


"Look, I was gonna go easy on you not to hurt your feelings."
"But I'm only going to get this one chance."
"Something's wrong, I can feel it."
Six minutes. Six Minutes. Six minutes, Slim Shady, you're on!
"You are just what the doc ordered."

I'm beginning to feel like a Rap God, Rap God
All my people from the front to the back nod, back nod
Now, who thinks their arms are long enough to slap box, slap box?
They said I rap like a robot, so call me Rap-bot

But for me to rap like a computer it must be in my genes
I got a laptop in my back pocket
My pen'll go off when I half-cock it
Got a fat knot from that rap profit
Made a livin' and a killin' off it
Ever since Bill Clinton was still in office
With Monica Lewinsky feelin' on his nutsack
I'm an MC still as honest
But as rude and as indecent as all hell
This flippity dippity-hippity hip-hop
You don't really wanna get into a pissin' match
With this rappity brat, packin' a MAC in the back of the Ac'
Backpack rap crap, yap-yap, yackety-yack
And at the exact same time I attempt these lyrical acrobat stunts while I'm practicin' that
I'll still be able to break a motherfuckin' table
Over the back of a couple of faggots, and crack it in half
Only realized it was ironic, I was signed to Aftermath after the fact
How could I not blow? All I do is drop F-bombs
Feel my wrath of attack
Rappers are havin' a rough time period, here's a maxi pad
It's actually disastrously bad for the wack
While I'm masterfully constructing this master piece

I'm beginning to feel like a Rap God, Rap God
All my people from the front to the back nod, back nod
Now, who thinks their arms are long enough to slap box, slap box?
Let me show you maintaining this shit ain't that hard, that hard
Everybody want the key and the secret
To rap immortality like I have got

Well, to be truthful the blueprint's
Simply rage and youthful exuberance
Everybody loves to root for a nuisance
Hit the Earth like an asteroid
MC's get taken to school with this music
'Cause I use it as a vehicle to "bust a rhyme"
Now I lead a new school full of students
Me? I'm a product of Rakim
Lakim Shabazz, 2Pac, N.W.A, Cube, hey Doc, Ren
Yella, Eazy, thank you, they got Slim
Inspired enough to one day grow up, blow up and be in a position
To meet Run–D.M.C. and induct them
Into the motherfuckin' Rock and Roll Hall of Fame
Even though I'll walk in the church and burst in a ball of flames
Only Hall of Fame I'll be inducted in is the alcohol of fame
You fags think it's all a game, 'til I walk a flock of flames
Off a plank and, tell me what in the fuck are you thinkin'?
Little gay-looking boy
So gay I can barely say it with a straight face, looking boy
You're witnessing a massacre
Like you're watching a church gathering take place, looking boy
"Oy vey, that boy's gay!", that's all they say, looking boy
You get a thumbs up, pat on the back
And a "way to go" from your label every day, looking boy
Hey, looking boy! What you say, looking boy?
I get a "hell yeah" from Dre, looking boy
I'ma work for everything I have, never ask nobody for shit
Get outta my face, looking boy!
Basically, boy, you're never gonna be capable
Of keeping up with the same pace, looking boy, 'cause—

I'm beginning to feel like a Rap God, Rap God
All my people from the front to the back nod, back nod
The way I'm racing around the track, call me NASCAR, NASCAR
Dale Earnhardt of the trailer park, the White Trash God
Kneel before General Zod
This planet's Krypton – no, Asgard, Asgard

So you be Thor and I'll be Odin
You rodent, I'm omnipotent
Let off, then I'm reloadin'
Immediately with these bombs I'm totin'
And I should not be woken
I'm the walking dead, but I'm just a talking head, a zombie floatin'
But I got your mom deep-throatin'
I'm out my Ramen Noodle
We have nothin' in common, poodle
I'm a Doberman, pinch yourself in the arm and pay homage, pupil
It's me, my honesty's brutal
But it's honestly futile if I don't utilize what I do though
For good at least once in a while
So I wanna make sure, somewhere in this chicken scratch I scribble and doodle enough rhymes
To maybe try to help get some people through tough times
But I gotta keep a few punchlines
Just in case, 'cause even you unsigned
Rappers are hungry looking at me like it's lunchtime
I know there was a time where once I
Was king of the underground
But I still rap like I'm on my Pharoahe Monch grind
So I crunch rhymes, but sometimes when you combine
Appeal with the skin color of mine
You get too big and here they come tryin'
To censor you, like that one line
I said on "I'm Back" from The Mathers LP 1 when I
Tried to say I'll take seven kids from Columbine
Put 'em all in a line, add an AK-47, a revolver and a 9
See if I get away with it now that I ain't as big as I was, but I'm
Morphin' into an immortal, comin' through the portal
You're stuck in a time warp from 2004 though
And I don't know what the fuck that you rhyme for
You're pointless as Rapunzel with fuckin' cornrows
You write normal? Fuck being normal!
And I just bought a new raygun from the future
Just to come and shoot ya, like when Fabolous made Ray J mad
'Cause Fab said he looked like a fag at Mayweather's pad
Singin' to a man while they played piano
Man, oh man, that was a 24/7 special on the cable channel
So Ray J went straight to the radio station
The very next day, "Hey Fab, I'ma kill you!"
Uh, summa-lumma, dooma-lumma, you assumin' I'm a human
What I gotta do to get it through to you? I'm superhuman
Innovative and I'm made of rubber, so that anything you say is ricocheting off of me and it'll glue to you and
I'm devastating, more than ever demonstrating
How to give a motherfuckin' audience a feeling like it's levitating
Never fading, and I know the haters are forever waiting
For the day that they can say I fell off, they'll be celebrating
'Cause I know the way to get 'em motivated
I make elevating music, you make elevator music
"Oh, he's too mainstream."
Well, that's what they do when they get jealous, they confuse it
"It's not hip-hop, it's pop," because I found a hella way to fuse it
With rock, shock rap with Doc
Throw on "Lose Yourself" and make 'em lose it
"I don't know how to make songs like that
I don't know what words to use."
Let me know when it occurs to you
While I'm rippin' any one of these verses that versus you
It's curtains, I'm inadvertently hurtin' you
How many verses I gotta murder to
Prove that if you were half as nice
Your songs you could sacrifice virgins to?
Ungh, school flunky, pill junkie
But look at the accolades these skills brung me
Full of myself, but still hungry
I bully myself 'cause I make me do what I put my mind to
And I'm a million leagues above you
Ill when I speak in tongues, but it's still tongue-in-cheek, fuck you!
I'm drunk – so Satan, take the fuckin' wheel!
I'm asleep in the front seat
Bumpin' Heavy D and the Boyz, still "Chunky but Funky"
But in my head there's something I can feel tugging and struggling
Angels fight with devils, and here's what they want from me
They're asking me to eliminate some of the women hate
But if you take into consideration the bitter hatred
I have, then you may be a little patient
And more sympathetic to the situation
And understand the discrimination
But fuck it, life's handin' you lemons, make lemonade then!
But if I can't batter the women
How the fuck am I supposed to bake them a cake then?
Don't mistake him for Satan; it's a fatal mistake
If you think I need to be overseas and take a vacation
To trip a broad, and make her fall on her face and
Don't be a retard – be a king? Think not
Why be a king when you can be a god?



I'm friends with the monster that's under my bed
Get along with the voices inside of my head
You're tryin' to save me, stop holdin' your breath
And you think I'm crazy, yeah, you think I'm crazy

I wanted the fame but not the cover of Newsweek
Oh well, guess beggars can't be choosey
Wanted to receive attention for my music
Wanted to be left alone in public, excuse me
For wantin' my cake, and eat it too, and wantin' it both ways
Fame made me a balloon ‘cause my ego inflated
When I blew, see, but it was confusing
‘Cause all I wanted to do's be the Bruce Lee of loose leaf
Abused ink, used it as a tool when I blew steam
Ooh! Hit the lottery, ooh-wee!
But with what I gave up to get it was bittersweet
It was like winnin' a used mink
Ironic ‘cause I think I'm gettin' so huge I need a shrink
Going coo-coo and kooky as Kool Keith
But I'm actually weirder than you think, ‘cause I'm—

I'm friends with the monster that's under my bed
Get along with the voices inside of my head
You're tryin' to save me, stop holdin' your breath
And you think I'm crazy, yeah, you think I'm crazy

Now, I ain't much of a poet
But I know somebody once told me to seize the moment
And don't squander it
‘Cause you never know when it all could be over tomorrow
So I keep conjurin'
Sometimes I wonder where these thoughts spawn from
Yeah, ponderin' will do you wonders
No wonder you're losing your mind, the way it wanders
Yodel-odel-ay-hee-hoo!
I think it went wanderin' off down yonder
And stumbled onto Jeff VanVonderen
‘Cause I need an interventionist
To intervene between me and this monster
And save me from myself and all this conflict
‘Cause the very thing that I love's killing me
And I can't conquer it
My OCD is conkin' me in the head, keep knockin'
Nobody's home, I'm sleepwalkin'
I'm just relayin' what the voice in my head's sayin'
Don't shoot the messenger, I'm just friends with the—

I'm friends with the monster that's under my bed
Get along with the voices inside of my head
You're tryin' to save me, stop holdin' your breath
And you think I'm crazy, yeah, you think I'm crazy

Call me crazy, but I have this vision
One day that I'll walk amongst you a regular civilian
But until then, drums get killed and
I'm comin' straight at MC's, blood gets spilled and
I'll take it back to the days that I'd get on a Dre track
Give every kid who got played that pumped-up feelin'
And shit to say back to the kids who played him
I ain't here to save the fuckin' children
But if one kid out of a hundred million
Who are going through a struggle feels it
And relates, that's great, it's payback, Russell Wilson
Falling way back in the draft
Turn nothin' into somethin', still can
Make that, straw into gold chump, I will spin
Rumpelstiltskin in a haystack
Maybe I need a straight jacket, face facts
I am nuts for real, but I'm okay with that
It's nothin', I'm still friends with the—

I'm friends with the monster that's under my bed
Get along with the voices inside of my head
You're tryin' to save me, stop holdin' your breath
And you think I'm crazy, yeah, you think I'm crazy
I'm friends with the monster that's under my bed
Get along with the voices inside of my head
You're tryin' to save me, stop holdin' your breath
And you think I'm crazy, yeah, you think I'm crazy



Now this shit's about to kick off, this party looks wack
Let's take it back to straight hip-hop and start it from scratch
I'm 'bout to bloody this track up, everybody get back
That's why my pen needs a pad, 'cause my rhymes on the rag
Just like I did with addiction, I'm 'bout to kick it
Like a magician, critics I turn to crickets
Got 'em still on the fence whether to picket
But quick to get it impaled when I tell 'em "Stick it!"
So sick I'm looking pale, wait, that's my pigment
'Bout to go ham, ya bish, shout out to Kendrick
Let's bring it back to that vintage Slim, bitch!
The art of MCing mixed with da Vinci and MC Ren
And I don't mean Stimpy's friend, bitch
Been Public Enemy since you thought PE was gym, bitch

Kick your shoes off, let your hair down
Grow your beard out, just weird out

We're gonna rock this house until we knock it down
So turn the volume loud
'Cause it's mayhem 'til the A.M.
So, baby, make just like K-Fed
And let yourself go, let yourself go
Say "Fuck it!" before we kick the bucket
Life's too short to not go for broke
So everybody, everybody, go berserk, grab your vial, yeah

Guess it's just the way that I'm dressed, ain't it?
Khakis pressed, Nike shoes crispy and fresh laced
So I guess it ain't that aftershave
Or cologne that made 'em just faint
Plus I showed up with a coat fresher than wet paint
So if love is a chess game, check mate
But girl, your body's bangin', jump me in, dang, bang-bang
Yes siree 'Bob', I was thinking the same thang
So come get on this Kid's rock, baw with da baw, dang-dang
Pow-p-p-p-pow, chica, pow, chica, wow-wow
Got your gal blowin' up a valve, valve-valve
Ain't slowin' down, throw in the towel, towel-towel
Dumb it down, I don't know how, huh-huh, how-how
At least I know that I don't know
Question is, are you bozos smart enough to feel stupid?
Hope so, now ho…

Kick your shoes off, let your hair down
Grow your beard out, just weird out

We're gonna rock this house until we knock it down
So turn the volume loud
'Cause it's mayhem 'til the A.M.
So crank the bass up like crazy
And let yourself go, let yourself go
Say "Fuck it!" before we kick the bucket
Life's too short to not go for broke
So everybody, everybody, go berzerk, get your vinyls!


They say that love is powerful as cough syrup in styrofoam
All I know is I fell asleep and woke up in that Monte Carlo
With the ugly Kardashian, Lamar, oh
Sorry yo, we done both set the bar low
Far as hard drugs are though, that's the past
But I done did enough codeine to knock Future into tomorrow
And girl, I ain't got no money to borrow
Oh, Marshall Mathers
Shithead with a potty mouth, get the bar of soap lathered
Kangol's and Carheartless Cargos
Girl, you're fixin' to get your heart broke
Don't be absurd, ma'am, you birdbrain, baby
I ain't called anybody baby since Birdman, unless you're a swallow
Word, Rick, word man, you heard
But don't get discouraged, girl
This is your jam, unless you got toe jam

Kick your shoes off, let your hair down
Grow your beard out, just weird out

We're gonna rock this house until we knock it down
So turn the volume loud
'Cause it's mayhem 'til the A.M.
So, baby, make just like K-Fed
And let yourself go, let yourself go
Say "Fuck it!" before we kick the bucket
Life's too short to not go for broke
So everybody, everybody, go berserk, grab your vial, yeah



"Look! If you had one shot, or one opportunity to seize everything you ever wanted in one moment, would you capture it or just let it slip?" Yo!

His palms are sweaty, knees weak, arms are heavy
He's nervous, but on the surface he looks calm and ready
To drop bombs, but he keeps on forgetting
What he wrote down, the whole crowd goes so loud
He opens his mouth, but the words won't come out
He's choking, how? Everybody's joking now
The clock's run out, time's up, over—blaow!
Snap back to reality, oh, there goes gravity, oh
There goes Rabbit, he choked, he's so mad, but he won't
Give up that easy, no, he won't have it, he knows
His whole back's to these ropes, it don't matter, he's dope
He knows that, but he's broke, he's so stagnant, he knows
When he goes back to this mobile home, that's when it's
Back to the lab again, yo! This whole rhapsody
Better go capture this moment and hope it don't pass him

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better…

His soul's escaping through this hole that is gaping
This world is mine for the taking, make me king
As we move toward a New World Order
A normal life is boring; but superstardom's
Close to post-mortem, it only grows harder
Homie grows hotter, he blows, it's all over
These hoes is all on him, coast-to-coast shows
He's known as the Globetrotter, lonely roads
God only knows, he's grown farther from home, he's no father
He goes home and barely knows his own daughter
But hold your nose, 'cause here goes the cold water
These hoes don't want him no mo', he's cold product
They moved on to the next schmoe who flows
He nose-dove and sold nada, and so the soap opera
Is told, it unfolds, I suppose it's old, partner

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better…

No more games, I'ma change what you call rage
Tear this motherfuckin' roof off like two dogs caged
I was playing in the beginning, the mood all changed
I've been chewed up and spit out and booed off stage
But I kept rhymin' and stepped right in the next cypher
Best believe somebody's paying the Pied Piper
All the pain inside amplified by the
Fact that I can't get by with my nine-to-
Five, and I can't provide the right type of
Life for my family 'cause, man, these goddamn
Food stamps don't buy diapers, and there's no movie
There's no Mekhi Phifer, this is my life
And these times are so hard, and it's getting even harder
Tryna feed and water my seed; plus, teeter-totter
Caught up between being a father and a prima donna
Baby mama drama, screaming on her
Too much for me to wanna stay in one spot
Another day of monotony's gotten me to the point
I'm like a snail, I've got to formulate a plot
Or end up in jail or shot
Success is my only motherfuckin' option—failure's not
Mom, I love you, but this trailer's got to go
I cannot grow old in Salem's Lot
This may be the only opportunity that I got

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better…

You can do anything you set your mind to, man



It's like I'm in this dirt, digging up old hurt
Tried everything to get my mind off you, it won't work
All it takes is one song on the radio, you're
Right back on it, reminding me all over again
How you fucking just brushed me off and left me so burnt
Spent a lot of time tryin' to soul search
Maybe I needed to grow up a little first
Well, looks like I hit a growth spurt
But I'm coming for closure
Don't suppose an explanation I'm owed, for
The way that you turned your back on me
Just when I may have needed you most
Oh, you thought it was over? You could just close the
Chapter and go about your life like it was nothing?
You ruined mine, but you seem to be doin' fine
Well, I've never recovered
But tonight I bet you that what you're 'bout to go through's tougher than anything I ever have suffered
Can't think of a better way to define poetic justice
Can I hold grudges? Mind saying, "Let it go, fuck this."
Hide the shovel and then drive off in the sunset."

I flee the scene like it was my last ride
You see right through
Oh, you had me pegged the first time
You can see the truth, but it's easier to justify
What's bad is good and I hate to be the bad guy
I just hate to be the bad guy
I just hate to be the bad guy

And to think I used to think you was the shit, bitch
To think it was you at one time I worshipped, shit
Think you can hurt people and just keep getting away with it?
Not this time, you better go and get the sewing kit, bitch!
Finish this stitch, so you can reap what you sew, nitwit
Thought some time would pass and I'd forget it? Forget it!
You left our family in shambles
And you expect me to just get over him, pretend he never existed?
May be gone, but he's not forgotten
And don't think ‘cause he's been out the pictures
So long that I've stopped the plottin' and still ain't comin' to get ya
You're wrong and that shit was rotten
And the way you played him, same shit you did to me; cold
Have you any idea the shit that I've gone through?
Feelings I harbor? All this pent-up resentment I hold on to?
Not once you call to ask me how I'm doin'
Letters, you don't respond to 'em
Fuck it, I'm coming to see you
And, gee, who better to talk to than you?
The cause of my problems
My life is garbage, and I'm 'bout to take it out on you
Poof, then I'm gone, voosh

I flee the scene like it was my last ride
You see right through
Oh, you had me pegged the first time
You can see the truth, but it's easier to justify
What's bad is good and I hate to be the bad guy
I just hate to be the bad guy
I just hate to be the bad guy

I've been drivin' around your side of this town
Like 9 frickin' hours and 45 minutes now
Finally I found your new address, park in your drive
Feel like I've been waiting on this moment all of my life
And it's now arrived, and my mouth is full of saliva
My knife is out and I'm ducking on the side of your house
See, it's sad it came to this point
Such a disappointment I had to make this appointment
To come and see ya, but I ain't here for your empathy
I don't need your apology or your friendship or sympathy
It's revenge that I seek
So I sneak vengefully, and treat your bedroom window
Continue to peep, still bent low, then keep
Tapping the glass lightly then start to crescendo, sneak
All the way 'round to the back porch
Man, door handles unlocked, shouldn't be that easy to do this
You don't plan for intruders beforehand?
Surprised to see me? Cat caught your tongue?
Gag, chloroform rag, gag, almost hack-up a lung
Like you picked an axe up and swung, stick to the core plan
Dragged to the back of a trunk by one of your fans
Irony's spectacular, huh? Now who's a faggot, you punk?
And here's your Bronco hat
You can have that shit back ‘cause they suck
It's just me, you and the music now, Slim, I hope you hear it
We're in the car right now – wait, here comes my favorite lyric
"I'm the bad guy who makes fun of people that die"
And hey, here's a sequel to my
Mathers LP just to try to get people to buy
How's this for a publicity stunt? This should be fun!
Last album now, ‘cause after this you'll be officially done
Eminem killed by M and M, Matthew Mitchell
Bitch, I even have your initials
I initially was gonna bury you next to my brother, but fuck it
Since you're in love with your city so much, I figured, what the fuck
The best place you could be buried alive is right here
Two more exits, time is quite near
Hope we don't get stopped, no license I fear
That sirens I hear? Guess 90 on the freeway wasn't the brightest idea, as cops appear in my driver's side mirror
Hope Foxtrot gets an aerial shot of your burial plot, at least
New plan, Stan!
Well, gotta go, almost at the bridge
Ha ha, big bro, it's for you, Slim, this is for him
And Frank Ocean; oh, hope you can swim good
Now say you hate homos again!
I also represent
Anyone on the receiving end of those jokes you offend
I'm the nightmare you fell asleep and then woke up still in
I'm your karma closing in with each stroke of a pen
Perfect time to have some remorse to show for your sin
Nope, it's hopeless, I'm the denial that you're hopelessly in
When they say all of this is approachin' its end
But you refuse to believe that it's over, here we go all over again
Back's to the wall, I'm stacking up all them odds
Toilets clogged, yeah, ‘cause I'm talking a lot of
Shit but I'm backing it all up
But in my head there's a voice in the back and it hollers
After the track is demolished, I am your lack of a conscience
I'm the ringing in your ears
I'm the polyps on the back of your tonsils
Eatin' your vocal chords after your concerts
I'm your time that's almost up that you haven't acknowledged
Grab for some water
But I'm that pill that's too jagged to swallow
I'm the bullies you hate that you became
With every faggot you slaughtered
Coming back on you, every woman you insult
Batter, but the double-standards you have
When it comes to your daughters
I represent everything you take for granted
‘Cause Marshall Mathers, the rapper's persona
Is half a facade, and Matthew and Stan's just symbolic
Of you not knowing what you had 'til it's gone
‘Cause after all the glitz and the glam
No more fans that are calling your name
Cameras are off, sad, but it happens to all of them
I'm the hindsight to say, “I told you so!”
Foreshadows of all the things that are to follow
I'm the future that's here to show you what happens tomorrow
If you don't stop after they call ya
Biggest laughing stock of rap who can't call it quits
When it's time to walk away, I'm every guilt trip
The baggage you have, but as you gather up all your possessions
If there's anything you have left to say
'Less it makes an impact, then don't bother
So 'fore you rest your case
Better make sure you're packin' a wallop
So, one last time, I'm back
Before it fades into black and it's all over
Behold the final chapter in a saga
Tryin' to recapture that lightning trapped in a bottle
Twice, the magic that started
It all, tragic portrait of an artist
Tortured, trapped in his own drawings
Tap into thoughts blacker and darker
Than anything imaginable; here goes a wild stab in the dark
As we pick up where the last Mathers left off




My tea's gone cold
I'm wondering why I got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad

Dear Slim, I wrote you, but you still ain't callin'
I left my cell, my pager and my home phone at the bottom
I sent two letters back in autumn, you must not've got 'em
There probably was a problem at the post office or somethin'
Sometimes I scribble addresses too sloppy when I jot 'em
But anyways, fuck it, what's been up, man? How's your daughter?
My girlfriend's pregnant too, I'm 'bout to be a father
If I have a daughter, guess what I'ma call her?
I'ma name her Bonnie
I read about your Uncle Ronnie too, I'm sorry
I had a friend kill himself over some bitch who didn't want him
I know you probably hear this every day, but I'm your biggest fan
I even got the underground shit that you did with Skam
I got a room full of your posters and your pictures, man
I like the shit you did with Rawkus too, that shit was phat
Anyways, I hope you get this, man, hit me back
Just to chat, truly yours, your biggest fan, this is Stan

My tea's gone cold
I'm wondering why I got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad

Dear Slim, you still ain't called or wrote, I hope you have a chance
I ain't mad, I just think it's fucked up you don't answer fans
If you didn't want to talk to me outside the concert
You didn't have to
But you coulda signed an autograph for Matthew
That's my little brother, man, he's only six years old
We waited in the blisterin' cold
For you, for four hours, and you just said no
That's pretty shitty, man, you're like his fuckin' idol
He wants to be just like you, man, he likes you more than I do
I ain't that mad though, I just don't like being lied to
Remember when we met in Denver?
You said if I'd write you, you would write back
He used to always cheat on my mom and beat her
I can relate to what you're sayin' in your songs
So when I have a shitty day, I drift away and put 'em on
‘Cause I don't really got shit else
So that shit helps when I'm depressed
I even got a tattoo of your name across the chest
Sometimes I even cut myself to see how much it bleeds
It's like adrenaline, the pain is such a sudden rush for me
See, everything you say is real, and I respect you ‘cause you tell it
My girlfriend's jealous ‘cause I talk about you 24/7
But she don't know you like I know you, Slim, no one does
She don't know what it was like for people like us growin' up
You gotta call me, man
I'll be the biggest fan you'll ever lose, sincerely yours, Stan
P.S. We should be together too

My tea's gone cold
I'm wondering why I got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad

Dear Mr. I'm-Too-Good-to-Call-or-Write-My-Fans
This'll be the last package I ever send your ass
It's been six months, and still no word — I don't deserve it?
I know you got my last two letters
I wrote the addresses on 'em perfect
So this is my cassette I'm sendin' you, I hope you hear it
I'm in the car right now, I'm doin' 90 on the freeway
Hey, Slim, I drank a fifth of vodka, you dare me to drive?
You know the song by Phil Collins, "In the Air of the Night"
About that guy who coulda saved that other guy from drownin'
But didn't, then Phil saw it all, then at a show he found him?
Now it's too late, I'm on a thousand downers now, I'm drowsy
And all I wanted was a lousy letter or a call
I hope you know I ripped all of your pictures off the wall
I loved you, Slim, we coulda been together — think about it!
You ruined it now, I hope you can't sleep and you dream about it
And when you dream I hope you can't sleep
And you scream about it; I hope your conscience eats at you
And you can't breathe without me
See, Slim— shut up, bitch! I'm tryin' to talk
Hey, Slim, that's my girlfriend screamin' in the trunk
But I didn't slit her throat, I just tied her up, see, I ain't like you
‘Cause if she suffocates she'll suffer more, and then she'll die too
Well, gotta go, I'm almost at the bridge now
Oh shit, I forgot, how am I supposed to send this shit out?!

My tea's gone cold
I'm wondering why I got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad

Dear Stan, I meant to write you sooner, but I just been busy
You said your girlfriend's pregnant now, how far along is she?
Look, I'm really flattered you would call your daughter that
And here's an autograph
For your brother; I wrote it on a Starter cap
I'm sorry I didn't see you at the show, I musta missed you
Don't think I did that shit intentionally just to diss you
But what's this shit you said about you like to cut your wrists too?
I say that shit just clownin', dawg, come on, how fucked up is you?
You got some issues, Stan, I think you need some counselin'
To help your ass from bouncin'
Off the walls when you get down some
And what's this shit about us meant to be together?
That type of shit'll make me not want us to meet each other
I really think you and your girlfriend need each other
Or maybe you just need to treat her better
I hope you get to read this letter
I just hope it reaches you in time
Before you hurt yourself, I think that you'll be doin' just fine
If you relax a little, I'm glad I inspire you, but Stan
Why are you so mad? Try to understand
That I do want you as a fan
I just don't want you to do some crazy shit
I seen this one shit on the news
A couple weeks ago that made me sick
Some dude was drunk and drove his car over a bridge
And had his girlfriend in the trunk
And she was pregnant with his kid
And in the car they found a tape, but they didn't say who it was to
Come to think about it, his name was… it was you, damn



This is survival of the fittest
This is do or die
This is the winner takes it all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all

Wasn't ready to be no millionaire, I was ill-prepared
I was prepared to be ill though, the skill was there
From the beginning it wasn't 'bout the ends
It was 'bout bustin' raps
Cut the fuckin' act like you're happy, I'm fuckin' back again
With another anthem – why stop when it doesn't have to end?
It ain't over 'til I say it's over, enough when I say enough
Throw me to them wolves and close the gate up
I'm afraid of what will happen to them wolves
When the thought of being thrown
Into an alligator pit, I salivate at it, wait is up
Hands up like it's 12 noon
Nah, homie, hold them bitches straighter up
Wave 'em 'til you dislocate a rotator cuff
Came up rough, came to ruffle feathers
Nah, egos, I ain't deflate enough
Last chance to make this whole stadium erupt, ‘cause—

This is survival of the fittest
This is do or die
This is the winner takes it all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all

I can see the finish line with each line that I finish
I'm so close to my goals, I can almost pole vault over the goal post
And if I don't got enough in the tank
Maybe I can just siphon enough
To fill up this last can, man, will I survive in this climate or what?
They said I was washed-up and got a bloodbath
Plus, I can just walk up to a mic and just bust
So, floor's open if you'd like to discuss
Top 5 in this muh'fucka, and if I don't make the cut
What? Like I give a fuck!
But I light this bitch up like I'm driving a truck
Through the side of a pump, 0 to 60, hop in and gun it
Like G-Unit without the hyphen, I'm hyping 'em up
And if there should ever come a time where my life's in a rut
And I look like I might just give up, eh, might've mistook
Me for bowin' out, I ain't takin' a bow
I'm stabbin' myself with a fuckin' knife in the gut
While I'm wipin' my butt
‘Cause I just shitted on the mic and I like gettin' cut
I get excited at the sight of my blood
You're in a fight with a nut
‘Cause I'ma fight 'til I die or win, bitin' the dust
It'll just make me angrier; wait, let me remind you of what
Got me this far, picture me quittin'
Now draw a circle around it and put a line through it, slut!
It's survival of what?

This is survival of the fittest
This is do or die
This is the winner takes it all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all

So, get your ideas, stack your ammo
But don't come unless you come to battle
Now mount up, jump in the saddle
This is it—it's what you eat, sleep, piss and shit
Live, breathe, your whole existence just consists of this
Refuse to quit, fuse is lit, can't defuse the wick
If I don't do this music shit, I'll lose my shit
Ain't got shit to lose, it's the moment of truth
But my respect is overdue
I'm showin' you the flow no one do
‘Cause I don't own no diploma for school, I quit
So there's nothin' for me to fall back on, I know no other trade
So you better trade your fuckin' mics in for some tool-box-es
‘Cause you'll never take my pride from me
It'll have to be pried from me
So, pull out your pliers and your screwdrivers!
But I want you to doubt me, I don't want you to buh-lieve
‘Cause this is somethin' that I must use to succeed
And if you don't like me, then fuck you! Self-esteem
Must be fuckin' shootin' through the roof, ‘cause trust me
My skin is too thick and bulletproof to touch me
I can see why the fuck I disgust you, I must be
Allergic to failure, ‘cause everytime I come close to it
I just sneeze, but I just go achoo then a-chieve!

This is survival of the fittest
This is do or die
This is the winner takes it all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all



I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
I walk on water

Why are expectations so high? Is it the bar I set?
My arms, I stretch, but I can't reach
A far cry from it, or it's in my grasp, but as
Soon as I grab, squeeze
I lose my grip like the flyin' trapeze
Into the dark I plummet, now the sky's blackening
I know the mark's high, butter–
flies rip apart my stomach
Knowin' that no matter what bars I come with
You're gonna harp, gripe, and
That's a hard Vicodin to swallow, so I scrap these
As pressure increases like khakis
I feel the ice cracking, because—

I walk on water
But I ain’t no Jesus
But only when it freezes

It's the curse of the standard
That the first of the Mathers discs set
Always in search of the verse that I haven't spit yet
Will this step just be another misstep
To tarnish whatever the legacy, love or respect
I've garnered? The rhyme has to be perfect, the delivery flawless
And it always feels like I'm hittin' the mark
'Til I go sit in the car, listen and pick it apart
Like, "This shit is garbage!"
God's given me all this, still I feel no different regardless
Kids look to me as a god, this is retarded
If only they knew, it's a facade and it's exhaustive
And I try not to listen to nonsense
But if you bitches are tryin' to strip me of my confidence
Mission accomplished
I'm not God-sent, Nas, Rakim, 'Pac, B.I.G., James Todd Smith
And I'm not Prince, so…

I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
I walk on water
But only when it freezes

'Cause I'm only human, just like you
Making my mistakes, oh if you only knew
I don't think you should believe in me the way that you do
'Cause I'm terrified to let you down, oh

It's true, I'm a Rubik's—a beautiful mess
At times juvenile, yes, I goof and I jest
A flawed human, I guess
But I'm doin' my best to not ruin your ex–
pectations and meet 'em, but first
The "Speedom" verse, now Big Sean
He's goin' too fast, is he gonna shout or curse out his mom?
There was a time I had the world by the balls, eatin' out my palm
Every album song I was spazzin' the fuck out on
And now I'm gettin' clowned and frowned on
But the only one who's looking down on
Me that matters now's DeShaun
Am I lucky to be around this long?
Begs the question though
Especially after the methadone
As yesterday fades and the Dresden home
Is burnt to the ground, and all that's left of my house is lawn
The crowds are gone
And it's time to wash out the blonde
Sales decline, the curtain's drawn
They're closin' the set, I'm still pokin' my head from out behind
And everyone who has doubt, remind
Now take your best rhyme, outdo it, now do it a thousand times
Now let 'em tell ya the world no longer cares or gives a fuck about your rhymes
And as I grow outta sight, outta mind, I might go outta mine
'Cause how do I ever let this mic go without a fight
When I made a fuckin' tightrope outta twine?
But when I do fall from these heights though, I'll be fine
I won't pout or cry or spiral down or whine
But I'll decide if it's my final bow this time around, 'cause—

I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
I walk on water
But only when it freezes

'Cause I'm only human, just like you
I've been making my mistakes, oh if you only knew
I don't think you should believe in me the way that you do
'Cause I'm terrified to let you down, oh
If I walked on water, I would drown

'Cause I'm just a man
But as long as I got a mic, I'm godlike
So me and you are not alike
Bitch, I wrote "Stan"




Mom, I know I let you down
And though you say the days are happy
Why is the power off and I'm fucked up?
And, Mom, I know he's not around
But don't you place the blame on me
As you pour yourself another drink, yeah

I guess we are who we are
Headlights shining in the dark night, I drive on
Maybe we took this too far

I went in headfirst, never thinkin' about who what I said hurt
In what verse, my mom probably got it the worst
The brunt of it, but as stubborn as we are, did I take it too far?
"Cleanin' Out My Closet" and all them other songs
But regardless, I don't hate you ‘cause, Ma
You're still beautiful to me, ‘cause you're my mom
Though far be it from you to be calm
Our house was Vietnam, Desert Storm
And both of us put together could form an atomic bomb
Equivalent to chemical warfare
And forever, we could drag this on and on, but
Agree to disagree, that gift for me up under the Christmas tree don't mean shit to me
You're kicking me out? It's 15 degrees and it's Christmas Eve
"Little prick, just leave!" Ma, let me grab my fucking coat
Anything to have each other's goats
Why we always at each other's throats?
Especially when Dad, he fucked us both
We're in the same fuckin' boat
Further away it drove us, but together, headlights shine
And a car full of belongings, still got a ways to go
Back to grandma's house – it's straight up the road
And I was the man of the house
The oldest, so my shoulders carried the weight of the load
Then Nate got taken away by the state at eight years old
And that's when I realized you were sick
And it wasn't fixable or changeable
And to this day we remain estranged, and I hate it though, but—

I guess we are who we are
Headlights shining in the dark night, I drive on
Maybe we took this too far

‘Cause to this day we remain estranged, and I hate it though
‘Cause you ain't even get to witness your grandbabies grow
But I'm sorry, Momma, for "Cleanin' Out My Closet"
At the time I was angry, rightfully? Maybe so
Never meant that far to take it though
‘Cause now I know it's not your fault, and I'm not making jokes
That song I no longer play at shows
And I cringe every time it's on the radio
And I think of Nathan being placed in a home
And all the medicine you fed us
And how I just wanted you to taste your own
But now the medication's taking over
And your mental state's deteriorating slow
And I'm way too old to cry, the shit is painful though
But, Ma, I forgive you, so does Nathan, yo
All you did, all you said, you did your best to raise us both
Foster care, that cross you bear
Few may be as heavy as yours, but I love you, Debbie Mathers
Oh, what a tangled web we have ‘cause
One thing I never asked was
Where the fuck my deadbeat dad was
Fuck it, I guess he had trouble keepin' up with every address
But I'da flipped every mattress, every rock and desert cactus
Owned a collection of maps
And followed my kids to the edge of the atlas
If someone ever moved 'em from me
That you coulda bet your asses
If I had to come down the chimney, dressed as Santa, kidnap 'em
And although one has only met their grandma once
You pulled up in our drive one night
As we were leavin' to get some hamburgers
Me, her and Nate, we introduced you, hugged you
And as you left I had this overwhelming sadness
Come over me as we pulled off to go our separate paths
And I saw your headlights as I looked back
And I'm mad I didn't get the chance to
Thank you for being my mom and my dad
So, Mom, please accept this as a tribute
I wrote this on the jet, I guess I had to get this off my chest
I hope I get the chance to lay it 'fore I'm dead
The stewardess said to fasten my seatbelt, I guess we're crashin'
So, if I'm not dreamin', I hope you get this message that
I'll always love you from afar, ‘cause you're my mom

I guess we are who we are
Headlights shining in the dark night, I drive on
Maybe we took this too far

So I'm coming home tonight
Well, no matter what the cost
And if the plane goes down
Or if the crew can't wake me up
Well, just know that I'm alright
I was not afraid to die
Oh, even if there's songs to sing
Well, my children will carry me
Just know that I'm alright
I was not afraid to die
Because I put my faith in my little girls
So I never say goodbye cruel world
Just know that I'm alright
I am not afraid to die

I guess we are who we are
Headlights shining in the dark night, I drive on
Maybe we took this too far
I want a new life




Two trailer park girls go 'round the outside
'Round the outside, 'round the outside
Two trailer park girls go 'round the outside
'Round the outside, 'round the outside

Guess who's back, back again
Shady's back, tell a friend
Guess who's back, guess who's back
Guess who's back, guess who's back

I've created a monster, ‘cause nobody wants to
See Marshall no more, they want Shady, I'm chopped liver
Well, if you want Shady, this is what I'll give ya
A little bit of weed mixed with some hard liquor
Some vodka that'll jump start my heart quicker
Than a shock when I get shocked at the hospital
By the doctor when I'm not co-operating
You waited this long, now stop debating
‘Cause I'm back, I'm on the rag and ovulating
I know that you got a job, Ms. Cheney
But your husband's heart problem's complicating
So the FCC won't let me be
Or let me be me, so let me see
They try to shut me down on MTV
But it feels so empty without me
So, come on and dip, bum on your lips
Fuck that! Cum on your lips and some on your tits
And get ready, ‘cause this shit's about to get heavy
I just settled all my lawsuits—fuck you, Debbie!

Now this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me!
‘Cause we need a little controversy
‘Cause it feels so empty without me
I said this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me!
‘Cause we need a little controversy
‘Cause it feels so empty without me

Little hellions, kids feeling rebellious
Embarrassed their parents still listen to Elvis
They start feeling like prisoners helpless
'Til someone comes along on a mission and yells, "Bitch!!!"
A visionary, vision is scary
Could start a revolution, polluting the airwaves
A rebel, so just let me revel and bask
In the fact that I got everyone kissing my ass {​​smack}​​
And it's a disaster, such a catastrophe
For you to see so damn much of my ass—you asked for me?
Well, I'm back, na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na
Fix your bent antenna, tune it in, and then I'm gonna
Enter in, and up under your skin like a splinter
The center of attention, back for the winter
I'm interesting, the best thing since wrestling
Infesting in your kid's ears and nesting
Testing, attention please
Feel the tension soon as someone mentions me
Here's my ten cents, my two cents is free
A nuisance, who sent? You sent for me?

Now this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me!
‘Cause we need a little controversy
‘Cause it feels so empty without me
I said this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me!
‘Cause we need a little controversy
‘Cause it feels so empty without me

A tisk-it a task-it, I'll go tit for tat with
Anybody who's talking "this shit, that shit"
Chris Kirkpatrick, you can get your ass kicked
Worse than them little Limp Bizkit bastards
And Moby? You can get stomped by Obie
You 36-year-old baldheaded fag, blow me!
You don't know me, you're too old, let go
It's over, nobody listens to techno
Now let's go, just give me the signal
I'll be there with a whole list full of new insults
I been dope, suspenseful with a pencil
Ever since Prince turned himself into a symbol
But sometimes the shit just seems
Everybody only wants to discuss me
So this must mean I'm disgusting
But it's just me, I'm just obscene
No, I'm not the first king of controversy
I am the worst thing since Elvis Presley
To do black music so selfishly
And use it to get myself wealthy
Twenty million other white rappers emerge
But no matter how many fish in the sea
It'll be so empty without me

Now this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me!
‘Cause we need a little controversy
‘Cause it feels so empty without me
I said this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me!
‘Cause we need a little controversy
‘Cause it feels so empty without me

Hum dei dei la la Hum dei dei la la la la la
Hum dei dei la la Hum dei dei la la la la la
Kids!



May I have your attention, please?
May I have your attention, please?
Will the real Slim Shady please stand up?
I repeat, will the real Slim Shady please stand up?
We're gonna have a problem here

Y'all act like you never seen a white person before
Jaws all on the floor like Pam like Tommy just burst in the door
And started whoopin' her ass worse than before
They first were divorced, throwin' her over furniture {Aww!}
It's the return of the "Ah, wait, no way, you're kidding
He didn't just say what I think he did, did he?"
And Dr. Dre said… nothing, you idiots!
Feminist women love Eminem
"Chicka, chicka, chicka, Slim Shady, I'm sick of him
Look at him, walkin' around, grabbin' his you-know-what
Flippin' the you-know-who," "Yeah, but he's so cute though."
Yeah, I probably got a couple of screws up in my head loose
But no worse than what's goin' on in your parents' bedrooms
Sometimes I wanna get on TV and just let loose
But can't, but it's cool for Tom Green to hump a dead moose
"My bum is on your lips, my bum is on your lips"
And if I'm lucky, you might just give it a little kiss
And that's the message that we deliver to little kids
And expect them not to know what a woman's clitoris is
Of course they're gonna know what intercourse is
By the time they hit fourth grade
They've got the Discovery Channel, don't they?
We ain't nothin' but mammals—well, some of us, cannibals
Who cut other people open like cantaloupes
But if we can hump dead animals and antelopes
Then there's no reason that a man and another man can't elope
But if you feel like I feel, I got the antidote
Women, wave your pantyhose, sing the chorus, and it goes—

I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?

Will Smith don't gotta cuss in his raps to sell records
Well, I do, so fuck him and fuck you too!
You think I give a damn about a Grammy?
Half of you critics can't even stomach me, let alone stand me
"But Slim, what if you win, wouldn't it be weird?"
Why, so you guys could just lie to get me here?
So you can sit me here next to Britney Spears?
Shit, Christina Aguilera better switch me chairs
So I can sit next to Carson Daly and Fred Durst
And hear 'em argue over who she gave head to first
Little bitch put me on blast on MTV
"Yeah, he's cute, but I think he's married to Kim, hee-hee."
I should download her audio on MP3
And show the whole world how you gave Eminem VD
I'm sick of you little girl and boy groups
All you do is annoy me, so I have been sent here to destroy you
And there's a million of us just like me
Who cuss like me, who just don't give a fuck like me
Who dress like me; walk, talk and act like me
And just might be the next best thing, but not quite me

'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?

I'm like a head trip to listen to, ‘cause I'm only givin' you
Things you joke about with your friends inside your livin' room
The only difference is I got the balls to say it in front of y'all
And I don't gotta be false or sugarcoat it at all
I just get on the mic and spit it
And whether you like to admit it, I just shit it
Better than 90% of you rappers out can
Kids eat up these albums like Valiums?"
It's funny, ‘cause at the rate I'm going, when I'm 30
I'll be the only person in the nursing home flirting
Pinching nurse's asses when I'm jacking off with Jergens
And I'm jerking, but this whole bag of Viagra isn't working
And every single person is a Slim Shady lurking
He could be working at Burger King, spittin' on your onion rings
Or in the parking lot, circling, screaming, "I don't give a fuck!"
With his windows down and his system up
So will the real Shady please stand up
And put one of those fingers on each hand up?
And be proud to be outta your mind and outta control
And one more time, loud as you can, how does it go?

I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?

Ha ha, I guess there’s a Slim Shady in all of us
Fuck it, let’s all stand up!




‘Cause sometimes you just feel tired, feel weak
And when you feel weak
You feel like you wanna just give up
But you gotta search within you
And gotta find that inner strength
And just pull that shit out of you
And get that motivation to not give up
And not be a quitter, no matter how bad you wanna just fall
Flat on your face and collapse

Till I collapse I'm spillin' these raps long as you feel 'em
Till the day that I drop you'll never say that I'm not killin' 'em
‘Cause when I am not, then I'ma stop pennin' 'em
And I am not hip hop and I'm just not Eminem
Subliminal thoughts, when I'ma stop sendin' 'em?
Women are caught in webs, spin 'em and hock venom
Adrenaline shots of penicillin could not get the illin' to stop
Amoxicillin's just not real enough
The criminal, cop killin', hip-hop villain
A minimal swap to cop millions of Pac listeners
You're comin' with me, feel it or not
You're gonna fear it like I showed you the spirit of God lives in us
You hear it a lot, lyrics to shock
Is it a miracle or am I just product of pop fizzin' up?
Fa shizzel, my wizzel, this is the plot, listen up
You bizzels forgot, Slizzel does not give a fuck

Till the roof comes off, till the lights go out
Till my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
Till the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
I'ma rip this shit till my bone collapse
Till the roof comes off, till the lights go out
Till my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
Till the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
I'ma rip this shit till my bone collapse

Music is like magic, there's a certain feelin' you get
When you real and you spit, and people are feelin' your shit
This is your moment, and every single minute you spend
Tryna hold on to it because you may never get it again
So while you're in it, try to get as much shit as you can
And when your run is over, just admit when it's at its end
'Cause I'm at the end of my wits with half the shit that gets in
I got a list, here's the order of my list that it's in
It goes Reggie, Jay-Z, 2Pac and Biggie
André from OutKast, Jada, Kurupt, Nas, and then me
But in this industry I'm the cause of a lot of envy
So when I'm not put on this list, the shit does not offend me
That's why you see me walk around like nothing's botherin' me
Even though half you people got a fuckin' problem with me
You hate it, but you know respect you got to give me
The press's wet dream, like Bobby and Whitney — Nate, hit me!

Till the roof comes off, till the lights go out
Till my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
Till the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
I'ma rip this shit till my bone collapse
Till the roof comes off, till the lights go out
Till my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
Till the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
I'ma rip this shit till my bone collapse

Soon as a verse starts, I eat at an emcee's heart
What is he thinking? How not to go against me, smart
And it's absurd how people hang on every word
I'll probably never get the props I feel I ever deserve
But I'll never be served, my spot is forever reserved
If I ever leave Earth, that would be the death of me first
‘Cause in my heart of hearts I know nothin' could ever be worse
That's why I'm clever when I put together every verse
My thoughts are sporadic, I act like I'm an addict
I rap like I'm addicted to smack like I'm Kim Mathers
But I don't want to go forth and back in constant battles
The fact is I would rather sit back and bomb some rappers
So this is like a full-blown attack I'm launchin' at 'em
The track is on some battlin' raps, who want some static?
‘Cause I don't really think that the fact that I'm Slim matters
A plaque and platinum status is whack if I'm not the baddest

Till the roof comes off, till the lights go out
Till my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
Till the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
I'ma rip this shit till my bone collapse
Till the roof comes off, till the lights go out
Till my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
Till the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
I'ma rip this shit till my bone collapse

I will not fall, I will stand tall
Feels like no one can beat me




It's either lust or a cloud of dust
Judgement is clouded; must
But I'm in something I don't know how to get out of
Left my girl in the house alone
Is that my soon-to-be-spouse’s moan?
And the further I walk, the louder
Pause for a minute to make certain that's what I heard
‘Cause after all, this is her place
So I give her the benefit of the doubt, I
Think I might be about to bust her, bust her
The thought's scary, yo, though and it hurts – brace
Hope it ain't, "Here we go, yo!"
‘Cause my head already goes to worst-case
Scenario, though in the first place
But you confirmed my low end theory though
Shoulda known when I made it all the way to third base
And that was only the first date
Coulda made it to home plate
But you slid straight for the dome and dove face first
Yeah, that ain't what they all say
I'll say, you can suck a softball through a straw
Used to be my fiancé
'Til you sucked on Wayne, André, and Kanye
LeBron, Akon, Jay, Lil Jon, Raekwon, Ma$e
Polow Tha Don, Dre, Dante Ross, James Conway, Kwame
Guess I'm gettin' my g-goddang Jigga on, eh?
‘Cause your name, I'm beyond sayin'
But fuck it, I'm movin' on, you women are all cray
But I'll probably always keep on playin'—

The game of love, love, love, love
La-la-la-la-la love

She doesn't love me, no, she don't love me no more
She hates my company, yeah, she don't love me no more
I tried to get her up out of my head, left my bags at the door
She screamed she loved me like she never did before
Go do whatcha want to do – I don't care!)
Go do whatcha want to do – I don't care!)

I told that bitch I'm a sucker for love, you a sucker for dick
Suckin' dick in your momma tub, then your granny walked in
Told the stupid nigga to duck under the water
He drowned, like an abortion
They booked you for manslaughter
You beat the case and I called ya
"Sherane is not available now, leave a message at the tone
And Kendrick, don't forget to buy two pair of those
Expensive heels, you little fuckin' Ferris Wheel
Fuckin' spinnin' on me – fuck you think, we gon' get married still?
Fuckin' Mary had a little lamb, this ain't no fairy tale
Fairy godmomma better tell you how I fuckin' feel
Like you should fuckin' beat it
Or fuckin' eat it while I'm on my period
Now have a blessed day." Bitch, you serious?
I'm in the mirror with this look on my face, curious
Why you ain't fuckin' with me, you cut me deep as a Caesarean
You know I want you bad as a Benjamin, I'm delirious
I want you bad as the head shattered on George Zimmerman
After the Dillinger hit him diligently and killin' him
His mouthpiece for a Cadillac emblem
That's analogy and metaphor for you
I should win a medal for all the ways I adore you
This is me talkin' cordial, yeah, I got some home trainin'
That ain't what you like, ain't it?
What about if I was as famous as Marshall?
Would you give fellatio in the carpool?
Cops pull us over, they just wanna know if you gargle
Singing, "I hope she's good enough"
Meanwhile you're chasin' her
Chlamydia couldn't even get rid of her
Pity the fool and pity the fool in me, I'ma live with the—

The game of love, love, love, love
La-la-la-la-la love

She doesn't love me, no, she don't love me no more
She hates my company, yeah, she don't love me no more
I tried to get her up out of my head, left my bags at the door
She screamed she loved me like she never did before
Go do whatcha want to do – I don't care!)
Go do whatcha want to do – I don't care!)

So needless to say I'm feelin' betrayed
Snatch my house key off her key chain
She jumps off Wee-Bey from The Wire's dick
Now she's chasin' me with a cheese grater
Here goes that broken record cliché
It's all my fault anyway, she's turning the tables, I'm a beat-break
She treats my face like Serato, she cuts and scratches like a DJ
Each day is an Instant Replay
They say what we display is symptomatic of addict behavior
Back together but forgot today was her b-day
She cut me off on the freeway
Simple misunderstanding, but just as I went to slam on the brakes
That's when I realized that she may be as crazy as me, wait
Bitch cut my fuckin' brakeline
Stepped on them fuckers eight times
Still goin' 73, thank God there's an exit comin' up
What the mother F-U-C-K's wrong with her?
Hit the off ramp 'til I coasted to a goddamn halt
Hit a fuckin' tree, now here she comes at full speed
She's racing at me, okay, you wanna fuck with me, eh?
Snatch the bitch out her car through the window
She screamin', I body slam her on the cement
Until the concrete gave and created a sinkhole
Buried this stink ho in it, then pay to have the street repaved
In a cold sweat like I got hit with a freeze ray during a heat wave
Guess I eventually caved though, ‘cause she's laying next to me in bed – directly aiming a gat at my head
Woke up again and jumped up
Like, "Fuck it! I've had it, I'm checkin' into rehab."
I confess I'm a static addict, I guess that's why I'm so clingy
Every girl I've ever had either says I got too much baggage
Or I'm too fuckin' dramatic
Man, what the fuck is the matter? I'm just a fuckin' romantic
I fuckin' love you, you fuckin' bitch!
Combative, possessive, in fact last time I was mad at an ex
I actually set off a chain reaction of tragic events
I said, "Hit the road" and after she left
I sent that bitch a text, I said, "Be careful driving
Don't read this and have an accident"
She glanced to look at it and wrecked
Too bad, thought we had a connect
No sense dwelling makes, never been a more compelling case
Than the model covered in L'Oreal and mace
Who fell from grace eleven stories for storytelling
While the whore was yelling, "Rape!"
'Til her vocal cords were swelling
And her voice were more hoarser than Tori Spellings' face
Still they swarm the gates and my fancy estates
To greet Norman Bates with a warm embrace
Unless you're Andrea Yates, don't ask me for a date
Don't be late, well, the sentiment's great
But wait, think there's been a mistake
You wanted an intimate date, I wanna intimidate
I have infinite hate in my blood
"Wait, dinner at eight?", I have infinite hate in my blood
It's mainly because of the game of—

Love, love, love, love
L-l, l-l-l-love



Now, everybody from the three-one-three
Put your motherfucking hands up and follow me!
Everybody from the three-one-three
Put your motherfucking hands up! Look, look...
Now, while he stands tough
Notice that this man did not have his hands up
This Free World's got you gassed up
Now, who's afraid of the Big Bad Wolf?
One, two, three, and to the four
One Pac, two Pac, three Pac, four
Four Pac, three Pac, two Pac, one
You're Pac, he's Pac, no Pac, none
This guy ain't no motherfucking MC
I know everything he's 'bout to say against me
I am white, I am a fucking bum
I do live in a trailer with my mom
My boy Future is an Uncle Tom
I do got a dumb friend named Cheddar Bob
Who shoots himself in his leg with his own gun
I did get jumped by all six of you chumps
And Wink did fuck my girl
I'm still standing here screaming, "Fuck the Free World!"
Don't ever try to judge me, dude
You don't know what the fuck I've been through
But I know something about you
You went to Cranbrook, that's a private school
What's the matter, dawg, you embarrassed?
This guy's a gangster? His real name's Clarence
And Clarence lives at home with both parents
And Clarence parents have a real good marriage
This guy don't wanna battle, he shook
'Cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
He's scared to death, he's scared to look
In his fucking yearbook; fuck Cranbrook!
Fuck the beat, I'll go a cappella
Fuck a Papa Doc, fuck a clock, fuck a trailer
Fuck everybody! Fuck y'all if you doubt me!
I'm a piece of fucking white trash, I say it proudly
And fuck this battle, I don't wanna win, I'm outtie
Here, tell these people something they don't know about me



Love, love
Love, love, love
Don't hurt me
Don't hurt me no more, no more
Love

Throw dirt on me and grow a wildflower
But it's "Fuck the world!" — get a child out her
Yeah, my life a bitch, but you know nothin' about her
Been to Hell and back, I can show you vouchers
I'm rollin' Sweets, I'm smokin' sour
Married to the game, but she broke her vows
That's why my bars are full of broken bottles
And my nightstands are full of open Bibles
I think about more than I forget
But I don't go 'round fire expectin' not to sweat
And these niggas know I lay 'em down, make your bed
Money outweighin' problems on the triple beam
I'm stickin' to the script, you niggas skippin' scenes
Be good or be good at it
Fuckin' right, I've got my gun, semi-Cartermatic
Yeah, put a dick in their mouth, so I guess it's "Fuck what they say!"
Man, I come down in a couple of days
Okay, you want me up in the cage
Then I'll come out in beast mode
I got this world stuck in the safe, combination is the G code
It's Weezy, motherfucker, Blood gang, and I'm in bleed mode
All about my dough, but I don't even check the peephole
So you can keep knockin' but won't knock me down
No love lost, no love found

It's a little too late to say that you're sorry now
You kicked me when I was down
You showed me nothin' but hate, you ran me into the ground
But what comes around goes around

I'm alive again, more alive than I have been
In my whole entire life; I can
See these people's ears perk up as I begin to spaz with the pen
I'm a little bit sicker than, most
Shit's finna get thick again
They say the competition is stiff
But I get a hard dick from this shit, and I stick it in
I ain't never givin' in again
Caution to the wind, complete freedom
Look at these rappers, how I treat 'em
So why the fuck would I join 'em when I beat 'em?
They call me a freak ‘cause I like to
Spit on these pussies 'fore I eat 'em
Man, get these whack cocksuckers off stage!
Where the fuck is Kanye when you need him?
Snatch the mic from 'em
Bitch, I'ma let you finish in a minute, yeah that rap was tight
But I'm 'bout spit the greatest verse of all time
So you might want to go back to the lab tonight and um
Scribble out them rhymes you were gonna spit
And start over from scratch and write new ones
But I'm afraid that it ain't gonna make no difference
When I rip this stage and tear it in half tonight
It's an adrenaline rush to feel the bass thump
From the place all the way to the parking lot, fellow
Set fire to the mic and ignite the crowd
You can see the sparks from hot metal
Cold-hearted, from the day I Bogarted
The game, my soul started to rot, fellow
When I'm not even in my harshest
You can still get roasted, ‘cause Marsh is not mellow
'Til I'm topplin' from the top, I'm not gonna stop
I'm standin' on my Monopoly board
That means I'm on top of my game
And it don't stop 'til my hip don't hop anymore
When you're so good that you can't say it
‘Cause it ain't even cool for you to sound cocky anymore
People just get sick ‘cause you spit
These fools can't drool or dribble a drop anymore
And you can never break my stride
You'll never slow the momentum at any moment
I'm 'bout to blow, you'll never take my pride
Killin' the flow, slow venom
And the opponent is gettin' no mercy, mark my words
Ain't lettin' up, relentless, I smell blood
Where was you when I fell and needed help up?
You get no love

It's a little too late to say that you're sorry now
You kicked me when I was down
You showed me nothin' but hate, you ran me into the ground
But what comes around goes around
Ha! Bitch, you get no love



Tell me where to go
Tell me what to do
I'll be right there for you
Tell me what to say
No matter if it's true
I'll say it all for you

I used to be the type of kid
That would always think the sky is fallin'
Why am I so differently wired? Am I a martian?
What kind of twisted experiment am I involved in?
‘Cause I don't belong in this world
That's why I'm scoffin' at authority, defiant often
Flyin' off at the handle at my mom
No dad, so I am noncompliant at home
At school I'm just shy and awkward
And I don't need no goddamn psychologist
Tryin' to diagnose why I have all these underlyin' problems
Thinkin' he can try and solve 'em
I'm outside chalkin' up drawings
On the sidewalk and in the front drive talkin'
To myself, either that or inside hidin' off in
The corner somewhere quiet, tryin' not to
Be noticed ‘cause I'm cryin' and sobbin'
I had a bad day at school so I ain't talkin'
Some cocksucker shoved me into a fuckin' locker
‘Cause he said that I eye-balled him

And if you fall, I'll catch you there
I'll be your savior from all the wars
That are fought inside your world
Please have faith in my words

‘Cause this is my legacy, legacy, yeah
This is my legacy, legacy, yeah
There's no guarantee
It's not up to me, we can only see
This is my legacy, legacy, legacy, legacy

I used to be the type of kid that would always think the sky's fallin'
Why am I so differently wired in my noggin?
‘Cause sporadic as my thoughts come, it's mind-bogglin'
‘Cause I obsess on everything in my mind, small shit
Bothers me, but not my father, he said sayonara
Then split, but I don’t give a shit
I'm fine long as there's batteries in my Walkman
Nothing is the matter with me
Shit, look on the bright side, at least I ain't walkin'
I bike ride through the neighborhood of my apartment
Complex on a ten-speed which I've acquired parts that
I find in the garbage, a frame, then put tires on it
Headphones on, look straight ahead if kids try and start shit
But if this is all there is for me, life offers
Why bother even tryin' to put up a fight? It's nonsense
But I think a light bulb just lit up in my conscience
What about them rhymes I've been jottin'?
They are kind of giving me confidence
Instead of tryin' to escape through my comics
Why don't I just blast a little something like Onyx?
To put me in the mood to wanna fight and write songs that
Say what I want to say to the kid that said that I eye-balled him
Grab hold of my balls, like, "That's right, fight's on, bitch!"
Who woulda knew, from the moment I turned the mic on, that
I could be iconic in my conquest?
That's word to Phife Dawg from A Tribe Called Quest

This is my legacy, legacy, yeah
This is my legacy, legacy, yeah
There's no guarantee
It's not up to me, we can only see
This is my legacy, legacy, legacy, legacy

I used to be the type of kid that would always think the sky's fallin'
Now I think the fact that I'm differently wired's awesome
‘Cause if I wasn't, I wouldn't be able to work words like this
And connect lines like crosswords
And use my enemy's words as strength
To try and draw from, and get inspired off 'em
‘Cause all my life I was told and taught I am not shit
By you wack fuckin' giant sacks of lyin' dog shit
Now you shut up, bitch, I am talkin'
Thought I was full of horseshit
And now you fuckin' worship the ground on which I am walkin'
Me against the world, so what? I'm Brian Dawkins
Versus the whole 0-16 Lions offense
So bring on the Giants, Falcons, and Miami Dolphins
It's the body bag game, bitch, I'm supplyin' coffins
‘Cause you dicks butt kiss, bunch of Brian Baldingers
You're gon' die a ball licker, I've been diabolical
With this dialogue since '99 Rawkus
You don't respect the legacy I leave behind, y'all can
Suck a dick; the day you beat me, pigs'll fly out my ass
In a flying saucer full of Italian sausage
The most high exaltin' and I ain't haltin'
'Til I die of exhaustion, inhale my exhaust fumes
The best part about me is I am not you
I'm me, and I'm the Fire Marshall, and this is my—

This is my legacy, legacy, yeah
This is my legacy, legacy, yeah
There's no guarantee
It's not up to me, we can only see
This is my legacy, legacy, legacy, legacy




Feels like a close, it's coming to
Fuck am I gonna do?
It's too late to start over
This is the only thing I, thing I know

Sometimes I feel like all I ever do is
Find different ways to word the same old song
Ever since I came along
From the day the song called “Hi! My Name Is” dropped
Started thinking my name was Fault
‘Cause any time things went wrong
I was the one who they would blame it on
The media made me the equivalent
Of a modern-day Genghis Khan
Tried to argue it was only entertainment, dog
Gangster? Nah, courageous balls
Had to change my style, they said I'm way too soft
And I sound like AZ and Nas, out came the claws
And the fangs been out since then
But up until the instant that I went against it
It was ingrained in me
That I wouldn't amount to a shitstain, I thought
No wonder I had to unlearn everything my brain was taught
"Do I really belong in this game?", I pondered
I just wanna play my part
Should I make waves or not?
So back and forth in my brain the tug of war wages on
And I don't wanna seem ungrateful
Or disrespect the artform I was raised upon
But sometimes you gotta take a loss
And have people rub it in your face
Before you get made pissed off
And keep plugging, it's your only outlet
And your only outfit, so you know they gonna talk about it
Better find a way to counter it quick and make it… ah
Feel like I've already said this a kabillion eighty times
How many times can I say the same thing
Different ways that rhyme?
What I really wanna say is, if there's anyone else that can relate to my story, bet you feel the same way I felt
When I was in the same place you are, when I was afraid to—

I was a… afraid to make a single sound
Afraid I would never find a way out, out, out
Afraid I'd never be found
I didn't wanna go another round
An angry man's power will shut you up
Trip wires fill this house with tip-toed love
Run out of excuses for everyone
So here I am and I will not run

Guts over fear, the time is near
Guts over fear, I shed a tear
For all the times I let you push me 'round
I let you keep me down
Now I got guts over fear, guts over fear

Feels like a close, it's coming to
Fuck am I gonna do?
It's too late to start over
This is the only thing I, thing I know

I know what it was like, I was there once
Single parents, hate your appearance
As you struggle to find your place in this world
And the pain spawns all the anger on
But it wasn't 'til I put the pain in song
Learned who to aim it on that I made a spark
Started to spit harder shit
Learned how to harness it while the reins were off
And there was a lot of bizarre shit, but the crazy part
Was soon as I stopped saying I gave a fuck
Haters started to appreciate my art
And it just breaks my heart to look at all the pain I caused
But what am I gonna do when the rage is gone
And the lights go out in that trailer park
And the window is closing and there's nowhere else that I can go with flows and I'm frozen
‘Cause there's no more emotion for me to pull from
Just a bunch of playful songs that I make for fun
So, to the break of dawn, here I go recycling the same old song
But I rather make “Not Afraid 2”
Than make another motherfucking “We Made You,” ah
Now, I don't wanna seem indulgent
When I discuss my lows and my highs
My demise and my uprise, pray to God
I just open enough eyes later on
And gave you the supplies and the tools
To hopefully use that'll make you strong
Enough to lift yourself up, when you feel like I felt
‘Cause I can't explain to y'all how dang exhausted my legs felt
Just having to balance my dang self
When on eggshells, I was made to walk
But thank you, Ma, ‘cause that gave me the
Strength to cause Shady-mania, so when they empty that stadium
Least I made it out of that house
And found a place in this world when the day was done
So this is for every kid who all's they ever did
Was dreamt of one day just getting accepted
I represent him or her, anyone similar
You are the reason that I made this song
And everything you're scared to say
Don't be afraid to say no more
From this day forward, just let them a-holes talk
Take it with a grain of salt and eat their fucking faces off
The legend of the angry blonde
Lives on through you when I’m gone, and to think I was a—

I was a… afraid to make a single sound
Afraid I would never find a way out, out, out
Afraid I'd never be found
I didn't wanna go another round
An angry man's power will shut you up
Trip wires fill this house with tip-toed love
Run out of excuses for everyone
So here I am and I will not run

Guts over fear, the time is near
Guts over fear, I shed a tear
For all the times I let you push me 'round
I let you keep me down
Now I got guts over fear, guts over fear



Just gonna stand there and watch me burn
Well, that's all right
Because I like the way it hurts
Just gonna stand there and hear me cry
Well, that's all right
Because I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie

I can't tell you what it really is
I can only tell you what it feels like
And right now there's a steel knife in my windpipe
I can't breathe, but I still fight while I can fight
As long as the wrong feels right, it's like I'm in flight
High off her love, drunk from her hate
It's like I'm huffin' paint
And I love her the more I suffer, I suffocate
And right before I'm about to drown she resuscitates me
She fuckin' hates me, and I love it, “Wait!
Where you going?”, “I'm leaving you.” “No, you ain't
Come back!” We're runnin' right back, here we go again
It's so insane, 'cause when it's goin' good it's goin' great
I'm Superman with the wind at his back, she's Lois Lane
But when it's bad it's awful, I feel so ashamed
I snap, “Who's that dude?”, I don't even know his name
I laid hands on him, I'll never stoop so low again
I guess I don't know my own strength

Just gonna stand there and watch me burn
Well, that's all right
Because I like the way it hurts
Just gonna stand there and hear me cry
Well, that's all right
Because I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie

You ever love somebody so much
You can barely breathe when you're with 'em?
You meet, and neither one of you even know what hit 'em
Got that warm fuzzy feelin'
Yeah, them chills used to get 'em
Now you're gettin' fuckin' sick of lookin' at 'em?
You swore you'd never hit 'em, never do nothin' to hurt 'em
Now you're in each other's face
Spewin' venom in your words when you spit 'em
You push, pull each other's hair, scratch, claw, bit 'em
Throw 'em down, pin 'em
So lost in the moments when you're in 'em
It's the rage that took over, it controls you both
So they say it's best to go your separate ways
Guess that they don't know ya
'Cause today, that was yesterday, yesterday is over
It's a different day, sound like broken records playin' over
But you promised her, next time you'd show restraint
You don't get another chance, life is no Nintendo game
But you lied again
Now you get to watch her leave out the window
Guess that's why they call it window pane

Just gonna stand there and watch me burn
Well, that's all right
Because I like the way it hurts
Just gonna stand there and hear me cry
Well, that's all right
Because I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie

Now, I know we said things, did things that we didn't mean
And we fall back into the same patterns, same routines
But your temper's just as bad as mine is
You're the same as me when it comes to love
You're just as blinded, baby, please
Come back, it wasn't you, baby, it was me
Maybe our relationship isn't as crazy as it seems
Maybe that's what happens when a tornado meets a volcano
All I know is I love you too much to walk away though
Come inside, pick up your bags off the sidewalk
Don't you hear sincerity in my voice when I talk?
Told you this is my fault, look me in the eyeball
Next time I'm pissed I'll aim my fist at the drywall
Next time? There won't be no next time!
I apologize even though I know it's lies
I'm tired of the games, I just want her back
I know I'm a liar, if she ever tries to fuckin' leave again
I'ma tie her to the bed and set this house on fire

Just gonna stand there and watch me burn
Well, that's all right
Because I like the way it hurts
Just gonna stand there and hear me cry
Well, that's all right
Because I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie



Yeah, I know sometimes
Things may not always make sense to you right now
But hey, what'd Daddy always tell you?
Straighten up, little soldier!
Stiffen up that upper lip!
What you cryin' about? You got me

Hailie, I know you miss your mom
And I know you miss your dad when I'm gone
But I'm tryin' to give you the life that I never had
I can see you're sad
Even when you smile, even when you laugh
I can see it in your eyes, deep inside you wanna cry
‘Cause you're scared, I ain't there
Daddy's with you in your prayers
No more crying, wipe them tears
Daddy's here, no more nightmares
We gon' pull together through it, we gon' do it
Lainie, Uncle's crazy, ain't he?
Yeah, but he loves you, girl, and you better know it
We're all we got in this world
When it spins, when it swirls, when it whirls, when it twirls
Two little beautiful girls
Looking puzzled, in a daze, I know it's confusing you
Daddy's always on the move
Momma's always on the news
I try to keep you sheltered from it, but somehow it seems
The harder that I try to do that, the more it backfires on me
All the things growing up as Daddy that he had to see
Daddy don't want you to see
But you see just as much as he did
We did not plan it to be this way, your mother and me
But things have got so bad between us
I don't see us ever being together ever again
Like we used to be when we was teenagers
But then, of course, everything always happens for a reason
I guess it was never meant to be
But it's just something we have no control over
And that's what destiny is
But no more worries, rest your head and go to sleep
Maybe one day we'll wake up and this'll all just be a dream

Now hush, little baby, don't you cry
Everything's gonna be alright
Stiffen that upper lip up, little lady, I told ya
Daddy's here to hold ya through the night
I know Mommy's not here right now
And we don't know why
We fear how we feel inside
It may seem a little crazy, pretty baby
But I promise, Momma's gon' be alright

Heh, it's funny
I remember back one year when Daddy had no money
Mommy wrapped the Christmas presents up
And stuck 'em under the tree
And said some of 'em were from me
‘Cause daddy couldn't buy 'em
I'll never forget that Christmas I sat up the whole night cryin'
‘Cause Daddy felt like a bum – see, Daddy had a job
But his job was to keep the food on the table for you and Mom
And at the time, every house that we lived in
Either kept gettin' broken into and robbed or shot up on the block
And your mom was saving money for you in a jar
Tryin' to start a piggy bank for you so you could go to college
Almost had a thousand dollars
'Til someone broke in and stole it
And I know it hurt so bad it broke your momma's heart
And it seemed like everything was just starting to fall apart
Mom and Dad was arguing a lot
So Momma moved back on to Chalmers
In the flat, one bedroom apartment
And Dad moved back to the other side of 8 Mile on Novara
And that's when Daddy went to California with his CD
And met Dr. Dre, and flew you and Momma out to see me
But Daddy had to work, you and Momma had to leave me
Then you started seeing Daddy on the TV
And Momma didn't like it
And you and Lainie were too young to understand it
Papa was a rolling stone, Momma developed a habit
And it all happened too fast for either one of us to grab it
I'm just sorry you were there and had to witness it first hand
‘Cause all I ever wanted to do was just make you proud
Now I'm sittin' in this empty house
Just reminiscing, looking at your baby pictures, it just trips me out
To see how much you both have grown
It's almost like you're sisters now
Wow, guess you pretty much are, and Daddy's still here
Lainie, I'm talking to you too, Daddy's still here
I like the sound of that, yeah, it's got a ring to it, don't it?
Sssshhh! Momma's only gone for the moment

Now hush, little baby, don't you cry
Everything's gonna be alright
Stiffen that upper lip up, little lady, I told ya
Daddy's here to hold ya through the night
I know Mommy's not here right now
And we don't know why
We fear how we feel inside
It may seem a little crazy, pretty baby
But I promise, Momma's gon' be alright

And if you ask me to, Daddy's gonna buy you a mockingbird
I'ma give you the world
I'ma buy a diamond ring for you, I'ma sing for you
I'll do anything for you to see you smile
And if that mockingbird don't sing and that ring don't shine
I'ma break that birdie's neck
I'll go back to the jeweler who sold it to ya



Yeah, it's been a ride
I guess I had to go to that place to get to this one
Now some of you might still be in that place
If you're tryin' to get out
Just follow me, I'll get you there

You can try and read my lyrics off of this paper before I lay 'em
But you won't take the sting out these words before I say 'em
'Cause ain't no way I'ma let you stop me from causin' mayhem
When I say I'ma do somethin', I do it, I don't give a damn
What you think, I'm doin' this for me, so fuck the world
Feed it beans, it's gassed up if it thinks it's stoppin' me
I'ma be what I set out to be, without a doubt, undoubtably
And all those who look down on me
I'm tearin' down your balcony
No ifs, ands or buts, don't try to ask him why or "how can he"
From Infinite down to the last Relapse album, he's
Still shittin', whether he's on salary, paid hourly
Until he bows out or he shits his bowels out of him
Whichever comes first, for better or worse
He's married to the game
Forget the Earth, he's got the urge to pull his dick from the dirt
And fuck the whole Universe

I'm not afraid to take a stand
Everybody, come take my hand
We'll walk this road together, through the storm
Whatever weather, cold or warm
Just lettin' you know that you're not alone
Holla if you feel like you've been down the same road

Okay, quit playin' with the scissors and shit, and cut the crap
I shouldn't have to rhyme these words in a rhythm
For you to know it's a wrap
You said you was king, you lied through your teeth
For that, fuck your feelings
Instead of gettin' crowned you're gettin' capped
And to the fans, I'll never let you down again, I'm back
I promise to never go back on that promise
In fact, let's be honest, that last Relapse CD was “ehhhh”
Perhaps I ran them accents into the ground
Relax, I ain't goin' back to that now
All I'm tryin' to say is get back, click-clack BLAOW
‘Cause I ain't playin' around
There's a game called circle and I don't know how
I'm way too up to back down
But I think I'm still tryin' to figure this crap out
Thought I had it mapped out
But I guess I didn't, this fuckin' black cloud
Still follows me around, but it's time to exorcise these demons
These muh'fuckers are doin' jumpin' jacks now

I'm not afraid to take a stand
Everybody, come take my hand
We'll walk this road together, through the storm
Whatever weather, cold or warm
Just lettin' you know that you're not alone
Holla if you feel like you've been down the same road

And I just can't keep livin' this way
So startin' today, I'm breakin' out of this cage
I'm standin' up, I'ma face my demons
I'm mannin' up, I'ma hold my ground
I've had enough, now I'm so fed up
Time to put my life back together right now

It was my decision to get clean, I did it for me
Admittedly I probably did it subliminally for you
So I could come back a brand-new me
You helped see me through
And don't even realize what you did, believe me you
I've been through the wringer
But they can do little to the middle finger
I think I got a tear in my eye, I feel like the king of
My world, haters can make like bees with no stingers
No more drama from now on, I promise
To focus solely on handlin' my responsibilities as a father
So I solemnly swear to always treat this roof like my daughters
And raise it, you couldn't lift a single shingle on it
‘Cause the way I feel, I'm strong enough to go to the club
Or the corner pub and lift the whole liquor counter up
‘Cause I'm raisin' the bar
I'd shoot for the moon, but I'm too busy gazin' at stars
I feel amazin', and I'm—

I'm not afraid to take a stand
Everybody, come take my hand
We'll walk this road together, through the storm
Whatever weather, cold or warm
Just lettin' you know that you're not alone
Holla if you feel like you've been down the same road



You used to say that I'd never be
Nothin' without you, and I'd believe
I'm shot in the lungs, I gasp, I can't breathe
Just lay here with me, baby, hold me please
And I'd beg and I'd plead, drop to knees
And I'd cry and I'd scream, "Baby, please don't leave!"
Snatch the keys from your hand, I would squeeze
And you'd laugh, and you'd tease
You're just fucking with me, and you must hate me
Why do you date me, if you say I make you sick?
And you've had enough of me
I smother you, I'm 'bout to jump off the edge

But you won't break me
You'll just make me stronger than I was
Before I met you, I bet you I'll be just fine without you
And if I stumble, I won't crumble
I'll get back up and uhh
But I'ma still be humble when I scream "Fuck you!"
‘Cause I'm stronger than I was

A beautiful face is all that you have
‘Cause on the inside you're ugly and mad
But you're all that I love, I grasp, you can't leave
Please stay here with me, baby, hold me please
And I'd beg and I'd plead, drop to knees
And I'd cry and I'd scream, "Baby, please don't leave!"
But you left and you took everything I had left
And left nothin', nothin' for me
So, please don't wake me from this dream, baby
We're still together in my head
And you're still in love with me
'Til I woke up to discover that that dream was dead

But you won't break me
You'll just make me stronger than I was
Before I met you, I bet you I'll be just fine without you
And if I stumble, I won't crumble
I'll get back up and uhh
But I'ma still be humble when I scream "Fuck you!"
‘Cause I'm stronger than I was

You walked out, I almost died
It was almost a homicide
That you caused, ‘cause I was so traumatized
Felt like I was in for a long bus ride
I'd rather die than you not be by my side
Can't count how many times I vomited, cried
Go to my room, turn the radio on and hide
Thought we were Bonnie and Clyde
Nah, on the inside you were Jekyll and Hyde
I felt like my whole relationship with you was a lie
It was you and I, why did I think it was ride or die?
‘Cause if you coulda took my life you woulda
It's like you put a knife through my chest
And pushed it right through to the
Other side of my back and stuck a spike too, shoulda
Put up more of a fight, but I couldn't
At the time, no one could hurt me like you coulda
Take you back now, what's the likelihood of that?
Bite me, bitch, chew on a nineteen footer!
‘Cause this morning I finally stood up
Held my chin up, finally showed a sign of life in me for the
First time since you left me
And left me with nothin' but shattered dreams
And the life we coulda had and we coulda been
But I'm breakin' out of this slump I'm in
Pullin' myself out of the dumps once again
I'm gettin' up once and for all – fuck this shit!
I'ma be late for the pity party
But you're never gonna beat me to the fuckin' punch again
Took it on the chin like a champ
So don't lump me in with them chump-ions
I'm done bein' your punching bag
It was the November 31st today
Woulda been our anniversary
Two years, but you left on the 1st of May
I wrote it on a calendar, was gonna call
But couldn't think of the words to say
But they came to me just now, so I put 'em in a verse to lay

And I thank you, ‘cause you made me
A better person than I was
But I hate you, ‘cause you drained me
I gave you all, you gave me none
But if you blame me, you're crazy
And after all is said and done
I'm still angry, yeah, I may be
I may never trust someone

But you won't break me
You'll just make me stronger than I was
Before I met you, I bet you I'll be just fine without you
And if I stumble, I won't crumble
I'll get back up and uhh
But I'ma still be humble when I scream "Fuck you!"
‘Cause I'm stronger than I was




Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady

Excuse me!
Can I have the attention of the class for one second?

Hi, kids! Do you like violence? Wanna see me stick nine inch nails through each one of my eyelids?
Wanna copy me and do exactly like I did?
Try 'cid and get fucked up worse than my life is?
My brain's dead weight, I'm trying to get my head straight
But I can't figure out which Spice Girl I want to impregnate
And Dr. Dre said "Slim Shady, you a basehead!"
Uh-uhhh! "So why's your face red? Man, you wasted!"
Well, since age twelve I felt like I'm someone else
‘Cause I hung my original self from the top bunk with a belt
Got pissed off and ripped Pamela Lee's tits off, and smacked her so hard I knocked her clothes backwards like Kris Kross
I smoke a fat pound of grass, and fall on my ass
Faster than a fat bitch who sat down too fast
Come here, slut! "Shady, wait a minute, that's my girl, dog!"
I don't give a fuck, God sent me to piss the world off

Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady

My English teacher wanted to flunk me in junior high
Thanks a lot, next semester I'll be 35
I smacked him in his face with an eraser
Chased him with a stapler, stapled his nuts to a stack of papers
Walked in the strip club, had my jacket zipped up
Flashed the bartender, then stuck my dick in the tip cup
Extraterrestrial, running over pedestrians in a spaceship
While they're screaming at me, "Let's just be friends!"
99 percent of my life I was lied to
I just found out my mom does more dope than I do
I told her I'd grow up to be a famous rapper
Make a record about doing drugs and name it after her
You know you blew up when the women rush your stands
And try to touch your hands like some screaming Usher fans
This guy at White Castle asked for my autograph

Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady

Dr. Dre, don't just stand there, operate!
I'm not ready to leave, it's too scary to die
I'll have to be carried inside the cemetery and buried alive
Am I coming or going? I can barely decide
I just drank a fifth of vodka, dare me to drive?
All my life I was very deprived
I ain't had a woman in years, my palms too hairy to hide
Clothes ripped like the Incredible Hulk
I spit when I talk, I'll fuck anything that walks
When I was little I used to get so hungry I would throw fits
How you gonna breastfeed me, Mom? You ain't got no tits!
I lay awake and strap myself in the bed
Put a bulletproof vest on and shoot myself in the head
I'm steaming mad and by the way, when you see my dad
Tell him that I slit his throat in this dream I had

Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady



Step by step, heart to heart
Left, right, left
We all fall down

Step by step, heart to heart
Left, right, left
We all fall down like toy soldiers
Bit by bit, torn apart
We never win
But the battle wages on for toy soldiers

I'm supposed to be the soldier who never blows his composure
Even though I hold the weight of the whole world on my shoulders, I ain't never supposed to show it
My crew ain't supposed to know it
Even if it means goin' toe to toe with a Benzino
It don't matter, I'd never drag them in battles that I can handle
'Less I absolutely have to, I'm supposed to set an example
I need to be the leader, my crew looks for me to guide 'em
If some shit ever does pop off I'm supposed to be beside 'em
That Ja shit, I tried to squash it, it was too late to stop it
There's a certain line you just don't cross, and he crossed it
I heard him say Hailie's name on a song and I just lost it
It was crazy, the shit went way beyond some Jay Z and Nas shit
And even though the battle is won, I feel like we lost it
I spent so much energy on it, honestly I'm exhausted
And I'm so caught in it, I almost feel I'm the one who caused it
This ain't what I'm in hip-hop for, it's not why I got in it
That was never my object, for someone to get killed
Why would I want to destroy something I helped build?
It wasn't my intentions, my intentions were good
I went through my whole career without ever mentionin' {Suge}
And that was just outta respect, for not runnin' my mouth
And talkin' about somethin' that I knew nothin' about
Plus Dre told me stay out, this just wasn't my beef
So I did, I just fell back, watched and gritted my teeth
While he's all over TV, down-talkin' the man
Who literally saved my life, like fuck it, I understand
This is business, and this shit just isn't none of my business
I'm still knowin' this shit could pop off at any minute, ‘cause—

Step by step, heart to heart
Left, right, left
We all fall down like toy soldiers
Bit by bit, torn apart
We never win
But the battle wages on for toy soldiers

There used to be a time when you could just say a rhyme and
Wouldn't have to worry about one of your people dyin'
But now it's elevated, ‘cause once you put someone's kids in it
The shit gets escalated — it ain't just words no more, is it?
It's a different ball game, you call names and you ain't just rappin'
We actually tried to stop the 50 and Ja beef from happenin'
Me and Dre had sat with him, kicked it and had a chat with him
And asked him not to start it, he wasn't gonna go after him
Until Ja started yappin' in magazines how he stabbed him
Fuck it, 50, smash him! Mash him and let him have it!
Meanwhile my attention's pulled in another direction
Some receptionist at The Source who answers phones at his desk
Has an erection for me and thinks that I'll be his resurrection
Tries to blow the dust off his mic and make a new record
But now he's fucked the game up
‘Cause one of the ways I came up
Was through that publication, the same one that made me famous
Now the owner of it has got a grudge against me for nothin'?
Well, fuck it, that motherfucker could get it too, fuck him then!
But I'm so busy bein' pissed off, I don't stop to think
That we just inherited 50's beef with Murder Inc.
And he's inherited mine, which is fine, ain't like either of us mind
We still have soldiers that's on the front line
Who's willin' to die for us as soon as we give the orders
Never to extort us, strictly to show they support us
And maybe shout 'em out in a rap or up in the chorus
To show 'em we love 'em back and let them know how important
It is to have Runyon Avenue soldiers up in our corners
Their loyalty to us is worth more than any award is
But I ain't tryin' to have none of my people hurt or murdered
It ain't worth it, I can't think of a perfecter way to word it
Than to just say that I love y'all too much to see the verdict
I'll walk away from it all 'fore I let it go any further
But don't get it twisted, it's not a plea that I'm coppin'
I'm just willing to be the bigger man if y'all can quit poppin'
Off at your jaws, well, then I can, ‘cause frankly I'm sick of talkin'
I'm not goin' to let someone else's coffin rest on my conscience
‘Cause—

Step by step, heart to heart
Left, right, left
We all fall down like toy soldiers
Bit by bit, torn apart
We never win
But the battle wages on for toy soldiers



Lately I've been hard to reach, I've been too long on my own
Everybody has a private world where they can be alone
Are you calling me? Are you trying to get through?
Are you reaching out for me? And I'm reaching out for you

I'm just so fuckin' depressed
I just can't seem to get out this slump
If I could just get over this hump
But I need somethin' to pull me out this dump
I took my bruises, took my lumps
Fell down and I got right back up
But I need that spark to get psyched back up
In order for me to pick the mic back up
I don't know how or why or when
I ended up in this position I'm in
I'm starting to feel distant again
So I decided just to pick this pen
Up and try to make an attempt to vent
But I just can't admit or come to grips with the fact
That I may be done with rap, I need a new outlet
And I know some shit's so hard to swallow
But I just can't sit back and wallow
I'll be one tough act to follow, one tough act to follow
I'll be one tough act to follow
Here today, gone tomorrow
But you'd have to walk a thousand miles

In my shoes, just to see what it's like to be me
I'll be you, let's trade shoes, just to see what it'd be like to
Feel your pain, you feel mine, go inside each other's minds
Just to see what we find, look at shit through each other's eyes
But don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you
Don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you

I think I'm starting to lose my sense of humor
Everything's so tense and gloom
I almost feel like I gotta check the temperature
Of the room, just as soon as
I walk in, it's like all eyes on me
So I try to avoid any eye contact
‘Cause if I do that, then it opens a door
For conversation, like I want that
I'm not lookin' for extra attention
I just wanna be just like you
Blend in with the rest of the room
Maybe just point me to the closest restroom
I don't need no fuckin' man-servant
Tryna follow me around and wipe my ass
Laugh at every single joke I crack
And half of 'em ain't even funny, like, "Ha!
Marshall, you're so funny, man
You should be a comedian, goddamn!"
Unfortunately I am
I just hide behind the tears of a clown
So why don't you all sit down?
Listen to the tale I'm about to tell
Hell, we don't gotta trade our shoes
And you ain't gotta walk no thousand miles

In my shoes, just to see what it's like to be me
I'll be you, let's trade shoes, just to see what it'd be like to
Feel your pain, you feel mine, go inside each other's minds
Just to see what we find, look at shit through each other's eyes
But don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you
Don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you

Nobody asked for life to deal us
With these bullshit hands we're dealt
We gotta take these cards ourselves
And flip 'em, don't expect no help
Now, I could've either just sat on my ass
And pissed and moaned
Or take this situation in which I'm placed in
And get up and get my own
I was never the type of kid
To wait by the door and pack his bags
And sat on the porch and hoped and prayed
For a dad to show up who never did
I just wanted to fit in in every single place
Every school I went, I dreamed of being that cool kid
Even if it meant acting stupid
"Keep making that face, it'll get stuck like that"
Meanwhile, I'm just standin' there
Holdin' my tongue, tryin' to talk *like this*
'Til I stuck my tongue on that frozen stop sign pole
At eight years old; I learned my lesson then
‘Cause I wasn't tryin' to impress my friends no mo'
But I already told you my whole life story
Not just based on my description
‘Cause where you see it from, where you're sittin'
It's probably 110% different
I guess we would have to walk a mile
In each other's shoes at least
What size you wear? I wear 10s
Let's see if you can fit your feet

In my shoes, just to see what it's like to be me
I'll be you, let's trade shoes, just to see what it'd be like to
Feel your pain, you feel mine, go inside each other's minds
Just to see what we find, look at shit through each other's eyes
But don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you
Don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you

Lately I've been hard to reach, I've been too long on my own
Everybody has a private world where they can be alone
Are you calling me? Are you trying to get through?
Are you reaching out for me? And I'm reaching out for you

Daddy'll be home soon
And to the rest of the world
God gave you them shoes to fit you
So put 'em on and wear 'em
Be yourself, man, be proud of who you are
Even if it sounds corny
Never let no one tell you you ain't beautiful



Yeah, tryin' to figure out the difference
But I think the lines are starting to get blurred

I'm in a strange place
I feel like Ma$e when he gave up the game for his faith
I feel like I'm caged in these chains and restraints
Grimmin' every stranger in the place while I gaze into space
‘Cause I'm mentally rearrangin' his face
I need a change of pace
‘Cause the pace I'm working at is dangerous
There's nowhere to dump this anger, and thanks to this angst
I done quit chicken heads cold turkey
And started slowly roasting 'em
‘Cause that's where most of my anger is based
Fuck your feelings! I feel like I play for the Saints
I just want to hurt you – aim for the skanks
Then aim for all these fake Kanye's
Jay's, Wayne's and the Drake's
I'm frustrated ‘cause ain't no more N'Sync, now I'm all out of whack
I'm all out of Backstreet Boys to call out and attack
I'm going all out in this rap shit
And whatever the fallout is I'm strapped
For battle, sucka – duck, crawl out the back!
It's a bar fight, prepare your arsenal
And beware of bar stools flying through the air
And bottles breaking, mirrors also
And I ain't stopping 'til the swear jar's full
"You done called every woman a slut
Oh, my bad, slut! And next time I show up to court
I'll be naked and just wear a lawsuit
Judge be like, "That's sharp
How much did that motherfucker cost you?
Smart-ass, you're lucky I don't tear it off you
And jump your bones, you sexy motherfucker!
You're so fuckin' gravy, Marshall, I should start calling you 'au jus'
‘Cause all you do is spit them lyrics out the wazoo."
Evil twin, take this beat now, it's all you
I believe people can change, but only for the worse
I coulda changed the world if it wasn't for this verse
So satanic, K-Mart chains panic
‘Cause they can't even spin back the curse words
‘Cause they're worse when they're reversed, motherfucker
Shit, motherfucker, and these kids are like parrots
They run around the house just like terrorists
Screaming, "Fuck! Shit! Fuck!", adult with a childish-like arrogance
Wild ever since the day I came out, I was like, "Merits?
Fuck that! I'd rather be loud, and I like swearing."
From the first album even the gals were like, "Tight lyrics!
Dreamy eyes!", but my fuckin' mouth was nightmare-ish
And from the start of it you felt like you were part of this and
Opposition felt the opposite, sometimes I listen
And revisit them old albums often as I can and
Skim through all them bitches
To make sure I keep up with my competition
Ha ha! Hogger of beats, hoarder of rhymes
Borderline genius who's bored of his lines
And that sort of defines where I'm at and the way I feel now
Feel like I might just strike first and ignore the replies

There's darkness closing in, there it goes again
It controls my pen, but that ain't me, it's my evil twin
He gives me an evil grin)
But he's just a friend, who pops up now and again
So don't blame me, just blame him, it's my evil twin

Welcome back to the land of the living, my friend
You have slept for quite some time

So, who's left? Lady Gaga? Mess with the Bieber?
Nah, F with Christina!
My albums just sicker than strep with the fever
Get the Cloriseptic, Excedrin, Aleve, or
Extra Strength Tylenol 3's
Feel like I'm burning to death, but I'm freezin'
Bedridden and destined never to leave the
Bedroom ever again, like the legend of Heath-uh-
Ledger, my suicide notes, barely legible, read the
Bottom, it's signed by the Joker
Lorena said I never can leave her
She'd sever my wiener I ever deceive her
Fuck that shit, bitch! Give up my dick for pussy?
I'd be Jerry Mathers I ever left it to Beaver
Get them titties cut off tryin' to mess with a cleaver
Golly-wally, I vent, heat register, Jesus
Ever since 1-9-9-4-6 Dresden, it was definitely
My destiny when on the steps, I met DeShaun
At Osborn, I'd never make it to sophomore
I just wanted to skip school and rap, used to mop floors
Flip burgers and wash dishes
While I wrote rhymes, tryin' to get props for 'em
‘Cause I took book-smarts and swapped for 'em
They were sleeping, I made 'em stop snorin'
Made them break out the popcorn
Now I've been hip-hop in it's tip-top form
Since N.W.A was blaring through my car windows
Leaning on the horn, screaming "Fuck the police!" like cop porn
Flipped rap on its ear like I dropped corn
Fuck top five, bitch, I'm top four
And that includes Biggie and Pac, whore
And I got an Evil Twin
So who the fuck do you think that third and that fourth spot's for?
And crazy as I am, I'm much tamer than him
And I'm nuts, then again, who the fuck wants a plain Eminem?
Hi! Faggot! Look who's back
With a crab up his ass like a lobster crawled up there
Two rabbits, a koala bear, and a ball of hair
And you're all aware I don't got it all upstairs
Guess that's why I'm an addict and it's so small up there
Peace to Whitney, jeez, just hit me
That I should call the Looney Police to come get me
‘Cause I'm so sick of being the truth
I wish someone finally admit me
To a mental hospital with Britney
Oh, LMFAO, no way, Jo-
Se Baez couldn't beat this rap – OJ, no
Hooray, I'm off the hook like Casey Anthony, hey, ho
The fuckin' chorus to "Hip Hop Hooray"? No
I’m hollerin', you got bottom-end like an 8-0-
8 and I 'base' whether we're fuckin' off that instead of your face, so
Let your low end raise, yo
Tango, what you think, ho?! Slow dancing or bowling?
You tryin' to hold hands with your homie?
What, you think I'm looking for romance ‘cause I'm lonely?
Change that tune, you ain't got a remote chance to control me
Ho, I'm only vulnerable when I got a bo-ner
Superman, try to fuck me over, it won't hurt
Don't try to fix me, I'm broke, so I don't work
So are you, but you're broke ‘cause you don't work
But all bullshit aside, I hit a stride
Still Shady inside, hair every bit as dyed
As it used to be when I first introduced y'all to my skittish side
And blamed it on him when they tried to criticize
‘Cause we are the same, bitch!



Yeah, it's my life
In my own words, I guess

Have you ever loved someone so much, you'd give an arm for?
Not the expression, no, literally give an arm for
When they know they're your heart, and you know you were their armor
And you will destroy anyone who would try to harm her
But what happens when karma turns right around to bite you?
And everything you stand for turns on you to spite you?
What happens when you become the main source of her pain?
"Daddy, look what I made!" "Dad's gotta go catch a plane"
"Daddy, where's Mommy? I can't find Mommy, where is she?"
"I don't know, go play, Hailie, baby, your daddy's busy
Daddy's writing a song, this song ain't gon' write itself
I'll give you one underdog, then you gotta swing by yourself"
Then turn right around on that song and tell her you love her
And put hands on her mother who's a spitting image of her
That's Slim Shady, yeah, baby, Slim Shady's crazy
Shady made me, but tonight Shady's rock-a-bye baby

And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm looking down on you smiling
And I didn't feel a thang
So, baby, don't feel no pain, just smile back
And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm looking down on you smiling
And I didn't feel a thang
So, baby, don't feel no pain, just smile back

I keep having this dream, I'm pushin' Hailie on the swing
She keeps screaming she don't want me to sing
"You're making Mommy cry, why? Why is Mommy cryin'?"
"Baby, Daddy ain't leaving no more" "Daddy, you're lyin'!
You always say that, you always say this is the last time
But you ain't leaving no more, Daddy, you're mine!"
She's piling boxes in front of the door, tryna block it
"Daddy, please! Daddy, don't leave! Daddy, no, stop it!"
Goes in her pocket, pulls out a tiny necklace locket
It's got a picture, "This'll keep you safe, Daddy, take it with ya!"
I look up, it's just me standing in the mirror
These fuckin' walls must be talkin', 'cause man, I can hear 'em
They're saying, "You got one more chance to do right and it's tonight
Now go out there and show 'em that you love 'em 'fore it's too late!"
And just as I go to walk out of my bedroom door
It turns to a stage, they're gone and this spotlight is on, and I'm singing—

And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm looking down on you smiling
And I didn't feel a thang
So, baby, don't feel no pain, just smile back
And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm looking down on you smiling
And I didn't feel a thang
So, baby, don't feel no pain, just smile back

Sixty-thousand people, all jumpin' out their seat
The curtain closes, they're throwin' roses at my feet
I take a bow, and thank you all for comin' out
They're screamin' so loud, I take one last look at the crowd
I glance down, I don't believe what I'm seein'
"Daddy, it's me! Help Mommy, her wrists are bleedin'!"
But baby, we're in Sweden, how did you get to Sweden?
"I followed you, Daddy, you told me that you weren't leavin'
You lied to me, Dad, and now you made Mommy sad
And I bought you this coin, it says 'Number One Dad'
That's all I wanted, I just wanted to give you this coin
I get the point, fine, me and Mommy are goin'."
But baby, wait! — "It's too late, Dad, you made the choice
Now go up there and show 'em that you love 'em more than us
That's what they want, they want you, Marshall, they keep
Screamin' your name, it's no wonder you can't go to sleep
Just take another pill, yeah, I bet you you will
You rap about it, yeah, word, k-keep it real."
I hear applause, all this time I couldn't see
How could it be that the curtain is closin' on me?
I turn around, find a gun on the ground, cock it
Put it to my brain, scream "Die, Shady!" and pop it
The sky darkens, my life flashes
The plane that I was supposed to be on crashes
And burns to ashes; that's when I wake up
Alarm clock's ringin', there's birds singin'
It's Spring and Hailie's outside swingin'
I walk right up to Kim and kiss her, tell her I miss her
Hailie just smiles, and winks at her little sister, almost as if to say

And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm looking down on you smiling
And I didn't feel a thang
So, baby, don't feel no pain, just smile back
And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm looking down on you smiling
And I didn't feel a thang
So, baby, don't feel no pain, just smile back

*Curtains Closing*



We touch, I feel a rush; we clutch, it isn't much
But it's enough to make me wonder what's in store for us
It's lust, it's torturous, you must be a sorceress
Don't play games, it'll be dangerous
If you fuck me over, ‘cause if I get burnt, I'ma show ya
What it's like to hurt, ‘cause I been treated like dirt before ya
And love is evil — spell it backwards, I'll show ya
Nobody knows me, I'm cold
Walk down this road all alone
It's no one's fault but my own
It's the path I've chosen to go
Frozen as snow, I show no emotion whatsoever so
Don't ask me why I have no love for these muh'fuckin' hoes
Bloodsuckin' succubuses
What the fuck is up with this?
I've tried in this department, but I ain't had no luck with this
It sucks, but it's exactly what I thought it would be
Like tryin' to start over
I got a hole in my heart, but some kinda emotional roller coaster
Something I won't go on
So you toy with my emotions, ho, it's over
It's like an explosion every time I hold ya
Wasn't joking when I told ya
You take my breath away, you're a supernova, and I'm a—

I'm a space-bound rocket ship
And your heart's the Moon
And I'm aiming right at you, right at you
250,000 miles on a clear night in June
And I'm aiming right at you
Right at you, right at you

I'll do whatever it takes
When I'm with you I get the shakes
My body aches when I ain't with you, I have zero strength
There's no limit on how far I would go
No boundaries, no lengths
Why do we say that until we get that person that we think's
Gonna be that one, then once we get 'em it's never the same
You want them when they don't want you
Soon as they do, feelings change
It's not a contest and I ain't on no conquest for no mate
I wasn't lookin' when I stumbled on to you, musta been fate
But so much is at stake
What the fuck does it take? Let's cut to the chase
'Fore the door shuts in your face
Promise me if I cave in and break and leave myself open
That I won't be makin' a mistake, ‘cause I'm a—

I'm a space-bound rocket ship
And your heart's the Moon
And I'm aiming right at you, right at you
250,000 miles on a clear night in June
And I'm aiming right at you
Right at you, right at you

So, after a year and six months
It's no longer me that you want
But I love you so much it hurts, never mistreated you once
I poured my heart out to you
Let down my guard, swear to God
I blow my brains in your lap, lay here and die in your arms
Drop to my knees and I'm pleadin'
I'm tryna stop you from leavin'
You won't even listen, so fuck it, I'm tryna stop you from breathin'
I put both hands on your throat, I sit on top of you squeezin'
'Til I snap your neck like a Popsicle stick, ain't no possible reason
I can think of to let you walk up out this house and let you live
Tears stream down both of my cheeks
Now I let you go and just give

And I would've did anything for you
To show you how much I adored you
But it's over now, it's too late to save our love
Just promise me you'll think of me every time
You look up in the sky and see a star, ‘cause I'm a—

I'm a space-bound rocket ship
And your heart's the Moon
And I'm aiming right at you, right at you
250,000 miles on a clear night in June
And I'm so lost without you
Without you, without you



You fuckin' groupie!
Pick up the goddamn phone!

Bitch, where the fuck were you Tuesday?
With who you say?
I wasn't at the studio, bitch, what'd you do? Screw Dre?
You went there lookin' for me? Boo, that excuse is too lame
Keep playin' me, you're gonna end up with a huge goose egg
You fake, lyin' slut, you never told me you knew Drake
And Lupe? You want to lose two legs?
You tryin' to flip this on me?
If I spent more time with you, you say
"Okay, yeah, and I'm coo-coo, eh?", well, screw you
And I'll be the third person who screwed you today
Oh, fourth—Dre, Drake, Lupe—oohm, touché
You were too two-faced for me
Thought you was my number one true-blue ace, but you ain't
And I can't see you when you make that wittle boo-boo face
'Cause I'm hanging up this phone, boo
You make my fuckin' Bluetooth ache
You're feeling blue? Too late; go smurf yourself!
You make me wanna smurf and puke blue Kool Aid
Here's what you say to someone you hate

My life would be so much better
If you just dropped dead
I was layin' in bed last night, thinkin'
And this thought just popped in my head
And I thought, wouldn't shit
Just be a lot easier if you dropped dead?
I would feel so much better

Think I just relapsed, this bitch pushed me over the brink
Hop on the freeway tryna get some time alone and just think
'Til the cops pulled me over
But they let me go, 'cause I told 'em I'm only drivin' drunk
'Cause that bitch drove me to drink
I'm back on my fuck hoes, with a whole new hatred for blondes
But bias? I hate all bitches the same, baby, come on!
Excuse the pun, but bitch is such a broad statement, and I'm
Channelin' my anger through every single station that's on
'Cause a woman broke my he-art
I say he-art 'cause she ripped it in two pa-arts
And threw it in the garbage; who do you think you a-are?
Bitch, guess it's time for me to get the dust off
And pick myself up off the carpet
But I'll never say the L-word again
I Lo-Lo-Lo-Lo… Lesbian! Aaahhh!
I hope you hear this song and go into a cardiac arrest
My life'd be so much better if you just—

My life would be so much better
If you just dropped dead
I was layin' in bed last night, thinkin'
And this thought just popped in my head
And I thought, wouldn't shit
Just be a lot easier if you dropped dead?
I would feel so much better

'Cause you told me
You'd love me forever
Bitch, that was a lie
Now I never wanted someone
To die so bad in my fuckin' life
But fuck it, there’s other fish in the sea

And I'ma have a whale of a time, bein' a single sailor
For the night, bitch, on a scale of
One to ten, shit, I must be the Holy Grail of
Catches, ho, I got an Oscar
I might hit the club, find a chick that's tailor-
Made for me, say fuck it
Kick some shots back, get hammered, and nail her
These bitches tryin' to get attached, but they're failin'
To latch onto the tail of
My bumper, they're scratchin' at the back of my trailer
Like I'm itchin' to get hitched
Yeah, I'm rich as a bitch
But bitches ain't shit, I'd rather leave a bitch in a ditch
Bitch, you complain when you listen to this
That's why I'm swingin' at this chicks on-site
Long as I got a bat and two balls it's foul, but my dick's on strike
So all that love shit is null and void, bitch, I'm a droid
I avoid Cupid, stupid! Wasn't for blow jobs, you'd be unemployed
Oye-yoy-yoy, man-oh-man, your boy-boy-boy's
Gettin' sick of these girls-girls-girls, oink-oink-oink
You fuckin' pigs, all you're good for is doink-doink-doink
I got 99 problems and a bitch ain't one
She's all 99 of 'em, I need a machine gun
I'll take 'em all out, I hope you hear this song
And go into a cardiac arrest, have a heart attack and just
Drop dead, and I'ma throw a fuckin' party after this, 'cause yes

My life would be so much better
If you just dropped dead
I was layin' in bed last night, thinkin'
And this thought just popped in my head
And I thought, wouldn't shit
Just be a lot easier if you dropped dead?
I would feel so much better

I'm just playin', bitch
You know I love you




Tell 'em, if they want it
I swear I love my city
See me, they salute me
Detroit vs. Everybody

I took a bite out the rotten apple by the poison tree
All these females need to email to make noise
And now things changin' a lot
He fuck with my authority
Then he shall see shells, but not by the seashore
If he gang bangin' or not
It's simple as the alphabet
He F with me, that G shall surely see
He definitely as 'bout it as retail fraud, he's sweet
The honest gesture
The trigger finger 'round the diamond tester
We tell flaw with heat
The same soldier, it's me, myself and I
Ridin' 'round shootin' my biopic in my autobiography
Range Rover, this ain't the squash beef state
You thinkin' make-up, we thinkin' Lark Voorhies face
The twin Eagles'll air his coupe
Might as well ride by in an ambulance
My pair'll shoot, like skydivin' in Hammer pants
So call it siblin' rivalry
Take his life; call it the unforgivable robbery
I don't got time to evict these clowns
Y'all niggas been bitches
Ridin' 'round his block; all he know is pitfalls
That's why he's always climbin' out his drop

Boy, I need no halves and halves, I want the game in entirety
Hundred percent cut; no stitches required
Welcome to Detroit, where if you get that promotion
Don't worry, man, them bullets will still be at your ass firin'
I still call it safe, I would suck if I was umpirin'
Boy, I hit the beat, I just treat that shit like a diary
I'm offended if you hear my new shit
And you ain't rewindin' me
Self-made, I never needed your bail or a wire, see
I'm never callin' collect, I call to collect
My homie wanted a Chevy, so I put my dog in the 'Vette
Ahh! Plus I'm so loyal that that paper, boy, is all that I fetch
If the ball in my hand, then the ball in the net
Bitch, I'm the D, can't no offense dunk on me
I'm Mr. Big Shot, these hoes get drunk off me
I'm overrespected
My mama gated community's overprotective
So futuristic I'm already over my next bitch
Reminiscin' on listenin' to 50 fifty times a day
Back when tenth grade was like fifty days away
Tryna get paid fifty ways a day
Used to put fifty on the layaway
Now my closet fifty shades of grey
26, and I done lived a lifetime a few times
From futons to Grey Poupons
In church, tryna get a little savings, yeah, a coupon
I spit that A1 every day, I'm hittin' new primes
Now the stakes high, niggas surprised at the new lines
Takin' down my number, like, "You still ain't got a new line?"
Nah, it's the same, we been laborin' for years
I know it took way longer than nine months
But fuck it, it's all in due time
I turned a blunt to a roach, with dreams of bein' a Beatle
Don't want to, I need to, ya gotta learn to keep it cerebral
When you come up in a place
Where everyone got a piece but ain't peaceful
This is just part one, wait 'til the sequel, lil' bitch!

Tell 'em, if they want it
I swear I love my city
See me, they salute me
Detroit vs. Everybody

Comin' from them streets where they thirsty, starvin' to eat
Just a step away from failin', that's why they call it the D
Arguably the whole reason for all of this honesty
Honestly no honor roll, but honored up in them streets
‘Cause I'm a Linwood nigga, them young niggas hit ya
Put a stack on your head, you'll bleed a lake on Grand River
If you think your hood harder, then I might beg to differ
Know some killers pull the trigger for a Swisher and Miller
If the blicka hit ya kisser, bet yo' ass not rememberin'
They say my city's tougher than two fat bitches scissorin'
So, nigga, I'm a veteran, retire my letterman
Have K's in front of your school, but I ain't goin' to Kettering
Cough up a lung, 313 where I'm from
Xan got me cross-eyed like Bernstein’s son
Any nigga try to copy, put a hole in his top
It's us vs. them, Detroit vs. Everybody

Lately it seems as if it's me against
The world, like it was before my life became a movie and they used to use my mothafuckin' trailer to tease me with
But I flipped that script like a refill of
Painkillers to pop the lid off that safety seal
It made me feel amazing, Navy SEAL of bravery
And if I may reiterate, I ain't even need a script
Ain't bein' conceited, but I made it to radio—eat a dick!
I still never ABC this shit
Mainstream appeal, but the skill is what made me iller
Since before they called Jay Dee Dilla
I was daydreamin' one day I would be the shit
And if I ever end up escapin' these streets
I swear that I would stay here still
And if I'm crazy, I'll always be real
Don't make me steal an eighteen-wheeler
Break all of my friends out of here
And take 'em straight to the Mercedes dealer
Peel off back to the same block that we came from
On a rampage too crazy for me to flip
What's makin' you think I need a switch?
‘Cause I'm Adrian Peterson
When he's ragin' and heated and
On the way to go beat his kid?
On a track get spanked like he just did
Sick of bein' treated like we ain't shit
But Jesus, I can see just why people quit callin' me to do features and them cyphers on BET, ‘cause if
I wasn't me I probably wouldn't
Want to play with me neither, shit
Seems to be reachin' its fever pitch
One hundred and eighty degrees in here
Shoulder blade full of cedar chips
MC's just bit off more than they can chew
Like a face full of Swedish Fish
Or Lorena with two penises
Hateful and geniusness inconvenience
And for the record, you don't want this type of static
In your life, when I'm makin' you cling to it
May consider tryin' to reinsulate your windows
May be in for another crazy winter
‘Cause so cold in the D, it is
As days begin to tick away, but ain't this really
What made me into the angry bitter blonde?
But ain't we sick of bein' underdogs?
Don't make me unleash this shit, release this pit
May even seem as if I'm yankin' your chain a bit
Or maybe the way in which I'm sayin' shit
Is playin' with you, but ain't shit changin'
It's still the same shit and Shady's still a lady killer
Since the day I went insane and then attacked the babysitter
With a potato peeler
And mushed her face into the entertainment center
It's like another plane just entered into Ukraine again
Or the Bermuda Triangle and
Attempted to make a safe descent
Awaiting anyone who ain't affiliated, it could be danger
Did you make arrangements with the gangsters 'fore you came here? And if they mention us…

Tell 'em, if they want it
I swear I love my city
See me, they salute me
Detroit vs. Everybody

What up though? It's the godfather Trick Trick
You either ridin' with us or gettin' rolled on
That means Detroit vs. Everybody!!
Hey, Em, let me get that instrumental
Take it down to the hood
Let the little homies get this remix crackin'!
Detroit! Okay!



Jumped out of the 2nd floor of a record store
With a Treacherous Four cassette and a cassette recorder
In Ecuador with Edward Norton
Witness the metamorphosis
Of a legend growin' like an expert swordsman
From the Hessian war and
Hence the origin of the Headless Horseman
Born with the endorphins of a pathetic orphan
Endless source and reservoir
Of extension cords in dresser drawers
And deadbolts on the bedroom doors
And sexual torture kits kept in a separate storage bin
Excellent boyfriend

Use intercourse to settle scores
With women who have vendettas towards men
Dickhead is forced in 'til there's shredded foreskin
Reddish torn and they're only bein' fed a portion
Bed sores and sore shins
Pregnant whores can get abortions
Fetish for stickin' metal forks in, self-absorption
Skeletor, I went to Hell and fell a floor
A predator, I'm headed for competitors
Better warn 'em, what I lack in tact and a set of morals
I make up for in metaphors like a cosmetic store
Stegosaurus, Chuck Norris with a thesaurus
Yes, of course, a mess of warrants
You want some? Come and get some, boys!
I'm givin' Daniel Pantaleo a refresher course
On excessive force and pressure points
And dressin' George Zimmerman in a fluorescent orange
Dress and four inch heels to address the court
With a bullseye on his back, his whole chest and torso
Are left on the doorsteps of Trayvon's dad as a present for him

In my present form I'm Desert Storm
Appetite for destruction there's no suppressant for
Aggressive, forceful, and less remorseful in every morsel
Unpleasant, horrible; hello, gorgeous!
The rebel with devil horns just fell off the yellow short bus
Met a contortionist, said, "When you wanna get sexual?"
She said, "However I fit in your schedule. I'm flexible."
Expired tags on the Saturn, got Catherine Bach
In the back in Daisy Dukes with the hazards on
At a traffic stop gettin' harassed, sign an autograph
For this asshole cop's daughter
Laugh 'cause I called her a brat on it
He spat on it and brought it back lookin' half in shock
Had a heart attack and dropped dead
Started fallin' back with it
And got slapped with a Colin Kaepernick practice sock

One ball and half a dick, Apple Watch
Crack front axle, walked in a Bass Pro Shop with David Hasselhoff, pulled Tabasco sauce out of my satchel
Knocked over a fisherman's tackle box and *crash sound*
Asked if they had a laugh in stock
That was fuckin' stupid…

You got it twisted, all 'cause I offered this bitch
A doggie biscuit, you call me misogynistic
Bitch, get to massagin' this dick!
Like spas in this bitch, slob on it with gobs of lipstick
Got a shoppin' list for you to run some odds and ends with
It's not a bitch on this earth I can be monogamous with
She's non-existent
Robin Thicke with a throbbin' dick on some suave and slick shit
But I shout derogatives at bitches like fuckin' missile launches
Misfit, blond and nitwit
Like I've gone ballistic, with a frostin' tip kit
Screamed, "I hate blondes," and became one, I'm optimistic
Love to start shit
Shovin' Clark Kent's undergarments in the glove compartment
Of the bucket, bumpin' Bubba Sparxxx
I'm double parkin' up at Targets, trouble causer, a double crosser
Shadiest mothafucka you'll ever come across
Olympic gymnast, been known for some assaults
A couple lawsuits, enough to cause a stomach ulcer
Same damn brain scan results as Rainman's is
Something's off, but when Dustin Hoffman's
Dressin' up in your mummy costume
On stage dancin' to "Brain Damage," what's the problem?
Nothing's wrong, the name brand is back to reclaim status
Run the faucet, I'mma dunk
A bunch of Trump supporters underwater
Snuck up on 'em in Ray-Bans in a gray van with a spray tan
It's a wrap, like an ACE bandage
Don't-give-a-fuck persona, to my last DNA strand
E&J in the waistband, at the VMAs with the stagehand
She wants kielbasa, pre-arrange an escape plan
Three-inch blade on point, like a See-and-Say
Consider me a dangerous man
But you should be afraid of this dang candidate
You say Trump don't kiss ass like a puppet
'Cause he runs his campaign with his own cash for the fundin'
And that's what you wanted
A fuckin' loose cannon who's blunt with his hand on the button
Who doesn't have to answer to no one—great idea!

If I was president, gettin' off is
The first order of business, once I get in office
Second thing that'll make me happy's walkin' up to Uncle Sam
Naked, laughin', dick cupped in hand
Screamin', "Fuck safe sex!"
Throw a latex and an AIDS test at him
Tell Congress I run this land
And I want the rubber banned, and make it snappy
Addiction to friction and static
Addict who can't escape the habit
Continue to chase the dragon
But as fate would have it, I walked up in Major Magics
Dressed as the maintenance man
In a laser tag vest and a racin' jacket
With a gauge to blast it
And sped away in the station wagon
Stacey Dash's and Casey Anthony's
Crazy asses in the backseat
Throwin' Stayfree pads at me
Dead passenger in the passenger seat
Unfasten the safety latches
And slam on the brakes in traffic so hard
I snapped the relocation brackets for the monster tires
'Finna get a murder case and catch it
Like you threw it at me encased in plastic

And send Dylann Roof through the windshield of the Benz
Until he spins like a pinwheel and begins feelin'...
Like a windmiller with a thin build while his skin's peelin'
And skids 'til he hits a cement pillar
Swing for the fence like Prince Fielder
Knock it into the upper peninsula
You wanna go against 'zilla? The Rap God
When will I quit? Never been realer
The in-stiller of fear, not even a scintilla of doubt
Whose pens iller than Prince in a chinchilla
Or Ben Stiller in a suspense thriller
Revenge killer, avenge syllable binge
Fill a syringe, 'til I
Draw first blood
Even pop shit on my pop shit, and it's popular
Couldn't be more awkwarder
Cause you're innocence I robbed you of
It's my fingers that got stuck up
Taught ya ta, not give a
Slapstick, hockey puck
The broad hunter with the sawed off
Like an arm when it's lopped off of ya
But I'm not gonna, get the shotgun
Or the Glock, I'm gonna opt for the ox
Cause I'm into objects that are sharp when I shop
And it's not a shock, I'm such an obnoxious fucker
The Rock Hudson of rock 'cause who would have thought
This much of a cocksucker to go across the buttocks of Vivica Fox with a box cutter
That was for 50, little slap on the wrist be warned
I'm unravelin' quickly
My squabbles, I'm grappling with your time traveling with me
Try and follow, as I wobble, relapse into history, with a flask of the whiskey
Tip it back then I'm twisting wine bottles
Like what happened to Chris Reeve's spine column
That's the plan of attack when I'm fixing my problems
Wish my chest wasn't having to get these rhymes off 'em
But the fact that I have so many rappers against me mind boggles
And why I haven't come back on these faggots who diss me is
More of a spectacular mystery than a fucking Agatha Christie crime novel

But my patience is wearing thin
Swear I been contemplatin' rubbing shit in your face 'til I smear it in
Diss you in every lyric until you fear the pen
And never appear again
If you actually had fuckin' careers to end
But then I think of Molly Qerim and I steer 'em in that direction and forget my ideas for them
Molly, I'm gone off you
Man, light some kush
You're my first take, I'll nail you
Can't lie, I gush
If I won you over, you would be the grand prize
I'm entranced by your looks, come and give the Shady franchise a push
You can get it in the can like some Anheuser Busch
Jeans too small, least three pant sizes tush
Mushed against your damn side, your puss
And thighs are squished
What kind of attire's that?
I'm ready to be rode
Psychopath, bet you we'll get it poppin' like a flat
Light the match to ignite the wrath
Got knives to slash and slice hermaphrodites in half
Piper Chapmans might just have to picket me
Like a scab
Hard to describe in fact
Startling violent perhaps
Are things that come to mind as soon as I start spitting rhymes like that
And you aren't really surprised at that
But as far as these lines I rap
And these bars, wouldn't dial it back if I star 69ed the track

Why am I such a dick?



These ideas are nightmares to white parents
Whose worst fear is a child with dyed hair and who likes earrings
Like whatever they say has no bearing
It's so scary in a house that allows no swearing
To see him walkin' around with his headphones blaring
Alone in his own zone, cold and he don't care, he's
A problem child, and what bothers him all comes out
When he talks about his fuckin' dad walkin' out
‘Cause he hates him so bad that he blocks him out
If he ever saw him again he'd probably knock him out
His thoughts are wacked, he's mad so he's talkin' back
Talkin' black, brainwashed from rock and rap
He sags his pants, doo-rags and a stockin' cap
His step-father hit him so he socked him back
And broke his nose, his house is a broken home
There's no control, he just lets his emotions go

Sing it with me, just for today
Maybe tomorrow, the good Lord will take you away

Entertainment is changin', intertwinin' with gangsters
In the land of the killers a sinner's mind is a sanctum
Holy or unholy, only have one homie
Only this gun, lonely ‘cause don't anyone know me
Yet everybody just feels like they can relate
I guess words are a motherfucker, they can be great
Or they can degrade, or even worse, they can teach hate
It's like these kids hang on every single statement we make
Like they worship us, plus all the stores ship us platinum
Now how the fuck did this metamorphosis happen?
From standin' on corners and porches just rappin'
To havin' a fortune, no more kissin' ass
But then these critics crucify you, journalists try to burn you
Fans turn on you, attorneys all want a turn at you
To get they hands on every dime you have
They want you to lose your mind every time you mad
So they can try to make you out to look like a loose cannon
Any dispute won't hesitate to produce handguns
That's why these prosecutors wanna convict me
Strictly just to get me off of these streets quickly
But all their kids been listenin' to me religiously
So I'm signin' CD's while police fingerprint me
They're for the judge's daughter but his grudge is against me
If I'm such a fuckin' menace this shit doesn't make sense, B
It's all political, if my music is literal
And I'm a criminal, how the fuck can I raise a little girl?
I couldn't, I wouldn't be fit to
You're full of shit too, Guerrera, that was a fist that hit you!

Sing it with me, just for today
Maybe tomorrow, the good Lord will take you away

They say music can alter moods and talk to you
Well, can it load a gun up for you and cock it too?
Well, if it can, then the next time you assault a dude
Just tell the judge it was my fault, and I'll get sued
See, what these kids do is hear about us totin' pistols
And they wanna get one ‘cause they think the shit's cool
Not knowin' we really just protectin' ourselves
We entertainers, of course the shit's affectin' our sales
You ignoramus, but music is reflection of self
We just explain it, and then we get our checks in the mail
It's fucked up, ain't it?
How we can come from practically nothin'
To bein' able to have any fuckin' thing that we wanted
That's why we sing for these kids who don't have a thing
Except for a dream and a fuckin' rap magazine
Who post pin-up pictures on they walls all day long
Idolize they favorite rappers and know all they songs
Or for anyone who's ever been through shit in they lives
So they sit and they cry, at night, wishin' they'd die
'Til they throw on a rap record, and they sit and they vibe
We're nothin' to you, but we're the fuckin' shit in they eyes
That's why we seize the moment
Try to freeze it and own it, squeeze it and hold it
‘Cause we consider these minutes golden
And maybe they'll admit it when we're gone
Just let our spirits live on
Through our lyrics that you hear in our songs, and we can…

Sing it with me, just for today
Maybe tomorrow, the good Lord will take you away
Sing it with me, just for today
Maybe tomorrow, the good Lord will take you away




My mother reproduced like the komodo dragon
And had me on the back of a motorcycle, then crashed in
The side of loco-motive with rap, I'm
Loco, it's like handing a psycho a loaded handgun
Michelangelo with a paint gun in a tantrum
'Bout to explode all over the canvas
Back with the Yoda of rap, "In a spasm
Your music usually has 'em
But waned for the game your enthusiasm it hasn't
Follow you must, Rick Rubin my little Padawan."
A Jedi in training, colossal brain and
Thoughts are entertainin'
But docile and impossible to explain and, I'm also vain and
Probably find a way to complain about a Picasso painting
Puke Skywalker, but sound like Chewbacca when I talk
Full of such blind rage I need a seein' eye dog
Can't even find the page I was writing this rhyme on
Oh, it's on the ram-page
Couldn't see what I wrote, I write small
It says, "Ever since I drove a '79 Lincoln with whitewalls
Had a fire in my heart
And a dire desire to aspire to Die Hard."
So as long as I'm on the clock, punching this time card
Hip-hop ain't dying on my watch

Now sometimes when I'm sleepin'
She comes to me in my dreams
Is she taken? Is she mine?
Don't got time, don't care, don't have two shits to give
Let me take you by the hand to promised land
And threaten everyone
'Cause there's no rhyme or no reason for nothing


No, if he had
He wouldn't have ended up in these rhymes on my pad
I wouldn't be so mad, my attitude wouldn't be so bad
Yeah, Dad, I'm the epitome and the prime
Example of what happens when the power of the rhyme
Falls into the wrong hands and
Makes you want to get up and start dancin'
Even if it is Charles Manson
Who just happens to be rappin', blue lights flashin'
Laughin' all the way to the bank, lampin' in my K-Mart mansion
I’m in the style department
With a pile in my cart, rippin' the aisle apart but
With great power comes
Absolutely no responsibility for content
Completely despondent and condescending
The king of nonsense and controversy is on a
Beat-killing spree, Your Honor
I must plead guilty, 'cause I sparked a revolution
Rebel without a cause who caused the evolution
Of rap, to take it to the next level, boost it
But several rebuked it, and whoever produced it
Does that mean it belongs to me?
'Cause I just happen to be a white honky devil with two horns
That don't honk but every time I speak you hear a beep
But lyrically I never hear a peep, not even a whisper
Rappers better stay clear of me, bitch, 'cause it's the—

It's the time of the season
When hate runs high
And this time, I won't give it to you easy
When I take back what's mine
With pleasured hands
And torture everyone, that is my plan
My job here isn't done
'Cause there's no rhyme or no reason for nothing


So yeah, Dad, let's walk
Let's have us a father and son talk
But I bet we wouldn't probably get one block
Without me knocking your block off, this is all your fault
Maybe that's why I'm so bananas I a-ppealed to all those walks
Of life, whoever had strife
Maybe that's what dad and son talks are like
'Cause I related to the struggles of young America
When their fucking parents were unaware of their troubles
Now they're rippin' out their fuckin' hair again, it's hysterical
I chuckle as everybody bloodies their bare knuckles
Yeah, uh-oh, better beware, knuckle heads!
"Don't knock, the door's broken, it won't lock
It might just fly open, get cold-cocked
You critics come to pay me a visit?
Misery loves company, please stay a minute!"
Kryptonite to a hypocrite
Zip your lip if you dish it but can't take it
Too busy gettin' stoned in your glass house
To kick rocks, then you wonder why I lash out
Mr. Mathers as advertised on the flyers, so spread the word
'Cause I'm promoting my passion until I'm passed out
Doing a Bankhead in a restraint chair
So, bitch, shoot me a look, it better be a blank stare
Or get shanked in the pancreas
I'm angrier than all eight other reindeer
Put together with Chief Keef 'cause I hate every fuckin' thang, yeah
Even this rhyme, bitch
And quit tryin' look for a fuckin' reason for it that ain't there
But I still am a "Criminal!"
Ten-year-old degenerate grabbin' on my genitals!
The last Mathers LP done went diamond
This time I'm predicting this one will go emerald!
When will the madness end?
How can it when there's no method to the pad and pen?
The only message that I have to send




Where's my snare?
I have no snare in my headphones
There you go, yeah, yo, yo

Have you ever been hated or discriminated against?
Picket signs for my wicked rhymes, look at the times
Sick as the mind of the motherfuckin' kid that's behind
All this commotion, emotions run deep as oceans
Explodin', tempers flarin' from parents
Just blow 'em off and keep goin'
Not takin' nothin' from no one, give 'em hell long as I'm breathin'
Keep kickin' ass in the morning and takin' names in the evenin'
Leave 'em with a taste as sour as vinegar in they mouth
See, they can trigger me, but they'll never figure me out
Look at me now! I bet you're probably sick of me now
Ain't you, Momma? I'ma make you look so ridiculous now!

I'm sorry, Momma, I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet
I said I'm sorry, Momma, I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet

I got some skeletons in my closet
And I don't know if no one knows it
So before they throw me inside my coffin and close it
I'ma expose it; I'll take you back to '73
Before I ever had a multi-platinum-selling CD
I was a baby, maybe I was just a couple of months
My faggot father must have had his panties up in a bunch
‘Cause he split, I wonder if he even kissed me goodbye
No, I don't, on second thought, I just fuckin' wished he would die
I look at Hailie, and I couldn't picture leavin' her side
Even if I hated Kim, I'd grit my teeth and I'd try
To make it work with her at least for Hailie's sake
I maybe made some mistakes
But I'm only human, but I'm man enough to face 'em today
What I did was stupid, no doubt it was dumb
But the smartest shit I did was take the bullets out of that gun
‘Cause I'da killed him, shit, I woulda shot Kim and him both
It's my life, I'd like to welcome y'all to The Eminem Show

I'm sorry, Momma, I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet
I said I'm sorry, Momma, I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet

Now, I would never diss my own momma just to get recognition
Take a second to listen 'fore you think this record is dissin'
But put yourself in my position, just try to envision
Witnessin' your momma poppin' prescription pills in the kitchen
Bitchin' that someone's always goin' through her purse and shit's missin', goin' through public housing systems
Victim of Münchausen's Syndrome
My whole life I was made to believe I was sick when I wasn't
'Til I grew up, now I blew up
It makes you sick to your stomach, doesn't it?
Wasn't it the reason you made that CD for me, Ma?
So you could try to justify the way you treated me, Ma?
But guess what, you're gettin' older now
And it's cold when you're lonely, and Nathan's growin' up so quick he's gonna know that you're phony
And Hailie's gettin' so big now, you should see her, she's beautiful
But you'll never see her — she won't even be at your funeral!
See, what hurts me the most is you won't admit you was wrong
Bitch, do your song, keep tellin' yourself that you was a mom!
But how dare you try to take what you didn't help me to get?
You selfish bitch, I hope you fuckin' burn in hell for this shit!
Remember when Ronnie died and you said you wished it was me?
Well, guess what, I am dead — dead to you as can be!

I'm sorry, Momma, I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet
I said I'm sorry, Momma, I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet



I know what you wanna hear

I know you want me, baby, I think I want you too
I'm here to save you, girl, come be in Shady's world
I wanna grow together, let's let our love unfurl
You know you want me, baby, you know I want you too
They call me Superman, I'm here to rescue you
I wanna save you, girl, come be in Shady's world

They call me Superman
Leap tall hoes in a single bound
I'd never let another chick bring me down
In a relationship; save it, bitch!
Babysit? You make me sick
Superman ain't savin' shit
Girl, you can jump on Shady's dick
Straight from the hip, cut to the chase
I tell a motherfuckin' slut to her face
Play no games, say no names
Ever since I broke up with what's-her-face
I'm a different man, kiss my ass
Kiss my lips? Bitch, why ask?
Kiss my dick, get my cash?
I'd rather have you whip my ass
Don't put out, I'll put you out
Won't get out, I'll push you out
Puss blew out, poppin' shit
Wouldn't piss on fire to put you out
Am I too nice? Buy you ice?
Bitch, if you died, wouldn't buy you life
What, you tryin' to be my new wife?
What, you Mariah? Fly through twice

But I do know one thing though
Bitches, they come, they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday
Monday through Sunday, yo
Maybe I'll love you one day
Maybe we'll someday grow
'Til then just sit your drunk ass on that fuckin' runway, ho

‘Cause I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Your Superman, your Superman

Don't get me wrong, I love these hoes
It's no secret, everybody knows
That's about as far as your buddy goes
We'll be friends, I'll call you again
I'll chase you around every bar you attend
Never know what kinda car I be in
We'll see how much you be partyin' then
You don't want that, neither do I
I don't wanna flip when I see you with guys
Too much pride, between you and I
Not a jealous man, but females lie
But I guess that's just what sluts do
How could it ever be just us two?
I'd never love you enough to trust you
We just met and I just fucked you

But I do know one thing though
Bitches, they come, they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday
Monday through Sunday, yo
Maybe I'll love you one day
Maybe we'll someday grow
'Til then just sit your drunk ass on that fuckin' runway, ho

‘Cause I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Your Superman, your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Your Superman, your Superman

I know you want me, baby, I think I want you too
I'm here to save you, girl, come be in Shady's world
I wanna grow together, let's let our love unfurl
You know you want me, baby, you know I want you too
They call me Superman, I'm here to rescue you
I wanna save you, girl, come be in Shady's world

I hang around big stars all day
I don't see what the big deal is anyway
You're just plain old Marshall to me)
Ooh yeah, girl, run that game
Love that tattoo, what's that say?
"Rot In Pieces," uh, that's great)
First off, you don't know Marshall
At all, so don't grow partial
That's ammo for my arsenal
I'll slap you off that bar stool
There goes another lawsuit
Leave handprints all across you
Good Lordy, whoadie
You must be gone off that water bottle
You want what you can't have
Ooh girl, that's too damn bad
Don't touch what you can't grab
End up with two backhands
Put anthrax on a Tampax
And slap you 'til you can't stand
Girl, you just blew your chance
Don't mean to ruin your plans

But I do know one thing though
Bitches, they come, they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday
Monday through Sunday, yo
Maybe I'll love you one day
Maybe we'll someday grow
'Til then just sit your drunk ass on that fuckin' runway, ho

‘Cause I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Your Superman, your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Your Superman, your Superman

I know you want me, baby, I think I want you too
I'm here to save you, girl, come be in Shady's world
I wanna grow together, let's let our love unfurl
You know you want me, baby, you know I want you too
They call me Superman, I'm here to rescue you
I wanna save you, girl, come be in Shady's world

‘Cause I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Your Superman, your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
Your Superman, your Superman



I can feel the heat risin'
Everything is on fire
Today is a painful reminder
Of why we can only get brighter
The further you put it behind ya
But right now I'm on the inside
Lookin' out, ‘cause—

I'm standin' in the flames
It’s a beautiful kind of pain
Settin' fire to yesterday
Find the light, find the light, find the light
I'm standin' in the flames
It’s a beautiful kind of pain
Settin' fire to yesterday
Find the light, find the light, find the light

Yesterday was the tornado warning
You wake in its wake to start the mourning process
And rebuilding, you're still a work in progress
Today's a whole new chapter
It's like an enormous asthma
Thunderstorm has passed ya
You weathered it and poked its eye out
With the thorn bush that you used to smell the roses
Stopped to inhale, can't even tell your nose is
Stuffed, so focused on the bright side
Then you floor the gas pedal
And hit the corner fast, the more asserted
Never looking back, may hit the curb
But every day is a new learning curve
As you steer through life
Sometimes you might not wanna swerve, but you have to
To avert a disaster, lucky no permanent damage
‘Cause they hurt you so bad
It's like they murdered your ass
And threw dirt on your casket
But you've returned from the ashes
And that hurt that you have, you just converted to gasoline
And while you're burning the past
Standing in the inferno and chant—

I'm standin' in the flames
It’s a beautiful kind of pain
Settin' fire to yesterday
Find the light, find the light, find the light
I'm standin' in the flames
It’s a beautiful kind of pain
Settin' fire to yesterday
Find the light, find the light, find the light

You're so familiarized
With what having to swallow this pill is like
It happens all the time, they take your heart and steal your life
And it's as though you feel you've died
‘Cause you've been killed inside
But yet you're still alive, which means you will survive
Although today you may weep ‘cause you're weakened
And everything seems so bleak and
Hopeless, the light that you're seekin'
It begins to seep in; that's the only thing keepin'
You from leapin' off the mothafreakin' deep end
And I'm pullin' for you to push through this feeling
And with a little time that should do the healing
And by tomorrow you may even feel so good
That you're willing to forgive 'em
Even after all the shit you been put through, this feeling
Of resilience is building, and the flames are burning
Quick as fire would through this building
You're sealed in, but you're fireproof
Flame retardant, you withstood it
And as you climb up to the roof, you're just chillin'
You look down, ‘cause you're so over 'em
You could put the heel of your foot through the ceiling

As time passes, things change every day
But wounds, wounds heal
But scars still remain the same
But tomorrow, today's going down in flames
Throw the match, set the past ablaze

So feel the fire beneath your feet
As you barely even perspire from the heat
Exhale deep and breathe a sigh of relief
And as you say goodbye to the grief
It's like watching the walls melt in your prison cell
But you've extinguished this livin' hell
Still a little piece of you dies as you scream—

I'm standin' in the flames
It’s a beautiful kind of pain
Settin' fire to yesterday
Find the light, find the light, find the light
I'm standin' in the flames
It’s a beautiful kind of pain
Settin' fire to yesterday
Find the light, find the light, find the light

I feel the burn, watch the smoke as I turn
Rising, a phoenix from the flames
I have learned from fighting fights that weren't mine
Not with fists, but with wings that I will fly

And I'm standin' in the flames
It’s a beautiful kind of pain
Settin' fire to yesterday
Find the light, find the light, find the light
I'm standin' in the flames
It’s a beautiful kind of pain
Settin' fire to yesterday
Find the light, find the light, find the light




…Man, whatever
Dre, just let it run
Ayo, turn the beat up a little bit
Ayo, this song is for anyone
Fuck it, just shut up and listen, ayo

I sit back with this pack of Zig-Zag's and this bag
Of this weed, it gives me the shit needed to be
The most meanest MC on this on this earth
And since birth I've been cursed with this curse to just curse
And just blurt this berserk and bizarre shit that works
And it sells and it helps in itself to relieve all this tension
Dispensing these sentences, getting this stress
That's been eating me recently off of this chest
And I rest again peacefully
But at least have the decency in you
To leave me alone, when you freaks see me out
In the streets when I'm eating or feeding my daughter
To not come and speak to me, I don't know you
And no, I don't owe you a mothafuckin' thing
I'm not Mr. N'Sync, I'm not what your friends think
I'm not Mr. Friendly, I can be a prick if you tempt me
My tank is on empty, no patience is in me
And if you offend me, I'm lifting you ten feet in the air
I don't care who was there and who saw me just jaw you
Go call you a lawyer, file you a lawsuit
I'll smile in the courtroom and buy you a wardrobe
I'm tired of all you, I don't mean to be mean
But that's all I can be, it's just me

And I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
‘Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
I don't know, it's just the way I am

Sometimes I just feel like my father
I hate to be bothered with all of this nonsense
It's constant, and, "Oh, it's his lyrical content
The song 'Guilty Conscience' has gotten such rotten responses."
And all of this controversy circles me
And it seems like the media immediately points a finger at me
So I point one back at 'em, but not the index or pinkie
Or the ring or the thumb, it's the one you put up
When you don't give a fuck, when you won't just put up
With the bullshit they pull, ‘cause they full of shit too
When a dude's getting bullied and shoots up his school
And they blame it on Marilyn and the heroin
Where were the parents at? And look where it's at!
Middle America, now it's a tragedy
Now it's so sad to see, an upper-class city havin' this happening
Then attack Eminem ‘cause I rap this way
But I'm glad, ‘cause they feed me the fuel that I need
For the fire to burn, and it's burning, and I have returned

And I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
‘Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
I don't know, it's just the way I am

I'm so sick and tired of being admired
That I wish that I would just die or get fired
And dropped from my label, let's stop with the fables
I'm not gonna be able to top on "My Name Is"
And pigeon-holed into some poppy sensation
To cop me rotation at rock-n-roll stations
And I just do not got the patience
To deal with these cocky Caucasians
Who think I'm some wigger who just tries to be black
‘Cause I talk with an accent and grab on my balls
So they always keep asking the same fucking questions
What school did I go to, what hood I grew up in
The why, the who, what, when, the where and the how
'Til I'm grabbing my hair and I'm tearin' it out
‘Cause they driving me crazy, I can't take it
I'm racin', I'm pacin', I stand and I sit
And I'm thankful for every fan that I get
But I can't take a shit
In the bathroom without someone standing by it
No, I won't sign you an autograph
You can call me an asshole, I'm glad

‘Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
‘Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
I don't know, it's just the way I am



Came to the world at a time when it was in need of a villain
An asshole, that role I think I succeeded fulfillin'
But don't think I ever stopped
To think that I was speaking to children
Everything was happening so fast
It was like I blinked—sold three million
Then it all went blank, all I remember is feelin' ridiculous
‘Cause I was getting sick of this feelin'
Like I am always under attack, man
I could have stacked my shit list to the ceilin'
Guess I'm a little bit of a hypocrite when I'm rippin' shit
But since when did this many people ever give a shit
What I had to say? It's just my opinion
If it contradicts how I'm livin', put a dick in your rear end
That's why every time you mentioned a lyric
I thanked you for it, for drawing more attention toward it
‘Cause it gave me an enormous platform
I'm flattered you thought I was that important
But you can't ignore the fact that I fought for the respect
And battled for it, mad awards, had GLAAD annoyed
Atta-boy, they told me to slow down, and I just zoned out
Good luck tryin' to convince a blonde
It's like telling Gwen Stefani that she sold out
‘Cause I was tryin' to leave, no doubt
In anyone's mind one day I'd go down in history
Think they know now, because everybody knows

Everybody knows that you're just an asshole
Everywhere that you go
People wanna go home, everyone knows
Everybody knows, so don't pretend to be nice
There's no place you can hide
You are just an asshole
Everyone knows, everyone knows

Thanks for the support, asshole! *scratch*
Thanks for the support, asshole!

Quit actin' salty! I was countin' on you to count me out
Ask Asher Roth when he round about
Dissed me to shout me out
Thought I was history, but goddamn, honky
That compliment's like backhanding a donkey
Good way to get your ass socked in the mouth
Nah, I'm off him
But what the fuck is all this trash-talkin' about?
The fight was fixed, I'm back and you can't stop me
You knocked me down, I went down for the count
I fell, but the fans caught me, and now
You're gonna have to beat the fuckin' pants off me
To take my belt—word to Pacquiao
Momma said there ain't nothin' else to talk about
Better go in that ring and knock 'em out
Or you better not come out
It's poetry in motion
Like Freddie Roach when he's quotin' Shakespeare
So what if the insults are revoltin'?
Even Helen Keller knows life stinks
You think it's a joke 'til you're bullet-riddled
But you should give little shit what I think
This whole world is a mess
Gotta have a goddamn vest on your chest
And a Glock just to go watch Batman
Who needs to test a testicles? Not that man
Half of you don't got the guts and intestinal blockage
Rest of you got lap bands
Stuck to this motto before they put bath salts
And all those water bottles in Colorado, so get lost, Waldo!
My soul's escapin' through this asshole that is gapin'
A black hole, and I'm swallowin' this track whole
Better pack toilet paper, but I'm taking no crap, ho
Here I go down the Bat Pole
And I'm changing back into that old maniac
In fact there they go tryin' to dip out the back-door retreatin'
‘Cause everybody knows

Everybody knows that you're just an asshole
Everywhere that you go
People wanna go home, everyone knows
Everybody knows, so don't pretend to be nice
There's no place you can hide
You are just an asshole
Everyone knows, everyone knows

Holy mackerel! I'm the biggest jerk on the planet Earth
I smacked a girl off the mechanical bull at a tractor pull
For thinkin' we had some magnetic pull
Then screamed "ICP in this bitch! How do fuckin' magnets work?"
‘Cause you're attractive, but we ain't attractable
Hate to be dramatical, but I'm not romantical
I'm making up words you can understandable, it's tragical
Thinkin' some magical shit's gonna happen, that ain't practical
You crackin' a joke, it's laughable
‘Cause me and love's like a bad combination
I keep them feelings locked in a vault
So it's safe to say I'm uncrackable
My heart is truly guarded, full body armor
Bitch, you just need a helmet
‘Cause if you think you're special, you're retarded
Thinkin' you're one of a kind like you got some platinum vagina
You're a train wreck, I got a one-track mind
Shorty, you're fine, but you sort of remind me of a 49er
‘Cause you been a gold digger since you was a minor
Been tryna hunt me down like a dog
‘Cause you're on my ass but you can't get a cent
‘Cause all of my spare time is spent
On my nose in this binder, so don't bother tryin'
Only women that I love are my daughters
But sometimes I rhyme and it sounds like I forget I'm a father
And I push it farther
So, Father, forgive me if I forget to draw the line
It's apparent I shouldn't have been a parent
I'll never grow up, so to hell with your parents
And motherfuckin' Father Time
It ain't never gonna stop a pessimist
Who transformed to an optimist in his prime
So even if I'm half-dead, I'm half alive
Poured my half empty glass in a cup
So now my cup has runneth over
And I'm 'bout to set it on you like a mothafuckin' coaster
I’m going back to what got me here
Yeah, cocky, and can’t knock being rude off, so fear not, my dear
And dry up your teardrops, I'm here
White America's mirror, so don't feel awkward or weird
If you stare at me and see yourself, because you're one too
Shouldn't be a shock, because everybody knows

Everybody knows that you're just an asshole
Everywhere that you go
People wanna go home, everyone knows
Everybody knows, so don't pretend to be nice
There's no place you can hide
You are just an asshole
Everyone knows, everyone knows




Here to stay
Even when I'm gone
When I close my eyes
Through the passage of time
Kings never die

I can hear the drummer drummin'
And the trumpets, someone's tryna summon someone
I know something's comin'
But I'm runnin' from it, to be standing at the summit
And plummet, how come it wasn't what I thought it was?
Was it too good to be true?
Have nothin', get it all but too much of it
Then lose it again, did I swallow hallucinogens?
‘Cause if not, where the hell did it go?
‘Cause here I sit in Lucifer’s den by the dutch oven
Just choosing to sin, even if it means I'm sellin' my soul
Just to be the undisputed again
Do whatever I gotta do just to win
‘Cause I got this motherfuckin' cloud over my head
Crown around it, thorns on it
Cracks in it, bet you morons didn't think I'd be back, did ya?
How 'bout that? I’m somehow now back to the underdog
But no matter how loud that I bark
This sport is somethin' I never bow-out at
I complain about the game, I shout and I pout, it's a love-hate
But I found out that I can move a mountain of doubt
Even when you bitches are countin' me out
And I appear to be down for the count
Only time I ever been out and about
Is drivin' around town with my fuckin' whereabouts in a doubt
‘Cause I been lost tryna think of what I did to get here
But I'm not a quitter; gotta get up, give it all I got or give up
Spit on, shit on, stepped on, but kept goin'
I'm tryna be headstrong
But it feels like I slept on my neck wrong
‘Cause you're moving onto the next, but is the respect gone?
‘Cause someone told me that…

Kings never die

Don't give me that sob story, liar, don't preach to the choir
You ain't never even had to reach in the fire to dig deep
Nobody ever handed me shit in life, not even a flyer
Wouldn't even take shit into consideration
Obliterate anyone in the way
I think I see why a lot of rappers get on these features
And try to show out on a track with me
But it'd actually have to be
A fuckin' blow-out to get me to retire
Tell these new artists that kings never die
I know shit has changed in this age, fuck a Twitter page
Did it just say I've been upstaged?
Why am I online? It's driving me crazy
I'm ridin' shotgun tryna get a gauge
On what's hot, but I'm not one to conform
But as days pass in this shit
And opinions sway, I can hear 'em say
If I stay passionate maybe I can stage a miraculous
Comeback, as if I went away
But detractors just say so much for the renegade
Someone's gonna make me blow my composure
Here I go again, center stage, and I feel like I'm in a cage
They so want a champion to fall
It's no wonder why I laugh at 'em
‘Cause why can't we win 'em all?
So fuck what these cynics say!
It just goes to show that when my back's against the wall
And I'm under attack again, that I'll act as if I'm 'posed ta
With this pent-up rage, ‘cause all these plaques in my office
On the floor stacked against the door
Are they just metaphors for the odds of me comin' back again?
‘Cause all the accomplishments, accolades, awards
And trophies just don't mean jack anymore
If I'm here today and gone tomorrow, and I'm not gonna be…

Here to stay
Even when I'm gone
When I close my eyes
Through the passage of time
Kings never die

I want it, I'm comin' to get it
So you son of a bitches don't duck
You’re gonna get Riddick Bowe’d
Critics'll end up in critical
Think your shit is dope, all you're gonna get is smoked
And I ain't stopping 'til I'm on top again
All alone and on a throne, like a token of respect
Or a homage poem, or an ode I've been owed
Tossed in the air by my own arm
And launched so hard it broke my collarbone
And when it's my time to go
I'm still not leaving, stop for no one, I don't know
But I've been told, an obstacle that blocks your road
Knock it over, time to go for the pot of gold, ‘cause…

They say kings never die
Just ask Jam Master Jay
They just grow wings and they fly
So, hands up, reach for the sky!
Try to hold on and prolong these moments
‘Cause in a blink of an eye
They'll be over

Tryna secure your legacy like Shakur
And ensure nobody's ever gonna be what you were
So before you're leavin' this Earth
You want people to feel the fury of a pure evil cerebral, berserk
Deacon of words, syllable genius at work
Plus, I'm thinkin' that they're mistakin' my kindness for weakness; kill 'em with meanness
I went from powdered milk and Farina
To flippin' burgers on the grill for some peanuts
At Gilbert's to arenas, call me Gilbert Arenas
Still appeal to the dreamers
I made it to the silverscreen
But Rocky's still what the theme is
Khalil on the beat, ‘cause makin' the beat
Ain’t the same feelin' to me as killin' the beat is
Or fulfillin' to me is what fillin' a seat is
It's that sound-bombing, thirstin' howl
Common, underground, Diamond D, Outsidaz
Stomach growl, throbbin' hunger, out-rhymin' everyone
God, just give me one shot, I swear that I won't let you down
I'ma be around forever-and-a-day, even in the ground
You ain't never ever gonna hear 'em say I ain't…

Here to stay
Even when I'm gone
When I close my eyes
Through the passage of time
Kings never die

Kings never die



I own a mansion but live in a house
A king-size bed but I sleep on the couch
I'm Mr. Brightside, glass is half-full
But my tank's half empty, gasket just blew

This always happens
Thirty minutes from home, gotta lay a log cabin
Only option I have's McDonalds's bathroom
In a public stall, droppin' a football
So every time someone walks in the john I get maddened
"Shady, what up?" What? Come on, man, I'm crappin'
And you're askin' for my goddamn autograph on a napkin?
Oh, that's odd, I just happened
To run out of tissue, yeah, hand me that
On second thought I'd be glad then
"Thanks, dawg! Name's Todd, a big fan."
I wiped my ass with it
Crumbled it up in a wad and threw it back and
Can't pump my gas without causing an accident
Pump my gas, cut my grass, I can't take out the fuckin' trash
Without someone passin' through my sub, harassin'
I'd count my blessings, but I suck at math
I'd rather wallow than bask sufferin' succotash
But the ant-acid, it gives my stomach gas
When I mix my corn with my fuckin' mashed
Potatoes, so what? Ho, kiss my country bumpkin ass!
Missouri Southern roots, what the fuck is upper class?
Call lunch dinner, call dinner supper
Tupperware in the cupboard, plasticware up the ass
Stuck in the past – iPod, what the fuck is that?
B-Boy to the core, mule, I'm as stubborn as

Maybe that's why I feel so strange
Got it all, but I still won't change
Maybe that's why I can't leave Detroit
It's the motivation that keeps me goin'
This is the inspiration I need
I can never turn my back on the city that made me

They call me classless, I heard that, I second and third that
Don't know what the fuck I'd be doin' if it weren't rap
Probably be a giant turd sack
But I blew, never turned back
Turned 40 and still sag – teenagers act more fuckin' mature, Jack
Fuck you gonna say to me? I leave on my own terms, asshole
I'm goin' berzerk, my nerves are bad
But I love the perks my work has
I get to meet famous people, look at her dag
Her nylons are ran, her skirt's snagged
And I heard she drag-races, {burp} swag
Tuck in my Hanes shirt tag
We'd be the perfect match
'Cause you're a vacuum, I'm a dirtbag
My apologies, no disrespect to technology
But what the heck is all of these buttons?
You expect me to sit here and learn that?
Fuck I gotta do to hear this new song from Luda?
Be an expert at computers?
I'd rather be an Encyclopedia Birtannica, hell with
PlayStation, I'm still on my first man on some Zelda
Nintendo, bitch! Run, jump, punch, stab, and I melt the
Mozzarella on my spaghetti
Put in on bread, make a sandwich with Welch's, and belch
They say this spray butter is bad for my health, but
I think this poor white trash from the trailer
Jed Clampett, Fred Sanford, and welfare
Mentality helps to keep me grounded
That's why I never take full advantage of wealth, I
Managed to dwell within these parameters
Still crammin' the shelves full of Hamburger Helper
I can't even help it, this is the hand I was dealt, a
Creature of habit, feel like I'm trapped in an animal shelter
With all these pet peeves, goddamn it, to hell, I
Can't stand all these kids with their camera cellphones
I can't go anywhere, I get so mad I could yell, the
Other day someone got all elaborate
And stuck a head from a fuckin' dead cat in my mailbox
Went to Burger King, they spit on my onion rings
I think my karma is catchin' up with me

Maybe that's why I feel so strange
Got it all, but I still won't change
Maybe that's why I can't leave Detroit
It's the motivation that keeps me goin'
This is the inspiration I need
I can never turn my back on the city that made me

Got friends on Facebook all over the world
Not sure what that means, they tell me it's good
So, I'm artist of the decade, I even got a plaque
I'd hang it up, but the frame is all cracked

I'm tryin' to be low-key, hopefully nobody notices me
In produce, hunched over, giant nosebleed
Ogre style as I mosey over to the frozen aisle
By the frozen yogurt this guy approached me
Embarrassed, I just did Comerica with Hova
The show's over, I'm hidin' in Kroger, buyin' groceries
He just had front-row seats
Told me to sign this poster, then insults me
"Wow! Up close didn't know you had crow's feet!"
I'm in the crossroads, lost, still shoppin' at Costco's
Sloppy Joe's, bulk waffles
Look over, see these two hot hoes
Finger still up one of my nostrils
Right next to 'em, stuck at the light, the fuckin' shit's
Takin' forever to change, it's stuck, these bitches are lovin' it
Rubbin' it in, chucklin', couldn't do nothin'
Play it off, "What you bumpin'?"
"Trunk Muzik, Yelawolf's better," fuckin' bitch!
They want me to flip at the label, but I won't succumb to it
The pressure, they want me to follow up with
Another one, after Recovery was so highly coveted
But what good is a fuckin' recovery if I fumble it?
'Cause I'ma drop the ball if I don't get a grip
Hoppin' out shrubbery on you sons of bitches
Wrong subdivision to fuck with, bitch
Quit snappin' fuckin' pictures of my kids
I love my city, but you pushed me to the limit – what a pity!
The shit I complain about
It's like there ain't a cloud in the sky and it's rainin' out
Kool-Aid stain on the couch, I'll never get it out
But bitch, I got an elevator in my house
Ants and a mouse – I'm livin' the dream!

Maybe that's why I feel so strange
Got it all, but I still won't change
Maybe that's why I can't leave Detroit
It's the motivation that keeps me goin'
This is the inspiration I need
I can never turn my back on the city that made me



I am phenomenal
With every ounce of my blood
With every breath in my lungs
Won't stop until I'm phe-no-menal
I am phenomenal
However long that it takes
I'll go to whatever lengths
It's gonna make me a monster though
I am phenomenal
But I'll never say, ‘Oh, it’s impossible’
Cause I'm born to be phenomenal

Unstoppable, unpoppable thought bubbles
Untoppable thoughts, fuckin' juggernaut that'll
Stomp you in a verse, obstacles I'm drawn to 'em
When the going got rough
Some of what I done fought through was the worst, little sissy
Who the fuck taught you how to persevere?
There ain't no situation that you ever had to respond to that's adverse
The messiest thing you've ever gone through was your purse
Yeah, I don't try like hell, then I might as well
Hang it up like a shelf, gotta keep growin' with it, evolve
Cause you can keep throwin' shit at the wall
But you're gonna find that nothing's gonna stick until you apply yourself
Time to slip in that zone 'til I find myself
Inside the realm of the unknown and boldly go
Into waters where nobody else has gone before
Or willing to go, uncharted, feeling is so
Bomb, I'm feelin' myself, I'm a giant
Sometimes I gotta remind myself that I am...

I am phenomenal
With every ounce of my blood
With every breath in my lungs
Won't stop until I'm phe-no-menal
I am phenomenal
However long that it takes
I'll go to whatever lengths
It's gonna make me a monster though
I am phenomenal
But I'll never say, ‘Oh, it’s impossible’
Cause I'm born to be phenomenal

Let me self-empower you
When you're down and they're tryin' to clown the fuck out of you
And you feel like you're runnin' out of fuel
I'll show you how to use doubt as fuel
Convert it to gunpowder too
Now what you do is put the match to the charcoal fluid
Put the spark to it like Martha Stewart barbecuing
Ah screw it, feel like you want to hit that wall then do it
Punch through it, just cock back, put your all into it
Now you gon' take that rage and make that what you wage
Never take back what you say
If you stay strapped in your brain, engaged in a steel cage match
Ready to scrap asap
Take your fists and just ball it
Show who's big and who's smallest you're Christopher Wallace
Now picture 'em all as plastic and foam
Lays flat, where you put your dinner plates at
And set it on 'em like a placemat
And I want you to say that

I am phenomenal
With every ounce of my blood
With every breath in my lungs
Won't stop until I'm phe-no-menal
I am phenomenal
However long that it takes
I'll go to whatever lengths
It's gonna make me a monster though
I am phenomenal
But I'll never say, ‘Oh, it’s impossible’
Cause I'm born to be phenomenal

Oh, step into the unknown and find yourself
You’re floating freely, no emotion

Got a fuckin’ mouth with no shut-off valve
Can't even cut off power to it, but it's what allowed
Me to come up out from under the fuckin' ground
Cause I worked my butt off now
It's a subject that I don't know how to shut up about
Cause I stuck it out
Like a motherfuckin' tongue thats how
I responded when I got shoved around
You're gonna have non-believers
But when you're beyond belief, you probably shouldn't wonder how
Get it how you live
But are you prepared to give more than you get?
And put in twice what you get back from this shit
Though what you sacrifice barely is half, never give
Rap is my shiv
But it's like my shield at the same time I wield and my knife is will
Sometimes I feel just like B. Real from Cypress Hill
How I can just kill a cypher, survivor's guilt
I rhyme like life is still an uphill climb
Ready to face any challenge, waitin'
Can taste it, it's salivation, I'm wagin' retaliation
Look what I have built, reputation is validation
The only thing I'm capable of makin' is amazing
Only thing you're capable of makin' is a false statement
Or accusation... I am legendary status, in fact
That is the only way you'll ever be able to say
You're a legend is makin' an allegation
I write with the left, same hand I hold the mic with
As I fight to the death, 'til my last breath
Manage to prove who the best man is
Prevail at all costs, be the only ones left standin'
In the end, but I ain't gonna be the only one with the advantage
Of knowin' what it's like to be southpaw
Cause you can bet your ass you'll be left handed
Cause I am

I am phenomenal
With every ounce of my blood
With every breath in my lungs
Won't stop until I'm phe-no-menal
I am phenomenal
However long that it takes
I'll go to whatever lengths
It's gonna make me a monster though
I am phenomenal
But I'll never say, ‘Oh, it’s impossible’
Cause I'm born to be phenomenal



You know, I just don't get it
Last year I was nobody, this year I'm selling records
Now everybody wants to come around
Like I owe 'em something
The fuck you want from me, ten million dollars?
Get the fuck outta here!

I'm just a regular guy
Nobody ever gave a fuck before
Now everybody wanna run their mouth

Yo, you might see me joggin', you might see me walkin'
You might see me walkin' a dead Rottweiler dog
With its head chopped off in the park with a spiked collar
Hollerin' at him ‘cause the son of a bitch won't quit barkin'
Or leanin' out a window with a cocked shotgun
Drivin' up the block in the car that they shot Pac in
Looking for Big's killers, dressin' ridiculous
Blue and red, like I don't see what the big deal is
Double barrel 12-gauge bigger than Chris Wallace
Pissed off ‘cause Biggie and Pac just missed all this
Watchin' all these cheap imitations get rich off 'em
And get dollars that shoulda been theirs like they switched wallets
And amidst all this Crist' poppin' and wrist watches
I just sit back and just watch and just get nauseous
And walk around with an empty bottle of Remy Martin
An anti-Backstreet and Ricky Martin
Whose instinct's to kill N'Sync, don't get me started
These fuckin' brats can't sing and Britney's garbage
What's this bitch, retarded?
Give me back my sixteen dollars!
All I see is sissies in magazines smilin'
Whatever happened to wilin' out and being violent?
Whatever happened to catchin'
A good old-fashioned passionate ass-whoopin'
And gettin' your shoes, coat and your hat tooken

New Kids on the Block sucked a lot of dick
Boy/girl groups make me sick
And I can't wait 'til I catch all you faggots in public
I'ma love it

A bunch of little kids wanna swear just like me
I think I was put here to annoy the world
And destroy your little four-year-old boy or girl
Plus I was put here to put fear
In faggots who spray Faygo Root Beer
And call themselves clowns ‘cause they look queer
Faggy 2 Dope and Silent Gay
And I don't wrestle, I'll knock you fuckin' faggots the fuck out
Ask 'em about the club they was at when they snuck out
After they ducked out the back
When they saw us and bugged out
Ducked down and got paintballs shot at they truck — blaow!
Look at y'all runnin' your mouth again
When you ain't seen a fuckin' mile road south of 10
And I don't need help from D12 to beat up two females
In make-up who may try to scratch me with Lee Nails
Slim Anus? You damn right, slim anus
I don't get fucked in mine like you two little flamin' faggots

I'm not a wrestler guy
Come and see me on the streets alone
And if you wanna run your mouth

Is it because you love me that y'all expect so much of me?
You little groupie bitch, get off me, go fuck Puffy!
Now because of this blonde mop that's on top
Of this fucked up head that I've got I've gone pop
The underground just spunned around and did a 360
Now these kids diss me and act like some big sissies
"Oh, he just did some shit with Missy
So now he thinks he's too big to do some shit with MC Get-Bizzy."
My fuckin' bitch mom's suin' for 10 million
She must want a dollar for every pill I've been stealin'
Shit, where the fuck you think I picked up the habit?
All I had to do was go in her room and lift up her mattress
It doesn't matter, {your attorney Fred Gibson's a} faggot
Talkin' about I fabricated my past
He's just aggravated I won't ejaculate in his ass
So tell me, what the hell is a fella to do?
For every million I make, another relative sues
Family fightin' and fussin' over who wants to invite me to supper
A half-brother and sister who never seen me
Or even bothered to call me until they saw me on TV
Now everybody's so happy and proud
And then to top it off I walked to the news stand
To buy this cheap-ass little magazine with a food stamp
Skipped to the last page, flipped right fast
And what do I see? A picture of my big white ass
Okay, let me give you motherfuckers some help
Um, here, "XXL! XXL!"
Now your magazine shouldn't have so much trouble to sell
Ahh, fuck it, I'll even buy a couple myself

I'm just a regular guy
Nobody ever gave a fuck before
Now everybody wanna run their mouth

I'm just a regular guy
Nobody ever gave a fuck before
Now everybody wanna run their mouth



I'm getting by with my wicked ways
I'm loading up and I'm taking names
I wanna dig my way to hell
I wanna dig my way to hell
I'm getting by with my wicked ways
I'm loading up and I'm taking names
I wanna dig my way to hell
I wanna dig my way to hell

Guess I got a way with words, I could get away with murder
Ever heard of Aspergers'? It's a rare condition
It's what you're sufferin' from when you simply don't care if it's an
80 degree day and there's no frickin' air conditionin'
And you can't see the bitch’s hair is frizzin'
'Cause you got the windows up, blarin' the system
In your Chevrolet Prizm
The devil ain't on a level same as him
Picture someone who revels in straight masochism
And imagine him givin' an adjective an ass-whoopin'
So bad they should put his ass in prison
A word bully, I verbally abuse verbs
Like they did somethin' to me personally
Used to get bullied, so I'd cut class and ditch it
Cadillac from a K Car
My ass from a hole in the ground, still can’t tell 'em a-part
Came straight out the trailer park
Screamin' I'm proud to shop at K-Mart, and it became art
And I'm still fed up and as pissed off as they are
To this day I still get in fights with the same broad
At the same Walmart, arguin' over the same cart
In the middle of the aisle whilin', I don't give a fuck, I don't play
Bitch, you think you saw this basket first?
You're ass backwards like motherfuckin' Bob and Silent Jay
Illest shit you could think I would say
Mind's like a pile of clay
When's the last time that you saw a villain with a cape
Ripped a gapin' hole in it, flipped out
Ripped down the drapes, tied 'em around my neck
Went down the fire escape of the Empire State
Slipped, fell straight down to the ground
Splattered all over the entire state
And straight to hell, got impaled by the gates
Saw Satan, stuck his face in an ashtray
While I sashayed around flames with a match
And I gave him the gas face
And this ain't got nothin' to do with a scale
Or being gay, little faggot, but by the way
Thoughts are gettin' darker by the day
I'm a combination of Skylar Grey
Tyler the Creator, and Violent J
It's a fuckin' miracle to be this lyrical
Paint my face with clown makeup and a smiley face
I'm insane, every rhyme I say
Sons you like an ultra-violet ray
I’m sellin' hatred, buffet style, all the shit you can eat
I’m throwin' down the gauntlet to see what hell I can raise
With the rhyme I’m spittin' while I’m shittin' on competition
In the meantime it’s always mean time, I'm gettin'—

I'm getting by with my wicked ways
I'm loading up and I'm taking names
I wanna dig my way to hell
I wanna dig my way to hell
I'm getting by with my wicked ways
I'm loading up and I'm taking names
I wanna dig my way to hell
I wanna dig my way to hell

I’ve been a career asshole
I don’t see why these people always got my back
I done said so much fucked up shit
I was born a mistake, but I was put here not by accident
I had a purpose and that purpose
Was to beat a beat purplish, slaughter tracks
I done put my two dimes and a nickel in this shit
I’m comin' to get that quarter back
Like Ndamukong, the drama can build
Your mama can ask me for my autograph
'Cause that cougar's a MILF
She's the oldest trick in the book, but I sure would fall for that
You done brought a bat to a rocket launcher fight
When I get on the mic I'ma snap
Make you wish the ambulance that took me to the hospital
When I overdosed woulda caught a flat
If it makes you sick to your stomach acid
Indigestion, my suggestion’s Kaopectate
If it feels like I'm runnin' away with the game
It's 'cause I am, don't speculate, spectate
All I got is dick for days and insults for decades
But I get by with my wicked ways
Lady, you can suck a dick 'til your neck aches
Cry 'til you get puffy eyes, red faced
But I'm leavin' on this jet plane
You ain't fly, you're an airhead
And I'm sick of poundin' a square peg in a round hole
Sorry, another catchphrase
But your baggage ain't gon' fit in my storage overhead space
'Cause it just ain't big enough to fit your damaged goods
'Cause baby, stable mentally I ain't
I need my meds, I peed my bed
I'm going blind, I don't see my legs, I keep on falling down
No wonder you can't stand me, I need my cane
Someone help me, I think my face is melting
If you felt these migraines
And see these maggots eat my brain
This G-I-A-N-T hole in my empty head
If you read my mind, you can see my pain
And you'd see why I be this way
Ever since I was knee-high playin' with G.I. Joes
Told these hoes shut their P-I-E holes, now peep my game
'Cause I'm 'bout it 'bout it
I'm outta control like no other mic go
Stab you 'til the knife goes – dull
I'm nothin' but a hole inside your skull where your eye goes
'Cause I'ma sock it to you!
Dyke ho, you don't like it?
Get on your Harley Davidson menstrual cycle
And ride it like a motorbike
I'm finna blow the mic the whole night, so
Strike up the fuckin' maestro, I'm nitro
And hi, ho, hand me my shovel!
I'm liable to dig my hole deeper
And it's off to H-E double hockey sticks, I go

I'm getting by with my wicked ways
I'm loading up and I'm taking names
I wanna dig my way to hell
I wanna dig my way to hell
I'm getting by with my wicked ways
I'm loading up and I'm taking names
I wanna dig my way to hell
I wanna dig my way to hell

Ohh, please be empty
Please be empty, please be empty
Thank you, God!
Shit… Is that a girl?
I'm gonna rock this blouse and put a cock in my mouth
And get my balls blew out, and get gay into the A.M.
And lay with eighteen guys naked
And let myself show, let myself show
Buttfuck it, suck it, pull it, tug it
Life's too short to not stroke your bone
So everybody, everybody
Circle jerk, touch my body
Who is that? Where are you going? Come back!
Why does everyone always leave me?
Hello? Fuck you then!
Blow it out your ass!



Welcome to Detroit
Myself, Slaughterhouse, and Yelawolf
White Dawg, get 'em!

Put these mothafuckas in a box, then I send 'em away
Put 'em in a gray 'llac and pop the trunk
And throw 'em in the back, jack; ha, dig 'em a grave
Put a brick inside that Xerox when I print up a page
Movin' keys I can relate, 'cause I live in the cage
I throw up the A, I take 'em to school, I give 'em a grade
An easy E for effort; that's WWA
White with an attitude, alphabet soup is on my plate
All I got is Z's, they sleepin' on me, I can't get 'em awake
I spoon-feed 'em a sound in a room full of deceivers and clowns
Who believe in makin' it rain 'cause all they see is the clouds
And I watch from the couch of the VIP like a potato
With a bunch of meatheads like, "Fuck it, I'll just feed 'em a cow."
Plenty of white boys to pick from this year
But before you pick a pepper, you better pick up your heater
'Cause even Peter Piper could pick up a mic
But what it's like to pick a fight with me
Is like puttin' Nikes on a cheetah
Better speed up, or at least in my case Adidas
I'm out this bitch, drinkin' Sprite by the two-liter
Holler! Shady Records…

Say I'm from the new school
I'ma say, "Check your tone and watch your mouth!"
If they teachin' how to Dougie, I'm condonin' droppin' out
Forced to wild, y'all birthed me, then gave me up
I just perfected being hip-hop's foster child; now check it
Don't blame y'all for being trash, fans are coppin' it
The radio's the crime scene, the masses are the hostages
In my youth I'd throw shots, the fad was dodgin' it
I'm grown, I ain't watchin' the throne, I'm sabotagin' it
You see that four-headed monster in the storm looms?
Snipe 'em from a distance; the scope got a long zoom
You Super Mario thugs is in the wrong room
Gotta figure here you won't get bigger if you on shrooms
If it was left to me, I'd revive what the game be 'bout
I'd have took the wine outta Amy house
Enough raps from you scrub cats 'bout cockin' a snub back
Wayne couldn't teach me how to love that
But I got this chick from uptown, she my summer bunny
Both parents broke, but she come from money
Think my bread is her paper to burn
So I lock her out, and now she doubt David is Stern
She's so bad, I make her hit the telly from a taxi
Then dead her in the Holiday Inn, learned that from Max B
That's why the haters envy, kinda wanna send me llamas
I made it right before their eyes, like I was Benihanas
Is it me, or is what I'm hearing just pitiful?
Airwaves the same, now the stereo's typical
My skin's thick, so the critics ignored
So unafraid to die you'd think I did it before
The boy's Rodman with the trash talk
Magic or Walt with the black ball
Way I bounce off the asphalt with cat paws, glass jaw
Hood of your mask will be the Blackfoot with no passport
Body be found in a mansion in one of my trapdoors
If punks had award you status whores categore
Probably be that of awards
Between Michael Rappaport and Kenny Lattimore
I know hip-hop's alive and well
If it died, you other crews wouldn't survive the smell

I spot a victim, the plot'll thicken when the clock is tickin'
I caught him slippin', I gotta give him a shot, I hit him
With proper spittin', hottest writtens and compositions
So competition's a contradiction
Somebody mention they got a Crooked, highly fiction
We probly different, got Gotti henchmen
Opposition, I'll body quick as Bugatti engines
I'm on a mission to get richer, the sickest lyric-kicker
Diggin' a ditch for different spitters
Weak lyricists get disfigured
Sip liquor, spit like a sick mixture
Of Notorious, Pun and L; get the big picture?
The poster, I'll roast ya
My mind so deadly it's just like the beanie is close to a holster
It's over, control my whole coastal region
Like I'm supposed to, flow is goin' postal even
Open season, heart close to freezin'
Ruthless as Eazy, nigga, approach, I'm squeezin'
Believe me, dopest West-Coaster breathin'
So most y'all hope I'm vegan; nope, I'm beefin'
Rappers need to keep it trill, give me a beat to kill
Too many people still eatin' sleeping pills
People sleepin' on my ether skills
And y'all ain't even real, you 'bout to die in this cypher
Before you die you should do the Jada and leave a will, for real

I ain't a rap dude, I'm a dude who rap
Before this I was movin' crack
Killers y'all become when y'all rhyme, I salute and dap
And if I blink, they'll remove your snaps
You ain't cool, you wack, with your foolish act
Skinny jeans don't mean your ass shoot
It means your booty claps
Don't play like Tyler Perry
This the Slaughterhouse of pain, flow brown, tight and heavy
When it come to 16's, I'm a fiend
Seen in the studio near a needle with a mean lean
Probably writin' bars to Nas' "Thief's Theme"
Gettin' my Yaowa on
Man, all these Olajuwons, we the dream team
This is an all day slaughter
They fiendin' for us to break, like Beyonce's water
The four quarters doin' all the eatin'
And y'all gotta know why I made the cut, I'm Puerto Rican
Ortiz keep the fire ready; and tryin' to put me out
Is like tryin' to steal a transvestite from Eddie

I'm do-or-die dope, and you can make the sticker sittin' on the door of that Phantom your suicide note
Hi, Rihanna! Is Nicki livin' with you?
Let me know so I can buy binoculars and telescopes
Hi, Rihanna! I don't need to know you better
You tell me you love my music again, we go together
Bye, Rihanna! Now back to y'all fools
We rock out, like the outside of a guitar school
Thousand dollar frames I prefer to see the world through
Don't ask me nothin' about Budden, I beat my girl too
You ask me why do I keep her, I say it's cheaper to
That's why I ride around in a Rolls, like Wiz Khalifa do
Rappers, I'm your daddy, I tell you straight as this
You don't kill, but your father will, like Jayden Smith
I tell you like I tell my Spanish chick
You fly, but I ain't going down on no landin' strip
So get your wax on, like Daniel San, or I'ma have to run
Like De la Hoya in drag when cameras come
Point out the greatest rapper alive, I'll headshot him
Smack his girl on the butt and buy her some red bottom
Bring every deceased rapper back to see his wife
While I'm cyber-sexin' with Jessica Alba via Skype
I’m on my D-boy, Deebo thing
Spiritual steelo swing, like Cee-Lo Green
Get out the camera with your B-Roll bling
You know your flow is wack
We cornered the market, like a Wal-Mart in a cul-de-sac
Yeah, this is what two million singles sold
And an album that's gold
Look like without having to sell your soul
Nickel!

Ayo, lyrical miracle, spiritual individual, criminal
You're 'bout to see peace destroyed, it'll never be restored
When I unleash these beastly hordes on your CD stores
Wanna stop it? You gon' need a priest, at least three swords
A license to ill from the Beastie Boys
Three Ouija boards, a squeegee, and please be warned
Don't ask what the squeegee's for
Or the holy water, acid raps that'll eat these floors
Eat a hole in a rhyme book, you see these horns?
And as for me, you ask when I'm gone, will he be mourned?
Is puke lukewarm? Should Casey Anthony do porn?
Can that chick fit a newborn dead baby inside a frickin' shoebox with a shoehorn
Smothered in chloroform, so she can go get her groove on?
Can she duct-tape and Velcro a fetus?
Joell, yo, tell Joe I need his
Empty box from his old shell-toed Adidas
So I can put these babies in a fetal position
They're gettin' elbows to the penis
Yeah, big deal, I took some little kid's Big Wheel
And spit in his frickin' big kids meal
Quit tryna bite me and pinch, you wench, sit still!
Did you just put your six-inch heel
Through my Benz windshield?!
Is it dust we 'bout to kick up?
Can Yelawolf fit a fifth of rum in a big cup
Between his stick shift in his frigging pickup
And drink like a hick redneck hillbilly will 'til he gets hicc-ups?
Flippin' the script up, like Mike Vick
Gettin' bit in his junk by a Pit, yup, I'm a sick pup
I'd be a horrible magician, 'cause I'd fuck a trick up
Fix your lips up to say somethin' fly, or zip up!
'Til you fuck around and get dropped
Like an E when you add an I-N-G
Don't put a K in front of that, though, when I MC
'Cause I'm not the king of this microphone booth
It's more like a phone booth
Superman in this bitch, Kryptonite won't do
It gives me more power
I bump the Fat Boys and eat rat poison, take meteor showers
Fresh outta the mental hospital
And me not flossin' a middle finger while I hop in a mosh pit
Will be like Nas doin' gospel or R&B—you crazy?
Me pushin' up daisies, that thought is impossible
As if flashin' across the news
Posdnuos was caught with a prostitute
With a huge johnson, boobs and a monstrous tube
Of lube, and a bra, some boots
Some panties, and an aqua blue Mazda
Swallowin' a popsicle, playin' tonsil pool
So kill the rumors, it ain’t happenin'; I’ma rap 'til I'm fossil fuel



Aww, look at daddy's baby girl
That's daddy's baby, little sleepy head
Yesterday I changed your diaper
Wiped you and powdered you
How did you get so big?
Can't believe it, now you're two
Baby, you're so precious
Daddy's so proud of you
Sit down, bitch! You move again

Don't make me wake this baby!
She don't need to see what I'm 'bout to do!
Quit crying, bitch! Why do you always make me shout at you?!
How could you just leave me and love him out the blue?!
Oh, what's the matter, Kim? Am I too loud for you?!
Too bad, bitch! You're gonna finally hear me out this time!
At first I'm like, "Aight, you wanna throw me out, that's fine!"
But not for him to take my place — are you out your mind?!
This couch, this TV, this whole house is mine!
How could you let him sleep in our bed?! Look it, Kim!
He ain't so hot now, is he, little punk?!
You're never gonna get away with this!) You think I give a fuck?!
We'll be right back — well, I will, you'll be in the trunk!

So long, bitch, you did me so wrong
I don't wanna go on
Living in this world without you
So long, bitch, you did me so wrong
I don't wanna go on
Living in this world without you

You really fucked me, Kim! You really did a number on me!
Never knew me cheatin' on you would come back to haunt me
But we was kids then, Kim, I was only eighteen
That was years ago, I thought we wiped the slate clean
There's a {four}-year-old little {boy}
Laying dead with a slit throat in your living room!
Ha-ha! What, you think I'm kiddin' you?!
Bullshit, you bitch! Don't fuckin' lie to me!
What the fuck's this guy's problem on the side of me?
Fuck you, asshole! Yeah, bite me!
Kim, Kim! Why don't you like me?
I hate you! I hate you! I swear to God, I hate you!
Oh my God, I love you! How the fuck could you do this to me?!

So long, bitch, you did me so wrong
I don't wanna go on
Living in this world without you
So long, bitch, you did me so wrong
I don't wanna go on
Living in this world without you

Please don't do this, baby! Please! I love you!
Look, we can just take Hailie and leave!)  Fuck you!
You did this to us! You did it! It's your fault!
Oh my God, I'm crackin' up — get a grip, Marshall!
Hey, remember the time we went to Brian's party
And you were, like, so drunk that you threw up all over Archie?
See, it all makes sense, doesn't it?
You and your husband have a fight
And while this is going on, his son just woke up
And he walks in, she panics, and he gets his throat cut
And you slash your own throat
So now it's double homicide and suicide with no note
I shoulda known better when you started to act weird
We coulda— hey, where you going? Get back here!
You can't run from me, Kim! It's just us, nobody else
You're only makin' this harder on yourself!
Ha-ha, got ya! Go ahead, yell!
Here, I'll scream with you, "Ah, somebody help!"
Don't you get it, bitch? No one can hear you!
Now shut the fuck up and get what's comin' to you!
You were supposed to love me!!!
Now bleed, bitch, bleed!!! Bleed, bitch, bleed!!! Bleed!!!

So long, bitch, you did me so wrong
I don't wanna go on
Living in this world without you
So long, bitch, you did me so wrong
I don't wanna go on
Living in this world without you



A lot of people ask me stupid fuckin' questions
A lot of people think that what I say on a record
Or what I talk about on a record
That I actually do in real life or that I believe in it
Or if I say that I wanna kill somebody
That I'm actually gonna do it or that I believe in it
Well, shit, if you believe that, then I'll kill you
You know why? ‘Cause I'm a criminal!
Criminal! You're goddamn right
I'm a criminal! Yeah, I'm a criminal!

My words are like a dagger with a jagged edge
That'll stab you in the head, whether you're a fag or lez
Or a homosex, hermaph or a trans-a-vest
Pants or dress, hate fags? The answer's yes
Homophobic? Nah, you're just heterophobic
Staring at my jeans, watching my genitals bulgin'
That's my motherfuckin' balls, you'd better let go of 'em
They belong in my scrotum, you'll never get hold of 'em!
"Hey, it's me, Versace! Whoops, somebody shot me!
And I was just checkin' the mail
Get it? Checkin' the male?"
How many records you expecting to sell
After your second LP sends you directly to jail?
Come on, relax, guy! I like gay men
"Please Lord, this boy needs Jesus
Heal this child, help us destroy these demons
Oh, and please send me a brand new car
And a prostitute while my wife's sick in the hospital"
Preacher, preacher! Fifth grade teacher!
You can't reach me, my mom can't neither
You can't teach me a goddamn thing ‘cause
I watch TV and Comcast cable
And you ain't able to stop these thoughts
You can't stop me from toppin' these charts
And you can't stop me from droppin' each March
With a brand new CD for these fuckin' retards
And to think, it's just lil old me
Mr. Don't-Give-a-Fuck still won't leave

I'm a criminal!
‘Cause every time I write a rhyme
These people think it's a crime
To tell 'em what's on my mind
I guess I'm a criminal!
I don't gotta say a word
I just flip 'em the bird and keep goin'
I don't take shit from no one

The mother did drugs, hard liquor, cigarettes and speed
The baby came out, disfigured ligaments, indeed
It was a seed who would grow up just as crazy as she
Don't dare make fun of that baby, ‘cause that baby was me
I'm a criminal, an animal caged who turned crazed
But how the fuck you supposed to grow up when you weren't raised?
So as I got older and I got a lot taller
My dick shrunk smaller, but my balls got larger
I drink more liquor to fuck you up quicker
Than you'd wanna fuck me up for sayin' the word ______
My morals went *pffft* when the president got oral
Sex in his Oval Office on top of his desk off of his own employee
Now, don't ignore me, you won't avoid me
I'm the bad guy who makes fun of people that die
In plane crashes and laughs as long as it ain't happened to him
Slim Shady, I'm as crazy as Eminem and Kim combined
"The Maniac's in" in place of the Doctor
‘Cause Dre couldn't make it today
He's a little under the weather, so I'm takin' his place
Oh, that's Dre with an AK to his face
Don't make me kill him too and spray his brains all over the place
I told you, Dre, you should've kept that thang put away
Guess that'll teach you not to let me play with it, eh?
I'm a criminal!

{*Whistling*} How you doin'?
Go, go, go!

Windows tinted on my ride when I drive in it
So when I rob a bank, run out and just dive in it
So I'll be disguised in it
And if anybody identifies the guy in it, I hide for five minutes
Come back, shoot the eyewitness
Fire at the private eye hired to pry in my business
Die bitches, bastards, brats, pets
This puppy's lucky I didn't blast his ass yet
If I ever gave a fuck, I'd shave my nuts
Tuck my dick in between my legs and cluck
You motherfuckin' chickens ain't brave enough
To say the stuff I say, so just tape it shut
Shit, half the shit I say, I just make it up
To make you mad, so kiss my white naked ass
And if it's not a rapper that I make it as
I'ma be a fuckin' rapist in a Jason mask

I'm a criminal!
‘Cause every time I write a rhyme
These people think it's a crime
To tell 'em what's on my mind
I guess I'm a criminal!
I don't gotta say a word
I just flip 'em the bird and keep goin'
I don't take shit from no one




When I was just a little baby boy
My momma used to tell me these crazy things
She used to tell me my daddy was an evil man
She used to tell me he hated me
But then I got a little bit older
And I realized she was the crazy one
But there was nothing I could do or say to try to change it
‘Cause that's just the way she was

They said I can't rap about being broke no more
They ain't say I can't rap about coke no more
Slut, you think I won't choke no whore
'Til the vocal cords don't work in her throat no more?
These motherfuckers are thinkin' I'm playin'
Thinkin' I'm sayin' the shit ‘cause I'm thinkin' it just to be sayin' it
Put your hands down, bitch, I ain't gon' shoot you
I'ma pull you to this bullet and put it through you
Shut up, slut! You're causin' too much chaos
Just bend over and take it like a slut — okay, Ma?
"Oh, now he's raping his own mother
Abusing a whore, snorting coke
And we gave him the Rolling Stone cover?"
You're goddamn right, bitch, and now it's too late
I'm triple platinum and tragedies happened in two states
I invented violence, you vile venomous volatile vicious
Vain Vicodin, vrin vrin vrin!
Texas Chainsaw, left his brains all
Danglin' from his neck while his head barely hangs on
Blood, guts, guns, cuts
Knives, lives, wives, nuns, sluts — bitch, I'ma kill you!

You don't wanna fuck with me
Girls neither, you ain't nothin' but a slut to me
Bitch, I'ma kill you! You ain't got the balls to beef
We ain't gon' never stop beefin', I don't squash the beef
You better kill me, I'ma be another rapper dead
For poppin' off at the mouth with shit I shouldn't have said
But when they kill me, I'm bringin' the world with me
Bitches too, you ain't nothin' but a girl to me

‘Cause Shady will fucking kill you

Bitch, I'ma kill you! Like a murder weapon, I'ma conceal you
In a closet with mildew, sheets, pillows and film you
Fuck with me, I been through Hell, shut the hell up
I'm tryna develop these pictures of the Devil to sell 'em
I ain't "acid rap," but I rap on acid
Got a new blow-up doll and just had a strap-on added
Whoops! Is that a subliminal hint?
No, just criminal intent to sodomize women again
Eminem offend? No, Eminem'll insult
And if you ever give in to him you give him an impulse
To do it again, then if he does it again
You'll probably end up jumpin' out of somethin' up on the tenth
Bitch, I'ma kill you! I ain't done, this ain't the chorus
I ain't even drug you in the woods yet to paint the forest
A bloodstain is orange after you wash it
Three or four times in a tub, but that's normal — ain't it, Norman?
Serial killer hiding murder material
In a cereal box on top of your stereo
Here we go again, we're out of our medicine

You don't wanna fuck with me
Girls neither, you ain't nothin' but a slut to me
Bitch, I'ma kill you! You ain't got the balls to beef
We ain't gon' never stop beefin', I don't squash the beef
You better kill me, I'ma be another rapper dead
For poppin' off at the mouth with shit I shouldn't have said
But when they kill me, I'm bringin' the world with me
Bitches too, you ain't nothin' but a girl to me

‘Cause Shady will fucking kill you

Know why I say these things?
‘Cause ladies' screams keep creepin' in Shady's dreams
And the way things seem
I shouldn't have to pay these shrinks
These 80 G's a week to say the same things tweece
Twice, whatever, I hate these things
Fuck shots, I hope the weed'll outweigh these drinks
Motherfuckers want me to come on their radio shows
Just to argue with 'em ‘cause their ratings stink
Fuck that! I'll choke radio announcer to bouncer
From fat bitch to all seventy thousand pounds of her
From principal to the student body and counselor
From in-school to before school to outta school
I don't even believe in breathin'
I'm leavin' air in your lungs
Just to hear you keep screamin' for me to seep it
Okay, I'm ready to go play, I got the machete from O.J.
I'm ready to make everyone's throats ache
You faggots keep eggin' me on
'Til I have you at knifepoint, then you beg me to stop
Shut up! Give me your hands and feet
I said shut up when I'm talkin' to you
You hear me? Answer me, or I'ma kill you!

You don't wanna fuck with me
Girls neither, you ain't nothin' but a slut to me
Bitch, I'ma kill you! You don't got the balls to beef
We ain't gon' never stop beefin', I don't squash the beef
You better kill me, I'ma be another rapper dead
For poppin' off at the mouth with shit I shouldn't have said
But when they kill me, I'm bringin' the world with me
Bitches too, you ain't nothin' but a girl to me
Bitch, I'ma kill you!

‘Cause Shady will fucking kill you

Ha-ha-ha, I'm just playing, ladies
You know I love you



That's why they call me Slim Shady

I murder a rhyme, one word at a time
You never heard of a mind as perverted as mine
You better get rid of that 9, it ain't gonna help
What good's it gonna do against a man that strangles himself?
I'm waitin' for Hell, like hell, shit, I'm anxious as hell
Manson, you're safe in that cell, be thankful it's jail
I used to be my mommy's little angel at twelve
Thirteen, I was puttin' shells in a gauge on a shelf
I used to get punked and bullied on my block
'Til I cut a kitten's head off and stuck it in this kid's mailbox
I used to give a fuck, now I could give a fuck less
What do I think of success? It sucks, too much press
I'm stressed, too much cess, depressed
Too upset, it's just too much mess
Whatever you say is wrong, whatever I say's right
You think of my name now whenever you say hi
Became a commodity because I'm W-H-I-
-T-E, ‘cause MTV was so friendly to me
Can't wait 'til Kim sees me!
Now, is it worth it? Look at my life, how is it perfect?
Read my lips, bitch! What, my mouth isn't workin'?
You hear this finger? Oh, it's upside down
Here, let me turn this motherfucker up right now

That's why they call me Slim Shady

I take each individual degenerate's head and reach into it
Just to see if he's influenced by me, if he listens to music
And if he feeds into this shit, he's an innocent victim
And becomes a puppet on the string of my tennis shoe
{​​*vocal scratches*}​​ My name is Slim Shady
I been crazy way before radio didn't play me
The sensational {​​*vocal scratch "Back is the incredible!"*}​​
With Ken Kaniff, who just finds the men edible
It's Ken Kaniff on the Internet
Tryin' to lure your kids with him into bed
It's a sick world we live in these days
"Slim, for pete's sakes, put down Christopher Reeve's legs!"
Geez, you guys are so sensitive
"Slim, it's a touchy subject, try and just don't mention it."
Mind with no sense in it, fried schizophrenic
Whose eyes get so squinted
I'm blind from smoke in 'em, with my windows tinted
With nine limos rented, doin' lines of coke in 'em
With a bunch of guys hoppin' out, all high and indo scented
And that's where I get my name from, that's why they call me—

That's why they call me Slim Shady

I take seven {kids} from {Columbine}
Stand 'em all in line, add an AK-47, a revolver, a 9
A MAC-11 and it oughta solve the problem of mine
And that's a whole school of bullies shot up all at one time
As the world was over this whole Y2K thing
And by the way, N'Sync, why do they sing?
Am I the only one who realizes they stink?
Should I dye my hair pink and care what y'all think
Lip sync and buy a bigger size of earrings?
It's why I tend to block out when I hear things
So I just throw up a middle finger and let it linger
Longer than the rumor that I was stickin' it to Christina
‘Cause if I ever stuck it to any singer in showbiz
It'd be Jennifer Lopez — and Puffy, you know this
I'm sorry Puff, but I don't give a fuck
If this chick was my own mother
I'd still fuck her with no rubber and cum inside her
And have a son and a new brother at the same time
And just say that it ain't mine — what's my name?

That's why they call me Slim Shady

Guess who's b-back, back
{​​*scratch*}​​ Guess who's back
{​​*scratch*}​​ Gue {​​*scratch*}​​ guess who's back
D-12 {​​*scratch*}​​ Guess who's back
Gue, gue-gue-gue, guess who's back
Dr. Dre {​​*scratch*}​​ Guess who's back
Back back {​​*scratch*}​​ back {​​*scratch*}​​
Slim Shady, 2001



Eminem has a full line of chainsaws
Eminem, Eminem, Eminem, Eminem, Eminem, Eminem
Marshall Mathers, Eminem, the rapper Eminem


I walk around like a space cadet, place your bets
Who's likely to become a serial killer? Case of Tourettes
Fuck, fuck-fuck, can't take the stress
I make a mess as the day progresses
Angry and take it out on the neighbors' hedges
Like this is how I'll cut your face up, bitches
With these hedge-trimmin' scissors with razor edges
Imagination's dangerous
It's the only way to escape this mess
And make the best of this situation, I guess
'Cause I feel like a little bitch
This predicament's despicable, I'm sick of just gettin' pushed
It's ridiculous, I look like a frickin' wuss
A pussy, this kid just took my stick of licorice
And threw my sticker books in a picker bush
I wanna kick his tush, but I was six and shook
This fucker was twelve and was six foot, with a vicious hook
He hit me, I fell; I got back up, all I did was book
Now there's using your head, Momma always said—

If you had a brain, you'd be dangerous
A brain, you'd be dangerous
I'ma prove you wrong
Momma, I'ma grow one day to be famous
And I'ma be a pain in the anus
I'ma be the bomb
I'ma use my head as a weapon
Find a way to escape this insaneness
Momma always said
"Son, if you had a brain, you'd be dangerous."
Guess it pays to be brainless

Fast forward some years later, a teenager; this is fun, sweet
I just got jumped twice in one week, it's complete
It's usually once a month, this is some feat
I've accomplished, they've stomped me
Into the mud, gee, for what reason you stumped me?
But how do you get the shit beat out of you
Beat down and be upbeat when you don't have nothing?
No valid shot at life, chance to make it or succeed
'Cause you're doomed from the start
It's like you grew up on Jump Street, from jump street
But if I could just get my head out my ass
I could accomplish any task, practicin' trash-talkin'
In a trance locked in my room
Yeah, but I got some plans, Momma
These damn rhymes are falling out of my pants pocket
I can't stop it, and I'm starting to blend in more
In school this shit helps for sure
I'm getting more self-assured than I've ever been before
Plus no one picks on me anymore
I done put a stop to that, threw my first punch – end of story
Still, in my skull’s a vacant empty void
Been usin’ it more as a bin for storage
Door hinge, syringe, an orange
An extension cord, and a Ninja sword
Not to mention four linchpins, an astringent stored
Ironin’ board, a bench, a wrench, a ore
Wench, an attention whore
Everything but a brain
But dome's off the fuckin' chain like an independent store
Something's wrong with my head
Just think if I had a brain in it, thank God that I don't
'Cause I'd probably be Dahmer, 'cause Momma always said—

If you had a brain, you'd be dangerous
A brain, you'd be dangerous
I'ma prove you wrong
Momma, I'ma grow one day to be famous
And I'ma be a pain in the anus
I'ma be the bomb
I'ma use my head as a weapon
Find a way to escape this insaneness
Momma always said
"Son, if you had a brain, you'd be dangerous."
Guess it pays to be brainless

Now my mom goes wahm-wahm-wahm
'Cause I'm not that smart, but I'm not dumb
I was on a bottom of the pile, gettin' stomped
But somehow I came out on top

I told you one day, I said they'd have that red carpet rolled out, yo
I'm nice, yo, fuck it, I'm out cold
Now everywhere I go they scream out go
I'm 'bout to clean house, yo
I'm Lysol, now I'm just household
Outsold the sell-outs
Freak the hell out Middle America, hear 'em yell out
In terror, they were so scared
And those kids just about belted out
Whatever spouted or fell out
Of my smart aleck mouth, it was so weird
Inappropriate? So be it, I don't see it
Maybe one day when the smoke clears, it won't be as
Motherfuckin' difficult, ch-yeah
'Til then, hopefully you little homos
Get over your fears and pho-bias
It's okay to be scared straight
They said I provoke queers 'til emotions evoke tears
My whole career's a stroke of sheer genius
Smoke and mirrors, tactical, practical jokes, yeah
Who the fuck woulda thunk that one little ol' MC'd
Be able to take the whole culture and re-upholstery it?
And boy, they did flock; can't believe this little hick locked
This hip-hop shit in his hip pocket, and still the shit got
That white-trash traffic in gridlock
Shit hoppin' like six blocks
From a Kid Rock/Insane Clown Posse concert in mid Oc-
-tober, and God forbid I see a wizard
And get a brain in my titanium cranium, y'all, 'cause
I'll turn into the Unabomber, Momma always said—

If you had a brain, you'd be dangerous
A brain, you'd be dangerous
I'ma prove you wrong
Momma, I'ma grow one day to be famous
And I'ma be a pain in the anus
I'ma be the bomb
I'ma use my head as a weapon
Find a way to escape this insaneness
Momma always said
"Son, if you had a brain, you'd be dangerous."
Guess it pays to be brainless

Insaneness ain't even a word, you stupid fuck!
Neither is ain't




Woah, uh get your hands in the air
And get to clapping 'em and, like, back and forth
Because this is what you thought it wasn't
It be's the brothers representin' the Dirty Dozen
I be the F-R-O the double G
And check out my man, he goes by the name of um, er…

Slim Shady, brain dead like Jim Brady
I'm an M-80, you little like that Kim lady
I'm buzzin', Dirty Dozen, naughty rotten rhymer
Cursin' at you playas worse than Marty Schottenheimer
You wacker than the motherfucker you bit your style from
You ain't gon' sell two copies if you press a double album
Admit it, fuck it, while we comin' out in the open
I'm doin' acid, crack, smack, coke and smokin' dope then
I have a disease, and they don't know what to call it
Better hide your wallet, ‘cause I'm comin' up quick to strip yo' cash
Bought a ticket to yo' concert just to come and whip yo' ass
Bitch, I'm comin' out swingin', so fast it'll make yo' eyes spin
You gettin' knocked the fuck out like Mike Tyson
The proof is in the pudding, just ask DeShaun Holton
I'll slit your motherfuckin' throat worse than Ron Goldman

So when you see me on yo' block with two Glocks
Screamin', "Fuck the world!" like 2Pac
I just don't give a fuck
Talkin' that shit behind my back
Dirty mackin', tellin' your boys that I'm on crack
I just don't give a fuck
So put my tape back on the rack
Go run and tell your friends my shit is wack
I just don't give a fuck
But see me on the street and duck
‘Cause you gon' get stuck, stole, and snuffed
‘Cause I just don't give a fuck

I'm nicer than Pete, but I'm on a search to crush a milkbone
I'm everlastin', I melt vanilla ice like silicone
I'm ill enough to just straight up diss you for no reason
I'm colder than snow season when it's 20 below freezin'
Flavor with no seasonin', this is the sneak preview
I'll diss your magazine and still won't get a weak review
I'll make your freak leave you, smell the Folgers crystals
This is lyrical combat—gentlemen, hold your pistols!
But I form like Voltron and blast you with my shoulder missiles
Extortion, snortin', supportin' abortion
Pathological liar, blowin' shit out of proportion
The looniest, zaniest, spontaneous, sporadic
Impulsive thinker, compulsive drinker, addict
Half animal, half man
Dumpin' yo' dead body inside of a fuckin' trash can
With more holes than an afghan

So when you see me on yo' block with two Glocks
Screamin', "Fuck the world!" like 2Pac
I just don't give a fuck
Talkin' that shit behind my back
Dirty mackin', tellin' your boys that I'm on crack
I just don't give a fuck
So put my tape back on the rack
Go run and tell your friends my shit is wack
I just don't give a fuck
But see me on the street and duck
‘Cause you finna get stuck, stole, and snuffed
I just don't give a fuck

Somebody, let me out this limousine! I'm a caged demon
On stage screamin' like Rage Against the Machine
I'm convinced I'm a fiend
Shootin' up while this record is spinnin'
Clinically brain-dead, I don't need a second opinion
Fuck droppin' a jewel, I'm flippin' a sacred treasure
I'll bite yo' motherfuckin' style, just to make it fresher
I can't take the pressure, I'm sick of bitches
Sick of naggin' bosses bitchin' while I'm washin' dishes
In school I never said much, too busy havin' a headrush
Doin' too much rush had my face flushed like red blush
Then I went to Jim Beam, that's when my face grayed
Went to gym in 8th grade, raped the women's swim team
Don't take me for a joke, I'm no comedian
Too many mental problems got me snortin' coke and smokin' weed again
I'm goin' up over the curb, drivin' on the median
Finally made it home, but I don't got the key to get in

So when you see me on yo' block with two Glocks
Screamin', "Fuck the world!" like 2Pac
I just don't give a fuck
Talkin' that shit behind my back
Dirty mackin', tellin' your boys that I'm on crack
I just don't give a fuck
So put my tape back on the rack
Go run and tell your friends my shit is wack
I just don't give a fuck
But see me on the street and duck
‘Cause you finna get stuck, stole, and snuffed
I just don't give a fuck

Shit, fuck everybody!
Outsidaz, Pacewon, Young Zee




This is Eminem, baby, back up in that motherfuckin' ass
We represent the 313, you know what I’m sayin'?
Yo, they don’t know shit about this, for the '96

Ayo, my pen and paper cause a chain reaction
To get your brain relaxin', the zany actin' maniac in action
A brainiac in fact, son, you mainly lack attraction
You look insanely wack when just a fraction of my tracks run
My rhymin' skills got you climbin' hills
I travel through your mind and to your spine like siren drills
I'm slimin' grills of roaches, with spray that disinfects
And twistin' necks of rappers 'til their spinal column disconnects
Put this in decks and check the monologue
Turn your system up, twist 'em up
And indulge in the marijuana smog
This is the season for noise pollution contamination
Examination of more car-tunes than animation
My lamination of nar-er-ration, hits a snare and bass
On a track for duck rapper interrogation
When I declare invasion, there ain't no time to be starin' gazin'
I turn the stage into a barren wasteland; I'm Infinite

You heard of Hell, well, I was sent from it
I went to it, servin' a sentence
For murderin' instruments
Now I'm tryin' to repent from it
But when I hear the beat, I'm tempted
To make another attempt at it; I'm Infinite

Bust it, I let the beat commence
So I can beat the sense in your elite defense
I got some meat to mince
A crew to stomp, and then two feet to rinse
I greet the gents and ladies, I spoil loyal fans
I foil plans and leave fluids leakin' like oil pans
My coiled hands around this microphone are lethal
One thought in my cerebral
Is deeper than a jeep-full of people
MC's are feeble, I came to cause some pandemonium
Battle a band of phony MC's, and stand the lonely one
Imitator, intimidator, stimulator
Simulator of data eliminator
There's never been a greater since the burial of Jesus
Fuck around and catch all the venereal diseases
My thesis'll smash a stereo to pieces
My a cappella releases classic masterpieces
Through telekinesis, it eases you mentally
Gently, sentimentally, instrumentally
With entity, dementedly meant to be Infinite

You heard of Hell, well, I was sent from it
I went to it, servin' a sentence
For murderin' instruments
Now I'm tryin' to repent from it
But when I hear the beat, I'm tempted
To make another attempt at it; I'm Infinite

Man, I got evidence, I'm never dense
And I've been clever ever since my residence was hesitant
To do some shit that represents the MO
So I'm assumin' all responsibility
‘Cause there's a monster will in me
That always wants to kill MC's
Mic nestler, slammin' like a wrestler
Here to make a mess of a lyric-smugglin' embezzler
No one is specialer, my skill is intergalactical
I get cynical, act a fool
Then I send a crew back to school
I never packed a tool or acted cool, it wasn't practical
I'd rather let a tactical, tactful track tickle your fancy
In fact, I can't see, or can't imagine
A man who ain't a lover of beats or a fan of scratchin'
So this is for my family, the kid who had a cameo
On my last jam, plus the man who never had a plan B
Be all you can be, ‘cause once you make an instant hit
I'm tensed a bit, and tempted
When I see the sins my friends commit; I'm Infinite

You heard of Hell, well, I was sent from it
I went to it, servin' a sentence
For murderin' instruments
Now I'm tryin' to repent from it
But when I hear the beat, I'm tempted
To make another attempt at it; I'm Infinite




America! Ha ha ha! We love you
How many people are proud to be citizens
Of this beautiful country of ours, the stripes and the stars
For the rights that men have died for to protect?
The women and men who have broke their necks
For the freedom of speech the United States government has sworn to uphold… or so we're told

I never would've dreamed in a million years I'd see
So many motherfuckin' people who feel like me
Who share the same views and the same exact beliefs
It's like a fuckin' army marchin' in back of me
So many lives I touched, so much anger aimed
In no particular direction, just sprays and sprays
And straight through your radio waves, it plays and plays
'Til it stays stuck in your head, for days and days
Who would've thought, standin' in this mirror, bleachin' my hair
With some peroxide, reachin' for a t-shirt to wear
That I would catapult to the forefront of rap like this?
How could I predict my words would have an impact like this?
I must've struck a chord with somebody up in the office
'Cause Congress keep tellin' me I ain't causin' nothin' but problems
And now they're sayin' I'm in trouble with the government
I'm lovin' it, I shoveled shit all my life, and now I'm dumpin' it on

White America! I could be one of your kids
White America! little Eric looks just like this
White America! Erica loves my shit
I go to TRL, look how many hugs I get!
White America! I could be one of your kids
White America! little Eric looks just like this
White America! Erica loves my shit
I go to TRL, look how many hugs I get!

Look at these eyes, baby blue, baby just like yourself
If they were brown, Shady'd lose, Shady sits on the shelf
But Shady's cute, Shady knew Shady's dimples would help
I ain't have to graduate from Lincoln High School to know that
But I could rap, so fuck school, I'm too cool to go back
Give me the mic! Show me where the fuckin' studio's at!
When I was underground no one gave a fuck I was white
No labels wanted to sign me, almost gave up, I was like
"Fuck it," until I met Dre, the only one to look past
Gave me a chance and I lit a fire up under his ass
Helped him get back to the top, every fan black that I got
Was probably his in exchange for every white fan that he's got
I'm like my skin is just startin' to work to my benefit now?

White America, I could be one of your kids
White America, little Eric looks just like this
White America, Erica loves my shit
I go to TRL, look how many hugs I get!
White America, I could be one of your kids
White America, little Eric looks just like this
White America, Erica loves my shit
I go to TRL, look how many hugs I get!

See, the problem is, I speak to suburban kids
Who otherwise woulda never knew these words exist
Whose moms probly woulda never gave two squirts of piss
'Til I created so much motherfuckin' turbulence
Straight out the tube, right into your livin' rooms I came
And kids flipped when they knew I was produced by Dre
That's all it took, and they were instantly hooked right in
And they connected with me too, because I looked like them
That's why they put my lyrics up under this microscope
Searchin' with a fine tooth comb, it's like this rope
Waitin' to choke, tightenin' around my throat
Watchin' me while I write this, like, "I don't like this note!"
Sponsors working round the clock to try to stop my concerts early
Surely hip-hop was never a problem in Harlem, only in Boston
After it bothered the fathers of daughters startin' to blossom
So now I'm catchin' the flak from these activists when they raggin'
Actin' like I'm the first rapper to smack a bitch or say "faggot," shit
Just look at me like I'm your closest pal
The posterchild, the motherfuckin' spokesman now, for—

White America, I could be one of your kids
White America, little Eric looks just like this
White America, Erica loves my shit
I go to TRL, look how many hugs I get!
White America, I could be one of your kids
White America, little Eric looks just like this
White America, Erica loves my shit
I go to TRL, look how many hugs I get!

So to the parents of America, I am the Deringer
Aimed at little Erica to attack her character
The ringleader of this circus of worthless pawns
Sent to lead the march right up to the steps of Congress
And piss on the lawns of the White House
To burn the ​​flag​​ and replace it with a Parental Advisory sticker
To spit liquor in the faces of this democracy of hypocrisy
Fuck you, Ms. Cheney! Fuck you, Tipper Gore!
Fuck you with the freest of speech this Divided States of Embarrassment will allow me to have! Fuck you!

Ha ha ha, I'm just playin', America
You know I love you




Too late for the other side
Caught in a chase, 25 to life
Too late for the other side
Caught in a chase, 25 to life
Too late
I'm taking my life back)
Caught in a chase, 25 to life

I don't think she understands the sacrifices that I've made
Maybe if this bitch had acted right I woulda stayed
But I've already wasted over half my life, I woulda laid
Down and died for you, I no longer cry for you, no more pain
Bitch, you took me for granted
Took my heart and ran it straight into the planet
Into the dirt, I can no longer stand it
Now my respect, I demand it
I'ma take control of this relationship, command it
And I'ma be the boss of you now, goddamn it
And what I mean is that I will no longer let you control me
So you better hear me out, this much you owe me
I gave up my life for you, totally devoted to you I have stayed
Faithful all the way, this is how I fuckin' get repaid?
Look at how I dress, fuckin' baggy sweats, go to work a mess
Always in a rush to get back to you, I ain't heard you yet
Not even once say you appreciate me, I deserve respect
I've done my best to give you nothin' less than perfectness
And I know that if I end this I'll no longer have nothin' left
And I won't be comin' back, so don't hold your fuckin' breath
You know what you've done, no need to go in depth
I told you you'd be sorry if I fuckin' left
I laughed while you wept, how's it feel now?
Yeah, funny, ain't it? You neglected me
Did me a favor, though, my spirit free you've set
But a special place for you in my heart I have kept
It's unfortunate, but it's…

Too late for the other side
Caught in a chase, 25 to life
Too late for the other side
Caught in a chase, 25 to life

I feel like when I bend over backwards for you, all you do is laugh
‘Cause that ain't good enough
You expect me to fold myself in half 'til I snap
Don't think I'm loyal, all I do is rap
How can I moonlight on the side? I have no life outside of that
Don't I give you enough of my time?
You don't think so, do you?
Jealous when I spend time with the girls
Why I'm married to you still? Man, I don't know
But tonight I'm serving you with papers
I'm divorcing you – go marry someone else and make 'em famous!
And take away their freedom like you did to me
Treat 'em like you don't need 'em and they ain't worthy of you
Feed 'em the same shit that you made me eat
I'm moving on, forget you
Oh, now I'm special? I ain't feel special when I was with you
All I ever felt was this helplessness
Imprisoned by a selfish bitch
Chew me up and spit me out, I fell for this
So many times it's ridiculous
And still I stick with this, I'm sick of this
But in my sickness and addiction you're addictive as they get
Evil as they come, vindictive as they make 'em
My friends keep askin' me why I can't just walk away from
I'm addicted to the pain, the stress, the drama
I'm drawn to shit, I guess I'm a
Mess, cursed and blessed, but this time I
Ain't changin' my mind, I'm climbin' out this abyss
You're screamin' as I walk out that I'll be missed
But when you spoke of people
Who meant the most to you, you left me off your list
Fuck you, Hip-Hop! I'm leavin' you
My life sentence is served, bitch, and it's just…

Too late for the other side
Caught in a chase 25 to life
Too late for the other side
Caught in a chase 25 to life
Too late
Caught in a chase 25 to life



Okay, I'm going to attempt to drown myself
You can try this at home
You can be just like me
Mic check, one-two, we recording?

I'm cancerous
So when I diss, you wouldn't wanna answer this
If you responded back with a battle rap you wrote for Canibus
I'll strangle you to death, then I'll choke you again
And break your fucking legs 'til your bones poke through your skin
You beef with me, I'ma even the score equally
Take you on Jerry Springer and beat your ass legally
I get too blunted off of funny home grown
‘Cause when I smoke out I hit the trees harder than Sonny Bono
That would mean I lie and get fucked
More than the President does
Hilary Clinton tried to slap me and call me a pervert
My nerves hurt, and lately I'm on edge
Grabbed Vanilla Ice and ripped out his blond dreads
Every girl I ever went out with has gone les
Follow me and do exactly what the song says
Smoke weed, take pills, drop out of school, kill people
And drink, jump behind the wheel like it was still legal
I'm dumb enough to walk in a store and steal
So I'm dumb enough to ask for a date with Lauryn Hill
Some people only see that I'm white, ignorin' skill
‘Cause I stand out like a green hat with a orange bill
But I don't get pissed, y'all don't even see through the mist
How the fuck can I be white? I don't even exist
I get a clean shave, bathe, go to a rave
Die from an overdose and dig myself up out of my grave
My middle finger won't go down, how do I wave?
And this is how I'm supposed to teach kids how to behave?

Now follow me and do exactly what you see
Don't you wanna grow up to be just like me?
I slap women and eat shrooms then OD
Now don't you want to grow up to be just like me?

Me and Marcus Allen went over to see Nicole
When we heard a knock at the door, must've been Ron Gold
Jumped behind the door, put the orgy on hold
Killed them both, then smeared blood on the white Bronco
I slapped Garth Brooks out of his rhinestone shirt
I'm not a player, just a ill rhyme sayer
That'll spray a aerosol can up at the ozone layer
My rap style's warped, I'm running out the morgue
With your dead grandmother's corpse to throw it on your porch
Jumped in a Chickenhawk cartoon with a cape on
And beat up Foghorn Leghorn with an acorn
I'm 'bout as normal as Norman Bates with deformative traits
A premature birth that was four minutes late
Mother, are you there? I love you
I never meant to hit you over the head with that shovel
Will someone please explain to my brain
That I just severed the main vein with a chainsaw and I'm in pain?
I take a breather and sigh; either I'm high
Or I'm nuts, ‘cause if you ain't tilting this room, neither am I
So when you see your mom with a thermometer
Shoved in her ass, then it probably is obvious I got it on with her
‘Cause when I drop this solo shit, it's over with
I bought Cage's tape, opened it, and dubbed over it

I came to the club drunk with a fake ID
Don't you wanna grow up to be just like me?
I've been with ten women who got HIV
Now don't you wanna grow up to be just like me?
I got genital warts and it burns when I pee
Don't you wanna grow up to be just like me?
I tie a rope around my penis and jump from a tree
You probably wanna grow up to be just like me





Alright, stop, now before you walk in the door
Of this liquor store and try to get money out the drawer
You better think of the consequence

That's nonsense!
Go in, gaffle the money, and run to one of your aunt's cribs
And borrow a damn dress and one of her blond wigs
Tell her you need a place to stay, you'll be safe for days
If you shave your legs with Renee's razor blades

Yeah, but if it all goes through like it's supposed to
The whole neighborhood knows you and they'll expose you
Think about it before you walk in the door first
Look at the store clerk, she's older than George Burns

Fuck that, do that shit! Shoot that bitch!
Can you afford to blow this shit, are you that rich?
Why you give a fuck if she dies? Are you that bitch?
Do you really think she gives a fuck if you have kids?

Don't even listen to Slim, yo, he's bad for you

These voices, these voices, I hear them
And when they talk, I follow, I follow
I follow, I follow all these voices


Now listen to me, while you're kissin' her cheek
And smearing her lipstick, slip this in her drink
Now all you gotta do is nibble on this little bitch's earlobe
You shouldn't take advantage of her, it's not fair)
Yo, look at her bush, does it got hair?
Fuck this bitch right here on the spot, bare
'Til she passes out and she forgot how she got there
No, but I seen the porno with Sun Doobiest
Man, fuck that, hit that shit raw dog and bail!

These voices, these voices, I hear them
And when they talk, I follow, I follow
I follow, I follow all these voices


Alright, calm down, relax, start breathin'
While you at work she's with some dude tryin' to get off
Fuck slittin' her throat, cut this bitch's head off!)
Wait, what if there's an explanation for this shit?
Alright, Shady, maybe he's right, Grady
But think about the baby before you get all crazy

Okay, thought about it? Still wanna stab her?
Grab her by the throat, get your daughter and kidnap her?
That's what I did, be smart, don't be a retard
You gonna take advice from somebody who slapped Dee Barnes?
Mr. Dre, Mr. N.W.A, Mr. AK
Comin' straight outta Compton, y'all better make way
How in the fuck you gonna tell this man not to be violent?

‘Cause he don't need to go the same route that I went
Been there, done that
Aw, fuck it, what am I sayin'?
Shoot 'em both, Grady! Where's your gun at?








Only reason I dissed you in the first place
Is 'cause you denied seeing me
Now I'm pissed off

Sit back homie relax, in fact grab a six pack
Kick back while I kick facts, yeah Dre, sick track
Perfect way to get back, wanna hear something wick-wack
I got the same exact tat that's on Nick's back
I'm Obsessed now, oh gee
Is that supposed to be me in the video with the goatee?
Wow Mariah, didn't expect you to go balls out
Bitch, shut the fuck up 'fore I put all them phone calls out
You made to my house when you was Wild'n Out before Nick
When you was on my dick and give you something to smile about
How many times you fly to my house, still trying to count
Better shut your lying mouth if you don't want Nick finding out
You probably think cause it's been so long
If I had something on you I woulda did it by now
Oh on the contrary, Mary Poppins
I'm mixing our studio session down
And sending it to mastering to make it loud
Enough dirt on you to murder you
This is what the fuck I do
Mariah it ever occur to you
That I still have pictures
However you prefer to do
And that goes for Nick too, faggot you think I'm scurred of you
You're gonna ruin my career you better get one
Like I'mma sit and fight with you over some slut bitch cunt
That made me put up with her psycho ass over six months
And only spread her legs to let me hit once
Yeah, what you gonna say I'm lucky
Tell the public that I was so ugly
That you fucking had to be drunk to fuck me?
Second base, what the fuck you tell Nick, Pumpkin
The second week we were dry humping, that's gotta count for something
Listen, girly, surely you don't want me to talk
About how I nutted early cause I ejaculated prematurely
And bust all over your belly and you almost started hurling
And said I was gross, go get a towel, your stomach's curling
Or maybe you do, but if I'm embarrassing me I'm embarrassing you
And don't you dare say it isn't true
As long as that song's gettin' airplay I'm dissin' you
I'm a hair away from getting carried away and getting sued
I was gonna stop at sixteen, that was thirty-two
This is thirty-four bars, we ain't even third of the way through
Damn Slim, Mariah played you, Mariah who?
Oh did I say whore Nick? I meant a liar too
Like I've been going off on you all this time
For no reason
Girl, you out your alcoholic mind
Check your wine cellar, look at the amounts of all the wine
Like I fucking sit around and think about you all the time
I just think this shit is funny when I pounce you on a rhyme
But fuck it now I'm 'bout to draw the line
And for you to cross it that's a mountain that I doubt you wanna climb
I can describe areas of your house you wouldn't find
On an episode of Cribs, I blow below the ribs
If I hear another word so don't go opening your jibs
Cause every time you do it's like an overload of fibs
I ain't sayin' this shit again, ho you know what it is
It's a warning shot, 'fore I blow up your whole spot
Call my bluff and I'll release every fucking thing I got
Including the voicemails right before you flipped your top
When me and Luis were trying to stick two CD's in the same slot

Slim Shady, artful dodger
Slim Shady, artful dodger

Let me whisper sweet nothings into your ear, boo
Now should I keep going or should we call truce
But I'm moving on with mine
Well tell her to shut her mouth then I'll leave her alone
Damn

I see Mary Ann, Mary Ann's saying cut the tape
Cut the tape, knife



I'm liable to start a violent spark with a silent thought
I disgust you like dialogue from The Shop to The Wired Frog
Night club, shit, I was taught
If your CD's on fire you had to put it out yourself like Highland Park
No fire department, so you might not hear sirens at all
But don't be alarmed if I sound off
Something just ain't right with me, dog
A martyr on a private charter, whose life could be harder?
Widely regarded highly? Bite me, sweetheart
I'm slightly retarded, but tonight I'm startin'
Shit, I'm feeling self righteous and might just hop in a mosh pit on some Mike Tyson and Pac shit
Lookin' to box with anybody, disorderly conduct
I'll fuck around and snort a key and pick a fight with a locksmith
Fan of The LOX, bananas, manic, I'm going in shock
Frantic, I'm trapped in a closet
Panic attack 'cause I'm claustrophobic
No, faggot, I mean I can't maneuver for movement
'Cause I have no room for improvement
I'm practically squashed, compacted and boxed in
Toxic, cans of arsenic, flammable bars, examine the content
Bar exam, start of insanity
Charles Hamilton slash Manson and Bronson
Animal snarls, cannibal jaws
Shark mandibles, lambs to the slaughter
Looking skantless as Hannibal's stalking
Anthony Hopkins with his hands in his pockets
Gallons of Vodka, but that gal has some knockers
I bet'cha they ring a bell when I come back and I'm conscious
What happened, doc? I passed out again
Alcohol's making me break into vacant's naked
Stolen Magnavox and bag of rocks in back of a Datsun
Fell asleep watching Fear Factor and Scare Tactics
Too close to the StairMaster
Poked a hole in the air mattress and popped it
Woke up shortly thereafter, hungover
No underwear, grasping a Bayer Aspirin and dropped it
Air Maxes in my closet, preposterous Nikes made out of ostrich
And the cross stitching is a cross mixing
Of a rhinoceros, possum skin, giraffe and a dolphin
Fin, cotton Dockers, OshKoshes, drop crotches
Swatch watches and sneakers match with the parkas
But it's like being overstaffed at a boxing gym
With all these trainers, but I don't have any boxers
And I'm standing here naked, hangover, still wasted
Like paper you write raps on, obnoxious
Yo, why does it always sound like I'm grabbing my nostrils?
Fuck that, I'll battle 'em all, I'll battle a mall
I’ll stand there and yell that at a wall
'Til the mannequin dolls scatter and the inanimate objects
That I'm battering all shatter and fall
'Cause I hear the track and I'm starting to get fucking amped
I'm a spark plug, I'm like the car with the cables hooked up to my fucking back, I'm a Duracell
But I sure as hell got it backwards 'cause y'all get jumped
And I'll catch the battery charge, but
I got a hunch like your back when it's arching
When I start attacking your squadron
You'll feel like MasterCard when I'm charging
So take a swipe at me, I'm coming straight at you
Like Clay Matthews from the Green Bay Packers
So get the sack like Wisconsin
That's nutbag that I'm talking, who am I kidding?
You faggots are all gonna do my bidding
Don't get dragged to the auction
Neiman Marcus, bags of Vuitton and all
I'll push a bitch into oncoming traffic, just watch this
Stretched, tinted, black sedan my ass
See how mad you act when I drop you off at Saks Fifth Ave
In a fucking taxi cab to go shopping
Affable guy next door's laughable
My next whore's gonna have mechanical arms
That'll jack me off with a lotion dispenser with a motion sensor
No emotion hence I guess this sick prick dies hard
I got a Magic Johnson
It's like a Magic Wand allows me to not let a blonde arouse me
If Ronda Rousey was on the couch with the condoms out
Holding a thousand Magnums at once to pounce me
I laugh in response to how she dances and flaunts it around me
Her flat little badonkadonk is bouncing around
And all I see is Paulie Malignaggi, Slaughterhouse in a blouse
And Madonna with mud on her, God dammit I am a misogynist
I slap Linda Ronstadt with a lobster, throw her off a balcony
Just so happens she's fond of algae
'Cause now she faceplants on the concrete
Complete lack of responsibility
Half you assholes ain't strong enough to pick up a spirit
Shit, you fags couldn't shoplift at a thrift shop
But I let the track lift 'em up, boost the energy
Klepto, I'm back to rip shop up, but my thing is this now
Five-finger discount
Been rapping so long I've been killing this shit, it's easy
Kidnapping your mom 'cause I'm still in this bitch, thievery
Ransom for JonBenét Ramsey, and Chandra Levy, and Gary Condit
I might relapse, get on some bullshit
Perhaps I'll launch some cracker taunts at Action Bronson
Macklemore, Mac Miller and Asher Roth
And have some back and forths
And record a wack response to Kendrick Lamar's "Control" verse
Yo, I put that shit on a greatest hits album
Now that was awesome
It takes some massive balls to do some shit like that
And put up with my crap so long for, what's the attraction, mama?
Is it the fact that I'm a walking, talking, actual quadruple entendre
Or the pointy nose that's pointing at you, mama?
Who knows at this point, it's always poking so na-ah
Still get along with this voice 'cause that's the "Monster"
Everyone who knows me knows that
What they don't know is the fact Rihanna calls me Pinocchio
Sits on my face and waits for my nose to grow
Pathological liar, oh, why am I such an asshole
That my disguise is pants, but they on fire
Sabotage Christmas, crap in your stocking
I'm wrapping up all the presents
In fucking camouflage so you can't even find 'em
Jack Santa Claus, snap Rudolph's antlers off
Wrap his schnoz in gauze bandage and blind him
Blowing a head gasket at Bed, Bath and Beyond
Put the basket back all the bath salt packets are gone, I
Know you really tired of me sampling Billy Squier
But classic rock acid rap is the genre
Got Slash on guitar, splash of Bizarre, Thrasher, and Aerosmith
And I'm a spectacular archer, feed Count Dracula, Chocula
Godzilla, half dragon and Bob Dylan, bandwagoners
I'm kicking the damn stragglers off and I'm strangling 'em
Smack Kim Basinger on her ass in the sauna



Shady, Aftermath
There she go, shaking that ass on the floor
Bumping and grinding that pole
The way she's grinding that pole
I think I'm losing control

Get buzzed, get drunk, get crunk, get fucked up
Hit the strip club, don't forget ones, get your dick rubbed
Get fucked, get sucked, get wasted, shit faceted
Pasted, plastered, puke drink, throw up
Get a new drink, hit the bathroom sink, throw up
Wipe your shoe clean, got a routine goin'
Still got a few chunks on them shoestrings showin'
I was dehydrated till the beat vibrated
I was revived as soon as this bitch gyrated
Them hips and licked them lips, and that was it
I had to get Nate Dogg in to sing some shit

Two to the one from the one to the three
I like good pussy and I like good tree
Smoke so much weed you wouldn't believe
And I get more ass than a toilet seat
Three to the one from the one to the three
I met a bad bitch last night in the D
Let me tell you how I made her leave with me
Conversation and Hennessy
I've been to the motherfuckin' mountain top
Heard motherfuckers talk, seen 'em drop
If I ain't got a weapon I'ma pick up a rock
And when I bust your ass I'm gon' continue to rock
Get your ass of the wall with your two left feet
It's real easy, just follow the beat
Don't let that fine girl pass you by
Look real close, ‘cause strobe lights lie

I'm looking for a girl with a body and a sexy strut
Wanna get it poppin', baby? Step right up
Some girls they act retarded
Some girls are 'bout it 'bout it
I'm looking for a girl that will do whatever the fuck
I say, every day she be givin' it up

Shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me
Come on, girl, shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me
Ohh, girl, shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me
Come on, girl, shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me

I'm a menace, a dentist, an oral hygienist
Open your mouth for about four or five minutes
Take a little bit of this fluoride rin-inse
Swish, but don't spit it; swallow it, now finish
Yeah, me and Nate D-O Double-G
Looking for a couple bitches with some double D's
Pop a little champagne and a couple E's
Slip it in her bubbly, we finna finna have a party

I'm looking for a girl I can fuck in my Hummer truck
Apple Bottom jeans and a big ol' butt
Some girls they act retarded
Some girls are 'bout it 'bout it
I want a bitch to sit at the crib with no panties on
Knows that she can, but she won't say no

Now look at this lady all in front of me, sexy as can be
Tonight I want a slut, would you be mine?
Heard you was freaky from a friend of mine
Now, I hope you don't get mad at me
But I told Nate you was a freak
He said he wants a slut, hope you don't mind
I told him how you like it from behind

Shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me
Come on, girl, shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me
Ohh, girl, shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me
Come on, girl, shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me

I'm looking for a girl with a body and a sexy strut
Wanna get it poppin', baby? Step right up
Some girls they act retarded
Some girls are 'bout it 'bout it
I'm looking for a girl that will do whatever the fuck
I say, every day she be givin' it up

There she go, shaking that ass on the floor
Bumping and grinding that pole
The way she's grinding that pole
I think I'm losing control

God! I ain’t leaving without you, bitch
You're coming home with me
And my boy, and his boy - and his boy, and his girl
Haha, Nate Dogg!




This bitch can twist like a damn contortionist
Condom on my dick? Of course it is
This bitch don't know what abortion is
So I can't come in her, fucks like a porn star
Looks like Jenna, fuck I'm gonna
Come, I think my rubber's comin' off
But oh, it's so fucking wet and soft
Fuck, I'm gonna start lettin' off
I'm squirting and she's not gettin' off
And she's on top, I'm gonna facking
Oh, god, oh, don't do that
Don't, stop, stop, don't, I don't mean "don't stop"
Ow, wait a minute, ow, ow, fuck
I, I'm gonna fucking come! *squirt squirt squirt*


Ooh, wow, boom that pow
Ooh, ow, I need a cigarette now
Ow, I'm so fucking hot
And you're so fucking hot
Oh my god, I wanna facking fack
No not "fuck", I said "fack"
F-A-C-K, F-A-C-K
Fack, fack, fack, facking freak me
Oh yeah, girl see, baby, they call me Mr. Freaky
Let's call your sister, three-way
Have some threesome, me so horny
And you're such a fucking babe
I wanna go down on you, fuck, you shaved
Oh, god damn, here I go again
I'm gonna come, I am


I’m Slim Shady, uh uh uh
I’m Slim Shady, uh uh uh
I’m Slim Shady, uh uh uh
I’m Slim Shady, uh uh uh

Okay, I'm done, I already came twice
You ain't gonna make me come
I'm all outta gas, not so fast
Uh, your finger just went in my ass
Ow, that hurts, take it out now
Oh, wait a minute, aw
Put it back in, in-in-in
This don't mean I'm gay, I don't like men
I like boobs, boobs, boobs
Now see that gerbil, grab that tube
Shove it up my butt
Let that little rascal nibble on my asshole, uhh
Yeah, right there, right there
Ahh, I'm coming, oh, yeah
Fack, I just came again
Okay, pull it out now, enhh
Oh, fuck yeah
Wait, he's not out, he's still crawling around up there
Ow, fuck, I think it's stuck
Ow, but it feels so fucking good


Shove a gerbil in your ass through a tube
Shove a gerbil in your ass through a tube
Shove a gerbil in your ass through a tube
Shove a gerbil in your ass through a tube
Ew, ew, ew, ew



One thousand different houses and Münchausen
What the fuck you hit me for?!"
Scream "life" as I punch counter, in bunches out of anger
I once encountered a stranger in a dumb gown
Black hood with a scythe, shit, I'll laugh in his face, spit
Bitch gave me an extra life, like, "Take this!
Now get your ass back in that game, bitch!
Don't take shit for granted, and don't take shit
Give it!" — only bull you should take is by the horns
A mixture of Whitey Ford and Mighty Thor
I everlast, pen is mightier than sword
Finish writin', then record, replenish, keep writin' more
Nothing's ridin' on it but your pride, that's all you're fightin' for
So you bite, scratch, you claw, backs to wall
No one was there to catch you fall
You pick yourself back up, you dust your jacket off
You grab your balls like they're gargantuan
And ask yourself how fuckin' bad you want it
Pull out your pass for whoopin' ass and flash it on 'em
Nobody's gonna back you in that corner, you're a hornet
No one's more ignorant than you fuckin' four in the mornin'
You're at the la-bor-atory
Stormin' like there's nothin' that's more important
Emcees, you better consider this a formal warnin', you're in for it!
Girl, what would you do if I said your body was off the chain
And I told you I smile every single time I saw your face?
I ain't finished, bitch, I meant in half, oil the blades
Nobody wants to play, they say I'm a spoiled lil' baby, but—

Nobody puts a baby in the corner
I'm only tryna warn ya
'Cause that baby gets mad and gets to throwin' a tantrum
He'll fuckin' flip on ya
'Cause nobody puts a baby in the corner
I'm only tryna warn ya
'Cause that baby gets mad and gets to throwin' a tantrum
He'll fuckin' flip on ya

What goes through an addict's brain
Besides static pain and Big Daddy Kane
Breakbeats and words? An erratic train
Of thought like splatter paint, scatter brain
Yeah, maybe that explains
Why you're back but you don't rap the same
And you're lookin' way thinner
'Cause your hunger got you lookin' like they took away dinner
Wouldn't sugar-coat a fuckin' booger though
Just to wipe that bitch on a hooker's coat
Now fling that bitch from your fingertips
Hope it lands on another rap singer's lips who can't think of shit
Anything of wit that's interesting to spit
Yo, who's king of this fuckin' English lit?
Let your middle fingers flip on each hand while extending this shit
How low can you go?
Lower then Chuck D, ho, hear the bassiness
In my voice? Rocky's back, where's my Adrians?
Nobody's crazy as Shady in an eighty million mile radius
I'm what Tom Brady is to the Patriots to rap
I'm not a man, I'm a weapon
Who just happened to be a rapper
Who just happen to be on the crapper
When it happened I had an epiphany in the bathroom
I'd never be the same after
Now I'm back with an appe-tite for destruction
And a fuckin' recipe for disaster
So let's eat 'cause I'm famished
Every deed is a dastardly one
Evilish bastard, even you askin' for me to be po-lite
To people's like me havin' my teeth pulled

Nobody puts a baby in the corner
I'm only tryna warn ya
'Cause that baby gets mad and gets to throwin' a tantrum
He'll fuckin' flip on ya
'Cause nobody puts a baby in the corner
I'm only tryna warn ya
'Cause that baby gets mad and gets to throwin' a tantrum
He'll fuckin' flip on ya

So step inside a dimension
Demented side of a mind that's like an inside of an engine
While I multiply your undivided attention
I lose my mind and my temper
You'd be the first one who finds him offensive
Got him climbin' the fences
Lost some time to addiction
But look up rhyme in the dictio-nary, I'm in the picture
Eminem is the synonym for it, I'm an enigma
Fuck it, let's get to the meatballs, I'm gonna skip the
Veg and potatoes, edumacator
They are shit, legends are made of spit, treacherous data
Shit that you would say to your worst enemy
This wretched is what you get when you mix Treach with a Jada
Then combine 'em with Method Man and Redman
With metham-phetamines in his left hand
In his right is a sledgehammer
In pajamas, standin' in front of a webcam
Beatin' himself in the head 'til Russell lets him off Def Jam
Maybe I need my head examined
Hannibal Lecter with a dead lamb
Hangin' from his ceiling, drippin' with a bed pan
I need meds, swear to God
'Cause if I go off the edge, T.I. ain't talkin' me off the ledge
Man, heart-throb, better fart, ah
Nah, more like a smart slob
Part Blob that'll stab you with a sharp ob-ject to the heart
And leave claw marks all over the Wal-Mart walls
Little baby with large balls
Fuck mud-slingin', I'm blood-flingin'
There's nothing on this fucking Earth
Better than bein' the king of the playground
I hate the swings, but I love bein' an underdog

Nobody puts a baby in the corner
I'm only tryna warn ya
'Cause that baby gets mad and gets to throwin' a tantrum
He'll fuckin' flip on ya
'Cause nobody puts a baby in the corner
I'm only tryna warn ya
'Cause that baby gets mad and gets to throwin' a tantrum
He'll fuckin' flip on ya




‘Cause some things just don't change
It's better when they stay the same
Although the whole world knows your name
Some want a bigger stage
They came to see you spit your game
But it shouldn't be difficult to explain
Just why you came back again
You hate the fame, love the game
Cold as ice you remain, fuck them all
Tell them all eat shit, here we go again

God damn! Is it that time again already?
Y'all don’t look too happy to see me
Fuck man, don’t everybody welcome me back at once
All right, fuck y’all then!

You can get the dick, just call me the ball sack, I'm nuts
Michael Vick in this bitch, dog—fall back, you mutts!
Fuck your worms, you've never seen such a sick puppy
Fuck it, a sick duck,  I want my duck sicked, mommy
And my nuts licked, gobble them up trick, yummy
Bitch, you don't fuckin' think I know
That you suck dick, dummy?
You'll get your butt kicked, fuck all that love shit, honey
Yeah, I laugh when I call you a slut, it's funny
Shorty, dance, while I diss you to the beat, fuck the words
You don't listen to 'em anyway, yeah, struck a nerve
Sucker, motherfucker, might as well let my lips pucker
Like Elton John, ‘cause I'm just a mean cocksucker
The shit is on ‘cause you went and pissed me off
Now I'm shittin' and pissin' on everybody
Give a fuck if it's right or wrong
So puff the Buddha, light a bong, but take a look at Mariah
Next time I inspire you to write a song—come on!

Oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh
I'm as cold as the cold wind blows
When it snows and it's 20 below
Ask me why, man, I just don't know
No-no-no, no-no, no
I'm as cold as the cold wind blows
Blow-blow-blows
Blow-blow, blows, oh, oh-oh

Fuck it, I'm a loose cannon
Bruce Banner's back in the booth
Y'all are sittin' ducks, I'm the only goose standin'
I'll set the world on fire, piss on it, put it out
Stick my dick in a circle, but I'm not fuckin' around
Mothafucka, I'll show you pussy-footin'
I'll kick a bitch in the cunt 'til it makes a queef
And sounds like a fuckin' whoopee cushion
Who the fuck is you pushin'?
You must've mistook me for some sissy soft punk
Lookin' for some nookie or bosom
Go ahead, fuckin' hater, push me!
I told you ain't no fuckin' way to shush me
Call me a faggot ‘cause I hate a pussy
Man the fuck up, sissy, G's up
All you gardeners freeze up
Put your hoes down, “Shady ease up!
Man, chill!”, naw I can't, goddamn it, rap is a landfill
Drop the anvil, these are shoes that you can't fill
Shit the day that happens the world will stop spinnin'
And Michael J. Fox'll come to a standstill
During a earthquake urine in your face
‘Cause you're fake, ah! What the fuck? That hurt, wait!
Ah what the fuck! I just got struck by lightnin'
All right then, I quit, God, I give up
Call it evil that men do
Lord, forgive me for what my pen do
“This is for your sins, I cleanse you
And you can repent, but I warn you
If you continue, to Hell I'll send you”
And just then the wind blew, and I said...

Oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh
I'm as cold as the cold wind blows
When it snows and it's 20 below
Ask me why, man, I just don't know
No-no-no, no-no, no
I'm as cold as the cold wind blows
Blow-blow-blows
Blow-blow, blows, oh, oh-oh-oh

How long will I be this way? Shady until my dyin' day
'Til I hang up the mic and it's time for me to say
"So long," 'til then I'll drop the fuckin' bombs
Like I missed the pass when I went long
If you don't like it you can kiss my ass in a lint thong
Now sing along, slut this, slut that
Learn the words to the song
"Oh, bitches don't like that," homie, I'll be nicer to women
When Aquaman drowns
And the Human Torch starts swimmin'
Man, I'm a cold soul, I roll solo
So, don't compare me to them other bums over there
It's like apples to oranges, peaches to plums, yeah
I'm bananas, pussy, cut off the grapes and grow a pair
But I swear, you try to diss me, I'll slaughter you
I put that on everything, like everyone does with Auto-tune
The last thing you want to do
Is have me spit out a rhyme
And say, "I was writing this, and I thought of you," so

Oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh
I'm as cold as the cold wind blows
When it snows and it's 20 below
Ask me why, man, I just don't know
No-no-no, no-no, no
I'm as cold as the cold wind blows
Blow-blow-blows
Blow-blow, blows, oh, oh-oh-oh

I don't know, I don't know what caused
I don't know what caused me to be this way
I don't know, I don't know
But I'll probably be this way 'til my dyin' day
I don't know why I'm so, I'm so cold
Mean things I don't mean to say
I guess this is how you made me



Yo, I can't sing, but
I feel like singing
I wanna fuckin' sing
‘Cause I'm happy
Yeah, I'm happy
I got my baby back
Yo, check it out

Some days I sit starin' out the window
Watchin' this world pass me by
Sometimes I think there's nothin' to live for
I almost break down and cry
Sometimes I think I'm crazy
I'm crazy? Oh, so crazy
Why am I here? Am I just wastin' my time?
But then I see my baby
Suddenly I'm not crazy
It all makes sense when I look into her eyes, oh no

‘Cause sometimes it feels
Like the world's on my shoulders
Everyone's leanin' on me
‘Cause sometimes it feels
Like the world's almost over
But then she comes back to me

My baby girl keeps gettin' older
I watch her grow up with pride
People make jokes ‘cause they don't understand me
They just don't see my real side
I act like shit don't faze me
Inside it drives me crazy
My insecurities could eat me alive
But then I see my baby
Suddenly I'm not crazy
It all makes sense when I look into her eyes, oh no

‘Cause sometimes it feels
Like the world's on my shoulders
Everyone's leanin' on me
‘Cause sometimes it feels
Like the world's almost over
But then she comes back to me

Man, if I could sing, I'd keep singin' this song to my daughter
If I could hit the notes, I'd blow somethin' as long as my father
To show her how I feel about her, how proud I am that I got her
God, I'm a daddy, I'm so glad that her mom didn't *want her*
Now, you probably get this picture from my public persona
That I'm a pistol-packin' drug addict who bags on his mama
But I wanna just take this time out to be perfectly honest
‘Cause there's a lot of shit I keep bottled
That hurts deep inside of my soul
And just know that I grow colder the older I grow
This boulder on my shoulder gets heavy and harder to hold
And this load is like the weight of the world
And I think my neck is breakin'
Should I just give up or try to live up to these expectations?
Now look, I love my daughter more than life in itself
But I got a wife that's determined to make my life livin' hell
But I handle it well, given the circumstances I'm dealt
So many chances, man, it's too bad, coulda had someone else
But the years that I've wasted
Is nothin' to the tears that I've tasted
I've went to jail for this woman
I've been to bat for this woman
I've taken bats to people's backs
Bent over backwards for this woman
Man, I shoulda seen it comin', what'd I stick my penis up in?
Wouldn't have ripped the prenup up
If I'd have seen what she was fuckin', but fuck it
It's over, there's no more reason to cry no more
I got my baby, baby, the only lady that I adore, Hailie
So sayonara, try tomorrow, nice to know ya
Our baby's traveled back to the arms of her rightful owner
And suddenly it seems like my shoulder blades have just shifted
It's like the greatest gift you can get, the weight has been lifted

And now it don't feel like the world's on my shoulders
Everyone's leanin' on me
‘Cause my baby knows that her daddy's a soldier
Nothin' can take her from me

Wooo! Told you I can't sing
Oh well, I tried
Hailie, remember when I said
If you ever need anything, Daddy would be right there?
Guess what, Daddy's here
And I ain't goin' nowhere, baby



I'm going through changes
I'm going through changes

Lately I really feel like I'm rollin' for delph like Philly
Feel like I'm losin' control of myself, I sincerely
Apologize if all that I sound like is I'm complainin'
But life keeps on complicatin'
And I'm debatin' on leavin' this world this evenin'
Even my girls can see I'm grievin'
I try and hide it, but I can't
Why do I act like I'm all high and mighty, when inside I'm dyin'?
I am finally realizin' I need help, I can't do it myself, too weak
Two weeks I've been havin' ups and downs
Going through peaks and valleys
Dilly-dallyin' around with the idea of endin' the shit right here
I'm hatin' my reflection, I walk around the house tryna fight mirrors
I can't stand what I look like, yeah
I look fat, but what do I care?
I give a fuck, only thing I fear is Hailie
I'm afraid if I close my eyes I might see her… shit

I'm going through changes
I'm going through changes

I lock myself in the bedroom, bathroom, nappin' at noon
Yeah, Dad's in a bad mood, he's always snappin' at you
Marshall, what happened that you can't stop with these pills?
And you've fallen off with your skills
And your own fans are laughin' at you
It become a problem you're too pussy to tackle?
Get up, be a man, stand, a real man woulda had this shit handled
Know you just had your heart ripped out and crushed
They say Proof just flipped out
Homie just whipped out and bust
Nah, it ain't like Doody to do that
He wouldn't fuckin' shoot at nobody, he'd fight first
But dwellin' on it only makes the night worse
Now I'm poppin' Vics, Percs and Methadone pills
"Yeah, Em, tight verse, you killed it!"
Fuckin' drug dealers hang around me like yes men
And they gonna do whatever I says when I says it
It's in their best interest to protect their investment
And I just lost my fuckin' best friend, so fuck it, I guess then—

I'm going through changes
But I just keep on going through changes)
I'm going through changes

My friends can't understand this new me
That's understandable, man, but think how bananas you'd be
You'd be an animal too
If you were trapped in this fame and caged in it like a zoo
And everybody's lookin' at you
What you want me to do?
I'm startin' to live like a recluse
And the truth is, fame startin' to give me an excuse
To be at an all-time low; I sit alone in my home theater
Watchin' the same damn DVD of the
First tour; the last tour, he was still alive
And it hurts so I fast forward
Sleeping pills'll make me feel alright
And if I'm still awake in the middle of the night
I'll just take a couple more, yeah, you're motherfuckin' right
I ain't slowin' down for no one
I am almost homeward bound
Almost in a coma, yeah homie, come on, dole 'em out!
"Daddy, don't you die on me!
Daddy, better hold your ground!"
Fuck, don't I know the sound
Of that voice? Yeah, baby, hold me down!

I'm going through changes
But I just keep on going through changes)
I'm going through changes

Wake up in the hospital, full of tubes
But somehow I'm pullin' through
Swear when I come back I'ma be bulletproof
I'ma do it just for Proof, I think I should state a few
Facts, 'cause I may not get a chance again to say the truth
Shit, it just hit me that, what if I would not've made it through?
I think about the things I woulda never got to say to you
I'd never get to make it right, so here's what I came to do
Hailie, this one is for you, Whitney and Alaina too
I still love your mother, that'll never change
Think about her every day
We just could never get it together, hey
Wish there was a better way for me to say it
But I swear on everything, I'd do anything for her on any day
There are just too many things to explain
When it rains, guess it pours — yes, it does
Wish there wasn't any pain, but I can't pretend there ain't
I ain't placin' any blame
I ain't pointin' fingers, Heaven knows I've never been a saint
I know that it feels like we just pissed away our history
And just today I looked at your picture, almost as if to say
I miss you subconsciously, wish it didn't end this way
But I just had to get away
Don't know why, I don't know what else to say, I guess I'm—

I'm going through changes
But I just keep on going through changes)
I'm going through changes




These are the results of a thousand electric volts
A kid who refused to respect adults
Wore spectacles with taped frames and a freckled nose
A corny-lookin' white boy, scrawny and always ornery
‘Cause I was always sick of brawny bullies pickin' on me
And I might snap, one day just like that
I decided to strike back, and flatten every tire on the bike rack
Three o'clock sharp this afternoon you die"
"I already gave you my lunch money!
What more do you want from me?"
My palms were sweaty, and I started to shake at first
Teacher, teacher! Quick, I need a naked nurse"
"What's the matter?" — I don't know, my leg, it hurts
"Leg? I thought you said it was your tummy"
Oh, I mean it is, but I also got a bum knee
"Mr. Mathers, the fun and games are over
And just for that stunt, you're gonna get some extra homework"
But don't you wanna give me after school detention?
"Nah, that bully wants to beat your ass and I'ma let him"

Brain damage, ever since the day I was born
Drugs is what they used to say I was on
They say I never knew which way I was goin'
But everywhere I go they keep playin' my song
Brain damage, ever since the day I was born
Drugs is what they used to say I was on
They say I never knew which way I was goin'
But everywhere I go they keep playin' my song

Way before my baby daughter Hailie
I was harassed daily by this fat kid named D'Angelo Bailey
An eighth grader who acted obnoxious, ‘cause his father boxes
So every day he'd shove me in the lockers
One day he came in the bathroom while I was pissin'
And had me in the position to beat me into submission
He banged my head against the urinal 'til he broke my nose
Soaked my clothes in blood, grabbed me and choked my throat
I tried to plead and tell him we shouldn't beef
But he just wouldn't leave
He kept chokin' me and I couldn't breathe
The Principal walked in and started helpin' him stomp me
I made them think they beat me to death
Holdin' my breath for like five minutes before they finally left
Then I got up and ran to the janitor's storage booth
Kicked the door hinge loose
And ripped out the four-inch screws
Grabbed some sharp objects, brooms and foreign tools
This is for every time you took my orange juice
Or stole my seat in the lunchroom and drank my chocolate milk
Every time you tipped my tray and it dropped and spilt
I'm gettin' you back, bully, now once and for good
I cocked the broomstick back and swung hard as I could
And beat him over the head with it 'til I broke the wood
Knocked him down, stood on his chest with one foot
Made it home later that same day
Started readin' a comic, and suddenly everything became gray
I couldn't even see what I was tryin' to read
I went deaf and my left ear started to bleed
She beat me over the head with the remote control
Opened a hole and my whole brain fell out of my skull
"Oh my God, I'm sorry, son!" — shut up, you cunt!
I said fuck it, took it and stuck it back up in my head
Then I sewed it shut and put a couple of screws in my neck

Brain damage, ever since the day I was born
Drugs is what they used to say I was on
They say I never knew which way I was goin'
But everywhere I go they keep playin' my song
Brain damage, ever since the day I was born
Drugs is what they used to say I was on
They say I never knew which way I was goin'
But everywhere I go they keep playin' my song

Brain damage, it's brain damage
I got brain damage, it's brain damage
It's probably brain damage, it's brain damage
Brain damage, I got brain damage



Yeah, you know, technically
I'm not even really supposed to be here right now
So fuck it, might as well make the most of it
Yeah! Ha ha, feels good
Guess I'm lucky
Some of us don't get a second chance
But I ain't blowin' this one
Nah, man, ha ha
Shit, I feel like I can do anything now

Who can catch lightning in the bottle, set fire to water
Comin' out the nozzle on the fire hose, flyer than swatters
Cinderella Man, Cinderella Man)
Smash an hourglass, grab the sand
Take his hands and cup 'em
Spit a rhyme and freeze the clock
Take the hands of time and cuff 'em
Cinderella Man, Cinderella Man)

There's a storm comin' that the weatherman couldn't predict
I start to bug, prick, you better flee, 'cause I get ticked
It's a wrap, I was down when I was down, I was kicked
I got up, I'm back to punch you to the ground, you trick!
It's a trap, fuck my last CD, the shit's in my trash
I'll be goddamned if another rapper gets in my ass
I hit the gas and I spit every rap as if it's my last
You can die in the blink of an eye, so bat your eyelashes
And keep winkin' and blowin' kisses
'Cause you're flirtin' with death
I'm destroyin' your livelihood, I ain't just hurtin' your rep
I catch a flow and get goin'
No remorse I'm showin', ain't slowin' for no one
Knowin' there's nothin' you can do about it
Zero in on the target like a marksman, the target is you
I shut your lane down, took your spot, parked in it too
Arsenic flow, lighter fluid saliva—what can you do?
Go get your crew to hype you up
Stand behind you like "Whooo!"
That boy's hot enough to melt Hell, burn Satan too
Fry his ass and put his ashes back together with glue
See, you can hate him, he don't blame you
Frankly, he would too
This game couldn't afford to lose him, how 'bout you?

Now guess who? Here's a clue
He came to the ball in his wife beater, lost his Nike shoe
It's in your ass, he's in your ass
He's all up in your psyche too
Now, what's his name?
Cinderella Man, Cinderella Man)
If I had a time machine, I'd be Cinderella Man
Music is my time machine, so call me
Cinderella Man, Cinderella Man)

Fuck catchin' lightning, he struck it
Screamed "Shut up!" at thunder
Then flipped the world upside down
And made it rain upward
Cinderella Man, Cinderella Man)
Rewound the future to the present
Paused it – don't ask how
Fuck the past, mothafucka
He's the shit right now, he's
Cinderella Man, Cinderella Man)

Cinderella man, Cinder Fellow, Shady dane
Came to wrap the game up in cellophane
Raise hell, from Hell he came
But didn't come to bore you with the Cinderella story
Nor did he come to do the same old
Can't afford to be a lame-o
In this day and age and at this stage of the game
Mediocrity can no longer be allowed to fly
So say bye to the old, H-I to the new
Que será, consider it his last hurrah
The coup de grâce, raise 'em high
In the sky, keep 'em up, time to bring the place alive
Thanks for bein' patient, I
Will make no more mistakes, shit, my
Potato's baked, homie, the veggies on my plate can fly
My filet is smokin' weed—yeah, faggot, the steaks are high
Shit, I ain't even suppose to be here by the grace of God
The skin of my teeth and the hair on my nuts, I skated by
Now y'all are on thin ice with ankle weights, I'd hate to lie
How fuckin' irritated are you? How much in your face am I?
It ain't shit you could do but fear it, Proof is here in spirit
And I'm the spittin' image, I mirror it when I stand near it
Your pussy lyric, I "cunt" hear it
Who forms pyramids and raps circles around square lyricists

Who? Here's a clue
He came to the ball in his wife beater, lost his Nike shoe
It's in your ass, he's in your ass
He's all up in your psyche too
Now, what's his name?
Cinderella, Cinderella Man, Cinderella Man)
If I had a time machine, I'd be
Cinderella Man, Cinderella Man)
Music is my time machine, so call me
Cinderella Man, Cinderella Man)




Aw, baby
The way you shake it, I can't believe it
I ain't never seen an ass like that
The way you move it, you make my pee-pee go
Do-doing, doing, doing
I don't believe it, it's almost too good to be true
I ain't never seen an ass like that
The way you move it, you make my pee-pee go
Do-doing, doing, doing

The way she moves, she's like a belly-dancer
She's shaking that ass to the new Nelly jams
I think someone's at the door but I don't think I'mma answer
What do you mean, 'freeze'? Please, I'm a human being!
I have needs! I'm NOT done, not 'til I'm finished peeing
I am not resisting arrest, I am agreeing
Mr. Officer! I'm already on my knees
I can't get on the ground any further, it's impossible for me
And do not treat me like a murderer, I just like to pee
Pee, pee, yes, I make R&B, I sing song
It go ring-a-chong, a-ching-chong-chong-chong-ching
Psych! I joke, I joke! I keed, I keed!
If I offend, I'm sorry! Please, please, forgive!
For I am Triumph the Puppet Dog, I am a mere puppet

The way you shake it, I can't believe it
I ain't never seen an ass like that
The way you move it, you make my pee-pee go
Do-doing, doing, doing
Jessica Simpson looks oh so tempting
Nick, I ain't never seen an ass like that
Every time I see that show on MTV, my pee-pee goes
Do-doing, doing, doing

Mary-Kate and Ashley used to be so wholesome
Now they getting older, they're starting to grow bum-bums
I go to the movies and sit down with my popcorn
What do you mean, 'freeze'? Geez, I just got my seat!
I have ticket, look, I put it away, my zipper's zipped!
Please do not remove me from this movie theater, please
I did not even get to see Mary-Kate's shower scene
I didn't mean to be obscene or make a great big scene
And don't treat me like I'm Pee-wee Herman, this movie's PG
Mr. Officer, I demand to see my attorney
I will simply plead innocent, cop a plea, and be free
Free, yes free, right back on the streets
What you mean my lawyer's with Michael, he's too busy?
I am Triumph, Britney Spears has shoulders like a man
And I can say that and you'll laugh

The way you shake it, I can't believe it
I ain't never seen an ass like that
The way you move it, you make my pee-pee go
Do-doing, doing, doing
Hilary Duff is not quite old enough, so
I ain't never seen her butt like that
Maybe next year, I'll say ass and she'll make my pee-pee go
Do-doing, doing, doing

The way she moves, she dances like a go-go
In that video, she sings, "Get out, you bozo
I need a new boyfriend!" Hi, my name is JoJo
What do you mean, 'freeze'? My computers will be seized
And my keys, to my ranch, I just bake cookies
Mr. Officer, lookie, take a whiff of this
Here, I make Jesus juice, take a sip of this
Nobody is safe from me! No, not even me
I don't even know if I can say the word 'pee-pee'
Pee, on the radio but I think I did
Janet, is that a breast? I think I just saw a tit!
Psych! I joke, I joke, I keed, I keed
I don't think my joke is working, I must flee quick!
Get to the chopper, everybody get out
I am not Triumph, I am Arnold, get down!

The way you shake it, I can't believe it
I ain't never seen an ass like that
The way you move it, you make my pee-pee go
Do-doing, doing, doing
So Gwen Stefani, will you pee-pee on me, please?
I ain't never seen an ass like that
'Cause the way you move it, you make my pee-pee go
Do-doing, doing, doing




"What is a nightmare?
The dictionary tells us it is a terrifying dream, a nightmare."

I used to think I had bad luck, but I wasn't superstitious
'Til one day I grew suspicious
When I stepped on a crack on Aunt Edna's stoop
And got pooped on by a group of stupid pigeons
Then we flew the coop to Michigan to start anew, but ditchin'
Missouri for Michigan didn't work
So we moved back to Missouri from Michigan
From Missouri back to Michigan
Someone, put me out my misery, I can't do this again
Mom, please stick to a decision
Discipline, last thing I wanna do is listen
She's like Lex Luthor, bitch, her rules are Krypton-ite
So the walls, I done lost my power to see through them bitches
But I run into 'em, runnin' through the kitchen
Pretendin' to be blind Superman, 'cause I had no supervision
But I did have a super power though, I could turn into Invisible Kid
Disappear out of sight like a true magician
And one day Uncle Ronnie brought over this new but different
Music into the picture, and it became my new religion

"I remember it clearly, even today."

Move back to Michigan again, to live with my Grandma Nan
Always itchin' for somethin' to do, was flippin'
Through the radio stations one day
And discovered this DJ who was mixin'
I say it to this day, if you ain't listened to the Wizzard
You ain't have a fuckin' clue what you was missin'
I'd zone out with my headphones
All I remember doing's wishin' for shoes
Fuck them stupid Pumas, bitch!
It's all about them new edition Troops
You get them LL Cool J coolin' system
Made that final maneuver to 8 Mile and Hoover
And somehow I saw my future is in this
That's how I knew my mission
Little boom box boomin', spittin'
Practicin' numerous writtens
When I'd sit in my room, envisionin' my dreams come to fruition
I remember Proof would visit
Couldn't wait to play him my new shit
He'd go cuckoo ballistic, go through the roof for his shit
It's like we knew the instant
We touched a mic that both of us too existed
To do this shit; never quit, too persistent

"We are the underground empire."

Started a group of misfits, Proof had a proposition
If we all band together, there ain't no stoppin' this shit
Come up with aliases, bipolar opposites and
Be ready to come off the top as sharp precision
If you got dissed at the Shop, 'cause if they caught you slippin'
They'd take your spot if someone got to rippin'
You, and you forgot your written
Opportunity knocks once, it ain't knockin' again
It tried ding-dong ditchin' shit, I fuckin' got that bitch in
A headlock, cut off his oxygen, Slim
Is not budgin' like cocksuckin' cynderblocks in the wind
Now I got a pot to piss in
Spot in that top position, koppin' over the opposition
Lookin' like a dog that's pissin', leg up on the competition
Promisin' complete dominance, Sugar Ray Robinson
I'm in a league Muhammad's in
Ali's my colleague bombin' 'em
Probably end up on top of 'em
Stompin' 'em like Ndamukong
I'm Russian like a Ukrainian, LaDainian Tomlinson
Flow vomits in your face, competitors fall at my waist
You spit a rhyme, I spit in a rhyme's face
So name the time, place
To battle, bitch, I'm still in that mind state
Don't make me step on you and make you wine grapes
Cry babies, maybe my way that I use words
Is loose, but you turds better be careful how you choose yours
'Cause feelings scar but egos bruise worse
And the truth hurts – shit, no wonder you're sore losers!
Now where's your poo, birds?
Ooh, no more trippin' in bird shit
Songs of self-empowerment surgin'
Words of encouragement, but discouragin'
The rappers, the rap game's god
But the name's not James Todd, I'm just a wordsmith
So let these words lift
'Cause all I got is bars for you dumbbells
Since yours ain't workin' out, each verse is
More merciless than the first is
And you ain't got to wear no shoes and shirt in this bitch
To get served, bloodthirst revenge of the nerds, chka

"That you'll not escape my vengeance."

And I'm the kid with them ears like Dumbo's gone
Word to Uncle Ron, I'm turnin' into a non-humble Don
You blind dumb hoes, all I got is dick for you to come blow on
So start the show, but I need a drum roll 'fore I go on
Better back away from the front row, get launched
Show you I'm bigger than Dikembe Mutumbo
On the fuckin' Jumbotron
I'm a juggernaut, you do not wanna rumble, you bomboclaats
I'll leave you stretched out like a fuckin' yawn
So mow the fuckin' lawn, your asses are blades of grass
And I'm fuckin' up this whole landscape of rap
The G.O.A.T. just ate eight acres, an eighth of that
Was just to make a path
And take it straight to your favorite rapper
Oh, look, my notebook looks smoke-cooked
Like the flow stood a foot over the flame on the stove, soot
Charred debris floatin' like Oakwood
Was burnin', return of the no good and I won't quit

"And the next thing I know
Something came crawling up from below
Something that made Godzilla look like a plane."

And I don't quit, won't change
It's like a Groundhog's Day
So crowd around, y'all, 'cause you may
See if I popped your head

I'm a monster
I'ma turn into a monster
I'm a monster
With my dick in your mouth all day!

"I'm not so sure I want to know from whence it came
But the white flesh creature's trail is easily followed
There, before that shimmering veil of light, the ivory skin slug thing."



Marshall! Sounds like an SOS
Holy wack unlyrical lyrics, Andre, you're fucking right!
To the Rapmobile – let's go!
Bitches and gentlemen! It's showtime!
Hurry hurry, step right up!
Introducing the star of our show
You wouldn't want to be
Anywhere else in the world right now

You 'bout to witness hip-hop in its most purest
Most rawest form, flow almost flawless
Most hardest, most honest known artist
Looks like Batman brought his own Robin
Oh God, Saddam's got his own Laden
With his own private plane, his own pilot
Set to blow college dorm rooms doors off the hinges
Oranges, peach, pears, plums, syringes
Vrinn, vrinn! Yeah, here I come, I'm inches
Away from you, dear, fear none
Hip-hop is in a state of 9-1-1, so

Let's get down to business
I don't got no time to play around, what is this?
Must be a circus in town, let's shut the shit down
Let's get down to business
I don't got no time to play around, what is this?
Must be a circus in town, let's shut the shit down

Quick, gotta move fast, gotta perform miracles
Gee willikers Dre, "Holy bat syllables!"
Look at all the bullshit that goes on
In Gotham when I'm gone
Time to get rid of these rap criminals
So skip to your lou while I do what I do best
You ain't even impressed no more, you're used to it
Flows too wet, nobody close to it
Nobody says it but still everybody knows the shit
The most hated on out of all those who say they get hated on in eighty songs and exaggerate it all so much
They make it all up, there's no such thing
Like a female with good looks who cooks and cleans
It just means so much more to so much more
People when you're rappin' and you know what for
The show must go on; so I'd like to welcome y'all
To Marshall and Andre's carnival, c'mon!

Now let's get down to business
I don't got no time to play around, what is this?
Must be a circus in town, let's shut the shit down
Let's get down to business
I don't got no time to play around, what is this?
Must be a circus in town, let's shut the shit down

It's just like old times, the Dynamic Duo
Two old friends, why panic? You already know
Who's fully capable, the two caped heroes
Dial straight down the center, eight-zero-zero
You can even call collect, the most feared duet
Since me and Elton played career Russian Roulette
And never even see me blink or get to bustin' a sweat
People steppin' over people just to rush to the set
Just to get to see an MC who breathes so freely
Ease over these beats and be so breezy
Jesus, how can shit be so easy?
How can one Chandra be so Levy?
Turn on these beats, MC's don't see me
Believe me, BET and MTV
Are gonna grieve when we leave, dog, fo' sheezy
Can't leave rap alone, the game needs me
'Til we grow beards, get weird and disappear
Into the mountains, nothin' but clowns down here
But we ain't fuckin' around round here

Now let's get down to business
I don't got no time to play around, what is this?
Must be a circus in town, let's shut the shit down
Let's get down to business
I don't got no time to play around, what is this?
Must be a circus in town, let's shut the shit down

So there you have it, folks
Back with his friend Andre
Here to remind you that bullshit does not pay
And never go away, until our dying day
So until next time, friends
Same blonde hair, same rap channel
Good night, everyone! Thank you for coming!
Oh! Heh



Yeah, look, if I woulda rapped about the crap that's out
That's the route you probably want me to take
‘Cause you're just dyin' to know what I think
Hear my take on some other rappers
If I was to say somethin' about Paul Wall
You'd probably crap in your pants, ‘cause I'm white and he's white
So he's like my competition, I mean, right?
Nope! Paul Wall is dope, and so is Bubba
So b-b-b-b-b-b, but I don't compete with nobody
I just go hard, do the rope-a-dope Ali shuffle
And dance around my opponents, do donuts
Sometimes I play possum like I'm asleep, it's awesome
I'm like a sleepin' giant, and when I awake I'm like Dre
I just jump from outta nowhere and bite prey
And sink my teeth in 'em and fill 'em
Full of poison, and make a noise like a snake before I kill 'em
And let 'em know that I just don't feel 'em
And smack 'em with the backward E on the Eminem emblem
I was taught, if you gonna murder somebody you should face him
Tell him why, look him dead in the eye, then waste him
And the dark shall emerge from the fiery depths of hell
Then swallow the shell, all the hollow who dwell
In the shadows of all who are willing to sell their souls
For this rap game and it g-g-goes
One-two-three, chk-chk, one-two-three
Chk-chk, one-two-three, that ain't the hook, now follow me
There's nothing else for me to say, my public adores me
Everybody bores me, they're just so corny
So at night before I sleep, I look in the mirror

My darling, I don't ever want you to leave me, my darling
You and me were meant to be together, my darling
And if I cannot have you, no one can, you're my darling
‘Cause I possess your soul, your mind, your heart and your body
I don't ever want you to leave me, my darling
You and me were meant to be together, my darling
And if I cannot have you, no one can, you're my darling
‘Cause I possess your soul, your mind, your heart and your body

"Shady, I know you're in there somewhere, come here!
Talk to me, sit! Here, pull up a chair!
Why don't you cut your hair?
Ha ha ha ha ha ha! Dye it back, come on, try it!"
Ahh, no! I told you, leave me the fuck alone, will you?
"But I'm here to rebuild you," – but I already killed you!
"But Shady, we were meant for each other
Think about your mother," — yeah, so what of her?
"You think about what she did to you and your little brother
All them foster homes," — fuck you, motherfucker!
I had you beat! — "No, I was playin' possum
Remember? I let you watch your little girls blossom
I gave you enough time, your soul's mine
I'm taking it back," — you fuckin' bitch, why?!
"Because I love you, look a little closer
Isn't that us on that poster? Ha ha ha ha!"

My darling, I don't ever want you to leave me, my darling
You and me were meant to be together, my darling
And if I cannot have you, no one can, you're my darling
‘Cause I possess your soul, your mind, your heart and your body
I don't ever want you to leave me, my darling
You and me were meant to be together, my darling
And if I cannot have you, no one can, you're my darling
‘Cause I possess your soul, your mind, your heart and your body

They're screaming for you, I can bring your career back!"
But I don't want it back — "Yes, you do," — no, I don't
"Yes, you do! You're gonna regret it later," — no, I won't
"I'ma get Dre on the phone, I'll just call the Doctor."
Go ahead, I already talked to Dre yesterday
"Well, I got him on the phone right now!"
I don't know, it just seems like ever since you got off your
Drugs you became a lot softer)
But Dre, all that Shady is, is a bottle of hair bleach and vodka
Just hit me back and let me know what's up) — fuck this mirror!
"I'm not in the mirror, I'm inside you
Let me guide you," — fuck you! Die, you son of a bitch!
"Put the gun down!" — bye-bye! *Boom!*
Okay, I'm still alive, — "So am I too!
You can't kill a spirit even if you tried to
Ha ha, you sold your soul to me, need I remind you?
You remember that night you prayed to God
You'd give anything to get a record deal? Well, Dre signed you
This is what you wanted your whole life, Marshall, right? Ooh
Oh, but you didn't know fame has a price too?
That you just now seeing the downside to
Lose your best friend from high school, your wife too
Ain't even sure if your kids like you
Come off tour, can't even sleep at night without NyQuil
Become a Valium addict, start a rehab cycle
But together we can break the cycle
Marshall…" — what?! — "No one's gonna love you like I do."

My darling, I don't ever want you to leave me, my darling
You and me were meant to be together, my darling
And if I cannot have you no one can, you're my darling
‘Cause I possess your soul, your mind, your heart and your body
I don't ever want you to leave me, my darling
You and me were meant to be together, my darling
And if I cannot have you no one can, you're my darling
‘Cause I possess your soul, your mind, your heart and your body



Down down down
Down down down
Down down down
Down okay
Guess who's back, back again
Shady's back, tell a friend
Now everyone report to the dance floor
To the dance floor, to the dance floor
Now everyone report to the dance floor
Alright, stop… pajama time

Come here, little kiddies! On my lap!
Guess who's back with a brand new rap?
And I don't mean "rap" as in a new case
Of child molestation accusations
Ah ah ah ah ah, no worries
Papa's got a brand new bag of toys
What else could I possibly do to make noise?
I've done touched on everything but little boys
That's not a stab at Michael
That's just a metaphor, I'm just psycho
I go a little bit crazy sometimes
I get a little bit out of control with my rhymes
Good God, dip, do a little slide
Bend down, touch your toes, and just glide
To the center of the dance floor
Like TP for my bung-hole
And it's cool if you let one go
Nobody's gonna know, who'd hear it?
Give a little "poot poot," it's okay
*fart sound* Oops, my CD just skipped
And everyone just heard you let one rip

Now I'm gonna make you dance
It's your chance, yeah boy, shake that ass
Whoops, I mean girl… girl, girl, girl
Girl, you know you're my world

It's Friday and it's my day
Just to party all the way to Sunday
Maybe 'til Monday, I don't know what day
Everyday's just a holiday
Cruisin' on the freeway, feelin' kind of breezy
Let the top down and my hair blow
I don't know where I'm goin', all I know is
Excuse me, miss, I don't mean to sound like a jerk
But I'm feelin' just a little stressed out from work
Would you punch me in the stomach and pull my hair
Now, what's your name, girl? What's your sign?
I'm just tryin' to unwind, now I'm…

Now I'm gonna make you dance
It's your chance, yeah boy, shake that ass
Whoops, I mean girl… girl, girl, girl
Girl, you know you're my world

It's Tuesday and I'm locked up
I'm in jail and I don't know what happened
They say I was runnin' butt-naked
Your honor, I'm sorry, I don't remember
All I know is this much, I'm not guilty
They said "Save it, boy, we got you on tape
Now this is the part where the rap breaks down
It gets real intense, no one makes a sound
Everything looks like it's 8 Mile now
The beat comes back and everybody lose themselves
Now snap back to reality; look, there's B. Rabbit!
"Oh, you signed me up to battle? I'm a grown man!"
Chuba chuba chuba chuba chuba chuba chubby
I don't have any lines to go right here, so chuba tellytubby
Black girls, white girls, skinny girls, fat girls
Tall girls, small girls, I'm calling all girls
Everyone report to the dance floor
It's your chance for a little romance or butt squeezin'

Now I'm gonna make you dance
It's your chance, yeah boy, shake that ass
Whoops, I mean girl… girl, girl, girl
Girl, you know you're my world

Touch my body
Touch my body
Oooh boy, touch my body
I mean girl, touch my body



It's the calm before the storm right here
Wait, how was I gonna start this off?
I forgot… oh yeah

That's an awfully hot coffee pot
Should I drop it on Donald Trump? Probably not
But that's all I got 'til I come up with a solid plot
Got a plan and now I gotta hatch it
Like a damn Apache with a tomahawk
I'ma walk inside a mosque on Ramadan
And say a prayer that every time **** talks
She gets her mou— ahh, I'ma stop
But we better give Obama props
'Cause what we got in office now's a kamikaze
That'll probably cause a nuclear holocaust
And while the drama pops
And he waits for shit to quiet down, he'll just gas his plane up
And fly around 'til the bombing stops
Intensities heightened, tensions are risin'
Trump, when it comes to givin' a shit, you're stingy as I am
Except when it comes to havin' the balls to go against me, you hide 'em
'Cause you don't got the fuckin' nuts like an empty asylum
Racism's the only thing he's fantastic for
'Cause that's how he gets his fuckin' rocks off and he's orange
Yeah, sick tan
That's why he wants us to disband
'Cause he cannot withstand
The fact we're not afraid of Trump
Fuck walkin' on egg shells, I came to stomp
That's why he keeps screamin', "Drain the swamp!"
'Cause he's in quicksand
It's like we take a step forwards, then backwards
But this is his form of distraction
Plus, he gets an enormous reaction
When he attacks the NFL so we focus on that in–
–stead of talkin' Puerto Rico or gun reform for Nevada
All these horrible tragedies and he's bored and would rather
Cause a Twitter storm with the Packers
Then says he wants to lower our taxes
Then who's gonna pay for his extravagant trips
Back and forth with his fam to his golf resorts and his mansions?
Same shit that he tormented Hillary for and he slandered
Then does it more
From his endorsement of Bannon
Support for the Klansmen
Tiki torches in hand for the soldier that's black
And comes home from Iraq
And is still told to go back to Africa
Fork and a dagger in this racist 94-year-old grandpa
Who keeps ignorin' our past historical, deplorable factors
Now if you're a black athlete you're a spoiled little brat for
Tryna use your platform or your stature
To try to give those a voice who don't have one
He says, "You're spittin' in the face of vets who fought for us, you bastards!"
Unless you're a POW who's tortured and battered
'Cause to him you're zeros
'Cause he don't like his war heroes captured
That's not disrespectin' the military
Fuck that, this is for Colin, ball up a fist!
And keep that shit balled like Donald the bitch!
"He's gonna get rid of all immigrants!"
"He's gonna build that thing up taller than this!"
Well, if he does build it, I hope it's rock solid with bricks
'Cause like him in politics, I'm usin' all of his tricks
'Cause I'm throwin' that piece of shit against the wall 'til it sticks
And any fan of mine who's a supporter of his
I'm drawing in the sand a line, you're either for or against
And if you can't decide who you like more and you're split
Fuck you!
The rest of America, stand up!
We love our military, and we love our country
But we fuckin' hate Trump!



Yeah, what up, Detroit?
Nu-uh, nu-uh nuh, no, he didn't
You shitted on these niggas two times, Dr. Dre?
Oh, fo' sho'
Uh-uh, naw, you smell that?
Yeah, it's a toast to the boogie, baby
To the boogie-oogie-oogie
Yeah, you know, what's crackin', Dre?

Just let me lay back and kick some old simplistic pimp shit
On Slim's shit and start riots like Limp Bizkit
Throw on "Guilty Conscience" at concerts
Some of these crowds that Slim draws is rowdy as Crenshaw Boulevard, when it's packed and full of cars
Some of these crowds me and Snoop draw
Is niggas from Crenshaw, from Long Beach to South Central
Whoa, not these niggas again
You and what army could harm me?
D-R-E and Shady, with Doggy from Long Beach
Came a long way, to makin' these songs play
It'll be a wrong move to stare at me the wrong way
I got a long Uz' and I carry it all day
Sometimes it's like a nightmare just bein' Andre, but I…

Somehow, some way
Now let me cut these niggas up
And show 'em where the fuck I'm comin' from
I get the party crackin' from the shit that I be spittin', son
Hit-and-run, get it done, get the funds, split and run
Got about fifty guns
Damn, baby girl, what's your name?
Hangin' in the club with my nephew Eminem
The Great White American Hope
Done hooked up with the king of the motherfuckin' West Coast
Baby

And you don't really wanna fuck with me
Only nigga that I trust is me
Fuck around and make me bust this heat
That's the devil, they always wanna dance

I'm the Head Nigga In Charge, I'm watchin' you move
You're found dead in your garage
With ten o'clock news coverage
Gotta love it ‘cause I expose the facade
Your little lungs is too small to hotbox with God's
All jokes aside, come bounce with us
Standin' over you with a 12 gauge, about to bust
It's like ashes to ashes and dust to dust
I might leave in the bodybag, but never in cuffs
So who do you trust? They just not rugged enough
When things get rough I'm in the club shootin' with Puff
Bitch, please! You must have a mental disease
Assume the position and get back down on your knees; come on!

And you don't really wanna fuck with me
Only nigga that I trust is me
Fuck around and make me bust this heat
That's the devil, they always wanna dance
And you don't really wanna fuck with me
Only nigga that I trust is me
Fuck around and make me bust this heat
That's the devil, they always wanna dance

Aww, naww, big Slim Dogg
Eighty pound balls, dick six inch long
Back up in the heezy, baby
Give me the mic, let me recite 'til Timothy White
Pickets outside the Interscope offices every night
What if he's right? I'm just a criminal
Makin' a livin' off of the world's misery
What in the world gives me the right to say what I like?
And walk around flippin' the bird
Livin' the urban life, like a white kid from the burbs
Dreamin' at night of screamin' at Mom, schemin' to leave
Run away from home and grow to be as evil as me
I just want you all to notice me and people to see
That somewhere deep down there's a decent human bein' in me
It just can't be found so the reason you've been seein' this me
Is ‘cause this is me now, the recent dude who's bein' this mean
So when you see me dressin' up like a nerd on TV
Or heard the CD usin' the fag word so freely
It's just me bein' me; here, want me to tone it down?
Suck my fuckin' dick, you faggot! You happy now?
Look here, I start some trouble everywhere that I go
Ask the bouncers in the club ‘cause they know
I start some shit, they throw me out the back door
Come back and shoot the club up with a .44

And you don't really wanna fuck with me
Only nigga that I trust is me
Fuck around and make me bust this heat
That's the devil, they always wanna dance
And you don't really wanna fuck with me
Only nigga that I trust is me
Fuck around and make me bust this heat
That's the devil, they always wanna dance

2001 and forever
Slim Shady
Dr. Dre
Snoop Dogg
X to the Z
Nate Dogg
Come on, yeah!



Yeah, haha, whoo, shit
I'll come in a minute
Ayo, this is my love song, it goes like this)

This is how we used to make the party start
We used to mix Hen with Bacardi Dark
And when it kicks in you can hardly talk
And by the sixth gin you're gon' probably crawl
And you'll be sick then and you'll probably barf
And my prediction is you're gon' probably fall
Either somewhere in the lobby or the hallway wall
And everything's spinnin', you're beginnin' to think women
Are swimmin' in pink linen again in the sink
Then in a couple of minutes that bottle of Guinness is finished
You are now allowed to officially slap bitches
You have the right to remain violent and start wilin'
Start a fight with the same guy that was smart eyein' you
Get in your car, start it, and start drivin'
Over the island and cause a 42-car pile-up
Looking for life on this planet, sir, no sign of it
All I can see is a bunch of smoke flyin'
And I'm so high that I might die if I go by it
Let me outta this place, I'm outta place
I'm in outer space, I've just vanished without a trace
I'm going to a pretty place now where the flowers grow
I'll be back in an hour or so)

‘Cause every time I go to try to leave
Something keeps pullin' on my sleeve
I don't wanna, but I gotta stay
These drugs really got a hold of me
‘Cause every time I try to tell 'em "no"
They won't let me ever let 'em go
I'm a sucker all I gotta say
These drugs really got a hold of me

In third grade, all I used to do
Was sniff glue through a tube and play Rubik's Cube
Seventeen years later, I'm as rude as Jude
Schemin' on the first chick with the hugest boobs
I've got no game, and every face looks the same
They've got no name, so I don't need game to play
I just say whatever I want to whoever I want
Whenever I want, wherever I want, however I want
However, I do show some respect to few
This ecstasy's got me standin' next to you
Getting sentimental as fuck, spillin' guts to you
We just met, but I think I'm in love with you
But you're on it too, so you tell me you love me too
Wake up in the morning like, "Yo, what the fuck we do?"
I gotta go, bitch, you know I got stuff to do
‘Cause if I get caught cheatin' then I'm stuck with you
But in the long run, these drugs are probably going
To catch up sooner or later, but fuck it, I'm on one
So let's enjoy, let the X destroy your spinal cord
So it's not a straight line no more
'Til we walk around looking like some wind-up dolls
Shit's stickin' out of our backs like a dinosaur
Shit, six hits won't even get me high no more
So bye for now, I'm going to try to find some more

‘Cause every time I go to try to leave
Something keeps pullin' on my sleeve
I don't wanna, but I gotta stay
These drugs really got a hold of me
‘Cause every time I try to tell 'em "no"
They won't let me ever let 'em go
I'm a sucker all I gotta say
These drugs really got a hold of me

That's the sound of a bottle when it's hollow
When you swallow it all wallow and drown in your sorrow
And tomorrow you're probably gonna wanna do it again
What's a little spinal fluid between you and a friend?
Screw it! And what's a little bit of alcohol poisonin'?
And what's a little fight? Tomorrow, you'll be boys again
It's your life, live it however you wanna
Mar-a-ju-on-na is everywhere, where was you brought up?
It don't matter as long as you get where you're goin'
‘Cause none of this shit's gonna mean shit where we're goin'
They tell you to stop, but you just sit there ignorin'
Even though you wake up feeling like shit every mornin'
But you're young, you've got a lot of drugs to do
Girls to screw, parties to crash, sucks to be you
If I could take it all back now, I wouldn't
I would have did more shit that people said that I shouldn't
But I'm all grown up now and upgraded
And graduated to better drugs and updated
But I still got a lotta growing up to do
I still got a whole lotta throwing up to spew
But when it's all said and done, I'll be forty
Before I know it with a 40 on the porch tellin' stories
With a bottle of Jack, two grandkids in my lap
Babysitting for Hailie while Hailie's out getting smashed

‘Cause every time I go to try to leave
Something keeps pullin' on my sleeve
I don't wanna, but I gotta stay
These drugs really got a hold of me
‘Cause every time I try to tell 'em "no"
They won't let me ever let 'em go
I'm a sucker all I gotta say
These drugs really got a hold of me




I don't do black music, I don't do white music
I make fight music, for high school kids
I put lives at risk when I drive like this
I put wives at risk with a knife like this
Shit, you probably think I'm in your tape deck now
I'm in the back seat of your truck with duct tape stretched out
Ducked the fuck way down, waitin' to straight jump out
Put it over your mouth, and grab you by the face — what now?
Oh, you want me to watch my mouth
How? Take my fuckin' eyeballs out and turn them around?
Look, I'll burn your fuckin' house down, circle around
And hit the hydrant, so you can't put your burnin' furniture out
I'm sorry, there must be a mix-up
You want me to fix up lyrics
While the President gets his dick sucked?
Fuck that! Take drugs, rape sluts
Make fun of gay clubs, men who wear make-up
Get aware, wake up, get a sense of humor
But don't blame me when little Eric jumps off of the terrace
You shoulda been watchin' him, apparently you ain't parents

‘Cause I never knew I, knew I would get this big
I never knew I, knew I'd affect this kid
I never knew I'd get him to slit his wrist
I never knew I'd get him to hit this bitch
I never knew I, knew I would get this big
I never knew I, knew I'd affect this kid
I never knew I'd get him to slit his wrist
I never knew I'd get him to hit this bitch

So who's bringin' the guns in this country?
I couldn't sneak a plastic pellet gun
Through customs over in London
And last week I seen this Schwarzenegger movie
Where he's shootin' all sorts of these motherfuckers with an Uzi
I sees three little kids up in the front row
Screaming "Go!" with their 17-year-old uncle
I'm like, guidance?!
Ain't they got the same moms and dads
Who got mad when I asked if they liked violence?
And told me that my tape taught 'em to swear?
What about the make-up
You allow your 12-year-old daughter to wear?
So tell me that your son doesn't know any cuss words
When his bus driver's screamin' at him, fuckin' him up worse
And "fuck" was the first word I ever learned
Up in the third grade, flippin' the gym teacher the bird
So read up 'bout how I used to get beat up
Peed on, be on free lunch
And changed school every three months
My life's like kind of what my wife's like
So how much easier would life be
If nineteen million motherfuckers grew to be just like me?

‘Cause I never knew I, knew I would get this big
I never knew I, knew I'd affect this kid
I never knew I'd get him to slit his wrist
I never knew I'd get him to hit this bitch
I never knew I, knew I would get this big
I never knew I, knew I'd affect this kid
I never knew I'd get him to slit his wrist
I never knew I'd get him to hit this bitch

I never knew I, knew I'd have a new house or a new car
A couple years ago I was more poorer than you are
I don't got that bad of a mouth, do I?
Fuck! Shit! Ass! Bitch! Cunt! Shooby-de-doo-wop!
Skibbedy-be-bop, a Christopher Reeve
Sonny Bono, skis, horses and hittin' some trees
How many retards'll listen to me
And run up in the school shootin' when they're pissed at a tea
-cher? Her? Him? Is it you? Is it them?
"Wasn't me, Slim Shady said to do it again!"
Damn, how much damage can you do with a pen?
Man, I'm just as fucked up as you woulda been
If you woulda been in my shoes, who woulda thought
Slim Shady would be somethin' that you woulda bought?
That woulda made you get a gun and shoot at a cop
I just said it, I ain't know if you'd do it or not

‘Cause I never knew I, knew I would get this big
I never knew I, knew I'd affect this kid
I never knew I'd get him to slit his wrist
I never knew I'd get him to hit this bitch
I never knew I, knew I would get this big
I never knew I, knew I'd affect this kid
I never knew I'd get him to slit his wrist
I never knew I'd get him to hit this bitch

How the fuck was I supposed to know?



Yo blast me off, Tim, blast me off, son
Blastin' off right now son

PART ONE

I wasn't born mean, I was pushed to treachery
I walk the streets looking for some puss to fetch me
I'm like a veggie, brain is turned to mush, I'm edgy
Edgy enough to give Reggie Bush a wedgie
If he don't gimme Kim, things could get messy
So pass that ass to me let me squish the left cheek
And press against the right one till it's smushed against me
And leave a dead body in the woods, the MC
With the Christopher Reeve beef
We started out on the wrong foot
Or should I say fake leg made outta wood
I shouldn't, yes I should
Riding through the hood, I'm chillin' with Westwood
I'm quite mellow, a white fellow
My pee is bright yellow, I like Jell-O
I'm like hello to a cute little dyke on the mic
I'm kinda like Iron Mike 'cause I bite earlobes

See I'm the first one to class and the last to leave
I mean the first one to leave outta class, believe
That I'm a mailbox pimp in my heart till I die
Even after I’m all gone and my ashes fried
Went from an ashy guy class clown as high
To a grown ass man stacking pa-per
Runyon Ave.'s the clique , D12's the game
Since we were little bébés
Gaga goo goo nana, nadi do do never
Word to my homie Em, I'm just too too clever
A 4-5 shot and leave a nigga's face  lop-sided
The kick from the barrel make you think I'm cock-eyed it
When I bust it out off in the crowd, you start diving
Greg Louganis went over the bar I ain't lying
Hot Iron lethals not defying a soldier
Runyon Ave. soldier equals death when it's over
Apply the street-muscle we've been had to hustle
We've been had to hustle, we've been had to muscle
Apply the street hustle, we've been had to hustle

Aight, aight
Me and Westwood blastin' off, jackin' off
In a pair of acid washed bumpin' Asher Roth
Cruisin Gratiot til I damn near crash the car
Tryna smash 'em off in the dash, hit the overpass, went off
Over the bridge into oncoming traffic
Caused a massive forty-two car pile-up, not a scratch at all
Hopped up holding an axe and saw
Jason mask is off when my face is plastered in tabasco sauce
Spitting flames, kickin' fire out your ass you little bastard
You can pass it on, I'm battery acid dog
You don't wanna get my ass ticked off
I'm harder than playing basketball when I'm going through crack withdrawal
Dick so big it's like elastic
I tie it in a knot and it looks like Mr. Fantastic
Crossed the path of Plastic Man with a drastic force
And went spastic, put my penis on classic sports

PART TWO

Once again it's the sinister, cynical, minister Shady
Kryptonite to Superman, he's a dentist to Amy
Administer of the pain, just finished, huffing the paint
And muffled the fumes like it was nothing because it ain't
Anything in his way, his enemies he just slays
His venom he spray, reaches like beams of energy rays
Menacing stares, he glares making the hairs
All on the back of your neck stand
Like Dracula yep
Spectacular rep, he's a tarantula, gargantuan
Yah, Angela so I command you to start dancing
Part Manson, part Hannibal, part mechanical shark
Throwing animal parts at Scarlett Johansson
Enter my gas chamber, ya gangsta, my ass
He's got his fangs to your neck, he's set to strangle ya ass, hater
You're facing a task greater, he's chasing your ass
He's got his face in a mask, your blood stains on his glass table
I'm checking the exposure, a full dose of me exposing
Myself locked inside of a cozy hotel posing
With or without clothing, next to the decomposing
Bodies eroding while I'm dozing off overdosing
Windows opening-shutting, doors opening-closing
I think there's a ghost, too much hydrocodone and Codeine
I was only supposed to swallow a half, I took the whole thing
I'm not joking, I think I just snorted my nose ring
I need a drink, I'm standing over the sink frozen
Myself, self-loathing, cause I'm on a brink, mostly
I don't wanna think this will make everything rosey
Beverly sings, scream while I'm severing three toesies
Totally frozen while I close in, I'm yodelling
Rosey, won't you come out to play
A nuisance, wasting time, cutting and pasting headlines
In the papers making shrines of my crimes and capers
My words are whirlwinds, I murder my girlfriends
Go to Europe and put neurofens in my syrup and stirred em
You never heard him like this, so don't encourage him
The neurosurgeon, coke mirrors, and lyrics worse than
The kinda person to get Katie Couric to cursin'
Eighty spirits of ladies 'cause Shady murdered the virgins
Crazy turn of events and then he emerged
Took over the world and reeled in all the children
Lured em into the building and killed em
Buried em in the mulch and mildew and he will
Do what he feels and still can spin
Straw into gold like Rumpelstiltskin
Cotton to silk, Motrin to Tylenol - three pills, the Real Slim
Shady's entered the building
There's nothing but crumbled leaves and
Tumbleweeds up in this bitch, Mildrid
He's ill wit it, he still shouldn't be healed
There's no one as sick as he, MC's
Will get fricasseed on the grill then

PART THREE

You wanna start with the hook first
You wanna start with the...oh
I have no idea what I'm doing, I have no idea what I'm doing, but
Everybody get up, sit up Christopher
They're miserable without you, Superman is a-
Live and he's flowin' like the Mystic River
Girl, don't act like you've never been kissed before
One, two, three, four, five, six, this uh
Rhyme is about to hit you right in the kisser
How did anybody ever find me? I disa-
-ppeared, I was hiding in Freeway's beard, just a
Hop, skip and a jump from my skin gushing
Nails into my face that I been pushing
Hellraiser, my face is my pin cushion
It's like when I'm on the mic I can squish a
Sucker like a vice grip, my pen put you
In the slaughterhouse cause your style's been butchered
I'll spin chainsaw, take off like the blades on, my brains on
Hyperdrive, someone put the brakes on

Here's a smidgen, a midget to get your digits Bridget
Don't try to fidget with it, ribbit ribbit
I got you slipping on my swag juice, my swag juice
I got you slipping on my swag juice, my swag juice
Now here's a smidgen, a midget to get your digits Bridget
Don't try to fidget with it, ribbit ribbit
I got you slipping on my swag juice, my swag juice


I got it figured out now nigga, see
My mind's right, money right
Can't nobody stoppin' how I get it
In hindsight I never shoulda left where  I was livin'
I probably wouldn't be getting pressed by all these women
But then again I wouldn't 'a met the ones that I was diggin'
So now I like to look and talk a lot like
She like Lil Kim and Kim and Serena Williams
Bitch call me talking about she pregnant
I won't never trust her no shit
Even if she specialize in mouth massaging my testicles
I never trust her, a ho, I, even on the first date
She's basically getting her mouth raped
Then turn around and ask me for a kiss
"No bitch I'm straight"
I've never really been concerned with how my own dick taste

I think I'm about slip on my swag juice, swag juice
I think I'm about to slip on your swag juice


Oh no! Don't slip on your swag juice!


Yeah, yeah, I think I'm 'bout to slip on my swag juice!

So here's a smidge and a midget to get your digits, Bridget
Don't try to figit with it, ribbit ribbit
I got you slipping on my swag juice, my swag juice
I got you slipping on my swag juice.  Aright

Slim is in the house, simmer down there sister
Bound to get you dizzy 'cause he gets as busy as a
Bee baby you could throw a Frisbee in a blizzard
He'll catch it in his teeth, what is he, he's a wizard
Standing in the disco with a disco biscuit
And I'm pretty sure it isn't Bisquick, is it
Now baby don't forget to bring your lipstick witcha
I want the kiss before I blow this bitch to smitha-
Reens, get the guillotines, this is a situ-
Ation that's critical as Dre spins his, uh
Turn tables and he cuts the record like a scissor
Checka-chicky-checka-chicky-checka-checka-chicka
We'll wreck it in a second tell me what the heck is sicker
Wait a minute I just dropped my necklace in the liquor
Now baby just to make a little breakfast and it's six o-
Clock in the morning unless you want to get some dessert

Here's a smidge and a midget to get your Bridgets, digit
Don't try to fidget with it, ribbit ribbit
I got you slipping on my swag juice, my swag juice
I got you slipping on my swag juice, my swag juice
I said, here's a smidge and a midget to get your digits, Bridget
Don't try to fidget with it, ribbit ribbit
I got you slipping on my swag juice, my swag juice
I got you slipping on my swag, my swag juice

Ayo, just so everybody knows, that was a hook we made on the way to the radio station and we were trying to get it right;
So we may have fucked it up a couple times or whatever;
But, this is what we were trying to like work out before we came here. Especially for Westwood, man! ESPECIALLY for you homie!



Guess who? D'you miss me?
Jessica Simpson, sing the chorus!

When you walked through the door
You’re the one they adore
We’re the ones who made you

Ahem, back by popular demand
Now pop a little Zantac for antacid if you can
You're ready to tackle any task that is at hand?
How does it feel? Is it fantastic? Is it grand?
Well, look at all the massive masses in the stands
"Shady, man, no, don't massacre the fans!"
Damn, I think Kim Kardashian's a man
She stomped him, just ‘cause he asked to put his hands
On her massive gluteus maximus again
Squeeze it then squish it, then pass it to a friend
Can he come back as nasty as he can?
Yes, he can-can; don't ask me this again
He does not mean to lesbian offend
But Lindsay, please come back to seeing men
Samantha's a 2; you're practically a 10
I know you want me, girl
In fact, I see you grin; now come in, girl!

When you walked through the door
You’re the one they adore
We’re the ones who made you

The enforcer, looking for more women to torture
Walk up to the cutest girl and charley-horse her
Sorry, Portia, but what's Ellen DeGeneres
Have that I don't? Are you telling me tenderness?
Well, I can be as gentle and as smooth as a gentleman
Give me my Ventolin inhaler, and two Xenadrine
And I'll invite Sarah Palin out to dinner then
Nail her, baby, say hello to my little friend!
Brit, forget K-Fed, let's cut off the middleman
Forget him or you're gonna end up in the hospital again
And this time it won't be for the Ritalin binge
Forget them other men, girl, pay them little attention
And little did I mention that Jennifer's in
Love with me, John Mayer, so sit on the bench
Man, I swear them other guys, you give 'em an inch
They take a mile; they got style, but it isn't Slim's

When you walked through the door
You’re the one they adore
We’re the ones who made you

And that's why, my love, you'll never live without
I know you want me, girl, 'cause I can see you're checking me out
And baby, you know, you know you want me too

Damn, girl, I'm beginning to sprout an Alfalfa
Why should I wash my filthy mouth out?
You think that's bad, you should hear the rest of my album
Never has there been such finesse and nostalgia
Man, Cash, I don't mean to mess with your gal, but
Wowzers! I just made a mess in my trousers
And they wonder why I keep dressing like Elvis
"Lord, help us, he's back in his pink Alf shirt
Looking like someone shrinked his outfit!"
I think he's 'bout to flip, Jessica
Rest assured Superman's here to rescue ya
Can you blame me? You're my Amy, I'm your Blake
Matter of fact, bake me a birthday cake
With a saw blade in it to make my jailbreak
Baby, I think you just met your soulmate
Now break it down, girl

When you walked through the door
You’re the one they adore
We’re the ones who made you

So baby
Baby get down, down down
Baby get down, down down
Baby get down, down down
Baby get down, get down
Baby get down, down down
Baby get down, down down
Baby get down, down down
Baby get down, get down
Oh Amy! Rehab never looked so good!
I can't wait, I'm going back
Ha ha, woo!
Dr. Dre! 2020!
Yeah!




A lot of people ask me, am I afraid of death?
Hell yeah, I'm afraid of death
I don't want to die yet
A lot of people think that I worship the devil
That I do all types of retarded shit
Look, I can't change the way I think
And I can't change the way I am
But if I offended you, good!
‘Cause I still don't give a fuck

I'm zonin' off of one joint, stoppin' a limo
Hopped in the window, shoppin' a demo at gunpoint
A lyricist without a clue, what year is this?
Fuck a needle, here's a sword, body pierce with this!
Livin' amok, never givin' a fuck
Give me the keys, I'm drunk, and I've never driven a truck
But I smoke dope in a cab
I'll stab you with the sharpest knife I can grab
Come back the next week and re-open your scab
A killer instinct runs in the blood
Emptyin' full clips and buryin' guns in the mud
I've calmed down now, I was heavy once into drugs
I could walk around straight for two months with a buzz
My brain's gone, my soul's worn, and my spirit is torn
The rest of my body's still bein' operated on
I'm ducked the fuck down while I'm writin' this rhyme
‘Cause I'm probably gonna get struck with lightnin' this time

For all the weed that I've smoked – yo, this blunt's for you
To all the people I've offended – yeah, fuck you too!
To all the friends I used to have – yo, I miss my past
But the rest of you assholes can kiss my ass
For all the drugs that I've done – yo, I'm still gonna do
To all the people I've offended – yeah, fuck you too!
For every time I reminisce – yo, I miss my past
But I still don't give a fuck, y'all can kiss my ass

I walked into a gunfight with a knife to kill you
And cut you so fast, when your blood spilled it was still blue
I'll hang you till you dangle and chain you with both ankles
And pull you apart from both angles
I wanna crush your skull 'til your brains leaks out of your veins and bust open like broken water mains
So tell Saddam not to bother with makin' another bomb
‘Cause I'm crushin' the whole world in my palm
Got your girl on my arm, and I'm armed with a firearm
So big my entire arm is a giant firebomb
Buy your mom a shirt with a Slim Shady iron-on
I get imaginative with a mouth full of adjectives
A brain full of adverbs, and a box full of laxatives
God, help me, before I commit some irresponsible acts again

For all the weed that I've smoked – yo, this blunt's for you
To all the people I've offended – yeah, fuck you too!
To all the friends I used to have – yo, I miss my past
But the rest of you assholes can kiss my ass
For all the drugs that I've done – yo, I'm still gonna do
To all the people I've offended – yeah, fuck you too!
For every time I reminisce – yo, I miss my past
But I still don't give a fuck, y'all can kiss my ass

I wanted an album so rugged nobody could touch it
Spent a million a track and went over my budget
Now how in the fuck am I supposed to get out of debt?
I can't rap anymore, I just murdered the alphabet
Drug sickness got me doin' some bugged twitches
I'm withdrawin' from crack so bad my blood itches
I don't rap to get the women—fuck bitches!
Give me a fat slut that cooks and does dishes
Never ran with a clique, I'm a posse
Kamikaze, strappin' a motherfuckin' bomb across me
From the second I was born my momma lost me
I'm a cross between Manson, Esham and Ozzy
I don't know why the fuck I'm here in the first place
My worst day on this earth was my first birthday
Retarded? What did that nurse say?
Brain damage? Fuck! I was born during an earthquake

For all the weed that I've smoked – yo, this blunt's for you
To all the people I've offended – yeah, fuck you too!
To all the friends I used to have – yo, I miss my past
But the rest of you assholes can kiss my ass
For all the drugs that I've done – yo, I'm still gonna do
To all the people I've offended – yeah, fuck you too!
For every time I reminisce – yo, I miss my past
But I still don't give a fuck, y'all can kiss my ass



There is no escaping
There's no place to hide
You scream, "Someone save me!"
But they don't pay no mind
Goodnight, goodbye!

You're walking down a horror corridor
It's almost four in the morning and you're in a
Nightmare, it's horrible, right there's the coroner
Waiting for you to turn the corner so he can corner ya
You're a goner, he's onto ya
Out the corner of his cornea, he just saw you run
All you want is to rest 'cause you can't run anymore, you're done
All he wants is to kill you in front of an audience
While everybody is watching in the party, applauding it
Here I sit, while I'm caught up in deep thought again
Contemplating my next plot again
Swallowin' a Klonopin while I'm noddin' in and out on the ottoman
At the Ramada Inn, holding onto the pill bottle, then
Lick my finger and swirl it 'round the bottom
And make sure I got all of it
Wake up naked at McDonald's with
Blood all over me, dead bodies behind the counter, shit
Guess I must've just blacked out again—not again!

It's 3 a.m. in the mornin'
Put my key in the door, and
Bodies layin' all over the floorin'
I don't remember how they got there
But I guess I must've killed 'em, killed 'em
I said, it's 3 a.m. in the mornin'
Put my key in the door, and
Bodies layin' all over the floorin'
I don't remember how they got there
But I guess I must've killed 'em, killed 'em

Sitting nude in my living room, it's almost noon
I wonder what's on the tube, maybe they'll show some boobs
Surfing every channel until I find Hannah Montana
Then I reach for the aloe and lanolin, bust all over the wall panelin'
Dismantlin' every candle on top of the fireplace mantle, and
Grab my flannel and my bandana, then
Kiss the naked mannequin man again
You can see him standin' in my front window if you look in
I'm just a hooligan who's used to using hallucinogens
Causing illusions again, brain contusions again
Cutting and bruising the skin, razors, scissors, and pins
Jesus, when does it end? Phases that I go through
Dazed and I'm so confused
Days that I don't know who gave these molecules to
Me, what am I gon' do?
Hey, the prodigal son, the diabolical one
Very methodical when I slaughter them

It's 3 a.m. in the mornin'
Put my key in the door, and
Bodies layin' all over the floorin'
I don't remember how they got there
But I guess I must've killed 'em, killed 'em
I said, it's 3 a.m. in the mornin'
Put my key in the door, and
Bodies layin' all over the floorin'
I don't remember how they got there
But I guess I must've killed 'em, killed 'em

She puts the lotion in the bucket
It puts the lotion on the skin
Or else it gets the hose again

I cut and I slash, slice and gash, last night was a blast
I can't quite remember when I had that
Much fun off a half-pint of the Jack, my last Vic and a half
A flashlight up Kim Kardashian's ass
I remember the first time I dismembered a family member
December, I think it was, I was having drinks with my cousin
I wrapped him in Christmas lights
Pushed him into the stinkin' tub, cut him up into pieces
And just when I went to drink his blood
I thought, "I oughta drink his bath water, that oughta be fun"
That's when my days of serial murder manslaughter begun
The sight of blood excites me, that might be an artery, son
Your blood-curdlin' screams just don't seem to bother me none
It's 3 a.m. and here I come, so you should probably run
A secret passageway around here, man, there's got to be one
Oh no, there's probably none
He can scream all that he wants, top of his lungs
But ain't no stopping me from chopping him up-up, 'cause…

It's 3 a.m. in the mornin'
Put my key in the door, and
Bodies layin' all over the floorin'
I don't remember how they got there
But I guess I must've killed 'em, killed 'em
I said, it's 3 a.m. in the mornin'
Put my key in the door, and
Bodies layin' all over the floorin'
I don't remember how they got there
But I guess I must've killed 'em, killed 'em




Sometimes I just feel like quittin', I still might
Why do I put up this fight? Why do I still write?
Sometimes it's hard enough just dealin' with real life
Sometimes I wanna jump on stage and just kill mics
And show these people what my level of skill's like
But I'm still white, sometimes I just hate life
Somethin' ain't right, hit the brake lights
Case of the stage fright, drawin' a blank like
Da-duh-duh-da-da, it ain't my fault
Great big eyeballs, my insides crawl
And I clam up {​*wham*},​ I just slam shut
I just can't do it, my whole manhood's
Just been stripped, I have just been vicked
So I must then get off the bus, then split
Man, fuck this shit, yo I'm goin' the fuck home
World on my shoulders as I run back to this 8 Mile Road

I'm a man, I'ma make a new plan
Time for me to just stand up and travel new land
Time to really just take matters into my own hands
Once I'm over these tracks, man, I'ma never look back
Sorry, Momma, I'm grown, I must travel alone
Ain't gon' follow no footsteps, I'm makin' my own
Only way that I know how to escape from this 8 Mile Road

I'm walkin' these train tracks, tryin' to regain back
The spirit I had 'fore I go back to the same crap
To the same plant, in the same pants
Tryin' to chase rap, gotta move ASAP
And get a new plan, Momma's got a new man
Poor little baby sister, she don't understand
Sits in front of the TV, buries her nose in the pad
And just colors until the crayon gets dull in her hand
While she colors her big brother and mother and dad
Ain't no tellin' what really goes on in her little head
Wish I could be the daddy that neither one of us had
But I keep runnin' from somethin' I never wanted so bad
Sometimes I get upset, ‘cause I ain't blew up yet
It's like I grew up, but I ain't grow me two nuts yet
Don't gotta rep my step, don't got enough pep
The pressure's too much, man, I'm just tryin' to do what's best
And I try, sit alone and I cry
Yo, I won't tell no lie, not a moment goes by
That I don't pray to the sky, please, I'm beggin' you, God
Please don't let me be pigeonholed in no regular job
Yo, I hope you can hear me, homie, wherever you are
Yo, I'm tellin' you, dawg, I'm bailin' this trailer tomorrow
Tell my mother I love her, kiss baby sister goodbye
Say whenever you need me, baby, I'm never too far
But yo, I gotta get out there, the only way I know
And I'ma be back for you the second that I blow
On everything I own, I'll make it on my own
Off to work I go back to this 8 Mile Road

I'm a man, gotta make a new plan
Time for me to just stand up and travel new land
Time to really just take matters into my own hands
Once I'm over these tracks, man, I'ma never look back
Sorry, Momma, I'm grown, I must travel alone
Ain't gon' follow no footsteps, I'm makin' my own
Only way that I know how to escape from this 8 Mile Road

You gotta live it to feel it; you didn't, you wouldn't get it
Or see what the big deal is, why it was and it still is
To be walkin' this borderline of Detroit city limits
It's different, it's a certain significance, a certificate
Of authenticity, you'd never even see
But it's everything to me, it's my credibility
You never seen, heard, smelled or met a real MC
Who's incredible upon the same pedestal as me
But yet I'm still unsigned, havin' a rough time
Sit on the porch with all my friends and kick dumb rhymes
Go to work and serve MC's in the lunchline
But when it comes crunch time, where do my punchlines go?
Who must I show to bust my flow?
Where must I go? Who must I know?
Or am I just another crab in the bucket?
‘Cause I ain't havin' no luck with this little Rabbit, so fuck it
Maybe I need a new outlet, I'm startin' to doubt shit
I'm feelin' a little skeptical who I hang out with
I look like a bum yo, my clothes ain't about shit
At the Salvation Army tryin' to salvage an outfit
And it's cold, tryin' to travel this road
Plus I feel like I'm always stuck in this battlin' mode
My defenses are so up, but one thing I don't want
Is pity from no one, this city is no fun
There is no sun, and it's so dark
Sometimes I feel like I'm just bein' pulled apart
From each one of my limbs, by each one of my friends
It's enough to just make me wanna jump out of my skin
Sometimes I feel like a robot, sometimes I just know not
What I'm doin', I just blow, my head is a stove top
I just explode, the kettle gets so hot
Sometimes my mouth just overloads the ass that I don't got
But I've learned, it's time for me to U-turn
Yo, it only takes one time for me to get burned
Ain't no fallin' no next time I meet a new girl
I can no longer play stupid or be immature
I got every ingredient, all I need is the courage
Like I already got the beat, all I need is the words
Got the urge, suddenly it's a surge
Suddenly a new burst of energy has occurred
Time to show these Free World leaders the 3 and a third
I am no longer scared now, I'm free as a bird
Then I turn and cross over the median curb
Hit the 'burbs and all you see is a blur from 8 Mile Road

I'm a man, gotta make a new plan
Time for me to just stand up and travel new land
Time to really just take matters into my own hands
Once I'm over these tracks, man, I'ma never look back
Sorry, Momma, I'm grown, I must travel alone
Ain't gon' follow no footsteps, I'm makin' my own
Only way that I know how to escape from this 8 Mile Road




Ayo, this song is dedicated
To all the happy people
All the happy people
Who have real nice lives
And have no idea
What it's like to be broke as fuck

I feel like I'm walkin' a tight rope without a circus net
Poppin' Percocet, I'm a nervous wreck
I deserve respect but I work a sweat for this worthless check
I'm about to burst this TEC at somebody to reverse this debt
Minimum wage got my adrenaline caged
Full of venom and rage, especially when I'm engaged
And my daughter's down to her last diaper, it's got my ass hyper
I pray that God answers — maybe I'll ask nicer
Watchin' ballers while they're flossin' in their Pathfinders
These overnight stars becomin' autograph-signers
We all long to blow up and leave the past behind us
Along with the small fries and average half-pinters
But player-haters turnin' bitch like they have vaginas
‘Cause we see them dollar signs and let the cash blind us
Money'll brainwash you and leave yo' ass mindless
Them snakes slither in the grass spineless

That's rock bottom
When this life makes you mad enough to kill
That's rock bottom
When you want somethin' bad enough to steal
That's rock bottom
When you feel like you've had it up to here
‘Cause you're mad enough to scream
But you're sad enough to tear

My life is full of empty promises and broken dreams
I'm hopin' things look up, but there ain't no job openings
I feel discouraged, hungry and malnourished
Livin' in this house with no furnace, unfurnished
And I'm sick of workin' dead-end jobs with lame pay
And I'm tired of bein' hired and fired the same day
But fuck it — if you know the rules to the game, play!
‘Cause when we die, we know we all goin' the same way
‘Cause it's cool to be the player, but it sucks to be the fan
When all you need is bucks to be the man, plus a luxury sedan
Or comfortable and roomy in a 6
But they threw me in the mix with all these gloomy lunatics
Who walk around depressed, and smoke a pound of cess a day
And yesterday went by so quick it seems like it was just today
My daughter wants to throw the ball, but I'm too stressed to play
Live half my life and throw the rest away

That's rock bottom
When this life makes you mad enough to kill
That's rock bottom
When you want somethin' bad enough to steal
That's rock bottom
When you feel like you've had it up to here
‘Cause you're mad enough to scream
But you're sad enough to tear

There's people that love me and people that hate me
But it's the evil that made me
This backstabbin', deceitful and shady
I want the money, the women, the fortune and fame
If it means I end up burnin' in Hell, scorchin' in flames
If it means I'm stealin' your checkbook and forgin' your name
This lifetime bliss for eternal torture and pain
‘Cause right now, I feel like I've just hit the rock bottom
I've got problems — now everybody on my block's got 'em
I'm screamin' like them two cops when 2Pac shot 'em
Holdin' two Glocks, hope your doors got new locks on 'em
My daughter's feet ain't got no shoes or socks on 'em
And them rings you wearin' look like they got a few rocks on 'em
And while you flaunt 'em
I could be takin' 'em to shops to pawn 'em
I got a couple of rings and a brand-new watch — you want 'em?
‘Cause I ain't never went gold off one song
I'm runnin' up on someone's lawn, with guns drawn

That's rock bottom
When this life makes you mad enough to kill
That's rock bottom
When you want somethin' bad enough to steal
That's rock bottom
When you feel like you've had it up to here
‘Cause you're mad enough to scream
But you're sad enough to tear



"Hello, boys and girls! Today we're gonna talk about father and daughter relationships. Do you have a daddy? I'll bet you do..! Who's your daddy?"
"Daddy, what are you doing?"

Okay then! Everybody, listen up!
I'm going to Hell! Who's coming with me?
Somebody, please help him!
I think my dad's gone crazy!

There's no mountain I can't climb
There's no tower too high
No plane that I can't learn how to fly
What do I gotta do to get through to you
To show you there ain't nothin' I can't take this chainsaw to?
Fuckin' brains, brawn and brass balls
I cut 'em off and got 'em pickled and bronzed in a glass jar
Inside of a hall, with my framed autographed sunglasses
With Elton John's name on my drag wall
I'm out the closet, I've been lyin' my ass off
All this time, me and Dre been fuckin' with hats off
So tell Laura and her husband to back off
'Fore I push this motherfuckin' button and blast off
And launch one at these Russians, and that's all
Blow every fuckin' thing except Afghanistan on the map off
When will it stop? When will I knock the crap off?

There's really nothin' else to say, I can't explain it
I think my dad's gone crazy!
A little help from Hailie Jade, won't you tell 'em, baby?
I think my dad's gone crazy!
There's nothin' you could do or say that could ever change me
I think my dad's gone crazy!
There's no one on Earth that can save me, not even Hailie
I think my dad's gone crazy!

It's like my mother always told me
Rana rana rana rana rana rana rana rana rana and codeine
And goddamn it, you little motherfucker
If you ain't got nothin' nice to say, then don't say nothin'!
… Uh… Fuck that shit, bitch!
Eat a motherfuckin' dick, chew on a prick
And lick a million motherfuckin' cocks per second
I'd rather put out a motherfuckin' gospel record
I'd rather be a pussy-whipped bitch
Eat pussy and have pussy lips glued to my face, with a clit
Ring in my nose than quit bringin' my flows
Quit givin' me my ammo; can't you see why I'm so mean?
If y'all leave me alone this wouldn't be my M.O.
I wouldn't have to go eenee-meene-minie-moe
Catch a homo by his toe, man, I don't know no more

There's really nothin' else to say
I can't explain it
I think my dad's gone crazy!
A little help from Hailie Jade
Won't you tell 'em, baby?
I think my dad's gone crazy!
There's nothin' you could do or say
That could ever change me
I think my dad's gone crazy!
There's no one on Earth that can save me
Not even Hailie
I think my dad's gone crazy!

My songs can make you cry, take you by surprise
At the same time, can make you dry your eyes
With the same rhyme
See, what you're seein' is a genius at work
Which to me isn't work
So it's easy to misinterpret it at first
‘Cause when I speak, it's tongue-in-cheek
I'd yank my fuckin' teeth
Before I'd ever bite my tongue, I'd slice my gums
Get struck by fuckin' lightning twice at once
And die and come back as Vanilla Ice's son
And walk around the rest of my life spit on
And kicked and hit with shit every time I sung
Like R. Kelly as soon as "Bump and Grind" comes on
More pain inside of my brain
Than the eyes of a little girl inside of a plane
Aimed at the World Trade
Standin' on Ronnie's grave, screamin' at the sky
'Til clouds gather; it's Clyde Mathers and Bonnie Jade
And that's pretty much the gist of it
The parents are pissed, but the kids love it
9 millimeter heaters stashed
In two-seaters with meat cleavers
I don't blame you, I wouldn't let Hailie listen to me neither

There's really nothin' else to say
I can't explain it
I think my dad's gone crazy!
A little help from Hailie Jade
Won't you tell 'em, baby?
I think my dad's gone crazy!
There's nothin' you could do or say
That could ever change me
I think my dad's gone crazy!
There's no one on Earth that can save me
Not even Hailie
I think my dad's gone crazy!
Crazy!

Ha ha ha ha!
You're funny, Daddy!



You can sound the alarm
You can call out your guards
You can fence in your yard
You can hold all the cards
But I won't back down
Oh no, I won't back down, oh no

Cadillac Sevilles, coupe DeVilles
Brain-dead rims, yeah, stupid wheels
Girl, I'm too for real, lose your tooth-and-nail
Tryna fight it, try to deny it, stupid you will feel
What I do, I do at will
Shootin' from the hip, yeah boy, I shoot to kill
Half a breath left on my death-bed
Screaming, “F that!” – yeah, super-ill
Baby, what the deal? We can chill
Split a half a pill and a Happy Meal
Fuck a steak slut, I'll cut my toes off
And step on the receipt 'fore I foot the bill
Listen, garden tool, don't make me introduce you
To my power tool, you know the fuckin' drill
How you douchebags feel knowin' you're disposable?
Summer's Eve, Massengill
Shady's got the mass appeal
Baby, crank the shit, 'cause it's your goddamn jam
You said that you want your punchlines a little more compact—well, shorty, I'm that man
These other cats ain't metaphorically where I'm at, man
I gave Bruce Wayne a Valium
I'm ready for combat, man!”
Get it? Calm Batman, nah
Ain't nobody who's as bomb and as nuts
Lines are like Mom's CAT-scans
'Cause they fuckin' go bananas
Honey, I applaud that ass
Swear to God, man, these broads can't dance
Ma, show them how it's done
Spaz like a goddamn Taz, yeah

You can sound the alarm
You can call out your guards
You can fence in your yard
You can hold all the cards
But I won't back down
Oh no, I won't back down, oh no

Girl, shake that ass like a donkey with Parkinson's
Make like Michael J. Fox is in your drawers
Playin' with an etch-a-sketch
Bet you that you'll never guess
Who's knockin' at your door, people hit the floors
Yeah, tonight, ladies, you gonna get divorced
Girl, forget remorse, I'ma hit you broads
With Chris's force like you pissed him off
Talented with the tongue, mothafucka
You ain't got a lick in yours
Hittin' licks like I'm robbin' liquor stores
Makin' cash registers shit their drawers
Think you spit the rawest?
I'm an uncooked slab of beef layin' on your kitchen floor
In other words, I'm off the meat rack
Bring the beat back, bring in two extension cords
I'ma measure my dick—shit, I need six inches more
Fuck, my dick's big, bitch, need I remind you
That I don't need the fuckin' swine flu to be a sick pig?
You're addicted, I'm dope
I'm the longest needle around here—need a fix, ock?
I'm the big shot—get it, dick-snots?
You're just small pokes, little pricks
Girl, you think that other prick's hot?
I'll drink gasoline and eat a lit match
Before I sit back and let him get hotter
Better call the cops on him quick, fast
Shady's right back on your bitch-ass
White trash with a half a six-pack in his hatchback
Trailer hitch attached to the back, dispatch

You can sound the alarm
You can call out your guards
You can fence in your yard
You can hold all the cards
But I won't back down
Oh no, I won't back down, oh no

Bitch, am I the reason that your boyfriend stopped rappin'?
Does a bird chirp? Does Lil' Wayne slurp 'zurp
'Til he burps and smoke purp?
Does a word search get circles wrapped around it
Like you do when I come through?
I'd like you to remind yourself of what the fuck I can do
When I'm on the mic
Oh, you're the kind of girl that I could take a likin' to
Psych! I'm spikin' you like a football
Been this way since I stood a foot tall
You're a good catch with a shitty spouse
Got a pretty mouth and a good jaw
Give me good brain, watch the wood-grain
Don't want no cum stain—bitch, you listenin'?
Tryin' to turn me down, slut, I'm talkin' to you
Turn me back up! Are you insane?!
Tryin' to talk over me in the car
Shut the fuck up while my shit's playin'!
I'm a shit stain on the underwear of life
What's the saying? Where there's thunder, there is light-
-ning and they say that it never strikes twice in the same place, so how the fuck have I been hit six times
In three different locations on four separate occasions?
And you can bet your stankin' ass
That I've come to smash everything in my path
Fork was in the road, took the psycho path
Poison Ivy wouldn't have me thinkin' rash
So hit the dance-floor, cutie, while I do my duty
On this microphone; shake your booty, shorty!
I'm the shit—why you think Proof used to call me "Doody"?

You can sound the alarm
You can call out your guards
You can fence in your yard
You can hold all the cards
But I won't back down
Oh no, I won't back down, oh no




I was born with a dick in my brain, yeah, fucked in the head
My stepfather said that I sucked in the bed
'Til one night he snuck in and said
"We're going out back, I want my dick sucked in the shed"
Can't we just play with Teddy Ruxpin instead?
"After I fuck you in the butt, get some head
Bust a nut, get some rest," the next day my mother said
"I don't know what the fuck's up with this kid
The bastard won't even eat nothing, he's fed
He just hung himself in the bedroom, he's dead"
"Debbie, don't let that fucker get you upset
Go in there, stick a fuckin' cigarette to his neck
I'll bet you he's fakin' it, I'll bet you, I bet
He probably just wants to see how upset you would get
I'll go handle this, of course unless you object"
"Aw, go fuck his brains out if any's left in his head"

If you could count the skeletons in my closet
Under my bed and up under my faucet
Then you would know I've completely lost it
Is he nuts? No, he's insane
If you could count the skeletons in my closet
Under my bed and up under my faucet
Then you would know I've completely lost it
Is he nuts? No, he's insane

"Did you get him?" Naw, fucker tried to bite my face off
I just got fuckin' chased off with a chainsaw
Then he took the chainsaw, bit the fuckin' blades off
Ate the blades, stuck a baseball in a slingshot
Then he aimed at his own face, let the thing pop
Took his eye out, picked it up and played ping pong
Then he played ping pong with his own ding-dong
That motherfucker's got nuts like King Kong
Then he set the lawnmower out on the dang lawn
And he laid all up underneath it with the thing on
Then he took his pants, he took every fuckin' thing off
Everything except his tank top and his training bra
Ain't he raw? Yeah, maniac, that's Shady, dawg
Man, that motherfucker's gangsta, ain't he, dawg?
Shady, dawg, what be goin' through that fuckin' brain of yours?
Say no more, what the fuck you waitin' for? Sing along

If you could count the skeletons in my closet
Under my bed and up under my faucet
Then you would know I've completely lost it
Is he nuts? No, he's insane
If you could count the skeletons in my closet
Under my bed and up under my faucet
Then you would know I've completely lost it
Is he nuts? No, he's insane

Don't you know what felch means? "Yeah" Well then, tell me
Would you rather get felched or do the felching?
Fuck 'em in the ass, suck the cum out while you're belching
Burp, belch, and go back for a second helping
Can you dig what I'm saying, man? Can you smell me?
Fuck a little puppy, kick the puppy while he's yelping
"Shady, what the fuck you saying?" I don't know, help me!
What the fuck's happening? I think I'm fuckin' melting
"Marshall, I just love you, boy, I care about your well-being"
No, Dad, I said no—I don't need no help peeing
I'm a big boy, I can do it by myself, see?
I only get naked when the babysitter tells me
She showed me a movie like Nightmare on Elm Street
But it was X and they called it "Pubic Hair on Chelsea"
"Well, this is called 'Ass Rape' and we're shooting the jail scene"

If you could count the skeletons in my closet
Under my bed and up under my faucet
Then you would know I've completely lost it
Is he nuts? No, he's insane
If you could count the skeletons in my closet
Under my bed and up under my faucet
Then you would know I've completely lost it
Is he nuts? No, he's insane



I'm a soldier
I'm a soldier
I'm a soldier
Yo...

Never was a thug, just infatuated with guns
Never was a gangsta 'til I graduated to one
And got the rep of a villain for weapon concealin'
Took the image of a thug, kept shit appealin'
Willin' to stick out my neck for respect
If it meant life or death, never live to regret what I said
When you're me, people just want to see if it's true
If it's you—what you say in your rap's what you do
So they feel it's part of your obligation to fulfill
When they see you on the streets, face to face, are you for real?
In confrontation, ain't no conversation, if you feel
You're in violation, any hesitation'll get you killed
If you feel it, kill it; if you conceal it, reveal it
Bein' reasonable will leave you full of bullets
Pull it, squeeze it 'til it's empty
Tempt me, push me, pussies
I need a good reason to give this trigger a good squeeze

They won't budge, I'll never fall or fold up
I will never slip or stumble
They won't budge, I'll never fall or fold up
I will never stumble

I love pissin' you off, gets me off
Like my lawyers when the fuckin' judge lets me off
All you motherfuckers gotta do is set me off
I'll violate and all the motherfuckin' bets be off
I'm a lit fuse, anything I do, bitch, it's news
Pistol whippin' motherfuckin' bouncer 6'2"
Who needs bullets? As soon as I pull it, you sweat bullets
An excellent method to get rid of the next bully
It's actually better 'cause instead of you murderin'
You can hurt 'em and come back again and kick dirt at 'em
It's like pourin' salt in the wounds, assault and get sued
You can smell the lawsuits soon as I waltz in the room
Everybody halts and stops, calls the cops
All you see is bitches comin' out their halter tops
Runnin' and duckin' out the Hot Rocks parking lot
You'll all get shot, whether its your fault or not, 'cause I'm a

They won't budge, I'll never fall or fold up
I will never slip or stumble
They won't budge, I'll never fall or fold up
I will never stumble

I spit it slow so these kids know that I'm talkin' to 'em
Give it back to these damn critics and sock it to 'em
I'm like a thug with a little bit of Pac influence
I spew it, and look how I got you bitches rockin' to it
You motherfuckers could never do it like I could do it
Don't even try it, you'll look stupid, do not pursue it
Don't ever in your life try to knock the truest
I spit the illest shit ever been dropped in two-inch
So ticky-tock, listen as the sound ticks on the clock
Listen to the sound of Kim as she licks on the cock
Listen to the sound of me spillin' my heart through this pen
Motherfuckers know that I'll never be Marshall again
Full of controversy until I retire my jersey
'Til the fire inside dies and expires at thirty
And Lord, have mercy on any more of these rappers that verse me
And put a curse on authorities, in the face of adversity, I'm a

They won't budge, I'll never fall or fold up
I will never slip or stumble
They won't budge, I'll never fall or fold up
I will never stumble

Yo left, yo left, yo left, right, left
Yo left, yo left, yo left, right, left
Yo left, yo left, yo left, right, left
Yo left, yo left, yo left, right, left



Ayo, before I start this song, man
I just wanna thank everybody for being so patient
And bearing with me over these last couple of years
While I figure this shit out

Is anybody out there?
It feels like I'm talkin' to myself
No one seems to know my struggle
And everything I've come from
Can anybody hear me?
Yeah, I guess I keep talkin' to myself
It feels like I'm goin' insane
Am I the one who's crazy?
So why in the world do I feel so alone?
Nobody but me, I'm on my own
Is there anyone out there who feels the way I feel?
If there is, let me hear
Just so I know that I'm not the only one

I went away, I guess, and opened up some lanes
But there was no one who even knew
I was goin' through growin' pains
Hatred was flowin' through my veins
On the verge of goin' insane
I almost made a song dissin' Lil Wayne
It's like I was jealous of him 'cause of the attention he was gettin'
I felt horrible about myself, he was spittin'
And I wasn't, anyone who was buzzin' back then coulda got it
Almost went at Kanye too, God, it
Feels like I'm goin' psychotic, thank God that I didn't do it
I'da had my ass handed to me, and I knew it
But Proof isn't here to see me through it
I'm in the booth, poppin' another pill, tryna talk myself into it
Are you stupid? You're gon' start dissin' people for no reason?
'Specially when you can't even write a decent punchline even? You're lyin' to yourself
You're slowly dyin', you're denyin' your health
Is declinin' with your self-esteem, you're cryin' out for help

Is anybody out there?
It feels like I'm talkin' to myself
No one seems to know my struggle
And everything I've come from
Can anybody hear me?
Yeah, I guess I keep talkin' to myself
It feels like I'm goin' insane
Am I the one who's crazy?
So why in the world do I feel so alone?
Nobody but me, I'm on my own
Is there anyone out there who feels the way I feel?
If there is, let me hear
Just so I know that I'm not the only one

Marshall, you're no longer the man, that's a bitter pill to swallow
All I know is I'm wallowing, self-loathing and hollow
Bottoms up on the pill bottle
Maybe I'll hit my bottom tomorrow
My sorrow echoes in this hall though
But I must be talkin' to the wall though
But all these other rappers suck is all that I know
I've turned into a hater, I put up a false bravado
But Marshall is not an egomaniac, that's not his motto
He's not a desperado
He's desperate, his thoughts are bottled
Inside him, one foot on the brake, one on the throttle
Falling asleep with writer's block in the parking lot of McDonald's
But instead of feeling sorry for yourself
Do something 'bout it, admit you got a problem
Your brain is clouded, you pouted
Quit worrying 'bout what they do, and do Shady
I'm fuckin' going crazy

Is anybody out there?
It feels like I'm talkin' to myself
No one seems to know my struggle
And everything I've come from
Can anybody hear me?
Yeah, I guess I keep talkin' to myself
It feels like I'm goin' insane
Am I the one who's crazy?
So why in the world do I feel so alone?
Nobody but me, I'm on my own
Is there anyone out there who feels the way I feel?
If there is, let me hear
Just so I know that I'm not the only one

So I picked myself off the ground
And fuckin' swam 'fore I drowned
Hit my bottom so hard I bounced twice
Suffice, this time around
It's different, them last two albums didn't count
Encore I was on drugs, Relapse I was flushin' them out
I've come to make it up to you now, no more fuckin' around
I got somethin' to prove to fans, 'cause I feel like I let 'em down
So please accept my apology, I finally feel like I'm back to normal
I feel like me again, let me formally
Reintroduce myself to you for those of you who don't know
The new me's back to the old me
And homie, I don't show no signs of slowin' up
Oh, and I'm blowin' up all over
My life is no longer a movie, but the show ain't over, homos
I'm back with a vengeance, homie
Weezy, keep ya head up, T.I., keep ya head up
Kanye, keep ya head up, don't let up
Just keep slayin' them, rest in peace to DJ AM
'Cause I know what it's like
I struggle with this shit every single day, and um

Is anybody out there?
It feels like I'm talkin' to myself
No one seems to know my struggle
And everything I've come from
Can anybody hear me?
Yeah, I guess I keep talkin' to myself
It feels like I'm goin' insane
Am I the one who's crazy?
So why in the world do I feel so alone?
Nobody but me, I'm on my own
Is there anyone out there who feels the way I feel?
If there is, let me hear
Just so I know that I'm not the only one

So there it is, damn
Feels like I just woke up or something
I guess I just forgot who the fuck I was, man
Ayo, and to anybody I thought about going at
It was never nothing personal
It was just some shit I was going through
And to everybody else, I'm BACK! Ha ha



Girl, you give me writer's block, I'm at a loss for words
Uhh, my mind's as lost as yours
I rack my brain but still no thoughts emerge
Never seen no ass as large as yours
How much that cost? That's what I call the cost to splurge
You drive me bonkers, I’m about to get my swerve on for sure
Thought I was pimpin' 'til I felt like Nas, the first
Date 'cause I think I gave you power
When I gave you flowers in a vase
A box of chocolates, throat lozengers, cough drops and Certs
Probably shoulda never let me call that job of yours
To talk to your boss and ask him if you can take off from work
Shoulda been one of the first signs to cause alert
Man, we jumped in too fast
'Cause since then I just can't be apart from her
'Cause nobody's body's awesomer
I lust it and she loves me 'cause I'm popular
But you know this ain't love

You know this ain't love, oh no
You know this ain't love, oh no
Wants me to be that guy to her)
'Cause I give in at the sight of her)

You were obviously oblivious to me
I swore I was just invisible to you
'Til I went to the lengths I did to meet you
'Cause you played so hard to get with me from
The beginning, now I'm in disbelief, I
Never knew that this could be such misery, ah
'Cause now you see nothing but me
And I don't see nothing but you
And I'm about to flip 'cause we are – super glued in
We stuck to each other's hips and we can't
Do anything individually, which is to cling on
Scared to be alone, can't specifically describe it
I just can't seem to give a reason
This definitive, just need ya
Talkin' about I live and breathe ya
And you pretend to be as mentally and physically
Addicted to me as Wiz Khalifa is to reefer
Don't wanna be without you
Don't wanna be with you neither
Bitch, put me in a situation in which it's both I wish to seek
'Cause this ain't love

You know this ain't love, oh no
You know this ain't love, oh no
Wants me to be that guy to her)
'Cause I give in at the sight of her)

Just want you to myself
Don't wanna share you with no one else
"What the fuck you whisperin' for?
You get on my nerves, you make me sick
I think our relationship, it seems to be on the fritz
I mean it's time that we just split and leave the
Games behind, your frame of mind ain't the same as mine
I think you need to finish developing a
Little more mentally to get the picture."
That's a negative, Alicia, I will never give the keys up
To the crib ever again, no reason
Not even a gift certificate from Tiffany's
You better have an epiphany, slut
Guess what? The lease up
I'm just mad the time it took to discover
You were usin' me for loot like I used you for looks
Oh, thought you was too good for me, huh?
Yeah, toots, used to be my Carrie Underwood
I was your lumberjack
But I can't stomach this, I'm leavin' you, I'm not comin' back
She said, "The fuck with that!
Where's my Louisville Slugger at?"
She grabbed that fuckin' bat
And swung it at my head, I barely ducked and that's
Right when she came up with a kick to the nuts twice
Steel toe, girl probably coulda put a 100-yard field goal
Through the uprights

You know this ain't love, oh no
You know this ain't love, oh no
Wants me to be that guy to her)
'Cause I give in at the sight of her)



Yeah
Definitely, definitely
Definitely dope
Definitely
Definitely K-Mart
Yeah
Yeah

You find me offensive
I find you offensive for findin' me offensive
Hence if I should draw out or line any fences
If so, to what extents if any should I go
'Cause it's getting expensive
Bein' on the other side of the courtroom on the defensive
They say I cause extensive psychological nerve damage to the brain
When I go to lengths, this
Far at other people's expenses
I say you're all just too God damned sensitive
It's censorship and it's downright blasphemous
Let's end this shit now cause I won't stand for this
And Christo-pher Reeves won't sit for this neither
And let's clear this up too I ain't got no beef with him either
He used to be like a hero to me I even believe I
Had one of those twenty-five cent stickers on my refrigerator
Right next to Darth Vader
And Darth musta put a hex on him for later
I feel like it's my fault cause of the way that
I stuck him up in between him and Lex Luthor
I killed Superman I killed Super-man, and how ironic
That I'd be the bad guy, kryptonite, the green chronic

Cause I ain't got no legs
Or no brain
Nice to meet you
Hi my name is
I forgot my name
My aim was not to become what I became with this level of fame
Rain Man

Now in the bible it says
Thou shalt not watch two lesbians in bed, have homosexual sex
Unless of course you were given the consent to join in
Then of course it's intercourse and it's bisexual sex
Which isn't as bad, as long as you show some remorse for your actions
Either before during or after
Performing the act of that which
Is normally referred to as such more commonly known phrases
That are more used by today's kids, in a more derogatory way
But who's to say, what's fair to say
And what not to say
Let's ask Dr. Dre
But, up I ain't done yet
In football the quarterback yells out hut-hut
While he reaches in another grown man's ass
Grabs on his nuts but just what if
It was never meant, it was just an accident
But he tripped fell slipped and his penis went in
His teeny tiny little round hiney and he didn't mean it
But his little weenie flinched just a little bit
And I don't need to go into any more details but
What if he pictured it as a female's butt
Is that gay
I just need to clear things up
'Til then I'll just walk around with a manly strut, because

Cause I ain't got no legs
Or no brain
Nice to meet you
Hi my name is
I forgot my name
My aim was not to become what I became with this level of fame
Rain Man

You find me offensive, I find you offensive
Shit this is the same verse, I just did this
When am I gonna come to my good senses
Probably the day Bush comes to my defenses
My spider sense is tellin me Spider-Man is nearby
And my plan is to get him next
And open up a whoop ass canister
Anyway, anyway I don't know how else to put it
This is the only thing that I'm good at
I am the bad guy, kryptonite, the green chronic
Demonic, yup yup, don't worry I'm on it
I got it, high five Nick Lachey
Stuck a pin in Jessica's head and walked away
And as she flew around the room like a balloon
I grabbed the last can of chicken tuna out the trash can
And zoom, I headed straight back to the Neverland Ranch
With a peanut butter jelly chicken tuna sandwich
And I don't even gotta make no God damned sense
I just did a whole song and I didn't say shit

Cause I ain't got no legs
Or no brain
Nice to meet you
Hi my name is
I forgot my name
My aim was not to become what I became with this level of fame
Rain Man

Cause ah ha ha ha ha
Yup, Rain Man
Definitely, definitely Dr. Dre
Super dope, beatmaker
Two thousand, two thousand four-hundred and eighty-seven million
Nine hundred and se-seventy-three thousand four hundred and sixty-three



Oh! Ladies and gentlemen
The moment you've all been waiting for
In this corner, weighing 175 pounds
With a record of 17 rapes, 400 assaults, and 4 murders
The undisputed, most diabolical villain in the world
Slim Shady!

So crack a bottle, let your body waddle
Don't act like a snobby model, you just hit the lotto
Uh oh, uh oh, bitches hoppin' in my Tahoe
Got one ridin' shotgun and no, not one of them got clothes
Now, where's the rubbers? Who's got the rubbers?
I noticed there's so many of them and there's really not that many of us
And ladies love us, my posse's kickin' up dust
It's on till the break of dawn and we're starting this party from dusk

Back with Andre the Giant, Mr. Elephant Tusk
Fix your musk, you'll be just another one bit the dust
Just one of my mother's sons who got thrown under the bus
Kiss my butt, lick fromunda cheese from under my nuts
It disgusts me to see the game the way that it looks
It's a must, I redeem my name and haters get mushed
Bitches lust, man, they love me when I lay in the cut
Fisticuffs, the lady give her eighty-some paper cuts
Now picture us; it's ridiculous, you curse at the thought
'Cause when I spit the verse, the shit gets worse than Worcestershire sauce
If I could fit the words as picture perfect, works every time
Every verse, every line, as simple as nursery rhymes
It's elementary, the elephants have entered the room
I venture to say we're the center of attention, it's true
Not to mention back with a vengeance, so here's the signal
Of the bat symbol, the platinum trio's back on you hoes

So crack a bottle, let your body waddle
Don't act like a snobby model, you just hit the lotto
Uh oh, uh oh, bitches hoppin' in my Tahoe
Got one ridin' shotgun and no, not one of them got clothes
Now, where's the rubbers? Who's got the rubbers?
I noticed there's so many of them and there's really not that many of us
And ladies love us, my posse's kickin' up dust
It's on till the break of dawn and we're starting this party from dusk

They see that low rider go by, they're like, "Oh, my!"
You ain't got to tell me why you're sick, 'cause I know why
I dip through in that six tre, like, "Sick 'em, Dre!"
I'm an itch that they can't scratch, they're sick of me
But hey, what else can I say? I love L.A
‘Cause over and above all, it's just another day
And this one begins where the last one ends
Pick up where we left off and get smashed again
I'll be damned, just fucked around and crashed my Benz
Drivin' 'round with a smashed front end, let's cash that one in
Grab another one from out the stable
The Monte Carlo, El Camino, or the El Dorado?
The hell if I know, do I want leather seats or vinyl?
Decisions, decisions; garage looks like Precision Collision
Or Maaco, beats quake like Waco
Just keep the bass low, speakers away from your face though

So crack a bottle, let your body waddle
Don't act like a snobby model, you just hit the lotto
Uh oh, uh oh, bitches hoppin' in my Tahoe
Got one ridin' shotgun and no, not one of them got clothes
Now, where's the rubbers? Who's got the rubbers?
I noticed there's so many of them and there's really not that many of us
And ladies love us, my posse's kickin' up dust
It's on till the break of dawn and we're starting this party from dusk
And I take great pleasure in introducing 50 Cent!

It's bottle after bottle
The money ain't a thing when you party with me
It's what we into, it's simple
We ball out of control like you wouldn't believe
I'm the napalm, the bomb, the don, I'm King Kong
Get rolled on, wrapped up and reigned on
I'm so calm, through Vietnam, ring the alarm
Bring the Chandon, burn marijuana, do what you want
Nigga, on and on, 'til the break of what?
Get the paper, man, I'm cakin', you know I don't give a fuck
I spend it like it don't mean nothin'
Blow it like it's supposed to be blown, motherfucker, I'm grown
I stunt, I style, I flash the shit
I gets what the fuck I want, so what I trick?
Fat-ass Birkin bags, some classy shit
Jimmy Choo shoes; I say "Move," a bitch move

So crack a bottle, let your body waddle
Don't act like a snobby model, you just hit the lotto
Uh oh, uh oh, bitches hoppin' in my Tahoe
Got one ridin' shotgun and no, not one of them got clothes
Now, where's the rubbers? Who's got the rubbers?
I noticed there's so many of them and there's really not that many of us
And ladies love us, my posse's kickin' up dust
It's on till the break of dawn and we're starting this party from dusk



Seduction when I tell them girls on the floor)
I don't know, man
Just feels like we're a lot different
It kinda feels like
I'm on a whole different page right now than you
It feels strange, but umm
I guess it's kinda like, it's kinda like…

I feel like I'm morphin' into somethin' that's so incredible
That I'm dwarfin' all competitors
Better get your girlfriend in check
It's psychological warfare, endorphins I effect
Your self-esteem shatters as dialect comes blastin' out your deck
She loves me, such passion, you'd expect
This sort of reaction from her, yet you strong-arm
You're fuckin' corny, you try to turn your charm on
'Cause you just think you're Bishop the Don Juan
But if you think that you're fuckin' with me, homie, you're on one
I'm cockin' my head back like Ed Lover, "C'mon, son!"
She's on my Johnson, she brings my name up constant
Your boys are like, "She's fuckin' with dude, she wants him."
Homeboy, you better get a clue
She's on my dick 'cause I spit better than you
What you expect her to do?
How you expect her to act in the sack
When she's closin' her eyes
Fantasizin' of diggin' her nails in my back to this track?

Seduction, seduce
Ain't nobody who's as good at what I do
'Cause one minute she loves you, the next she don't
She's been stolen from you
Seduction, seduce
Ain't nobody who's as good at what I do
'Cause one minute she loves you, the next she don't
She's been stolen from you

She's sittin' there gettin' liquored up at the bar
She says it's quicker to count the things that ain't wrong with you than to count the things that are
There's a seven-disc CD changer in her car
And I'm in every single slot, and you're not — aww!
And I'm not about to sit back
And just keep rhymin' one syllable — naw!
Switch it up and watch them haters not give it up
'Cause they're just not good enough, but I'm not givin' up
'Til I get my respect and I won't stop 'til I get enough
That hater alarm is soundin' off
You sadly mistaken if you thinkin' that I'm not on my game, boy
And things just ain't been the same since the day that I came forth
You wear your heart on your sleeve, I sport that white tank, boy
But you got a hard on for me, what you hollerin' my name for?
It's your bitch on my dick, ain't my dang fault, man, I can't call it

Seduction, seduce
Ain't nobody who's as good at what I do
'Cause one minute she loves you, the next she don't
She's been stolen from you
Seduction, seduce
Ain't nobody who's as good at what I do
'Cause one minute she loves you, the next she don't
She's been stolen from you

It's like we're playin' lyrical tug of war with your ear
You hear it, girl? Come here
Put your ear up to the speaker, dear
While I freak this world premiere
Seducin' her, loosen up
With a little freestyle that'll— wait, am I losin' ya?
Am I makin' you look bad? Well, I got news for ya
Homie, you losin' her
Oh wait, she don't like when I spit it fast
Am I tryin' to show how? Let me slow it down some
It's still gonna be a blow-out
You're gonna wanna throw out your whole album
Rummage through the shit and try to salvage somethin' to see
If you can save any of it, punk, but none of it's fuckin' with me
Prick, you really feelin' that bullshit?
You think you killin' them syllables? Quit
Playin', these beats ain't nothin' to fool with
Your entire arsenal is not enough to fuck with one round
I am also the opposite of what you are like
You're a microcosm of what the fuck I am on the mic
I am awesome and you are just awe-struck
She's love-stricken, she's got her jaw stuck
From suckin' my dick… aw, fuck

Seduction, seduce
Ain't nobody who's as good at what I do
'Cause one minute she loves you, the next she don't
She's been stolen from you
Seduction, seduce
Ain't nobody who's as good at what I do
'Cause one minute she loves you, the next she don't
She's been stolen from you



I can almost taste it
This shit makes no sense to me
What does it all mean?
I can almost taste it
I can almost see it
This shit makes no sense to me
What does it all mean?
I can almost taste it
I can almost taste it

Can't stop now
This might be the last chance I get
To be famous

You dream of trading places
I have been changing faces
You cannot fill these shoes
There is too much to lose
Wake up behind these trenches
You run around defenseless
There is too much to lose
You cannot fill these shoes
I just wanna be famous, but…
Be careful what you wish for

I stuck my dick in this game like a rapist
They call me Slim Roethlisberger
I go berserker than a fed-up post office worker
I murk her with a Mossberg
I'm pissed off, get murdered
Like someone took a ketchup squirter
Squirted a frankfurter
For a gangster you sure did shit your pants
When you saw the chainsaw get to waving
Like a terrible towel
How thangs turn around when his fangs come out
Get your brains blown out
That's what I call blowin' your mind
When I come back, like nut on your spine
I'm a thumb tack that you slept on, son
Now here I come screaming "Attack!"
Like I just stepped on one
Low on the totem 'til he showed 'em
Defiance, giant scrotum
He don't owe them bitches shit
His britches, he out grow'd em
He's so out cold he's knocked out at the South Pole
And nobody fucks with him, rigor mortis and post mortem
He's dyin' of boredom
Take your best rhymes, record 'em, then try to thwart him
He'll just take your punch lines and snort 'em
Shit-stained drawers, you gon' fuck with a guy
Who licks the blades of his chainsaws
While he dips 'em in P.F. Chang's sauce?
Game's up, homie, hang it up like some crank calls
You think I'm backin' down?
You must be out of your dang skulls; I'm almost famous

You dream of trading places
I have been changing faces
You cannot fill these shoes
There is too much to lose
Wake up behind these trenches
You run around defenseless
There is too much to lose
You cannot fill these shoes
I just wanna be famous, but…
Be careful what you wish for

I'm back for revenge
I lost a battle, that ain't happenin' again
I'm at your throat like strep, I step, strapped with a pen
Metaphors wrote on my hand
Some are just stored in my memory
Some I wrote on a napkin; I do what I have to to win
Pullin' out all stops, any who touch a mic prior's
Not even Austin Powers, how the fuck are they Mike Myers?
And tell that psycho to pass the torch
To the wacko before I take a shit in his Jack-O-Lantern
And smash it on his porch
Now get off my dick! 'Dick' is too short of a word for my dick
Get off my antidisestablishmentarianism, you prick!
Don't call me the Champ
Call me the Space Shuttle Destroyer
I just blew up the Challenger; matter fact, I need a lawyer
I just laced my gloves with enough plaster to make a cast
Beat his ass naked and peed in his corner like Verne Troyer
See, he's in a whole nother weight class
You're full of it, you were dissin' his CD's
Laughed at Infinite
Now he's back like someone pissed in his Wheaties
No peace treaties, he's turned into a beast
His new Slim Shady EP's got the attention
Of the mighty D.R.E.—he's almost famous

You dream of trading places
I have been changing faces
You cannot fill these shoes
There is too much to lose
Wake up behind these trenches
You run around defenseless
There is too much to lose
You cannot fill these shoes
I just wanna be famous, but…
Be careful what you wish for

Now there he goes in Dre's studio, cuppin' his balls
Screamin' the wood off the panelin'
Cussin' the paint off the walls
Spewin' his hate to these haters
Showin' no love for these broads
He ain't given them shit
He says he'll pinch a penny so hard he'll leave a bruise on the bronze so dark you can see the mark
These metaphors and similes ain't similar to them, not at all
If they don't like it, they can all get fucked
Instead of suckin' him off
They can go get a belt or a neck tie
And eat shit while they at it
He's fuckin' had it, he's mad at the whole world
So go to hell and build a snowman, girl
The bullies become bullied, and pussies get pushed
Then they better pull me
Take me back to 9th grade to school me
'Cause I ain't lookin' back, only forward
This whole spot blowin'
Who coulda known he'd grow to be a poet and not know it?
And while I'm bein' poetic
Let me get it stoic and raise the bar
Higher than my opinion of these women's been lowered
So bear witness to some biblical shit
There's a cold wind blowin'
This world ain't gonna know what hit it
He did it, he made it, he's finally famous



"Life," by Marshall Mathers
What is life? Life is like a big obstacle
Put in front of your optical to slow you down
And every time you think you've gotten past it
It's gonna come back around
And tackle you to the damn ground
What are friends?
Friends are people that you think are your friends
But they're really your enemies, with secret identities
And disguises to hide their true colors
So just when you think you're close enough to be brothers
They wanna come back
And cut your throat when you ain't lookin'
What is money?
Money is what makes a man act funny
Money is the root of all evil
Money'll make them same friends come back around
Swearin' that they was always down
What is life? I'm tired of life

I'm tired of backstabbin'-ass snakes with friendly grins
I'm tired of committin' so many sins
Tired of always givin' in when this bottle of Henny wins
Tired of never havin' any ends
Tired of havin' skinny friends, hooked on crack and Mini Thins
I'm tired of this DJ playin' your shit when he spins
Tired of not havin' a deal
Tired of havin' to deal with the bullshit without grabbin' a steel
Tired of drownin' in my sorrow
Tired of havin' to borrow a dollar for gas to start my Monte Carlo
I'm tired of motherfuckers sprayin' shit and dartin' off
I'm tired of jobs startin' off
I'm tired of bein' fired every time I fart and cough
Tired of havin' to work as a gas station clerk
For this jerk, breathin' down my neck, drivin' me berserk
I'm tired of usin' plastic silverware
Tired of workin' at Builder's Square
Tired of not bein' a millionaire

But if I had a million dollars
I'd buy a damn brewery and turn the planet into alcoholics
If I had a magic wand
I'd make the world suck my dick without a condom on
While I'm on the john
If I had a million bucks, it wouldn't be enough
Because I'd still be out robbin' armored trucks
If I had one wish, I would ask
For a big enough ass for the whole world to kiss

I'm tired of bein' white trash, broke and always poor
Tired of takin' pop bottles back to the party store
I'm tired of not havin' a phone
Tired of not havin' a home to have one in if I did have one on
Tired of not drivin' a BM
Tired of not workin' at GM, tired of wantin' to be him
Tired of not sleepin' without a Tylenol PM
Tired of not performin' in a packed coliseum
Tired of not bein' on tour
Tired of fuckin' the same blonde whore
After work, in the back of a Contour
I'm tired of fakin' knots with a stack of ones
Havin' a lack of funds and resortin' back to guns
Tired of bein' stared at
Tired of wearin' the same damn Nike Air hat
Tired of steppin' in clubs, wearin' the same pair of Lugz
Tired of people sayin' they're tired of hearin' me rap about drugs
Tired of other rappers who ain't bringin' half the skill as me
Sayin' they wasn't feelin' me on "Nobody's As Ill As Me"
And I'm tired of radio stations tellin' fibs
Tired of JLB sayin', "where hip-hop lives"

But if I had a million dollars
I'd buy a damn brewery and turn the planet into alcoholics
If I had a magic wand
I'd make the world suck my dick without a condom on
While I'm on the john
If I had a million bucks, it wouldn't be enough
Because I'd still be out robbin' armored trucks
If I had one wish, I would ask
For a big enough ass for the whole world to kiss

You know what I'm sayin'?
I'm tired of all of this bullshit, tellin' me to be positive
How am I 'posed to be positive when I don't see shit positive?
You know what I'm sayin'?
I rap about shit around me, shit I see
You know what I'm sayin'?
And right now, I'm tired of everything
Tired of all this player-hatin' that's goin' on in my own city
Can't get no airplay, you know what I'm sayin'?
But hey, it's cool though, you know what I'm sayin'?
I'm just fed up, that's my word




People, it feels so good to be back!
Ladies and gentleman
Introducing the new and improved you-know-who

Never been the type to bend or budge
The wrong button to push, no friend of Bush
I'm the centerpiece, you're a Maltese
I'm a pitbull off his leash, all this peace talk can cease
All these people I had to leave in limbo
I'm back now, I've come to release this info
I'll be brief, and let me just keep shit simple
Can-I-Bitch don't want no beef with Slim, nooo!
Not even on my radar
So won't you please jump off my dick, lay off and stay off?
And follow me as I put these crayons to chaos
From seance to seance, aw-a-aw-ch-a-aw

C'mon now! Let's all get on down!
Let's do-si-do now! We gon' have a good ol' time
Don't be scared, ‘cause there ain't nothin' to worry about
Let your hair down, and square dance with me!
C'mon now! Let's all get on down!
Let's do-si-do now! We gon' have a good ol' time
Don't be scared, ‘cause there ain't nothin' to worry about
Let your hair down, and square dance with me!

Yeah, let your hair down to the track, yeah, kick on back
Boo! The boogie monster of Rap, yeah, the man's back
With a plan to ambush this Bush administration
Mush the Senate's face and push this generation
Of kids to stand and fight for the right
To say somethin' you might not like
This white hot light that I'm under
No wonder I look so sunburnt
Oh no, I won't leave no stone unturned
Oh no, I won't leave, won't go nowhere
Do-si-do, oh, yo, ho, hello there!
Oh yeah, don't think I won't go there
Go to Beirut and do a show there
Yeah, you laugh 'til your mothafuckin' ass gets drafted
While you're at band camp thinking that crap can't happen
'Til you fuck around, get an Anthrax napkin
Inside a package wrapped in Saran Wrap wrappin'
Open the plastic and then you stand back gaspin'
Fuckin' assassins hi-jackin' Amtraks, crashin'
All this terror, America demands action
Next thing you know you've got Uncle Sam's ass askin'
To join the army or what you'll do for their Navy
You just a baby gettin' recruited at 18
You're on a plane now, eatin' their food and their baked beans
I'm 28, they gonna take you 'fore they take me
Crazy insane or insane crazy?
When I say Hussein, you say Shady
My views ain't changed, still inhumane, wait
Arraigned two days late, the date's today, hang me!

C'mon now! Let's all get on down!
Let's do-si-do now! We gon' have a good ol' time
Don't be scared, ‘cause there ain't nothin' to worry about
Let your hair down, and square dance with me!
C'mon now! Let's all get on down!
Let's do-si-do now! We gon' have a good ol' time
Don't be scared, ‘cause there ain't nothin' to worry about
Let your hair down, and square dance with me!

Nothin' moves me more than a groove that soothes me
Nothin' soothes me more than a groove that boosts me
Nothin' boosts me more or suits me beautifully
There's nothin' you can do to me—stab me, shoot at me!
Psychotic, hypnotic product, I got the antibiotic
Ain't nobody hotter and so on and yada yada
God, I talk a lot of hem-de-lay-la-la-la
Oochie walla walla um da dah da dah da, but you gotta gotta
Keep movin', there's more music to make
Keep makin' new shit, produce hits to break
The monotony, what's gotten into me?
Drugs, rock and Hennessy, thug like I'm 'Pac on my enemies
On your knees, got you under siege
Somebody you would give a lung to be
Hungry like a fuckin' younger me
Fuck the fee, I can get you jumped for free
To have you killed by somebody who has nothin'
I'm past bluffin', pass the K-Y
Let's get ready for some intense serious ass-fuckin'!

C'mon now! Let's all get on down!
Let's do-si-do now! We gon' have a good ol' time
Don't be scared, ‘cause there ain't nothin' to worry about
Let your hair down, and square dance with me!
C'mon now! Let's all get on down!
Let's do-si-do now! We gon' have a good ol' time
Don't be scared, ‘cause there ain't nothin' to worry about
Let your hair down, and square dance with me!

Dr. Dre wants to square dance with me
Nasty Nas wants to square dance with me
X to the Z wants to square dance with me
Busta Rhymes wants to square dance with me
Cani-bitch won't square dance with me
Fan-a-bitch won't square dance with me
Canada-bis don't want no parts of me
Dirty Dozen wants to square dance with you
Yeeehawww!



I roll over and go to reach for you, you're gone
This bed's empty without you
You said you're moving on
But I'm having some trouble getting there
But dwelling ain't getting me, uhh, anywhere
Fuckin' Valentine's Day
Fuck February, stuffed teddy bear, guts everywhere
Machete on the floor, I smashed up every mirror
Yeah, how do I look?
You fuckin' just left me here to die didn't you?
Why didn't you respond yet?
I've written you five or six different times and
I'm gettin' sick and tired of always apologizing to you
I didn't do shit to deserve what you're puttin' me through
This couldn't be true, we can't be over
So violets are blue, roses are red
Why is it everything I do I'm reminded of you?

Saw two white coffins in my dreams last night
I saw my Lord Jesus with his hands pointed toward the light
Saw my old sweetheart she said, "honey, I'm back"
Just so you don't die alone, just so you don't die alone

Guess I gotta deal with the fact that, you ain't never comin' back
Now every woman that I look at I'm lookin' for you
So I'm findin' something the matter with them
Excuse to not see anyone
Useless, rather pick up the phone, not at all, followin' protocol
I get bold like bowling balls
Grow balls and go to call to talk, forget what I want to say
Damnit I'm drawin' blanks like I'm playin' hangman
I'm sick of playin' these games, I can't handle this heartbreak
It's makin' me wanna blow out my brains
Like birthday cake candles
Hang up the phone and I shake, I think I may have made a mistake
Can't escape the madness
Turn the radio on, I hate this sad song
But I can't even change the station
The same one's playin' on eight channels
I lay awake in shambles, I'm startin to hallucinate
I'm havin' all these visions of us at each other's wakes
In caskets and suddenly I wake and that's when I know I

Saw two white coffins in my dreams last night
I saw my Lord Jesus with his hands pointed toward the light
Saw my old sweetheart she said, "honey, I'm back"
Just so you don't die alone, just so you don't die alone

Give me one more, bottle for the pain
Give me one more for the memories
Give me one more, I'll make it taste like a steak
It'll help alleviate
It'll soothe this ache
Of trying to fake
That she's really, she's really coming back

And it's been a while now, but I finally realize how
Much reality sucks, but it's just something about our love
I'm still in denial now, dealing with the finality of
And it's making me crazy thinking of the days we, spent
And how I'll never hold you again
And there ain't shit I can do about it
Now my head is overcrowded
With these clouded memories and I can't seem to get you out it
And how the fuck do you sleep comfortably
Knowing what you done did to me, huh?
Did it even occur to you that I loved you?
Completely, deep, and madly head over heels for you
Was you and me, once used to be together forever
It was supposed to be us, but you crushed the dream
We was supposed to die together, and it's killing me so much
When I sleep I wake up dead, must be why I

Saw two white coffins in my dreams last night
I saw my Lord Jesus with his hands pointed toward the light
Saw my old sweetheart she said, "honey, I'm back"
Just so you don't die alone, just so you don't die alone



Remember me? Seven executions
Remember me? I have no remorse
Remember me? I'm high-powered
Remember me? I drop bombs, like Hiroshima

For this one, it's the X—you retarded?!
‘Cause I grab the mic and get down like syndrome
Hide and roam into the masses
Without boundaries, which qualifies me
For the term "universal," without no rehearsal
I leak words that's controversial
Like I'm not the one you wanna contest, see
‘Cause I'll hit your ass like the train did that bitch
That got banned from TV, heavyweight hitter
Hit you, watch your whole head split up
Loco is the motion, we comin' through
Hollow-tips is the lead the .45 threw

Remember me? Throw ya gunz in the air!
Remember me? Slam! Slam!
Remember me? Nigga, bacdafucup!
Remember me? Chka-chka-Onyx!

Niggas that take no for an answer get told no
Yeah, I been told no, but it was more like "No! No! No!!!"
Life's a bitch, met her, fuck you if you let her
Better come better than better to be a competitor
This vet is ahead of the shit, it's all redder
You deader and deader
A medic instead of the cheddars and credda
Settle vendetta with metal Beretta from ghetto to ghetto
Evidence, nope, never leave a shred of
I got the soul of every rapper in me, love me or hate me
My moms got raped by the industry and made me
I'm the illest nigga ever, I told you
I get more pussy than them dyke bitches Total
Want beef, nigga? Pbbt, you better dead that shit
My name should be Can't-Believe-That-Nigga-Said-That-Shit
Probably sayin' he ain't a killer, but I'm killin' myself
Smoke death, fuck bitches raw on the kitchen floor
So think what I'ma do to you, have done to you
Got niggas in my hood who'd do that shit for a blunt or two
What you wanna do? Cocksuckers, we Glock busters
'Til the cops cuff us, we'll start ruckus and drop blockbusters
Round the clock hustlers, you cannot touch us
I'm gettin' wires, niggas wantin' me dead
Wantin' my head, you think it could be somethin' I said?

Remember me? I just don't give a fuck!
Remember me? Yeah, fuck you too!
Remember me? I'm low down and I'm shifty!
Remember me? I'm Shady!

When I go out, I'ma go out shootin'
I don't mean when I die, I mean when I go out to the club, stupid!
I'm tryin' to clean up my fuckin' image
So I promised the fuckin' critics
I wouldn't say "fuckin'" for six minutes
My baby's mom, bitch made me an angry blonde
So I made me a song, killed her and put Hailie on
I may be wrong, I keep thinkin' these crazy thoughts
In my cranium, but I'm stuck with a crazy mom
Came home and somebody musta broke in the back window
And stole two loaded machine guns and both of my trenchcoats
Sick, sick dreams of picnic scenes
Two kids, sixteen, with M-16's and ten clips each
And them shits reach through six kids each
And Slim gets blamed in Bill Clint's speech to fix these streets?!
Fuck that! Pbbt, you faggots can vanish to volcanic ash
And reappear in hell with a can of gas and a match!
Aftermath, Dre, grab the gat! Show 'em where it's at!

Don't you remember me?
Remember me? Remember me?



Yo, yo, follow me
Come with me to the dark side of the force
No man would boldly go to this place
The devil only knows of this world
So dark and oh so cold, it's oh so cold
Oh so cold, oh

Soon as my flow starts, I compose art like the ghost of Mozart
Even though they all say that they're real, I know that most aren't
Boy, you think you're clever, don't ya?
Girl, you think you're so smart
Come with me to another side in a world so cold and so dark

A world so dark, a world so cold
A world where on–ly some will go
But none return, when will they learn?
Where do they go? God only knows
Stay wide awake

Fe-fi-fo-fum, I think I smell the scent of a placenta
I enter Central Park, it's dark, it's winter in December
I see my target, put my car in park and approach a tender
Young girl by the name of Brenda and I pretend to befriend her
Sit down beside her like a spider, hi there, girl, you mighta
Heard of me before, see, whore
You're the kind of girl that I'd a–ssault and rape
Then figure why not try to make your pussy wider
Fuck you with an umbrella
Then open it up while the shit's inside ya
I'm the kind of guy that's mild
But I might flip and get a little bit wilder
Impregnate a lesbian, yeah
Now let's see her have triplets, and I'll di–sintegrate them babies
As soon as they're out her with formalde–hyde and cyanide
Girl, you can try and hide, you can try to scream louder
No need for no gunpowder, that only takes all the fun outta
Murderin', I'd rather go vinn-vinn, and now you see just how the
Fuck I do just what I do when I cut right through your scalp, uhh
Shit, wait a minute, I mean skull
My knife seems dull, pull another one out, uh

Soon as my flow starts, I compose art like the ghost of Mozart
Even though they all say that they're real, I know that most aren't
Boy, you think you're clever, don't ya?
Girl, you think you're so smart
Come with me to another side in a world so cold and so dark

A world so dark, a world so cold
A world where on–ly some will go
But none return, when will they learn?
Where do they go? God only knows
Stay wide awake

So dark and so cold, my friends don't know this other side of me
There's a monster inside of me, it's quite ugly and it frightens me
But they can't see what I can see, there's a vacancy in my tummy
It's making me play hide-and-seek like Jason, I'm so hungry
She's naked, see, no privacy but I can see she wants me
So patient, see, I try to be but gee, why does she taunt me?
Pulls the drapes and she goes right to sleep
And I creep right through the front, see
So blatantly, but silently 'cause I know that she's sound 'sleep
"Who's waking me so violently, and why's he on top of me?"
"He's raping me," she tries to scream
"Somebody please get him off me
He's taping me, he's biting me, he's laughing like it's funny"
She's scraping me, she's fighting me
She's scratching like some dumb freak
Escaping me, no dice, you see, I might just be Ted Bundy
Or Satan, gee, what a sight to see, I'm dancing in my red panties
I'm crazy, but it's alright with me, man, life can be so empty
Stay away from me 'cause I'm dancing
To quite a different drum beat

Soon as my flow starts, I compose art like the ghost of Mozart
Even though they all say that they're real, I know that most aren't
Boy, you think you're clever, don't ya?
Girl, you think you're so smart
Come with me to another side in a world so cold and so dark

A world so dark, a world so cold
A world where on–ly some will go
But none return, when will they learn?
Where do they go? God only knows
Stay wide awake

Better try to stay wide awake
Or you might end up found dead by the lake
Soon as you lay me down to sleep
Bitch, your soul I'mma try to take
Pray for light of day right away
Why do they try to fight today?
I must make them pay twice as much
Might as well put the knife away
Now I use power tools, how 'bout now, are you in the shower?
Scour you for six hours 'til outage of power outlets
How did you figure out I was down in your basement? Now ya
Must've just heard the sound of my stomach
Growling from down there
Prowler, there's no one fouler
Bound ya, that's how they found ya
Face down in the tub, I drown ya
With piles of downers around ya
Such nostalgia and power, such prowess, look how you cower
Jump out on you now like I was a Jawa from fuckin' Star Wars
Jabba the Hutt, beddy-bye-bye
Beddy-bye-bye, it's time to die-die
Ought to not even bother to scream, it don't even matter
Amazing when grazing skin with these razor blades he waves at ya
Not ya everyday Damien, bathe me in holy water
Nothing like Son of Sam so please understand
There's no gun in hand
Where's the thrill in the hunt?
There's no fun in that, here I come with axe
Fun to act like lumberjack when I'm hacking 'em up with that
What was that? Dial 9-1-1, someone's coming in from the back

Soon as my flow starts, I compose art like the ghost of Mozart
Even though they all say that they're real, I know that most aren't
Boy, you think you're clever, don't ya?
Girl, you think you're so smart
Come with me to another side in a world so cold and so dark

A world so dark, a world so cold
A world where on–ly some will go
But none return, when will they learn?
Where do they go? God only knows
Stay wide awake



DMC, we have a mid-thirties male found down, unresponsive
Possible overdose, substance unknown
Pulse is 60 and thready, respiration's eight
He's intubated and we're bagging him now
Uh, BP 90 over palp, patient is cool, pale, and diaphoretic
Has aspirated, uh, GSC is 3
Will update en route, ETA ten minutes

As I fall deeper into a manic state
I'm a prime candidate for the gene to receive the drug addict trait
Blood pressure climbs at a dramatic rate
I seem to gravitate to the bottle of NyQuil then I salivate
Start off with the NyQuil, like, I think I'll just have a taste
Couple of sips of that then I gradually graduate
To a harder prescription drug called Valium, like, yeah that's great
I go to just take one and I end up like having eight
Now I need something in my stomach 'cause I haven't ate
Maybe I'll grab a plate of nachos and I'll have a steak
And you'd think that with all I have at stake
Look at my daughter's face
"Mommy, something is wrong with Dad I think
He's acting weird again, he's really beginning to scare me
Won't shave his beard again and he pretends he doesn't hear me
And all he does is eat Doritos and Cheetos
And he just fell asleep in his car eating
3 Musketeers in the rear seat"

Sometimes I feel so alone, I just don't know
Feels like I been down this road before
So lonely and cold, it's like something takes over me
As soon as I go home and close the door
Kinda feels like déjà vu
I wanna get away from this place, I do
But I can't and I won't, say I try, but I know that's a lie
'Cause I don't and why, I just don't know

"Maybe just a nice cold brew, what's a beer?"
That's the devil in my ear, I've been sober a fuckin' year
And that fucker still talks to me, he's all I can fucking hear
"Marshall, come on, we'll watch the game
It's the Cowboys and Buccaneers"
And maybe if I just drink half
I'll be half-buzzed, for half of the time
Who's the mastermind behind that little line?
With that kind of rationale, man, I got half a mind
To have another half a glass of wine
Sounds asinine, yeah, I know
But I never had no problem with alcohol
Ouch, look out for the wall, aim for the couch, I'm 'bout to fall
I miss the couch and down I go, lookin' like a bouncy ball
Shit must've knocked me out 'cause I ain't feel the ground at all
Wow, what the fuck happened last night? Where am I?
Man, fuck am I hungover, and goddamn, I
Got a headache, shit, half a Vicodin, why can't I?
All systems ready for take off, please stand by

Sometimes I feel so alone, I just don't know
Feels like I been down this road before
So lonely and cold, it's like something takes over me
As soon as I go home and close the door
Kinda feels like déjà vu
I wanna get away from this place, I do
But I can't and I won't, say I try, but I know that's a lie
'Cause I don't and why, I just don't know

So I take a Vicodin, splash, it hits my stomach, then "Ahhh"
Couple of weeks go by it ain't even like I'm gettin' high
Now I need it just not to feel sick, yeah, I'm gettin' by
Wouldn't even be taking this shit if DeShaun didn't die
Oh yeah, there's an excuse; you lose Proof so you use
There's new rules, it's cool if it's helpin' you to get through
It's twelve noon, ain't no harm in self-inducin' a snooze
What else is new? Fuck it, what would Elvis do in your shoes?
Now here I am three months later, full-blown relapse
"Just get high until the kids get home from school, homes, relax"
And since I'm convinced that I'm an insomniac
I need these pills to be able to sleep, so I take three naps
Just to be able to function throughout the day, let's see
That's an Ambien each nap, how many Valium? Three
And that will average out to about one good hour's sleep
Okay, so now ya see the reason how come he
Has taken four years to just put out an album, B
See, me and you, we almost had the same outcome, Heath
'Cause that Christmas, you know the whole pneumonia thing?
It was bologna, was it the methadone, ya think?
Or the hydrocodone you hide inside your pornos?
Your VCR tape cases, with your Ambien CR
Great places to hide 'em, ain't it? So you can lie to Hailie
I'm going beddy-bye, Whitney, baby, good night, Alaina!
Go in the room and shut the bedroom door
And wake up in an ambulance
They said they found me on the bathroom floor, damn

Sometimes I feel so alone, I just don't know
Feels like I been down this road before
So lonely and cold, it's like something takes over me
As soon as I go home and close the door
Kinda feels like déjà vu
I wanna get away from this place, I do
But I can't and I won't, say I try, but I know that's a lie
'Cause I don't and why, I just don't know




Baby, your dada loves you
And I'ma always be here for you no matter what happens
You're all I got in this world
I would never give you up for nothin'
Nobody in this world is ever gonna keep you from me
I love you

C'mon Hai-Hai, we goin' to the beach
Grab a couple of toys and let Dada strap you in the car seat
Oh, where's Mama? She's takin' a little nap in the trunk
Oh, that smell? Dada must've runned over a skunk
Now, I know what you're thinkin', it's kind of late to go swimmin'
But you know your Mama, she's one of those type of women
That do crazy things, and if she don't get her way she'll throw a fit
And don't look so upset, why you actin' bashful?
And Mama said she wants to show how far she can float
And don't worry about that little boo-boo on her throat
It's just a little scratch – it don't hurt
Her was eatin' dinner while you were sweepin'
And spilled ketchup on her shirt
Mama's messy, ain't she? We'll let her wash off in the water
And me and you can pway by ourselves, can't we?

Just the two of us, just the two of us
And when we ride
Just the two of us, just the two of us
Just you and I
Just the two of us, just the two of us
And when we ride
Just the two of us, just the two of us
Just you and I

See, honey, there's a place called Heaven and a place called Hell
A place called prison and a place called jail
And Dada's probably on his way to all of 'em except one
‘Cause Mama's got a new husband and a stepson
And you don't want a brother, do ya?
Maybe when you're old enough
To understand a little better, I'll explain it to ya
But for now, we'll just say Mama was real, real bad
She was bein' mean to Dad and made him real, real mad
But I still feel sad that I put her on timeout
Sit back in your chair, honey, quit tryna climb out!
I told you it's okay, Hai-Hai, want a ba-ba?
Take a night-night? Nan-a-boo, goo-goo ga-ga?
Her make poo-poo ca-ca? Dada change your didee
Clean the baby up so her can take a nighty-nighty
Your dad'll wake her up as soon as we get to the water

Just the two of us, just the two of us
And when we ride
Just the two of us, just the two of us
Just you and I
Just the two of us, just the two of us
And when we ride
Just the two of us, just the two of us
Just you and I


Wake up, sweepyhead, we're here, before we pway
We're gonna take Mama for a wittle walk along the pier
Baby, don't cry, honey, don't get the wrong idea
That's why you can't get her to wake, but don't worry
Dada made a nice bed for Mommy at the bottom of the lake
We'll tie it to her footsie then we'll roll her off the dock
Ready now, here we go, on the count of free
There goes Mama, spashin' in the water
No more fightin' with Dad, no more restrainin' order
No more stepdada, no more new brother
Now we'll go play in the sand, build a castle and junk
But first, just help Dad with two more things out the trunk

Just the two of us, just the two of us
And when we ride
Just the two of us, just the two of us
Just you and I
Just the two of us, just the two of us
And when we ride
Just the two of us, just the two of us
Just you and I

Just me and you, baby, is all we need in this world
Just me and you
Your dada will always be there for you
Your dada's always gonna love you, remember that
If you ever need me I will always be here for you
If you ever need anything, just ask
Dada will be right there
Your dada loves you — I love you, baby



Don't kill me!

Hurry the fuck up! 
Thank you! 
Go, go, go! What the... fuck? The fuck did he go?
Aw, you gotta be fucking kidding me!
Are you fucking kidding me? Shit! 
Get off! 
Ha-ha! 
Parking lot! Shit, ah!

Let me see your hands, bend over!

Ah, fuck it!



Chem-le-le-le-le-le-le-le, le-le, le-le
Chem-ne-le-eh-ne-nuf-nu-nef, ne-nish, le-le
So you can suck my dick if you don't like my shit
‘Cause I was high when I wrote this, so suck my dick!

Two pills I pop, 'til my pupils swell up like two pennies
I'm Clint Eastwood in his mid-twenties
A young-ass man with a trash can, strapped to the back
Of his ass so the rats can't chew through his last pants
I'm like a mummy at night, fightin' with bright lightnin'
Frightened with five little white Vicodin pills bitin' him
I'm like a fuckin' wasp in the hospital, lost
Stingin' the fuck outta everything I come across in the halls
I light a candle and place it up on the mantel
Grab a knife at the blade and stab you with the fuckin handle
So when you find yourself wrapped up in the blinds, hurtin'
‘Cause once you're hung from the drapes, it's curtains

I'm an instigator, .380 slug penetrator
Degradin', creatin' murders to kill haters
Accused for every crime known through the equator
They knew I did it for havin' blood on my 'gators
My weed'll hit your chest like a double barrel gauge and
I'm a black grenade that'll blow up in yo' face
With a fifth in me, when I guzzle Remy I do shit on purpose
You never hear me say forgive me
I'm snatchin' every penny, it gotta be that way, nigga, face it
That weed I sold to you, Brigade laced it
You hidin', I make the President get a facelift
Niggas just afraid, handin' me they bracelets
Chillin' in the lab wasted, I'm the type
That'll drink Kahlua and gin, throw up on the mic
Your life is ruined, you get socked right on sight
And even at the Million Man March, we gon' fight

So you can suck my dick if you don't like my shit
‘Cause I was high when I wrote this, so suck my dick!
‘Cause I don't give a fuck if you don't like my shit
‘Cause I was high when I wrote this, so suck my dick!

I'm a compulsive liar, settin' my preacher on fire
Slashin' your tires, flyin' down Fenkell and Meyers
Plates expired, soon as I'm hired I'm fired
Jackin' my dick off in a bed of barbed wire
Special invited guest will be Richard Pryor
Fuckin' your bitch in the ass with a tire iron
I'm ripped, I'm on an acid trip
My DJ's in a coma for lettin' the record skip
I'm fuckin' anything when I'm snortin'
It's gonna cost 300 dollars to get my pitbull an abortion
Some bitch asked for my autograph
I called her a whore, spit beer in her face and laughed
I drop bombs like I was in Vietnam
All bitches is hoes, even my stinkin'-ass mom

Ayo, flashback, two feets, two deep up in that ass crack
Weed laced with somethin' – nigga, pass that!
In Amsterdam we only hang out with hash rats
At a Stop the Violence rally, I blast gats
BMI on publishin'; get yo' ass capped
The Kuniva, divide up yo' cash stack
Run yo' motherfuckin' pockets, ASAP
I don't need a platinum chain, bitch, I snatched Shaq's
Born loser, half thief and half black
Bring your boys and your guns and get laughed at
Bitch smacker, rich rappers get they Jag jacked
And found chopped up in a trash bag

We stranglin' rappers until the point they can't yell
‘Cause they crew is full of fags and sweeter than bake sales
Reckless, come from behind and snatch your necklace
Gruesome, and causin' more violence than nine hoodlums
I grapple your Adam's apple until it crackle
Run right past you, turn around, grab you and stab you
Get executed, ‘cause I'm a Luni, I got a Yukmouth
And it's polluted; I cock it back, then shoot it
I love snatchin' up players, thugs and young ballers
Shoot up the household, even the young toddlers
Brigade barricade to bring the noise
While the bullets break your bones up like Christmas toys
If I go solo, I'm doin' a song with Bolo
A big Chinese nigga screamin', "Kuniva, yo, yo!"
I leave ya face leakin', run up in church
And smack the preacher while he's preachin'
Take a swing at the deacon

I used to tell cats I sold weed and weight
I was straight 'til I got caught sellin' them shake
I'm ignorant, with the intent to snatch your rent
I got kicked out of summer camp for havin' sex in my tent
With the superintendent's daughter, my brain's out of order
I've been a Kon Artis since I was swimmin' in water
In cahoots with this nigga named Carlisle Von
Who got fired from UPS for tryin' to send you a bomb
Say I got cancer, get dropped, take the advancement and run
Drive-by you in the rain while you carry your son
Call your house and hang up on you for not givin' me none
Born straight up out a pussy but a son of a gun
Got a reputation for havin' niggas runnin' they funds
Used to be the type of nigga that was foldin' some ones
'Til I met your fat mama, now I'm rollin' in dough

So you can suck my dick if you don't like, my shit
‘Cause I was high when I wrote this so suck, my dick
Cause I don't give a fuck if you don't like my shit
Cause I was high when I wrote this so suck my dick

Ha ha! Suck my mothafuckin' dick!
D-12… Dirty-mothafuckin'-Dozen
Nasty like a stank slut bitch with thirty fuckin' husbands
Bizarre Kid, Swifty McVay, the Kon Artis
The Kuniva, Dirty Harry and Slim Shady



I ain't gonna eat, I ain't gonna sleep
Ain't gonna breathe 'til I see what I wanna see
And what I wanna see is you go to sleep in the dirt
Permanently; you're just being hurt
This ain't gonna work for me, it just wouldn't be
Sufficient enough 'cause we are just gonna be
Enemies as long as we breathe, I don't ever see
Either of us comin' to terms where we can agree
There ain't gonna be no reasonin' speakin' with me
You speak on my seed, then me no speak-a Inglés
So we gonna beef, and keep on beefin', unless
You're gonna agree to meet with me in the flesh
And settle this face-to-face, and you're gonna see
A demon unleashed in me that you've never seen
And you're gonna see this gangster pee on himself
I see you D12, and thanks, but me need no help
Me do this one all by my lonely
I don't need fifteen of my homies
When I see you, I'm seein' you, me and you only
We never met, but best believe you gon' know me
When I'm this close to see you exposed as phony
Come on, bitch, show me! Pick me up, throw me!
Lift me up, hold me—just like you told me
You was gonna do, that's what I thought, you're pitiful
I'm rid of you, all of you, Ja, you'll get it too

Now go to sleep, bitch! Die, motherfucker, die!
Ugh, time's up, bitch, close your eyes!
Go to sleep, bitch! Why are you still alive?
How many times I gotta say, close your eyes!
And go to sleep, bitch! Die, motherfucker die!
Bye, bye, motherfucker, bye, bye!
Go to sleep, bitch! Why are you still alive?
Why? Die, motherfucker! Ah, ah, ah, go to sleep, bitch!

We got you niggas nervous, on purpose
To hurt your focus, you's not MC's
You's worthless, you's not them G's
You's a circus, you's no appeal, please
You's curtains, you use words Kool Herc slurred
You's no threat, who's you servin'?
When lyrically oughta bury you beneath the dirt when
You fuck with a label overseein' the Earth
Shady, mothafucka, O. Trice's birth
And as I mold I become more cursed
So we can put down the verse, take it to the turf
Cock and squeeze, and he who reach the hearse
Is he who depicts fiction in his verse
And as I breathe, and you be deceased
The world believe you deceived just to speak
You's not the streets, you's the desk
Use not your chest, nigga, use a vest
Before tools choose your rest, you chose death
Six feet deep, nigga, that's the depth

Now go to sleep, bitch! Die, motherfucker, die!
Ugh, time's up, bitch, close your eyes!
Go to sleep, bitch! Why are you still alive?
How many times I gotta say, close your eyes!
And go to sleep, bitch! Die, motherfucker die!
Bye, bye, motherfucker, bye, bye!
Go to sleep, bitch! Why are you still alive?
Why? Die, motherfucker! Ah, ah, ah, go to sleep, bitch!

Hey dog, I'ma walk like a beast, talk like the streets
I'ma stay blazin' New York with the heat
Stalk on the beat, walk with my feet
Understand my pain, the rain ain't sleet
Peep how I'm movin', peep where I'm goin'
Shit don't seep, then sleep not knowin'
But I'ma keep growin', gettin' larger than life
Easy goin' with the same one that started the fight
He be knowin' how dog get when dog don't bite
Tried to show him the dog shit, it's dog for life
Grand Champ, and my Blood Line is tight
'Cause it's all good, it's all right
Niggas tried to holla but couldn't holla back
Now they gots to swallow everything in the sack
Blood Line, and we can go track for track
Damn, dog, why'd you have to do them niggas like that?

Now go to sleep, bitch! Die, motherfucker, die!
Ugh, time's up, bitch, close your eyes!
Go to sleep, bitch! Why are you still alive?
How many times I gotta say, close your eyes!
And go to sleep, bitch! Die, motherfucker die!
Bye, bye, motherfucker, bye, bye!
Go to sleep, bitch! Why are you still alive?
Why? Die, motherfucker! Ah, ah, ah, go to sleep, bitch!

All you motherfuckers, take that!
Here, take this too, bitch!
Uh, uh, uh, uh, wahoo
We're killing all you motherfuckers dead
All of you! Fake-ass gangsters!
No more press! No more press!
Rot, motherfuckers, rot!
Decay, in the dirt, bitch, in the motherfuckin' dirt!
Die nameless, bitch! Die nameless!
No more fame! Ahh, hahahaha
Yo, X, come on, man! Obie, let's go! Ha ha



Yo, I spit a racial slur, honky, sue me
The shit is a horror flick, but the black guy doesn't die in this movie
Fuckin' with Lotto? Dawg, you gotta be kiddin'
That makes me believe you really don't have an interest in livin'
You think these niggas gon' feel the shit you say?
I got a better chance joinin' the KKK
On some real shit though, I like you
That's why I didn't wanna have to be the one you commit suicide to
Fuck "Lotto," call me your leader
I feel bad that I gotta murder that dude from Leave It To Beaver
I used to like that show, now you got me in fight back mode
But oh well, if you gotta go, then you gotta go
I hate to do this, I would love for this shit to last
So I'll take pictures of my rear end so you won't forget my ass
And all's well that ends okay
So I'll end this shit with a fuck you, but have a nice day

Ward, I think you were a little hard on the beaver
So was Eddie Haskell, Wally, and Ms Cleaver
This guy keeps screamin', he's paranoid
Quick, someone get his ass another steroid!
Blah Badi Boo Blah Bah Badi Blo Blah
Is that a tank top or a new bra?
Look! Snoop Dogg just got a fuckin' boob job
Didn't you listen to the last round, meathead?
Pay attention, you're sayin' the same shit that he said
Matter of fact, dawg, here's a pencil
Go home, write some shit, make it suspenseful
And don't come back until somethin' dope hits you
Fuck it, you can take the mic home with you
Lookin' like a cyclone hit you
Tank top screamin', "Lotto, I don't fit you!"
You see how far the white jokes get you
Boys like, "How Vanilla Ice gon' diss you?"
I get the seven digits from your mother for a dollar tomorrow



Yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Okay
Alright, aight, aight, aight, aight, aight
Yo, yo
Alright, I'mma lay the chorus first
Here we go now

My mom loved Valium and lots of drugs
That's why I am like I am 'cause I'm like her
Because my mom loved Valium and lots of drugs
That's why I'm on what I'm on 'cause I'm my mom

My mom, my mom
I know you're probably tired of hearing 'bout my mom
Oh-ho, whoa-ho
But this is just a story of when I was just a shorty
And how I became hooked on Va-aliu-um
Valium was in everything, food that I ate
The water that I drank, fuckin' peas on my plate
She sprinkled just enough of it to season my steak
So every day, I'd have at least three stomach aches
Now, tell me, what kind of mother would want to see her
Son grow up to be an under-a-fuckin'-chiever?
My teacher didn't think I was gonna be nothin' either
"What the fuck you stickin' gum up under the fucking seat for?"
"Mrs. Mathers, your son has been huffing ether
Either that or the motherfucker's been puffin' reefer"
But all this huffin' and puffin' wasn't what it was either
It was neither, I was buzzing but it wasn't what she thought
Pee in a teacup? Bitch, you ain't my keeper, I'm sleeping
What the fuck you keep on fucking with me for?
Slut, you need to leave me the fuck alone, I ain't playin'
Go find you a white crayon and color a fucking zebra

My mom loved Valium and lots of drugs
That's why I am like I am 'cause I'm like her
Because my mom loved Valium and lots of drugs
That's why I'm on what I'm on 'cause I'm my mom

Wait a minute, this ain't dinner, this is paint thinner
"You ate it yesterday, I ain't hear no complaints, did I?
Now here's a plate full of painkillers
Now just wait 'til I crush the Valium and put it in your potatoes
You little motherfucker, I'll make you sit there and make
That retarded fucking face without even tasting it
You better lick the fucking plate, you ain't wasting it
Put your face in it 'fore I throw you in the basement again
And I ain't givin' in, you're gonna just sit there
In one fucking place, finnickin' 'til next Thanksgiving
And if you still ain't finished it, I'll use the same shit again
Then when I make spinach dip, it'll be placed in the shit
You little shit, wanna sit there and play innocent?
A rack fell and hit me in K-Mart and they witnessed it
Child support, your father, he ain't sent the shit
And so what if he did? It's none of your dang business, kid"

My mom
There's no one else quite like my mom
I know I should let bygones be bygones
But she's the reason why I am high what I'm high on

'Cause my mom loved Valium and lots of drugs
That's why I am like I am 'cause I'm like her
Because my mom loved Valium and lots of drugs
That's why I'm on what I'm on 'cause I'm my mom

My mom loved Valium, now all I am
Is a party animal, I am what I am
But I'm strong to the finish with me Valium spinach
But my buzz only lasts about two minutes
But I don't wanna swallow it without chewin' it
I can't even write a rhyme without you in it
My Valium, my Vaaaaaa-liummmm, ohh

Man, I never thought that I could ever be
A drug addict, naw, fuck that, I can't have it happen to me
But that's actually
What has ended up happening, a tragedy
The fucking past ended up catching me
And it's probably where I got acquainted with the taste, ain't it?
Pharmaceuticals are the bomb, Mom, beautiful
She killed the fuckin' dog with the medicine she done fed it
Feed it a fuckin' aspirin and say that it has a headache
"Here, want a snack? You hungry, you fuckin' brat?
Look at that, it's a Xanax, take it and take a nap, eat it"
But I don't need it "Well fuck it then, break it up
Take a little piece and beat it before you wake Nathan up"
Alright Ma, you win, I don't feel like arguin'
I'll do it, pop and gobble it and start wobblin'
Stumble, hobble, tumble, slip, trip then I fall in bed
With a bottle of meds and a Heath Ledger bobblehead

My mom loved Valium and lots of drugs
That's why I am like I am 'cause I'm like her
Because my mom loved Valium and lots of drugs
That's why I'm on what I'm on 'cause I'm my mom

My mom, I'm just like her
My mom, my mom, my mom
My mom, my mom, my mom
My mom, my mom, my mom
My mom, my momma
Me momma, I like-a da momma
Haha, sorry Mom
I still love you though
Dr. Dre, 2010
Ay, this shit is hella hard, homie
Yo, take us on outta here
Woo!



This guy's a choke artist, ya catch a bad one
You're better off shooting yourself with Papa Doc's handgun
Climbing up this mountain, you're weak
I'll leave you lost without a paddle, floating shit's creek
You ain't Detroit, I'm the D, you're the new kid on the block
'Bout to get smacked back to the boondocks
Fucking Nazi, your squad ain't your type
Take some real advice and form a group with Vanilla Ice
And what I tell you, you better use it
This guy's a hillbilly, this ain't Willie Nelson music
Trailer trash, I'll choke you to your last breath
And have you looking foolish
Like Cheddar Bob when he shot himself
Silly Rabbit, I know why they call you that
'Cause you follow Future like you got carrots up his ass crack
And when you acting up that's when you got jacked up
And left stupid like Tina Turner when she got smacked up
I'll crack your shoulder blade
You'll get dropped so hard that Elvis will start turning in his grave
I don't know why they let you out in the dark
You need to take your white ass back across 8 Mile to the trailer park

This guy raps like his parents jerked him
He sounds like Erick Sermon, the generic version
This whole crowd looks suspicious
It's all dudes in here, except for these bitches
So I'm a German, eh?
That's okay, you look like a fuckin' worm with braids
These Leaders of the Free World rookies
Lookie, how can 6 dicks be pussies
Talkin' 'bout shits creek
Bitch, you could be up piss creek with paddles this deep
You're still gonna sink, you're a disgrace
Yeah, they call me Rabbit, this is a turtle race
He can't get with me, spitting this shit wickedly
Lickety shot suspicious spickety split lickety
So I'ma turn around with a great smile
And walk my white ass back across 8 Mile



Yeah! Oh! Get up
Where my dreads at? I said, get up
You know what happens when I'm around, man
Woo! Let's go
Better watch out now
'Cause here we come
And we ain’t stoppin'
Until we see the morning sun
So give us room to do our thing
'Cause we ain’t come to hurt no one
So everybody come and get up on the floor now
And grab someone

Man, first of all, I’m a boss
I just want to get that across
Man, even my dentist hates when I floss
Pull up to the club in a Pinto like it’s a Porsche
Garbage bag for one of the windows
Spray painted doors with the flames on ‘em
Michigan plates and my name's on ‘em
Baby, Shady’s here
Come and get him if you dames want him
But he ain’t stupid
So quit tryna run them games on him
He's immune to Cupid
Why you tryna put your claims on him?
'Cause you won’t do to me what you did to the last man
Now climb in back, try not to kick over the gas can
There’s a half a gallon in it, that could be our last chance
We have of just gettin' home, now can I get that lap dance?
She’s got a tattoo of me right above her ass, man
In the streets of Warren, Michigan
We call ‘em tramp stamps
That means she belongs to me
Time to put the damn clamps down
And show this hussy who’s the man
Now get amped, dance

Now you can do this on your own
But everyone knows that no one likes to be alone
So get on the floor and grab somebody
Ain't nothin' but a white trash party
So let’s have us a little bash
And if anyone asks, it ain’t no one but us trash
You don’t know, you better ask somebody
'Cause we’re having a white trash party

Pull a fifth of Bacardi from outta my underwear
And walk around the party without a care
Like a body without a head
Looking like a zombie from Night of the Living Dead
And tomorrow I'll probably still be too high to get out of bed
'Til I feel like I been hit with the sharp part of the hammer
Mixing Hennessy and Fanta with Pepto and Mylanta
I shoot the gift like I’m hollering "Die Santa"
Missed the tree and hit Rudolph and two innocent bystanders
So quit tryna play the wall like you Paul
And get on the floor when the beat drops and stop stalling
They call me the Stephon Marbury of rap, darling
'Cause as soon as they throw on some R. Kelly, I start ballin'
Making it rain for the ladies in the minis
But I’m not throwing ones, fives, tens, or even twenties
I’m throwing quarters, nickels, dimes, pennies up at skinnies
Man, I do this for them bunnies up at Denny’s
From the North, East, and West
But when it comes to them trailers in them South parks
Muffle it, 'cause homie that hood’s tighter than Kenny’s
So ladies, if your belly button’s not an innie, then I’m outtie
Now hop in my minivan, let's get rowdy
Come on

Now you can do this on your own
But everyone knows that no one likes to be alone
So get on the floor and grab somebody
Ain't nothin' but a white trash party
So let’s have us a little bash
And if anyone asks, it ain’t no one but us trash
You don’t know, you better ask somebody
'Cause we’re having a white trash party

Now whether you’re black, white, or purple
If you’re misunderstood
But you don’t give a fuck
You ain’t doing shit that you should
Long as you know you’re up to evil
And you’re no damn good
Get on the floor, man and rep your hood

Now honey, don’t let them pricks trip
We should make a quick dip
And go do some doughnuts in the hospital parking lot
'Cause girl, I got a sick whip
Kick the back window outta my Gremlin
Put two milk crates in the trunk
Rip out the stick shift
And make a five-seater
I’ll be damned if I feed a chick
It ain’t like me to split a piece of dry pita
I be the S-L-to-the-I-M to the S-H-A-D-Y
And I don’t need a tank top to be a wife beater
I’ll rip a tree out the ground and flip it upside down
'Fore I turn over a new leaf, clown
I’ll tell you now
I’m so raw, I still need to unthaw
You feel me y'all?
I shut the club down like Drake in the mall
But baby, a body like that’s against the law
You the baddest little chain with the blades I ever saw
Coleslaw containers, empty straw wrappers and all
You got more junk in your trunk than I do in my car
Now get up

Now you can do this on your own
But everyone knows that no one likes to be alone
So get on the floor and grab somebody
Ain't nothin' but a white trash party
So let’s have us a little bash
And if anyone asks, it ain’t no one but us trash
You don’t know, you better ask somebody
'Cause we’re having a white trash party



"We seem to be approaching an age of the gross." {burp}
"We all have this idea that we should move up a little bit from our parents' nation and each generation should do a little bit better."

Alright, come on, let's cut the bullshit, enough
Let's get it started, let's start addressin' this issue, and open it up
Let's take this shit back to the basement
And we can discuss statements that's made on this tape and
Its whole origin of the music that we all know and love
The music that we all enjoy
The music you accuse me of tryin' to destroy
Let's rewind it to '89 when I was a boy
On the east side of Detroit, crossin' 8 Mile into Warren
Into hick territory; I'd like to share a story
This is my story, and can't nobody tell it for me
You have well informed me, I am well-aware
I get my ass kicked damn near everywhere
From Bel-Aire shopping center just for stopping in there
From the black side all the way to the white side
Okay, there's a bright side, a day that I might slide
You may call it a pass, I call it haulin' my ass
Through that patch of grass over them railroad tracks
Oh, them railroad tracks, them old railroad tracks
Them good old notorious so well known tracks

So, let's go back, follow the yellow brick road
As we go on another episode
Journey with me as I take you through this nifty little place
That I once used to call home sweet home
Come on, let's go back, follow the yellow brick road
As we go on another episode
Journey with me as I take you through this nifty little place
That I once used to call home sweet home

I'd roam the streets so much they'd call me a drifter
Sometimes I'd stick up a thumb just to hitchhike
Just to get picked up to get me a lift to
8 Mile and Van Dyke and steal a goddamn bike
From somebody's backyard, and drop it off at the park
That was the halfway mark, to meet Kim, had to walk
Back to her mama's on Chalmers after dark
To sneak me in the house when I'm kicked out my Mom's
That's about the time I first met Proof
With Goofy Gary on the steps
At Osbourne, handin' out some flyers
He was doin' some talent shows at Center Line High
I had told him to stop by and check this out sometime
He looked at me like I'm out my mind
Shook his head, like, "White boys don't know how to rhyme."
I spit out a line and rhymed "birthday" with "first place"
And we both had the same rhymes that sound alike
We was on the same shit, that Big Daddy Kane shit
With compound syllables sound combined
From that day we was down to ride
Somehow we knew we'd meet again somewhere down the line

So, let's go back, follow the yellow brick road
As we go on another episode
Journey with me as I take you through this nifty little place
That I once used to call home sweet home
Come on, let's go back, follow the yellow brick road
As we go on another episode
Journey with me as I take you through this nifty little place
That I once used to call home sweet home

My first year in 9th grade, can't forget that day at school
It was cool 'til your man MC Shan came through
He said that Puma's the brand ‘cause the Klan makes Troops
It was rumors, but man, goddamn, they flew
Musta been true, because man, we done banned they shoes
I had the new ones, the Cool J, Ice Lamb, suede too
But we just threw 'em in the trash like they yesterday's news
Guess who came through next?
Exists in a state of red, black and green, with a key, sissies!
Now with this being a new trend, we don't fit in
Crackas is out with Cactus albums, blackness is in
African symbols and medallions represent Black Power
And we ain't know what it meant, me and my man Howard
And Butta would go to the mall
With 'em all over our necks like we're showin 'em off
Not knowin' at all we was being laughed at
"You ain't even half black!
You ain't 'posed to have that, homie, let me grab that!
And that Flavor Flav clock, we gon' have to snatch that!"
All I remember is meeting back at Manix's basement
Sayin' how we hate this
How racist but dope the X Clan's tape is
Which reminds me, back in '89, me
And Kim broke up for the first time; she was tryna two-time me
And there was this black girl at our school
Who thought I was cool
‘Cause I rapped, so she was kinda eyein' me
And oh the irony, guess what her name was?
Ain't even goin' say it, plus, the same color hair as hers
Was and blue contacts and a pair of jugs
The bombest goddamn girl in our whole school
If I could pull her, not only would I become more popular
But I would be able to piss Kim off at the
Same time; but it backfired
I was supposed to dump her but she dumped me for this black guy
And that's the last I ever seen or heard
Or spoke to the "Oh Foolish Pride" girl
But I've heard people say they heard the tape and it ain't that bad
And for that I apologize, I was wrong
‘Cause no matter what color a girl is, she's still a ho

So, let's go back, follow the yellow brick road
As we go on another episode
Journey with me as I take you through this nifty little place
That I once used to call home sweet home
Come on, let's go back, follow the yellow brick road
As we go on another episode
Journey with me as I take you through this nifty little place
That I once used to call home sweet home



Oh, it's music to my ears, oh, man
How can I describe the way I feel?
Fucking great, man
Okay, let me see
How could I begin?

Locked in Mariah's wine cellar, all I had for lunch
Was bread, wine, more bread, wine and Captain Crunch
Red wine for breakfast and for brunch
And to soak it up, an in-between snack, crackers to munch
Mariah, what ever happened to us? Why did we have to break up?
All I asked for was a glass of punch
You see, I never really asked for much
I can't imagine what's going through your mind after such
A nasty break-up with that Latin hunk Luis Miguel
Nick Cannon better back the fuck up
I'm not playin', I want her back, ya punk
This is Hello Kitty bedspread, Satin Funk
Mixed with Egyptian with a little Rap and Punk
Zapp and Eric Clapton, Shaft, Frank Zappa, Crunk
And yeah, baby, I want another crack at ya
You can beat me with any spatula that you want
I mean, I really want you bad, you cunt
Nick, you had your fun, I've come to kick you in your sack of junk
Man, I could use a fresh batch of blood
So prepare your vernacular for Dracula acupuncture

Bagpipes from Baghdad
When will it ever cease?
For Pete sakes, he's crazy to say the least
Bagpipes from Baghdad
What's going through my mind
Half the time, when I rhyme, or blowing up like
Bagpipes from Baghdad
Somebody turn the vacancy sign on
'Cause I'm gone, blowing on my
Bagpipes from Baghdad
I run the streets
And act like a madman holding a Glad

You can be a permanent fixture in my lyrical mixture
I'm the Miracle Whip trickster
My signature sound, when a tube of lipstick's around
I'm bound to put it on in an instant, wow
Man, what an ensemble
What an assortment of pharma–ceuticals
This beautiful pill dust in my palm, my
Cuticles get residue just from touchin' the bottle
Never knew I could remind me so much of my momma
I'll cut ya like Dahmer, pull a butcher knife on ya
The size of a sword, boy, I'm like the fuckin' Red Sonja
Get it stuck in your cornea, nice knowing ya, Norman
You're so fuckin' annoyin', drop the shovel, boy
You don't know what the fuck you're doin'
I ain't playin' no fuckin' more
Nick Cannon, you prick, I wish you luck with the fuckin' whore
Every minute there's a sucker born, snuck up on Malachi
Made the motherfucker suck on a shuck of corn
Shuck o', shuck o' corn, Chaka Khan
Hit Jason in the face with a hockey puck, and
Told him it's fuckin' on, man, what the fuck are ya doin'?
You're runnin' over the snowblower with the lawnmower
Blowin' your bagpipes from Baghdad

Bagpipes from Baghdad
When will it ever cease?
For Pete sakes, he's crazy to say the least
Bagpipes from Baghdad
What's going through my mind
Half the time, when I rhyme, or blowing up like
Bagpipes from Baghdad
Somebody turn the vacancy sign on
'Cause I'm gone, blowing on my
Bagpipes from Baghdad
I run the streets
And act like a madman holding a Glad bag

In the bed with two brain-dead lesbian vegetables
I bet you they become heterosexual
Nothing will stop me from molestin' you
Titty-fuckin' you 'til your breast nipple flesh tickles my testicles
Is what I said to the two conjoined twins
How's it going, girlfriends? You needs a boyfriend?
You need some ointment? Just set up an appointment
Who's gonna see the doctor first? We'll do a coin flip
I just got my one-year sobriety coin chit
When the bad get going, how bad does the going get?
Baby, you shouldn't have any trouble rubbing groins wit'
Each other, specially when you're joined at the hip
I'm going to get the needle and thread from the sewing kit
And attempt to separate 'em and stitch 'em back at the loin, shit
Lure the little boy with the chocolate 'Chips Ahoy!' chip
Cookie, lookie, even took me a Polaroid flick

Bagpipes from Baghdad
When will it ever cease?
For Pete sakes, he's crazy to say the least
Bagpipes from Baghdad
What's going through my mind
Half the time, when I rhyme, or blowing up like
Bagpipes from Baghdad
Somebody turn the vacancy sign on
'Cause I'm gone, blowing on my
Bagpipes from Baghdad
I run the streets
And act like a madman holding a Glad bag
Oh, bagpipes from Baghdad

Hghum-day-li-laaa-aaa-aaa-aaa-aa-aah-aah
Hghum-day-li-laaa-aaa-aaa-aaa-aa-aah-aah
Hghum-day-li-laaa-aaa-aaa-aaa-aa-aah-aah
Hghum-day-li-laaa-aaa-aaa-aaa-aa-aah-aah



You know, critics, man
Critics never got nothin' nice to say, man
You know, the one thing I notice about critics, man
Is critics never ask me how my day went
Well, I'ma tell 'em

Yesterday my dog died
I hog tied a ho, tied her in a bow
You wanna criticize, dog? Try a little mo'
I'm so tired of this I could blow, fire in the hole
I'm fired up, so fire up the lighter and the dro
Better hold on a little tighter, here I go
Flows tighter, hot-headed as Ghost Rider
Cold-hearted as Spiderman throwing a spider in the snow
So you better get lower than Florida
Inside of a lowrider with no tires, in a hole
Why am I like this? Why is winter cold?
Why is it when I talk I'm so biased to the hoes?
Listen, dog, Christmas is off, this is as soft as it gets
This isn't golf, this is a blistering assault
Those are your wounds, this is the salt, so get lost
Shit, dissin' me is just like pissin' off the Wizard of Oz
Wrap a lizard in gauze
Beat you in the jaws with it, grab the scissors and saws
And cut out your livers, gizzards, and balls
Throw you in the middle of the ocean in a blizzard with Jaws
So sip piss like sizzurp through a straw
Then describe how it tasted like dessert to us all
Got the gall to make Chris piss in his drawers
Tickle him, go to his grave, skip him, and visit his dog

That's how you know you're on a roll
'Cause when you're hot its like you're burning up
Everyone else's cold
Man, I'm so fuckin' sick
I got ambulances pullin' me over and shit
You need to stop, drop, and roll
'Cause when you say the shit to get
The whole Hip Hop shop to blow

I just put a bullshit hook in between two long-ass verses
If you mistook this for a song, look, this ain't a song
It's a warning to Brooke Hogan and David Cook
That the crook just took over, so book
Run as fast as you can, stop writing and kill it
I'm lightning in a skillet, you're a fuckin' flash in the pan
I pop up, you bitches scatter like hot grease splashing a fan
Mr. Mathers is the man, yeah, I'm pissed
But I would rather take this energy and stash it in a can
Come back and whip your ass with it again
Saliva's like sulfuric acid in your hand
It'll eat through anything, metal, the ass of Iron Man
Turn him into plastic
So for you to think that you could stand a fuckin' chance is asinine
Yeah, ask Denaun, man
Hit a blind man with a coloring book
And told him color inside the lines or get hit with a flying crayon
Fuck it, I ain't playin', pull up in a van
And hop out on a homeless man holding a sign sayin'
"Vietnam vet," I'm out my fuckin' mind, man
Kick over the can, beat his ass, and leave him 9 grand
So if I seem a little mean to you
This ain't savage, you ain't never seen a brute
You wanna get graphic, we can go the scenic route
You couldn't make a bulimic puke
On a piece of fuckin' corn and peanut poop
Sayin' you sick, quit playin', you prick, don't nobody care
And why the fuck am I yellin' at air
I ain't even talkin' to no one, 'cause ain't nobody there
And nobody will fuckin' test me
'Cause these hoes won't even dare
I'm wasting punchlines, but I got so many to spare
I just thought of another one that might go here
Nah, don't waste it, save it, psycho, yeah
Plus you got to rewrite those lines

That's how you know you're on a roll
'Cause when you're hot its like you're burning up
Everyone else's cold
Man, I'm so hot my motherfuckin' firetruck's on fire, homie
You need to stop, drop, and roll
'Cause when you say the shit to get
The whole Hip Hop shop to blow



Some days I just wanna up and call it quits
I feel like I'm surrounded by a wall of bricks
Every time I go to get up I just fall in pits
My life's like one great big ball of shit
If I could just put it all into all I spit
Instead of always trying to swallow it
Instead of staring at this wall and shit
While I sit, writer's block, sick of all this shit
Can't call it, shit, all I know is I'm about to hit the wall
If I have to see another one of mom's alcoholic fits
This is it, last straw, that's all, that's it
I ain't dealing with another fucking politic
I'm like a skillet bubbling until it filters up
I'm about to kill it, I can feel it building up
Blow this building up, I've concealed enough
My cup runneth over, I done filled it up
The pen explodes and busts, ink spills my guts
You think all I do is stand here and feel my nuts
Well, I'ma show you what, you gon' feel my rush
You don't feel it, then it must be too real to touch
Peel the Dutch, I'm about to tear shit up
Goosebumps, yeah, I'ma make your hair sit up
Yeah, sit up, I'ma tell you who I be
I'ma make you hate me, cause you ain't me
You wait, it ain't too late to finally see
What you closed-minded fucks were too blind to see
Whoever finds me is gonna get a finder's fee
Out this world, ain't no one out their mind as me
You need peace of mind? Here's a piece of mine
All I need's a line
But sometimes I don't always find the words to rhyme
To express how I'm really feeling at that time
Yeah, sometimes, sometimes, sometimes
It's just sometimes, it's always me
How dark can these hallways be?
The clock strikes midnight, one, two, then half-past three
This half-assed rhyme with this half-assed piece of paper
{*rip*} I'm desperate at my desk
If I can just get the rest of the shit off my chest again
Stuck in a slump, can't think of nothin'
Fuck, I'm stumped up, wait, here comes somethin'
{*crumples paper*} Nope, it's not good enough, scribble it out
New pad, crinkle it up, and throw the shit out
I'm fizzlin' now, thought I figured it out
Ball's in my court, but I'm scared to dribble it out
I'm afraid, but why am I afraid?
Why am I a slave to this trade? Cyanide I spit to the grave
Real enough to rile you up
Want me to flip it, I can rip it any style you want
I'm a switch hitter bitch, Jimmy Smith ain't a quitter
I'ma sit until I get enough in me to finally hit a
Fucking boiling point, put some oil in your joints
Flip the coin, bitch, come get destroyed
An MC's worst dream, I make 'em tense
They hate me, see me and shake like a chain-link fence
By the looks of 'em, you would swear that Jaws was comin'
By the screams of 'em, you would swear I'm sawing someone
By the way they're running, you would swear the law was comin'
It's now or never, and tonight is all or nothin'
Momma, Jimmy keeps leaving on us, he said he'd be back
He pinky promised, I don't think he's honest
I'll be back, baby, I just gotta beat this clock
Fuck this clock, I'ma make 'em eat this watch
Don't believe me? Watch, I'ma win this race
And I'ma come back and rub my shit in your face, bitch
I found my niche, you gon' hear my voice
'Til you sick of it, you ain't gonna have a choice
If I gotta scream 'til I have half a lung
If I have half a chance I grab it — Rabbit, run!



A lot of people ask me
Where the fuck I've been at the last few years
Shit, I don't know
But I do know I'm back now

Here comes the rain and thunder now
Nowhere to run, to run to now
I disappeared, don't wonder how
Lookin' for me? I'm underground
Here comes the rain and thunder now
Nowhere to run, to run to now
I disappeared, don't wonder how
Lookin' for me? I'm underground

Dre, I'm down here, under the ground, dig me up!
Broken tibias, fibias, yeah, fix me up
Sixty sluts, all of them dyin' from asphyxia
After they sip piss through a Christopher Reeves sippy cup
Dixie cups, toxins, boxes of Oxy pads
Enough Oxycontin to send a fuckin' ox to rehab
Wack job in the back in a black stocking cap
Jackin' off to a hockey mask at a boxing match
I just did, faggot, now guess again
Better text message your next-of-kin
Tell 'em shit's about to get extra messy
Especially when I flex again
And throw a fuckin' lesbian in wet cement
Faggoty, faggoty, faggoty! Raggedy Ann and Andy
No! Raggedy Andy and Andy
No, it can't be, it can't be—yes, it can be
The fuckin' Anti-Christ is back, Dante
It's Satan in black satin panties
This is Amityville, calamity, goddamn it
Insanity, pills, fanny pack filled with Xannies
Through every nook and cranny, lookin' for trannies
Milk and cookies spilled on my silk négligée, looky
Razor-ba-lades with me to make you ba-leed
Cases of Maybelline makeup lay on a table of weed
Slim Shady? Shit sounds like a fable to me
'Til he jumps out of the fuckin' toilet when you're takin' a pee

Here comes the rain and thunder now
Nowhere to run, to run to now
I disappeared, don't wonder how
Lookin' for me? I'm underground
Here comes the rain and thunder now
Nowhere to run, to run to now
I disappeared, don't wonder how
Lookin' for me? I'm underground

Six semen samples, seventeen strands of hair
Found in the back of a van after the shoot with Vanity Fair
Hannah Montana, prepare to elope with a can opener
And be cut open like cantaloupe on canopy beds
And Glad bags, yeah, glad to be back
'Cause last year was a tragedy rhat landed me smack-dab in rehab
Fuckin' doctor, I ain't understand a damn word he said
I planned to relapse the second I walked out of that bitch
Two weeks in Brighton, I ain't enlightened
Bitin' into a fuckin' Vicodin like I'm a Viking
Oh, lightning is strikin', it might be a fuckin' sign I need a psychic
Evaluation, fuck Jason, it's Friday the 19th
And this is the kind of shit I think of regularly
Fuckin' lesbian shouldn't have had her legs in the way
Now she's pregnant and gay, missin' both legs and beggin' to stay

Here comes the rain and thunder now
Nowhere to run, to run to now
I disappeared, don't wonder how
Lookin' for me? I'm underground
Here comes the rain and thunder now
Nowhere to run, to run to now
I disappeared, don't wonder how
Lookin' for me? I'm underground

Tell the critics I'm back and I'm comin' to spit it back in abundance
Hit a fag with onions, then split a bag of Funyuns
Mad at me? Understandable, cannibal, shoot an animal
Out of a cannon and have 'em catapult at an adult
Captain of a cult with an elite following
To turn Halloween back into a trick-or-treat holiday
Have Michael Myers lookin' like a liar, swipe his powers
Replace his knife with flowers and a stack of fliers
Hit Jason Vorhees with a 40; stuck a suppository
Up his ass, and made him tell me a story
Gave Hannibal Lector a fuckin' nectarine
And sat him in the fuckin' fruit and vegetable section
And gave him a lecture
Walked up Elm Street with a fuckin' Wiffle bat drew
Fought Freddy Krueger and Edward Scissorhands too
And came out with a little scratch, ooh
Lookin' like I got in a fuckin' pillow fight with a Triple F.A.T. goose
Insanity, can it be vanity?
Where's the humanity in having a twisted fantasy
With an arm-and-leg amputee?
Straitjacket with a hundred and eight brackets
And a strap that wraps twice around my back
Then they latch it; cut your fuckin' head off
And ask where you're headed off to
Get it? Headed off to? Medic, this headache's awful!
This anesthetic's pathetic, so is this diabetic waffle
And this prosthetic arm keeps crushin' my hard taco

Here comes the rain and thunder now
Nowhere to run, to run to now
I disappeared, don't wonder how
Lookin' for me? I'm underground
Here comes the rain and thunder now
Nowhere to run, to run to now
I disappeared, don't wonder how
Lookin' for me? I'm underground

So, it wasn't a choice, it was "I had to do this"
And now I got 90 days clean
And uh, that's all I have to share, thanks
Is there anyone else who'd like to share this evening?)
"When you walked through the door you were queer to me
So come here, baby boy, just come here to me
You're a cock-boy, everybody wants you
You're gayer than you would ever claim to
I won't have to rape you
So, homie, lay down, down, down
Lay down, down, down
Lay down, down, down, lay down, lay down"
Where's everybody going?
This always went over real big in Gay-A
Okay, wait, I got another one
"I just love condoms and lots of cum"
No? Well, shit!



Used to get bent, now I represent to the fullest
Pencil is full of insolent bullets
I'm like a Doberman Pinscher, Pitbull and a Rott'
Mixed with a toxic, the plot begins to thicken
I begin to spittin' like vintage Pac
Demented, demonic, sinister
Ever since the Doc' replenished me
The day he gave me that shot when I was just about to quit
So to not see him with me would be a shocking image
And I'm the definition of what a concrete chin is
‘Cause no matter how many times you sock me in it
And knock me to the canvas, even the boxing critics
Know that if I get off to a rocky start, I'll always have a Rocky finish
Eat me brocoli, spinach, cocky? Nope
But I hope I offended you when I told ya how dope I am at
This and put emphasis on the "dope"
So when names come up, in that conversation of who's the dopest, better throw mine in it
And don't mind me, while I remind you of the flow
You won't find anywhere
When it fires and I unload, my pen explodes
'Til there's no rhymes in it, reload in no time
Let insults fly every 60 seconds that go by, so you know I meant it
In school I was so shy, timid
Two pairs of jeans I'd alternate, bummy clothes, I 'member
Begging my mom for K-Mart MacGregors
‘Cause they were new, St. Vincent de Paul
Those Pony's were used, and no size fitted
But kissed them old days, adiós, I did it
They said I was a gimmick
Now I'm the one that those guys mimic
Now you fuckers don't wanna go starting no argument
‘Cause you know I'll win it
Name a flow that's more authentic, and don't front

Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Don't front, you know I got you open, word
Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Yo, why you frontin'?
You know I got you open, kid

Rest in peace to Big Proof
You was a beast, you lyrically mirrored me
Molded my flow off of you, your spirit's flowing through me
I love you, Doody, without you I feel so incomplete
I'm no king, no need for rose petals to be thrown at my feet
I'm a thorn in your side, get thrown into a throne
Better watch the fucking tone that you speak
Feel like I'm in the zone, I'm in a whole different league
On my motherfuckin' own, it's just me
No opponents can compete
And I've never been known to retreat
From beef, be beat, follow trends or wallow in defeat
I'm still hungry as fuck but can't even say "Bon appétit!"
‘Cause I don't know what to eat
Fucking microphone or the beat
Bitch, nobody's mind works like mine
It's nose to the grindstone time, holmes, your mind's blown
‘Cause I rhyme like I'm still trying to get signed
Up in the Ebony Show-case
With Denaun screamin' "Who the fuck passed you the mic?"
Never asked you like my shit from the get
I'd rather ask you to wipe my ass, bitch
You had you a nice run, now take a hike
I ever meet my match, I'ma strike that bitch first
‘Cause on the mic I gotta represent the real rappers
The real rappers get their motherfuckin' skills crackin'
Word to Buckshot and Dru-Ha, why the fuck not?
You don't like it? Suck a cock! Almost forgot
Before I signed with the Doc, I almost signed with Duck Down
‘Cause Rawkus didn't make no offers, so motherfuck Loud
They jerked me around, so what's up now?
Wow, how much of an asshole would I sound like
Rubbin' it in and holdin' some grudge now? But don't front

Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Don't front, you know I got you open, word
Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Don't front, you know I got you open, kid
Yo, why you frontin'?
You know I got you open, kid

Late at night, used to catch a buzz, couldn't write
Now I write the type of shit to make you wipe
But wear diapers, ‘cause you might leave a streak
I'm on a streak windshield wipers couldn't wipe
It's hard to decipher what cypher I might jump into tonight
‘Cause I'm hyper or something
Needing someone or something is lighting
This fire under me, it's breathing new life
It's like I already died once
I guess some people only live twice, and it's funny
My days of being broke were so long ago
I lost all concept of money
But you dimes won't get a fucking nickle from me
Oh shit, I'm down on one knee
I'm having a stroke of genius – Elizabeth, I'm coming to you, honey
From boy to man
And still make a whore moan, like a thyroid gland
I'm in another category, man
Don't put me up with them pop stars
I never needed a pat on the back to get at a boy, band
No offense? Yes offense
Precedents has been set that'll never get met
Middle finger pressed against Moby's nose
Shouts to Obie, the curtains closed on my show
But never forget that I'm the one you thought wouldn't make it
You can't take it, oh
Got a whole generation of rappers coming up
That are nutty with the flow, but convince me you've heard
An MC since me who's as good with the fuckin' mincin' of words
Without mincin' words that'll make you feel like I'm pinchin' a nerve
Who's mentally disturbed
You might as well stick a knife in me and turn
It'll be like my skin being Indian burned
Hah, bitch, there isn't one, when will you learn?
Never been served, if memory serves
I'd battle that 'til my own recollection remembers these words

You know I got you open kid, stop frontin'
You know I got you open, Word Life



Music, reality
Sometimes it's hard to tell the difference
But we as entertainers
Have a responsibility to these kids... Psych!

If I were to die, murdered in cold blood tomorrow
Would you feel sorrow, or show love? Or would it matter?
Could never be the lead-off batter
If there ain't shit for me to feed off, I'm see-saw battlin'
But there's way too much at stake for me to be fake
There's too much on my plate
I done came way too far in this game to turn and walk away
And not say what I got to say
What the fuck you take me for, a joke? You smoking crack?
'Fore I do that, I'd beg Mariah to take me back
I'll get up 'fore I get down
Run myself in the ground, 'fore I put some wack shit out
Y'all steady tryna drown a shark
Ain't gon' do nothing but piss me off
Lid to the can of whip-ass, just twist me off
See me leap out, pull a piece out
Fuck shooting, I'm just tryna knock his teeth out
Fuck with me now, bitch; let's see you freestyle!
Talk is cheap, motherfucker, if you really feelin' froggish, leap
Yo, Slim, you gon' let him get away with that?
He tried to play you, you can't let him skate with that
Man, I hate this crap, this ain't rap
This is crazy, the way we act when we confuse hip-hop
With real life when the music stops

Ain't no getting rid of McVay, if so, you would've tried
The only way I'm leaving this bitch is suicide
I have died clinically
Arrived back at my enemies' crib with Hennessy
Got drunk then I finished him
I'm every nigga's favorite archenemy
Physically fitted to be the most dangerous nigga with beef
I spark willingly, with a Dillinger in the dark, diligently
I'm not what you think, I appear to be fucked up
Mentally endangered; I can't stay away from a razor
I just want my face in a paper
I wish a nigga had a grenade to squeeze tight
To awake neighbours for acres
I'll murder you; I gauge and have me turn into a mad man
Son of Sam; bitch, I'm surgical
I'm allergic to dying – you think not?
You got balls? We can see how large, when the music stops

I was happy having a deal at first
Thought money would make me happy
But it only made my pain worse
It hurts when you see your friends
Turn their back on you, dawg
And you ain't got nothing left but your word and your balls
And you're stressed from the calls of your new friends
Begging with their hands out
Checking for your record when it's selling
No girls, just the gin you drink till your car spin
You think "Damn!" when you slam into the wall
And you fall out the car and try to crawl with one arm
I'm 'bout to lose it all in a pool of alcohol
If my funeral's tomorrow
Wonder would they even call? When the music stops

Let's see how many of your men loyal
When I pull up looking for you with a pistol
Sipping a can of penzoil
I'm revved up; who said what? When lead bust
Your head just explode with red stuff, I'm handcuffed
Tossed in the paddy-wagon
Bragging about how you shouted like a coward
Bullets devoured you, showered you niggas
If I was you niggas, I'd run while given the chance
Understand, I can enhance the spirit of man
Death itself, it can't hurt me
Just the thought of dying alone that really irks me
You ain't worthy to speak thoughts of cheap talk
Be smart and stop tryna walk how Gs walk before we spark
Hug the floor while we playing tug-of-war with your life
Fuck a tour and a mic, I'd rather fuck a whore with a knife
Deliver that shit that coroners like
You hype, popping shit in broad daylight
Nigga, you're a goner at night; when the music stops

Instigators turn pits in cages
Let loose and bit the neighbors; wrist to razors
Y'all don't want war, y'all want talk
In the dark, my dogs all bark, like, "Woof!"
Proof, nigga, I'm a wolf
Get your whole roof caved in, like reindeer hoofs
Stomp the booth, shake the floor tiles loose
The more y'all breathe, shit, the more I moves
Put a gun to rap, check in all our dues
Or make the news, bet you all y'all move
When the Uzi pop, you better drop, when the music stop

Music has changed my life in so many ways
Brain's confused, been fucked since the 5th grade
LL told me to "Rock the Bells"
NWA said "Fuck the Police," now I'm in jail
Ninety-three was strictly R&B
Fucked up haircut, listened to Jodeci
Michael Jackson – who gon' tell me I ain't Mike?
Ass cheeks painted white, fuckin' Priscilla tonight
Flying down Sunset, smoking crack
Transvestite in the front, Eddie Murphy in the back
M.O.P. had me grimey and gritty
Ludacris told me to throw them bows
Now I'm in the hospital with a broken nose
And a fractured elbow
Voices in my head, I'm going in shock
I'm reaching for the Glock, but the music stops {*blam*}



Another day, another hotel, the inside of it is nice though, oh well
This is my life so as I go and try on clothes for tonight's show
To see how far that line goes, still blows my mind, show business
Guess I'll just never get, so this shit just always feels so weird
To this day because all's I ever did
Was just say the shit I would've wanted to hear
Other people say to me when I was a kid
So please don't make me some type of hero
Cause I will say some ol' inspirational shit in a real way
But still will have a field day with some of the fucked up shit
In the world and tell it to suck on the dick, cause I still make fun
Of a sitch someone's in like a son of a bitch at another's expense
I'm fuckin' relentless as fuck when it comes to this pen
I struggle with coming to senses, stuck on the fence
It's a balance beam, if I seem unbalanced, it's challenging
When my conscience allows me to think the most foulest
Childish things without even blinking, without even thinkin' about
All the stinkin' amounts of people that seems to be reachin'
But the crowds, they're screaming
And The Palace sold out this evening
But now it's lay me down to sleeping
Is it really my soul to keep, or have I sold it cheap?
Is it greed? And do I take more than I need?
When I joke of leavin', but keep overachievin'
Cause what it's stole from me I've barely broken even

I know, it's a fine, fine line
Living in hope or dire need
I know, it's a fine, fine line
Living in hope or dire need

So a martyr is how I paint myself
And through my harrowin' ordeals I’m so vain I want my respect
But ignore the butterfly effect that comes from my dialect
'Til I sit in the dark and I reflect
And my reflection shows what it's like here
Cause this vanity, surrounded by all these lights
Yeah, it's like a nightmare
I said, this vanity surrounded by these lights is a night mirror
And I don't like how I see myself, so I open the Bible to Isaiah
Cause I swear to Christ there are nights when I stay up and might
Say a prayer twice just to make sure God hears
Cause this ice layer I skate on's a nice way of putting it
But I like stayin' feistier than a triceratops and like a dice player
I got a nice paradise here, sealed off in my lair
Away from the bullshit good safe place to sit and talk shit from
And this house, is quite bare, but it ain't when you can't leave it
And I feel so isolated, it's nice I made it
But it's like I paid the price of fame twice, I hate it
So I bitch about my life then make another song
Vicious cycle ain't it, then wonder why I stay famous
I keep walkin' the line, this goldfish bowl gets old
But especially when you don’t know
If your conscience is sayin' I told you so
Cause you don't even know anymore
If you got the soul of a soldier, or you sold your soul


And from here you look so small
Hovering high above us all
Please come back to me

I still remember the times when
They were simpler than the rhymes of
Vanilla Ice were when I was just killin' the mics
I'll never forget what that feeling was like
I miss those times now when I was just starting out
Without a dime and, now I'm diamond
I can't even stage dive in the crowd anymore now when I've been
Stuck in this house hibernatin'
Hate even going outside
It sucks, sometimes I just wanna walk into Target and look at shit and browse, I don't even want to buy nothin'
I just wanna fuckin' walk around inside it
Look how excited I sound when I get to talkin' bout life and
Everything about it I miss, which now reminds me
Put a thousand lighters in the sky for the Outsidaz
Wow, I must have had Alzheimer's
Long time since I shouted them out, 'bout time
Cause it's been on my mind lately how
Zee, you always supported me
You vouched, I will never forget that and
How you guys accepted me for me and Pace
I love you too, you slept on my couch
And I've been thinkin' 'bout the time when I slept on the floor at The Outhouse
Rhyming's all we ever wanted to do
And regardless how life has turned out
Inside I'll, I'll always be an outsider
My life has been turned inside out but I


But I keep walkin' the line...



Yeah, haha, you feel that, baby?
Yeah, I feel it too, damn
You know, I'm so glad we could spend this time together
You see, I'm not as crazy as you thought I was, am I?

I’m the American Dream
I’m the definiton of white trash ballin’
I’m right back on 'em
Same shit, different toilet
Oh, you got a nice ass, darling
Can’t wait to get you into my Benz, take you for a spin
What you mean we ain't fuckin’? You take me for a friend?
Let me tell you the whole story of Shady’s origin
You’ll be sorry if you slam my Mercedes door again
Now, it all started with my father
I must’ve got my pimpin' genes from him
The way he left my momma
I’m a rolling stone, just like him, word to Johnny Drama
Keep my entourage with me, baby, I’ll make a promise
There ain't nobody as bomb as me
I’m as calm as the breeze
I’m the bee’s knees, his legs, and his arms
I'm a superstar, girl, I’m ready for you, mama
Why you think the only thing I got on is my pajamas?

So bad, I’m so good that I’m so bad
Guarantee I’ll be the greatest thing you ever had
‘Cause you ain't never met nobody like me
And you ain't gonna wanna fuck nobody else again
So bad, I’m so good that I’m so bad
Guarantee I’ll be the greatest thing you ever had
‘Cause you ain't never met nobody like me
And you ain't gonna wanna fuck nobody else again

I'm equivalent to a shot of Cuervo
First I’ll kiss your navel, work my way down
Baby, you can lay down on the table
But you may wanna find somethin' more stable
I told you I ain't fooling from the gate
This ain't the first day of April
But thank you for staying, April
I'ma make you learn to appreciate me, differentiate me
From these phony, little fishy and sissy fake G’s
Skip over the "huggy bear," and all the "kissy face," please
Initiate phase three, missy, now service me
Take another shot of Jäger, shakin' so nervously
Take your time, baby, oh, you’re the bomb, baby
Oh, you’re doing that even better than your mom, lady
I told you why I’m Shady, you didn't listen now, did ya?
Relax woman, you know that I’m only kiddin' with ya
Got a twisted sense of humor, its warped, but I didn't hit ya
I think you’re finally starting to get the picture
I’m just…

So bad, I’m so good that I’m so bad
Guarantee I’ll be the greatest thing you ever had
‘Cause you ain't never met nobody like me
And you ain't gonna wanna fuck nobody else again
So bad, I’m so good that I’m so bad
Guarantee I’ll be the greatest thing you ever had
‘Cause you ain't never met nobody like me
And you ain't gonna wanna fuck nobody else again

Call me dynamite, dynamite, dynamite, soul
Call me dynamite, dynamite, dynamite, soul
I can hold you in the morning
But in the evening I gotta go
‘Cause I'm on to the next girl
And the next girl I kind of like, oh

I got you caught up in the rapture
Make you recapture the feelings you had for
Your last boyfriend, before he slapped ya
You never wanted someone so bad, you're
Sweating, but if I’m what you wanted
Why’d you panic when I grabbed ya?
Girl, don't be so frantic, I’m just a hopeless romantic
Don't try to fight the feeling of somethin' that's so organic
You can’t ignore it, so don't, just stand before it
Just drop them panties to the floor, let’s get to camcording
Damn, shawty, I told you this was bound to happen
Soon as you wrote your number on the napkin
I was bound to work a number on your back
And throw your spine out of alignment
My love has got you so blind that
You couldn't pick Amy Winehouse out of a line-up
So stop at the store, pick a pint up
Let's get the pineapple Schnapps going, no one will knock
‘Cause I'ma hang a sign up saying "DON'T DISTURB"
Shawty, I’m so superb
I say the right things, don't I spit the dopest words?

So bad, I’m so good that I’m so bad
Guarantee I’ll be the greatest thing you ever had
‘Cause you ain't never met nobody like me
And you ain't gonna wanna fuck nobody else again
So bad, I’m so good that I’m so bad
Guarantee I’ll be the greatest thing you ever had
‘Cause you ain't never met nobody like me
And you ain't gonna wanna fuck nobody else again

Dynamite, dynamite, dynamite, soul
Dynamite, dynamite, dynamite, soul
I can hold you in the morning
But in the evening I gotta go
‘Cause I am on to the next girl
And the next girl I kind of like, oh

So bad, I’m so good that I’m so bad
Guarantee I’ll be the greatest thing you ever had
‘Cause you ain't never met nobody like me
And you ain't gonna wanna fuck nobody else again
So bad, I’m so good that I’m so bad
Guarantee I’ll be the greatest thing you ever had
‘Cause you ain't never met nobody like me
And you ain't gonna wanna fuck nobody else again



Nah man, not quite finished yet

Girl, I think you just might've tried
To pull a motherfuckin’ fast one, I’m mad
You just hurt my goddamn feeling
And that was the last one I had
Does this look like an arcade?
Tryin' to play games? See this saw blade?
See this silhouette of a stalker in your walkway?
Better cooperate or get sauteed
And rotisseried while you’re hog-tied
MC’s get so quiet
You can hear a motherfuckin' dog whistle when I walk by
Colt Seavers on a mule, stuntin' on that ass like the fuckin’ Fall Guy
I don’t gas my Mercedes after midnight, I treat it like a Mogwai
'Cause it will turn into a Gremlin
And run over kids, women, and men – Vrinn-Vrinn!
Motor so big you can fit a midget in his engine
Bitch, give me them digits, why you cringin’?
Not by the hair on my chinny-chin-chin
Will I spend-spend even ten cents on you, since when
Do you think it’s gonna cost me a pretty penny
Shit, if I think a penny’s pretty
Just imagine how beautiful a quarter is to me
Eenie-meenie-miney-mo
Catch an Eskimo by his toe while he’s tryin' to roll a snowball
But don’t make him lose his cool
If he hollers, better let him go, y’all

You don't own me
Now here we go, go, go

Get up, baby, get a move on like a U-Haul
You can rack your brain like pool balls
You won't ever think of this shit – yeah, honey, you called?
Well, here I come, Havoc on the beat, I wreak it
Evil – I see, hear, and speak it
Lady, put your money on Shady, fuck that other weak shit
Put your eggs in the same basket
You can count every motherfuckin’ chicken 'fore it hatches
'Cause you can bet your ass that we gonna get it crackin’
Like the Kraken and Titans when they're clashin'
Get your brains bashed in
So bad, you’re gonna have Kurt Cobain askin’
To autograph a bloodstained napkin
Unfashionable, and 'bout as rational as a rash on a fag’s asshole
Now let’s take that line, run it up the flagpole
With Elton, see if he’s cool with it
Don’t stand there and look stupid at
Me, bitch, I ain’t in the mood for this shit
Get my dick, Google it 'til it pops up
Y’all are so motherfuckin’ full of shit that you stopped up
Me, I’m always shittin' diarrhea of the mouth
'Til your speakers crap out Pfft, huh, what?
Girl you got a hot butt
But you won’t get a hot fudge sundae from me
So do not strut my way, slut, because–

You don't own me
Here we go, go, go

And now that I got your panties in a bunch
And your bowels in an uproar
I'ma show you why I came, so you stop askin' me what the fuck for
Now look you little slut, cunt, whore
I know you want more
Bitch, it’s time to put the math back into Mathers
'Cause I’m a fuckin’ problem – run, boy!
Every flow, got it mastered
So every last word that you fuckin’ fags heard
Comes straight from the fish's ass
Yeah, in other words, I’m a bass-turd
Looking at me like I killed Kenny
Gas in the tank, yeah, still plenty
No morals are instilled in me
So remorse, I really don’t feel any
Eat your heart out, Hannibal, understandable
Why you jealous? Fuck an animal, I got cannibal magnetism
Can't resist him now – can you, ho?
“Shady, I don’t understand your flow.”
Understand my flow? Bitch, I flow like Troy Polamalu’s hair, boy
Don’t you dare try to follow or compare, boy
I’m raw, you ain’t even medium-rare
Stay the fuck outta my hair, boy
You can look, you can stare, and point
But you can’t touch, I’m too clairvoyant
I don’t get it, man, is there a void?
All this weak shit, what am I, steroids?
Well, bitch, I’m back with some shit for that ass
And your trunk, elephant hemorrhoids
And remember, boys–

You don't own me
Here we go go go

Thank you for coming out
I hope you enjoyed the show
Until next time
Peace




I reckon you ain't familiar with these here parts
You know, there's a story behind that there saloon
20 years ago, two outlaws took this whole town over
Sheriffs couldn't stop 'em
Quickest damn gun-slingers I've ever seen
Got murdered in cold-blood
That old saloon there was their little 'home away from home'
They say the ghosts of Bad and Evil still live in that tavern
And on a quiet night, you can still hear
The footsteps of Slim Shady and Royce da 5'9"

I don't speak, I float in the air, wrapped in a sheet
I'm not a real person, I'm a ghost trapped in a beat
I translate when my voice is read through a seismograph
And the noise is spread
Picked up and transmitted through Royce's head
Trap him in his room, possess him and hoist his bed
'Til the evilness flows through his blood like poisonous lead
Told him each one of his boys is dead
I asked him to come to the dark side
He made a choice and said...

Who hard? Yo, I done heard worse
We can get in two cars and accelerate at each other
To see which one'll swerve first
Two blind bandits panic whose mental capacity holds that of a globe on top of nine other planets
Kissed the cheek of the Devil
Intelligence level is hellier than treble peakin'
On speakers in the ghetto
Dismissal, I'm not a fair man
Disgraced the race of an atheist
Interceptin' missiles with my bare hands like a patriot
One track sliced without swords
I buried the Christ corpse, in my past life
When the black knight mounted the white horse
And stay over-worked
It's like the Nazis and the Nation
Collaboratin', attemptin' to take over the Earth

‘Cause this is what happens when Bad meets Evil
And we hit the trees 'til we look like Vietnamese people
He's Evil, and I'm Bad like Steve Seagal
Above the law ‘cause I don't agree with police either

We ain't eager to be legal
So please leave me with the keys to your Jeep Eagle
I breathe ether in three lethal amounts
While I stab myself in the knee with a diseased needle
Releasin' rage on anybody in squeezin' range
Cold enough to make the seasons change into freezin' rain
And I'm pissed off, ‘cause I can't find a decent vein

The disaster with dreads
I'm bad enough to commit suicide
And survive long enough to kill my soul after I'm dead
When in danger, it's funny
Actually my flavor's similar to a waiter
‘Cause I serve any stranger with money
I spray a hundred
Man, until they joint chains, while slippin' bullets at point-blank range like they was punches
Piss on a flag and burn it
Murder you then come to your funeral
Service lobby and strangle your body to confirm it
Whippin' human ass, throwin' blows, crackin' jaws
With my fists wrapped in gauze, dipped in glue and glass
I'm blazin' emcees, at the same time amazin' emcees
Somehow, emcees ain't that eyebrow-raisin' to me
From all of angles of us, flash a MAC loud enough
To cast a avalanche and bust 'til volcanoes erupt

Hello? Ayo, what’s up?
We’re coming to get you!
Stop! THEY KNOW IT’S US!!!

I used to be a loudmouth, remember me?
I'm the one who burned your house down, well, I'm out now
And this time I'm comin' back to blow your house up
And I ain't gon' leave you a window to jump out of
Give me two fat tabs and three shrooms
And you won't see me, like fat people in steam rooms
And when I go to hell and I'm gettin' ready to leave
I'ma put air in a bag and charge people to breathe

‘Cause this is what happens when Bad meets Evil
And we hit the trees 'til we look like Vietnamese people
He's Evil, and I'm Bad like Steve Seagal
Against peaceful, see you in Hell for the sequel
Wall Street, Royce Da 5'9", Slim Shady

And so that's the story when Bad meets Evil
Two of the most wanted individuals in the county
Made Jesse James and Billy the Kid
Look like law-abiding citizens
It's too bad they had to go out the way they did
Got shot in the back coming out of that old saloon
But their spirits still live on 'til this day
Shhh…  wait, did y'all hear that?



Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood

I thought I had it all figured out, I did
I thought I was tough enough to stick it out with Kim
But I wasn't tough enough to juggle two things at once
I found myself laying on my knees in cuffs
Which should've been a reason enough for me to get my stuff
And just leave, how come I couldn't see this shit myself?
It's just me, nobody couldn't see the shit I felt
Knowing damn well she wasn't gonna be there when I fell
To catch me; the minute shit was heated, she just bailed
I'm standing here swinging on like thirty people by myself
I couldn't even see the millimeter when it fell
Turned around, saw Gary stashing the heater in his belt
Saw the bouncers rush him and beat him to the ground
I just sold two million records, I don't need to go to jail
I'm not about to lose my freedom over no female
I need to slow down
Try to get my feet on solid ground, so for now

Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood

Bury my face in comic books, ‘cause I don't wanna look
At nothing, this world's too much, I've swallowed all I could
If I could swallow a bottle of Tylenol I would
And end it for good, just say goodbye to Hollywood
I probably should, these problems are pilin' all at once
‘Cause everything that bothers me, I got it bottled up
I think I'm bottomin' out, but I'm not about to give up
I gotta get up, thank God I got a little girl
And I'm a responsible father, so not a lot of good
I'd be to my daughter, laying in the bottom of the mud
Must be in my blood ‘cause I don't know how I do it
All I know is I don't want to follow in the footsteps
Of my dad, ‘cause I hate him so bad
The worst fear that I had
Was growing up to be like his fucking ass
Man, if you could understand why I am the way that I am
What do I say to my fans when I tell 'em I'm

Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood

I don't wanna quit, but shit, I feel like this is it
For me to have this much appeal like this is sick
This is not a game, this fame, in real life, this is sick
"Publicity stunt" my ass, "conceal" my fuckin' dick
Fuck the guns, I'm done, I'll never look at gats
If I scrap, I'll scrap like I ain't never whipped some ass
I love my fans, but no one ever puts a grasp
On the fact I've sacrificed everything I have
I never dreamt I'd get to the level that I'm at
This is wack, this is more than I ever coulda asked
Everywhere I go, a hat, a sweater hood or mask
What about math, how come I wasn't ever good at that?
It's like the boy in the bubble, who never could adapt
I'm trapped, if I could go back, I never woulda rapped
I sold my soul to the devil, I'll never get it back
I just wanna leave this game with level head intact
Imagine goin' from bein' a no one to seein' everything blow up, and all you did was just grow up emceein'
It's fucking crazy, ‘cause all I wanted was to give Hailie
The life I never had
Instead I forced us to live alienated, so I'm saying

Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood
Saying goodbye, say goodbye to Hollywood





The days are cold, living without you
The nights are long, I’m growing older
I miss the days of old, thinking about you
You may be gone, but you’re never over

If Proof could see me now, I know he’d be proud
Somewhere in me deep down
There’s something in me he found
That made him believe in me, now no one can beat me now
You try, it’ll be them doors on Dre's Phantom, believe me, clowns
That means "suicide," homie
You’ll never throw me off of this course, blow me!
Bitch, I do this all for the sport only
But I want it all, I’m not just talkin' awards, homie
And the ball's in my court and it’s lonely
On top of the world, when you’re the only
One with the balls in your shorts
To leave their jaws on the floors with no re-morse
Remember that when they get to doggin' you boy, homie
So y’all can just get to bloggin' about bologna
I’m not gonna stop, the saga continues, no stoppin' the force, Obi
I’m moppin' the floors with them
I keep tryin' to pass it, but they keep on droppin' the torch
And it won’t be long 'til this sport is O-V-E-R
Just Blaze and me, we are knockin' on doors
And no we ain’t pumpkins on Halloween
But we’ll show up on your porch, so be
Careful what you say, there ain’t no punks over here, so follow me
Through the fog like I’m S-N-double-O-P
Let me guide you through the smoke, G
If only I wasn’t travelin' down this road by my lonely
No one who knew me like you will ever know me
I don’t think you understand how much you meant to me

The days are cold, living without you
The nights are long, I’m growing older
I miss the days of old, thinking about you
You may be gone, but you’re never over

And it don’t stop, oh-oooh
And it don’t quit, oh-oooh
And it don’t stop, oh-oooh
And it don’t quit, oh-oooh
And I miss you, oh-oooh
I just miss you, oh-oooh
I just miss you, oh-oooh
Homie, I’ll never forget you, nooo

For you, I wanna write the sickest rhyme of my life
So sick it’ll blow up the mic, it’ll put the "dyna" in mite
Yeah, it’ll make the dopest MC
Wanna jump off a bridge and shit himself
Tap dancin' all over the beat
It’ll jump off the page and spit itself
Yeah, it’s the best thing I could do
Right now, Doody, for you is to rep
So I’m gonna fuck 'til I die, yeah I'ma do it to death
And instead of mourning your death
I’d rather celebrate your life, elevate to new height
Step on the gas and accelerate, I'ma need two mics
'Cause the way that I’m feelin' tonight
Everything I can just do right
There’s nothin' that I can do wrong
I’m too strong and I’m just too hyped
Just finished the rhyme and I bust it
And—excuse the corny metaphor—they’ll never catch up
To all this energy that I’ve mustered
So God just help me out while I fight through this grieving process
Tryin' to process this loss is makin' me nauseous
But this depression ain’t takin' me hostage
I’ve been patiently watchin' this game
Pacin' these hallways, you had faith in me always
Proof, you knew I’d come out of this slump
Rise from these ashes, come right back on they asses
And go Mike Tyson on these bastards
And I'ma show 'em, blow 'em out the water, slaughter 'em, holmes
I’ma own so many belts, the only place they can hit me is below 'em
Homie, I know I’m never gonna be the same without you
I never woulda came in this game, I’m goin' insane without you
Matter of fact, it was just the other night
Had another dream about you
You told me to get up, I got up, I spread my wings and I flew
You gave me a reason to fight, I was on my way to see you
Layin' on that table, I knew
I was gonna make it; soon as you said "think of Hailie" I knew
There wasn’t no way that I was ever gonna leave them babies, and Proof
Not many are lucky enough to have a guardian angel like you
Lord, I’m so thankful
Please don’t think that I don’t feel grateful, I do
Just grant me the strength that I need
For one more day to get through
So, homie, this is your song, I dedicate this to you
I love you, Doody

The days are cold, living without you
The nights are long, I’m growing older
I miss the days of old, thinking about you
You may be gone, but you’re never over

And it don’t stop, oh-oooh
And it don’t quit, oh-oooh
And it don’t stop, oh-oooh
And it don’t quit, oh-oooh
And I miss you, oh-oooh
I just miss you, oh-oooh
I just miss you, oh-oooh
Homie, I’ll never forget you, nooo



I don't know why this world keeps turning round and round
But I wish it would stop and let me off right now
I don't know why this world keeps turning round and round
But I wish it would stop and let me off right now

Yes, man! As the world turns
We all experience things in life
Trials and tribulations that we all must go through
When someone wants to test us
When someone tries our patience

I hang with a bunch of hippies and wacky tobacco planters
Who swallow lit roaches and light up like jack-o-lanterns
Outsidaz, baby, and we suin' the courts
‘Cause we dope as fuck and only get a 2 in The Source
They never should've booted me outta reform school
Deformed fool, taking a shit in a warm pool
'Til they threw me out the Ramada Inn
I said it wasn't me, I got a twin
It all started when my mother took my bike away
‘Cause I murdered my guinea pig
And stuck him in the microwave
After that, it was straight to the 40 ouncers
Slappin' teachers and jackin' off in front of my counselors
Class clown freshman, dressed like Les Nessman
Fuck the next lesson! I'll pass the test guessin'
He'll never last, the only class he'll ever pass is phys-ed."
Maybe true, 'til I told this bitch in gym class
That she was too fat to swim laps, she need a Slim Fast
You walked into Vic Tanny's and stepped on Jenny Craig
She picked me up to snap me like a skinny twig
Put me in a headlock, then I thought of my guinea pig
I felt the evilness and started transformin'
It began stormin', I heard a bunch of cheering fans swarmin'
Grabbed that bitch by her hair, drug her across the ground
And took her up to the highest diving board
And tossed her down
Sorry coach, it's too late to tell me stop
While I drop this bitch face down and watch her belly flop

I don't know why this world keeps turning round and round
But I wish it would stop and let me off right now

As the world turns, these are the days of our lives
These are the things that we must go through, day by day

We drive around in million dollar sports cars
While little kids hide this tape
From their parents like bad report cards
Outsidaz, and we suin' the courts
‘Cause we dope as fuck and only get a 2 in The Source
Hypochondriac, hanging out at the laundromat
Where all the raunchy, fat, white, trashy blondes be at
Dressed like a sailor, standin' by a pail of garbage
It's almost dark and I'm still tryna nail a trailer park bitch
I'd like to treat you to a Faygo and a slice of pizza
But I'm broke as fuck
And I don't get paid 'til the first of next month
But if you would care to join me
I was about to roll this next blunt
But I ain't got no weed, no Phillies or no papers
Plus I'm a rapist and a repeated prison escapist
So give me all your money
And don't try nothing funny, ‘cause you know your stinking ass is too fat to try to outrun me."
I went to grab my gun, that's when her ass put it on me
With an uppercut and hit me with a basket of laundry
I fell through the glass doors, started causing a scene
Slid across the floor and flew right into a washing machine
Jumped up with a broken back
Thank God I was smokin' crack
All day, and doped up on coke and smack
All I wanted to do was rape the bitch and snatch her purse
Now I wanna kill her, but yo, I gotta catch her first
Ran through Rally's parking lot and took a shortcut
Saw the house she ran up in and shot her fuckin' porch up
Kicked the door down to murder this divorced slut
Looked around the room
That's when I seen her bedroom door shut
I know you're in there, bitch, I got my gun cocked
You might as well come out now
I walked in and all I smelled was Liz Claiborne
And seen her spread across the bed naked watchin' gay porn
I turned around to run, twisted my ankle and sprained it
She came at me at full speed, nothin' could stop her
I shot her five times and every bullet bounced off her
But she swallowed my fuckin' leg whole like an egg roll
With one leg left, now I'm hoppin' around crippled
I grabbed my pocket knife and sliced off her right nipple
Just tryna buy me some time
Then I remembered this magic trick
Duh-dah-duh-dah-duh-duh, go-go gadget dick!
Whipped that shit out, and ain't no doubt about it
It hit the ground, caused an earthquake and power outage
Stuffed that shit in crooked and fucked that fat slut to death
Take this mothafuckin' dick, bitch, come here!)

I don't know why this world keeps turning round and round
But I wish it would stop and let me off right now
I don't know why this world keeps turning round and round
But I wish it would stop and let me off right now
I don't know why this world keeps turning round and round
But I wish it would stop and let me off right now

And as we go along, throughout the days of our lives
We all face small obstacles and challenges everyday
That we must go through, these are the things
That surround us through our atmosphere, every day
Every single day the world keeps turning



They ask me am I okay, they ask me if I'm happy
Are they asking me that be
-cause of the shit that's been thrown at me?
Or am I just a little snappy and they genuinely care?
Doody, most of my life it's just been me and you there
And I continuously stare at pictures of you
I never got to say I love you as much as I wanted to, but I do
Yeah, I say it now when you can't hear me
What the fuck good does that do me now?
But somehow I know you're near me in presence
Oh, I went and dropped some presents off for Easter
To them two little beautiful boys of yours to try to ease their
Minds a little, and dog, you'll never believe this
But Sharonda actually talks to me now — Jesus!
And everyone else is just tryin' to pick up the pieces
Man, how could you touch so many fuckin' lives and just leave us?
They say grievance has a way of affectin' everyone different
If it's true, how the fuck am I supposed to get over you?
Difficult as it sounds

Doody, I dropped a tear in a rhyme
The day you find it is the day I stop missin' DeShaun
Holton, it was written, it was woven
For a soldier to leave so suddenly — got me wide open
How could God take a soul so dope and
Turn around and leave us all heartbroken?
Know that you're sayin', "Keep goin'!
Be a man! No emotion!"
It's your duty, until we meet again, Doody

"Doody" — that's what we'd call each other
I don't know where it came from
But it just stuck with us; we was always brothers
Never thought about each other's skin colors
'Til one day we was walkin' up the block in the summer
It was like 90 degrees, I was catchin' a sunburn
Tryin' to walk under the trees just to give me some comfort
I'm moanin', I just wanna get home and
I look over, and your shirt is off
I'm like, "You're gonna fry," you're like, "No, I won't
I'm black, stupid! And black people, they got melatonin
In their skin — we don’t burn," meanwhile my face is glowin'
And I feel like I'm on fire
And the entire time you're just laughin' at me
And snappin' at me with your shirt, bastard
And I still have to get you back for that shit
And by the way, them Playboy rings my mother stole from you
Well, Nate finally got 'em back, shit
It must've been at least sixteen years ago
Well, I put 'em in your cask— oww
Movin' past it, it still ain't registered yet
But you can bet, your legacy they'll never forget
The Motor City, Motown, hip hop vet
Hip Hop Shop, dreads, it don't stop there
Yeah, as difficult as it sounds

Doody, I dropped a tear in a rhyme
The day you find it is the day I stop missin' DeShaun
Holton, it was written, it was woven
For a soldier to leave so suddenly — got me wide open
How could God take a soul so dope and
Turn around and leave us all heartbroken?
Know that you're sayin', "Keep goin'!
Be a man! No emotion!"
It's your duty, until we meet again, Doody

And this might sound a little strange, but I'ma tell it
I found that jacket that you left at my wedding
And I picked it up to smell it
I wrapped it up in plastic until I put it in glass
And hang up in the hallway so I can always look at it
And as for all me and D12 we feel like "Fuck rap!"
It feels like our general just fuckin' died in our lap
We shut off all our pagers, all our cell numbers is changed
Our two-ways are in the trash
So some cats will have to find a new way
And I know it feels like the dreams will die with you today
But the truth is they're all still here, and you ain't
Purple Gang, you gotta keep pressin' on
Don't ever give up the dream, dog, I got love for you all
And Doody, it's true you brought people together
Who never woulda been in the same room if it wasn't for you
You were the peacemaker, Doody
I know sometimes you were moody
But you hated confrontation and truly hated the feuding
But you was down for yours whenever it came to scrappin'
If it had to happen, it had to happen
Believe me, I know you're the one who taught me to throw them bows back on Dresden
From eggin' cars to paintballin' and gettin' arrested
To sittin' across from each other in cells, laughin' and jestin'
They tried to hit us for five years for that, no question
I guess them hookers and bums that we shot up didn't show up for court, so we got off on a technicality, left sweatin'
Me, you and… what's his face? I forgot his fuckin' name
Shame he even came to your funeral, he betrayed our team
And if I see him again I'ma punch him in the fuckin' face
And that’s on Hailie Jade, Whitney Laine and Alaina’s name
I'll let the pistol bang once just to lick a shot
In the air for you, and pour some liquor out
With Obie in the parking lot of 54 just before
We were supposed to get in cars to come and see you once more
Difficult as it sounds

Doody!



I come around like what goes around, what goes up must come down
Anyone who comes up must go down, might as well go for the gusto now
Better not let up, better not let them breathe, last shot, give it all you got
Try to turn me down, bitch, get fucked with a volume knob, fuck all you snobs
Hoes, I hope all you rot, two bottles of Lubriderm and a box of condoms
Is that all you brought? And you want a ménage à trois, you twats?
Fuck that, I'd rather turn this club to a bar-room brawl
Get rowdy as Roethlisberger in a bathroom stall
Like a leech stuck in a vacuum y'all, ain't nothing but a whole lot of sucking
Going on in rap, yeah but I'm home, bad to the bone
Back in the zone, let him alone, you don't want to go eggin' him on
It'll never be my chair that you own, crown so tight that it cuts off
Circulation to the brain, no oxygen, other words, there's no heir to the throne
When I die so does hip-hop, Hitchcock of the shit, bitch ask Doc
Doc got it ziplocked in a bag, you fags ain't been able to fade me
Since Kid Rock had a high top, keep bloggin' while I mind-boggle
And I zone like I'm in the twilight, dog, get off my bone
This is my mic, doggonit; I like hoggin' it
Flow's so wet I'mma take this beat tobogganin', I'm waterloggin' it
I'm soggin' it, pull your verse out the beat and stomp on it
Suplexing it on cement like I'm on some "Straight Outta Compton" shit
Take this dick and chomp on it, I'm so bad I can bitch-slap
A back-handed compliment, jackass, eat a donkey dick
The game I just about conquered it, like Donkey Kong, I'm bonkers, bitch
I'm the king of this honkey shit, I reign supreme in this honkey shit
No sense screaming and arguing, makes no difference
Whether a Benz or Bentley or a Beamer's the car you in
You think you ball? Well, I palm it, I throw up bombs when I vomit
Boy, I throw down in the kitchen might hit your mom with my omelette
But you got egg on your face, now watch me drop an atomic
I should be strapped to the chest of a kamikaze
Bitch, I'm as batshit as Ozzy, it's obvious, you can tell right off the bat
No pun intended, but come any closer, I'll bite off your head
Tryna give me the finger's kinda like giving a spider the web
I'm just gonna spin it and try to use it to my advantage
I'll catch a fly in that bitch, you think you fly, you just food
I give as much of a flying fuck as that Superman dude
Guess I just do what you can't do and make you look stupid and bamboozled
Confused as usual and you can get whipped, she can open a can too
But you better hope you can handle the heat or stay the fuck
Outta Hell's kitchen, I came to cock block like a square
Fucking male chicken, yeah, it's Shady, slut; the rest
Can suck on a big one, cause I'm as despicable as Daffy Duck when I'm spittin'



In my mind I'm a fighter, my heart's a lighter
My soul is the fluid, my flow sparks it right up
An arsenic writer, author with arth-r-itis
Carpel-tunnel, Marshall with start shit-itis
Hard-headed and hot-headed
Bull-headed and pig-headed
Dick-headed, a prick, a big headache, I'm sick
Quick-witted for every lyric spitted
There are six critics who wait for me to slip with it
So quick, this dynamite stick, bury the wick
It's gonna explode any minute
Some lunatic lit it, and it's not Nelly
Do not tell me to stop yelling
When I stop selling I'll quit, so stop dwelling!
I am not failing, you fuckers are not ready
‘Cause I got jelly, like Beyonce's pot belly
This is destiny; yes, money, I'm off running
So get off of me, I'm not slowing or softening

No apologies! Nah, suckers, I'm not sorry
You can all sue me, y'all could be the cause of me
No apologies! Y'all feeling the force of me
No remorse for me, like there was no recourse for me
No apologies! Not even acknowledging you at all
'Til I get a call that God's coming
No apologies! Laugh, fuckers, it's all funny
I can spit in your face while you're standing across from me
No apologies!

My head hits the pillow, a weeping willow
I can't sleep, a pain so deep it bellows
But these cellos help just to keep me mellow
Hands on my head, touch knees to elbows
I'm hunched over, emotion just flows over
These cold shoulders are both frozen
You don't know me
I keep saying it, I can't stress it enough
So keep playing it, and stand next to the subs
I choke mics like asphyxiation
When I'm strangling my own throat masturbatin'
Fuck yeah, I'm a basket case, and
I master this rap shit 'til my ass gets wasted
'Til my assassination
'Til I'm slain because of some fag's infatuation
.44 mag's fascination
A taste for disaster, and if that's the case, then…

No apologies! Nah, suckers, I'm not sorry
You can all sue me, y'all could be the cause of me
No apologies! Y'all feeling the force of me
No remorse for me, like there was no recourse for me
No apologies! Not even acknowledging you at all
'Til I get a call that God's coming
No apologies! Laugh, fuckers, it's all funny
I can spit in your face while you're standing across from me
No apologies!

It's what he'll do just to see if he still has it
And if his skills mastered
He's able to spill raps long after he's killed
That's a real MC, got you feelin' me
Whether willing or unwillingly, you still agree
As long as there's still this hunger and will in me
Then expect a longer life expectancy
I'd be a savage beast, if I ain't had this outlet to salvage me
Inside I'd be exploding, soaked in self-loathing
And mourning, so I'm warning you don't coax me
It's silly, I’m really a sheep in wolf's clothing
Who only reacts when he gets pushed, don't be
Fooled, the press blows up this whole thing
It's stupid, they don't know, ‘cause they don't see
That I'm wounded, all they did was ballooned it
I'm sick of talkin' about these tattoos Cartoon did
That's why I tuned it out, I'm sick of dukin'
They can suck my dick while I'm pukin'
And you too, you can—

Expect no sympathy from me
I'm an MC, this is how I'm supposed to be
Cold as a G, my heart's frozen
It don't even beat, so expect no apologies
Expect no sympathy from me
I'm an MC, this is how I'm supposed to be
Cold as a G, my heart's frozen
It don't even beat, so expect no apologies



I pledge allegiance to the flag
Of the United States of America
And to the republic for which it stands
People! It feels so good to be back!
One nation, under God, indivisible
With liberty and justice for all
Mosh with me now!

Scrutinize every word, memorize every line
I spit it once, refuel, re-energize, and rewind
I give sight to the blind, my insight through the mind
I exercise my right to express when I feel it's time
It's just all in your mind, what you interpret it as
I say to fight and you take it as "I'ma whip someone's ass"
If you don't understand, don't even bother to ask
A father who has grown up with a fatherless past
Who has blown up now to rap phenomenon that has
Or at least shows no difficulty multi-taskin'
And juggling both, perhaps mastered his craft slash
Entrepreneur, who's helped launch a few more rap acts
Who's had a few obstacles thrown his way through the last half
Of his career, typical manure, moving past that
Mr. Kiss-His-Ass-Crack, he's a class act
Rubberband Man – yeah, he just snaps back

Come along, follow me
As I lead through the darkness
As I provide just enough spark that we need
To proceed, carry on, give me hope
Give me strength, come with me
And I won't steer you wrong
Put your faith and your trust
As I guide us through the fog
To the light at the end of the tunnel
We gon' fight, we gon' charge, we gon' stomp
We gon' march through the swamp
We gon' mosh through the marsh
Take us right through the doors, come on!

All the people up top, on the side and the middle
Come together, let's all form and swarm just a little
Just let it gradually build from the front to the back
All you can see is a sea of people, some white and some black
Don't matter what color, all that matters we're gathered together
To celebrate for the same cause no matter the weather
If it rains, let it rain – yeah, the wetter the better
They ain't gon' stop us, they can't
We're stronger now more than ever
They tell us "No!" we say "Yeah!"
They tell us "Stop!" we say "Go!"
Rebel with a rebel yell, raise hell, we gon' let 'em know
Stomp, push shove, mush; fuck Bush!
Until they bring our troops home, come on, just—

Come along, follow me
As I lead through the darkness
As I provide just enough spark that we need
To proceed, carry on, give me hope
Give me strength, come with me
And I won't steer you wrong
Put your faith and your trust
As I guide us through the fog
To the light at the end of the tunnel
We gon' fight, we gon' charge, we gon' stomp
We gon' march through the swamp
We gon' mosh through the marsh
Take us right through the doors, come on!

Imagine it pourin', just rainin' down on us
Mosh pits outside the Oval Office
Someone's tryin' to tell us somethin', maybe this is God just
Sayin' we're responsible for this monster
This coward that we have empowered
This is Bin Laden, look at his head noddin'
How could we allow somethin' like this without pumpin' our fists?
Now this is our final hour
Let me be the voice and your strength and your choice
Let me simplify the rhyme just to amplify the noise
Try to amplify it, times-it, and multiply it by six
-teen million people, all equal at this high pitch
Maybe we can reach al-Qaeda through my speech
Let the President answer a higher anarchy
Strap him with an AK-47, let him go
Fight his own war, let him impress Daddy that way
No more blood for oil
We got our own battles to fight on our own soil
No more psychological warfare
To trick us to thinkin' that we ain't loyal
If we don't serve our own country
We're patronizin' a hero; look in his eyes, it's all lies
The stars and stripes have been swiped, washed out and wiped
And replaced with his own face, mosh now or die
If I get sniped tonight, you'll know why—‘cause I told you to fight!

Come along, follow me
As I lead through the darkness
As I provide just enough spark that we need
To proceed, carry on, give me hope
Give me strength, come with me
And I won't steer you wrong
Put your faith and your trust
As I guide us through the fog
To the light at the end of the tunnel
We gon' fight, we gon' charge, we gon' stomp
We gon' march through the swamp
We gon' mosh through the marsh
Take us right through the doors, come on!

And as we precede
To mosh through this Desert Storm
And these closing statements
If they should argue, let us beg to differ
As we set aside our differences
And assemble our own army
To disarm this weapon of mass destruction
That we call our President, for the present
And mosh for the future of our next generation
To speak and be heard
Mr. President! Mr. Senator!

"Go left, go left, go left, right, left"
"Go left, go left, go left, right, left"

Can you guys hear us? *laughs*



Yeah
Same song and dance
Damn girl, everywhere I go
Same song and dance
I like the way you move, all over the globe
Same song and dance
Something about it, man
Same song and dance
In the pale moonlight

I'm looking at ya, yeah girl, you're kinda tooken back by
The whole rapper thing aren't ya?
Probably thinking you'll get slapped so dang hard ya
Won't even be able to stand up straight, aren't ya?
Couple rape charges, people think you're a monster
The police constantly bugging you non-stop
I walk up on ya, "Well, hello Tonya"
I think you got your OnStar button inside your car stuck
You out of gas? Do you got a flat?
I would hate for you to be stranded at the laundromat
I got your back
Why don't you put your laundry baskets in the back
And sit up front; I'm not asking, it's a trap
You just got jacked and body snatched, and it's a wrap
In broad day, and no mask for this attack
I heard 'em say exact opposites attract
If that's a fact, it'll take task force to get you back
Come on

Yeah baby, do that dance
It's the last dance you'll ever get the chance to do
Girl, shake that ass
You ain't never gonna break that glass
That windshield's too strong for you
I said, yeah baby, sing that song
It's the last song you'll ever get the chance to sing
You sexy little thing
Show me what you got, give it your all
Look at you bawl, why you crying to me?
Same song and dance

The first victim I had, she was a big one
Big movie star, a party girl, big fun
She was the girl the media always picked on
In and out of rehab every four-to-six months
She was always known for little pranks and slick stunts
At Nickelodeon, flashed the little kids once
What an event it was, I was sitting in front
I was hooked in at the first glimpse of them buns
Seen her backstage, now here's where I come in, son
Look, here she comes, I better pull out the big guns
Hello, Lindsay, you're looking a little thin, hun
How 'bout a ride to rehab? Get in, cunt
But starting off on the wrong foot is what I didn't want
Girl, I'm just kidding, let me start over again, hun
See what I meant was, we should have a little intervention
Come with me to Brighton, let me relieve your tension
You little wench, ya, murder wasn't my intention
If I wanted to kill you, it would've already been done
Slowly she gets in and I begin to lynch her
With 66 inches of extension cord

Yeah baby, do that dance
It's the last dance you'll ever get the chance to do
Girl, shake that ass
You ain't never gonna break that glass
That windshield's too strong for you
I said, yeah baby, sing that song
It's the last song you'll ever get the chance to sing
You sexy little thing
Show me what you got, give it your all
Look at you bawl, why you crying to me?
Same song and dance

My second victim was even bigger than the first
Pop star, icon, the whole works
She played a little schoolgirl when she first
Burst upon the scene and seen that the world was hers
She twirls and turns and flirts in skirts so bad it hurts
It irked me, it made me mad at first
I lashed out in my songs, but what was really going on
Was that I had developed a crush
I just didn't know how to tell it to her
Should I cut off one of my ears and mail it to her?
Send her pictures of my collection of skeletons, or
Footage of me impaling myself on an elephant tusk?
We'll settle this once and for all, I'mma tell her at dusk
Tonight, tonight is the night, and tell her I must
Creep up to her mansion in stilettos, and just
Climb the gate, and ring the bell, like "Hello, my love"
I just picked your prescription for Seroquel up
Now would you like to share a pill or two wit' me?
I'll share my Valium with you 'cause I'm feeling you, Britney
I'll trade you a blue one for a pink one
Ever since a schoolgirl juvenile delinquent
I've been feeling you, ooh-ooh, girl, you sexy little gal, you
Hold that pill any longer, it'll get sentimental value
C'mon, toots, give me the Valium alley-oop
I'll slam dunk it in your mouth 'til you puke
And just as soon as you pass out in your alphabet soup
I'm 'bout to make a new outfit out of you
New outfit? Shit, I'll make a suit out of you, shoot
Now show me how you move, baby, do how a-you do

Yeah baby, do that dance
It's the last dance you'll ever get the chance to do
Girl, shake that ass
You ain't never gonna break that glass
That windshield's too strong for you
I said, yeah baby, sing that song
It's the last song you'll ever get the chance to sing
You sexy little thing
Show me what you got, give it your all
Look at you bawl, why you crying to me?
Same song and dance

Same kicking and screaming, same crying and sobbing
Same song and dance
Same begging and pleading, same yelling and bleeding
Same song and dance
Yeah
Same song and dance
I know
Same song and dance



Who run it? You know
But you actin' like you don't know
We run it, yeah, you know
But you actin' like you don't know
Who run it? You know
But you actin' like you don't know
We run it, you know
But you actin' like you don't know
You know, you actin' like you don't know
I tear the club up fo' sho'
This flow is gon' bring mo' dough
And you know, but you actin' like you don't know

Now, homie, I say I "run it run it" because I'm in control
Hpnotiq, Hennessy, a couple shots of Patron
I have you feelin' a'ight, I get you high as a kite
Party poppin', shawty says she comin' with me tonight
I ain't shoulder leanin', I ain't snappin' and poppin'
Either I'm bobbin' my head or I'm just standin' there watchin'
I'm a hustler, I hustle; you can tell that I'm paid
And I protect what I got, I'm in the house with my blade
Nigga, you front, you gon' get it
Okay, now maybe I'm sidick
'Cause I want you to tridip, yeah, I be on that shidick
You should see when I'm stuntin'
I flash the stones to be wantin'
Push the whip, see me rollin', you can tell that I'm holdin'
I'm just doin' my thang, you know the Unit's the game
I got my grimy Shady with me
You front, you'll have to get me
It's not a big deal, it's nothin' but some cash

Who run it? You know
But you actin' like you don't know
I tear the club up fo' sho'
This flow is gon' bring mo' dough
Yeah, you know, but you actin' like you don't know
Who run it? You know
But you actin' like you don't know
I tear the club up fo' sho'
This flow is gon' bring mo' dough
Yeah, you know, but you actin' like you don't know

When me and Fif' got together to do this music
The more we became enveloped
We just developed a fellowship through it
It's no pretend shit, it's friendship
Mi nemesis es su nemesis
Same for him, it's just media
See, to them, it's just images
But this shit is no gimmicks, this is blood in and blood out
When there's beef you just gotta know
When to butt in and butt out
If there's a problem we solve it, if we don't resolve it
It usually just evolves into one big brawl
And we all get involved in it
And we should all get a merit, this much beef we inherit
And wear it like a badge with honor
Pass it around and share it
And let it go to whoever's holdin'
The most current beef on their shoulders
And their soldiers got their backs 'til it's over
But tonight we ain't come in here to beef with nobody
So it's Shady, Aftermizath, back in that ass, you wizzass
Come hizzon, what kinda fuzukin' quizition is that?

Who run it? You know
But you actin' like you don't know
I tear the club up fo' sho'
This flow is gon' bring mo' dough
Yeah, you know, but you actin' like you don't know
Who run it? I said, you know
But you actin' like you don't know
I tear the club up fo' sho'
This flow is gon' bring mo' dough
Yeah, you know, but you actin' like you don't know

Pistol play, ricochet, see where the victim lay
Slumped over bleedin'; J.F.K.
AK 'til your chest plate cave
I'ma ride to the death, do you rep that way?
Forever I'ma be a Shady 7-4 gangsta
Plus, I'll survive everything you got in that chamber
I thrive off of danger, jumpin' in all beef
You keep talkin' shit, now the squad have called me

Enough holdin' back the steam, Em let off a magazine
Dappadon Cappa queen mixed in with Ca$his creams
Started off with half a dream
Developed into what you see
Tellin' ain't my cup of tea, can't tell I'm a fuckin' G
I'm on automatic when I'm at it, start static
And you splattered, shit shattered
I'm a walkin' bitch magnet
Spit it how I live it, live it all the way to the limit
And I'm always on my pivot for my digits, you dig it?

Who run it? You know
But you actin' like you don't know
I tear the club up fo' sho'
This flow is gon' bring mo' dough
Yeah, you know, but you actin' like you don't know
Who run it? You know
But you actin' like you don't know
I tear the club up fo' sho'
This flow is gon' bring mo' dough
Yeah, you know, but you actin' like you don't know
Who run it?

You know who this is… Shady, G-Unit, Aftermath
Lloyd Banks, Ca$his, Marshall Mathers, Ferrari F-50
It's a movement; you can't stop it
Talk of New York, Tony Yayo



I feel phenomenal as usual
Pharmaceuticals, glue sniffin', pools of vomit at Bonnaroo
But I don't know if I'm in Tennessee, Chicago, or Houston
In the corner tryin' to seek solitude
Shallow but such a hollow dude
I won't even swallow solid food
Alcoholic too, plus I'm on lean like the Tower of Pisa
Top it off I'm on mushrooms, so fuck all of you!
Roses are violet, mollies are blue
Lost in a ball of confusion, it's all an illusion
It's probably the shrooms I'm on
‘Cause I think I started hallucinating, ‘cause I just thought I heard Jay Electronica and Odd Future's new shit
And all I could do was follow the music
And end up with Paula Abdul at Lollapalooza
Fillin' water balloons with nail-polish remover
Just to pop 'em and wallow in fumes
I feel uptight, I gotta get looser
After I finish polishing off this bottle of booze I got a solution
Concentrated like orange juice, so I'm not as deluded
‘Cause all this delusion got me seein' shit
Excusez-moi, but that hoochie that passed
You see her ass? Wouldn't make her my main squeeze
Butt juicier, ass, it belongs in a juicer
It's mouth-waterin' too
So I walked over to her, like, “I’m Marshall
Wanna try to meet my standards? I'll introduce ya"
Oh, I'm a misogynist too, but I'm not a masseuse
But my attitude is rubbin' off on the youth
Chronic abuser, and I don't mean a user of marijuana
I mean verbal assault that I use to smoke all of you losers
Got a bazooka, a shotgun, a Ruger, a Glock, and a nuke
And a Rottweiler too, and I'm not in the mood, so
When I say I'm bringing the TEC out
I'm not coming to repair your fuckin' electronic computers
God, I'm gonna puke, I'm so gone off the hookah
I think I swallowed a loofah
I'm tore up, demolished, I'm fuckin' stoned like Oliver
Like I looked Medusa in the eyeball to seduce her
The thoughts I produce are loony tunes
The box of reusable latex gloves and the socks and the shoes
That were placed next to Veronica's boobs
And the paycheck stubs that were stuffed in the glove box
In a blue Honda with used condoms were clues
The girl was just not the one suitable for him

Rearrange my head to be
Just right for you and me
Don’t laugh, please listen to me

Thought I’d give in to the pressure
Collapse and crumble perhaps, relapsing under that
Well, that's a bunch of crap
In the clutch, I'm the Captain Crunch of rap
And I'm sick of acting humble, that's enough of that
Fuck that shit, cut the sack
Like it's a natural reaction
That's why I'm actually trapped in this shoving match
‘Cause push keeps coming to that
I can keep getting my ass kicked and coming back
Like a sarcastic crumpled sack of shit, still mad
Disgruntled, had some struggles, yeah
But that passion and hunger's back
What a fantastic juggling act!
And the way I flip my tongue on the track
It's like verbal acrobatics, but in fact
Last time I tried to pull off a dramatic stunt as drastic
I fuckin' crashed my hovercraft
After I strapped a duffel bag to my back
And stuffed a massive punchin' bag in it
And an elastic bungee strap, rubber, plaster, a thumb tack
And a piece of plastic bubble wrap
Went spastic and fuckin' snapped
Jumped and splashed in a puddle of battery acid
Stumbled back, recovered, back flipped
And landed on a gymnastic tumble mat
And for my last trick, lunge on back
Latch on a NASA shuttle flap, fuckin' snap the rudder in half
Chuckled and laughed, utter my last rebuttal
And just as I'm to come crashin'
I grab my Go-Go-Gadget inflatable gigantic humongous mattress and ceramic construction hat
Rub my magic mushroom tat
For luck, then splat, get up from that
Face taped to a waste paper basket
Throw up, then gasp, lungs collapsed
And that's more likely than finding someone that's…

Rearrange my head to be
Just right for you and me
Don’t laugh, please listen to me

Couple of shots of Jäger
Public intoxication, dis-fuckin'-combobulation
Flooded with thoughts of anger
While I was away I know probably some of you got to thinkin'
"You're top ten, ain't cha?"
Stop it, you fuckers are talkin' crazy
And stop interrupting, you're not even up in that conversation
Whether you're punchin' a clock or famous
Underground, pop, or nameless
Whatever your job is, I give a fuck what's your occupation
You're thinkin' just ‘cause you came in with scrubs
And you brought the scalpel and sponge
The oxygen tank and the suction and shot the brain surgeon
Stuck in the operating room
Once you done swapped your name with him
Smuggled in Ronald Reagan
If you dug him up; Donald Fagen
While juggling waffles, bacon
A fuckin' McDonalds egg and cheese sausage bagel finagled it
Flung it across the table
Then bump it and knock it shake it
Jumped and got in the way, then disrupted my concentration
I said fuck it and lost my patience
They all woke up from sedation
Ain't none of you Dr Dre, so then what is it got you thinkin'
You can fuck with this operation?!
Aftermath, still running hip-hop amazin'
I'm still pluggin' along
No need for an assumption, here's confirmation
I'm up for the long duration
I'm just looking for something to walk away with
Some pocket change and a little integrity
Though I'll probably be jumpin' across the stage
'Til I'm fuckin' Madonna's age and
Stuck in an awkward place in my life
But I shit you not like I'm plugged up with constipation
That day will come
Before I finally stumble upon some lady that’s…

Rearrange my head to be
Just right for you and me
Don’t laugh, please listen to me




Gave you all the finger and told you to sit and twirl
Sold a billion tapes, and still screamed "Fuck the world!"
And shoot me 25 times in the same spot
I think I got a generation brainwashed
To pop pills and smoke pot 'til they brains rot
Stop they blood flow until they veins clot
I need a pain shot and a shot of plain Scotch
Purple haze and acid raindrops
Spike the punch at the party and drink pop
Shaved my armpits and wore a tank top
Bad Boy, I told you that I can't stop
You gotta make 'em fear you before you make 'em feel you
So everybody buy my shit or I'ma come and kill you

I got mushrooms, I got acid
I got tabs and aspirin tablets
I'm your brother when you need
Some good weed to set you free
You know me, I'm your friend
When you need a Mini Thin

I like happy things, I'm really calm and peaceful
I like birds, bees, I like people
I like funny things that make me happy and gleeful
Like when my teacher sucked my wee-wee in preschool
The ill type, I stab myself with a steel spike
While I blow my brain out just to see what it feels like
‘Cause this is how I am in real life
I don't want to just die a normal death
I wanna be killed twice
How you gonna scare somebody with a gun threat
When they high off of drugs they haven't even done yet?
So bring the money by tonight, ‘cause your wife
I try to keep it positive and play it cool
‘Cause I'm the one they can relate to and look up to better
Tonight I think I'll write my biggest fan a fuck-you letter

I got mushrooms, I got acid
I got tabs and aspirin tablets
I'm your brother when you need
Some good weed to set you free
You know me, I'm your friend
When you need a Mini Thin

I listen to your demo tape
Six months later you hear your lyrics on my shit
People don't buy shit no more, they just dub it
That's why I'm still broke and had the number-one club hit
But they love it when you make your business public
And if I told you I had AIDS, y'all would play it
‘Cause you stupid mothafuckas think I'm playin' when I say it
Well, I do take pills, don't do speed
Don't do crack, don't do coke, I do smoke weed
Don't do smack, I do do shrooms, do drink beer
I just wanna make a few things clear
My baby mama's not dead, she's still alive and bitchin'
And I don't have herpes, my dick's just itchin'
It's not syphilis, and as for being AIDS-infested
I don't know yet, I'm too scared to get tested

I got mushrooms, I got acid
I got tabs and aspirin tablets
I'm your brother when you need
Some good weed to set you free
You know me, I'm your friend
When you need a Mini Thin

Told you I was Shady
Y'all didn't believe me
I'm Shady!
And that's my name



Oh my goodness, what have I done?
Oh no, I can't believe it
It's like I've got the whole world in my palm
And I'm ready to drop bombs

Welcome to the Slim Shady Mecca, Rebecca
It's the village in New York right next to the Tribeca
That's my sector, homosexual dissector
Come again, rewind selector
I said, nice rectum, I had a vasectomy Hector
So you can't get pregnant if I bisexually wreck ya
Hannibal Lecter into guy sex, and I bet ya
I tantalize ya and in less than five seconds I get ya
They say once bitten and twice shy, well, lie next to the guy
With nine ecstasy pills and five extra
Boxes of ribbed condoms in quantities, why yessir
I took the rest of the Lunesta pills from my dresser
That's my kind of vibe, what else should I try, Lester?
Drop-kick the bitch before her second trimester
Perform the home abortion with Dexter
Then I guess I'll dig her fetus out with a wire hanger
Then digest her

I guess it's time for you to hate me again
Let's begin, now hand me the pen
How should I begin it and where does it all end?
The world is just my medicine ball you're all in
I said, I guess it's time for you to hate me again
Let's begin, now hand me the pen
How should I begin it and where does it all end?
My medicine ball, you're in my medicine ball, friends

All my Westside bitches throw it up
Put a balloon inside your pussy, queef, and blow it up
Man, I think that he just fell off the deep end, sure enough
So you better change the station to keep from throwing up
Man, you seen it all before, you're all too familiar with it
There's a penis on the floor and two balls, so you know who did it
You know you with it, girl, don't front, oh no you didn't
I won't rape all the Pussycat Dolls? Nicole, you kiddin'?
I'll pee on Rihanna, see, man, I do what I wanna
Spray perfume in the sauna room, crazy-gluing Madonna
To the La-Z-Boy sofa, fold her in two, then sit on her
Imagine a visual for that, man, who would've thought I
Could ever be such a relentless prick, unleashing his vengeance
But the chick's so old, she looks like she outlived a life sentence
I never meant this rhyme to be so offensive
If you weren't so defensive, it wouldn't be, you're so sensitive

I guess it's time for you to hate me again
Let's begin, now hand me the pen
How should I begin it and where does it all end?
The world is just my medicine ball you're all in
I said, I guess it's time for you to hate me again
Let's begin, now hand me the pen
How should I begin it and where does it all end?
My medicine ball, you're in my medicine ball, friends

Put Christopher Reeves on a unicycle with a kickstand
Kick it up and push him and lead him right into quicksand
Here, you need a hand, big man?
Grab hold of this branch with both hands
Man, they don't understand, I'm just a sick man
Now everybody's pissed at me, like it's my fault
This name rhymes with so many different words, jeez
So one last time, Mr. Christopher Reeves
Won't you break it down for me and just spit the verse, please?
Always hated you, and I still do
Doesn't even fit you, they don't feel you
Who do you think you are? Hang my suit up in the armoire
Every day I hate you more and more
Throw down the cardboard
Let's breakdance if you think you're hardcore"

I guess it's time for you to hate me again
Let's begin, now hand me the pen
How should I begin it and where does it all end?
The world is just my medicine ball you're all in
I said, I guess it's time for you to hate me again
Let's begin, now hand me the pen
How should I begin it and where does it all end?
My medicine ball, you're in my medicine ball, friends

The world is mine



Dahh-dum, dahh-dum... dum
Dahh-dum, dahh-dum, duh-da-da-da-da
Dahh-dum, dahh-dum... dum
Dahh-dum, dahh-dum, dumm...

Accidentally kill your family still

I get lifted and spin til I'm half-twisted
Pen full of ink, think sinful and rap sick shit
Shrink pencil me in for my last visit
Drink gin til my chin's full of splashed whiskers
Hash, whiskey, and ash til I slap bitches
Ask Bizzy he's been here the past six years
Mash with me again and imagine this

Accidentally kill your family still

I fucked my cousin in his asshole, slit my mother's throat
Guess who Slim Shady just signed to Interscope
My little sister's birthday, she'll remember me
For a gift I had ten of my boys take her virginity
And bitches know me as a horny-ass freak
Their mother wasn't raped, I ate her pussy while she was asleep
That's what I said at my dad's funeral

Accidentally kill your family still

That's why the city is filled with a bunch of fucking idiots still
That's why the first motherfucker popping some shit he gets killed
That's why we don't call it Detroit, we call it Amityville
You can get capped after just having a cavity filled
Ahahahaha, that's why we're crowned the murder capital still
This ain't Detroit, this is motherfucking Hamburger Hill
We don't do drive-bys, we park in front of houses and shoot
And when the police come we fucking shoot it out with them too
That's the mentality here, that's the reality here
Did I just hear somebody say they want to challenge me here
While I'm holding a pistol with this many calibers here
Plus a registration that just made this shit valid this year
Cause once I snap, I can't be held accountable for my actions
And that's when accidents happen
When a thousand bullets come at your house
And collapse the foundation around and they found you
And your family in it
GOD DAMMIT HE MEANT IT WHEN HE TELLS YOU

Accidentally kill your family still

Dum, tahh-dum... ta-dah-da
Dum, tahh-dum... ta-dah-da
Dum, tahh-dum... ta-dah-da
Dum, tahh-dum... ta-dah-da
Dum, tahh-dum... ta-dah-da
Dum, tahh-dum... ta-dah-da
Dum, tahh-dum... ta-dah-da
Dum, tahh-dum... ta-dah-da
Dum...



Hailie, what do you want to be when you grow up, baby?
I don't know, but I don't want to
Grow up to be like Ja Rule's little dirty-ass kids
Ha ha, yeah, c'mon
G-G-G-G-G-G-G Unit
Hailie, come here, baby! Bring Daddy his Oscar!
We're gonna shove it up Ja Rule's ass

I'm about to get rid of some hoes, it's simple
I'm quick to murder ink with lead
And I ain't talking 'bout a pencil
Look at what the fuck you done got into
I see you found your niche, you just a bitch with a menstrual
Claiming you a murderer, and you spelled it wrong
You put E before the D, ‘cause that's all you on
You on Pac's dick, you a replica guy
If he was still alive, you would never get by
All you do is cry, bitch, keep it real
Life is more than imitating niggas and eating pills
And what kind of motherfucker ruins three deals
That another nigga got you? They didn't see skills
And I ain't playin', you a brother getting cheated
And Ja Rule be prayin' on his cover, ‘cause he need it
And all you niggas hating, shut your mouths!
It's just that real niggas ain't buying that shit y'all put out

Doe, rae, me, but we don't sing, motherfuckers
So Murder Inc, do your thing, motherfuckers
You unleashed on a team
Who expects nothin' less than R&B coming from that regime
"Regime" is a little extreme
Neck and neck with soldiers, motherfuckin' Marines
Ja sold his soul to sing
Weave eye-witness team on the TV screen, chase the greed
Now that you've embraced the green
Don't fuck with the triple beams
You's a motherfuckin' actor, slash Pac impersonating rapper
Slash Billie Holiday – how it happen?
Artist and repertoire saw him in action
Pac assassination, Def Jam grabbed him
Told him, "Reenact him, you go platinum!"
They seen it for sure, I know that Afeni Shakur
Don't enjoy Jeffrey Atkins reenacting her boy
So I'm click-clackin' this toy, mash and destroy
Shady slash Aftermath and Detroit, motherfucker!

Doe rae me, fa-so-la-ti-da
Don't blame me ‘cause you washed up, lost your spot
Mama-say-mama-sa-ma-macosa
Ja, quit playin', knock it off, you're not 2Pac
Don't hate me, I'm too hot and you're not
Shooting at me, with the only shot you got
Ja, quit playin', knock it off, you're not 2Pac
You'll get popped poppin' all that shit you pop

Now, we can get past the mean mugs and get to the slugs
To the grievance and the crying and the intimate hugs
We don't take you serious, nigga, you shook
You half of a half-way crook; get off X dick, go sing a hook!
Nigga, and you can't replace the late great one
And when you gone you only gon' be the late fake one
Nigga, please stick to the script
Before the guns stick to the clip
And Benzino, you ain't shit but a bitch!
Fuckin' old-ass, ignorant, innocent-lookin' senior citizen
Built up, slap you like Grimace, all sensitive
A bitch-made man; now, how you gonna connect
With them short ass arms, like a Tyrannosaurus Rex
You niggas can scream, holler and curse
Go ahead and respond
And pull that pen and pad up outta your purse

Slim didn't send Proof to get at the wankstas
He told me to let loose and spit at the gangstas
What up, Gotti? And this little war you pushed on
Put your ear to the ground for stepping on bush stones
What's wrong? Didn't think we strong with real niggas?
Roll like a boss, in the streets they still feel us
It's real business, y'all ain't caught the concept
You talking nonsense to walking bomb threats
Contact was blown by Benzetta in The Source
Threaten at the boss, you gon' see me on your porch
Now Irv got the nerve to try to serve on us
But Detroit niggas early and ain't scurred to bust

Word to my nigga Bugz, punks like you get beat up
Stomped unconscious and smacked with the heater
This rap cookie monster gets jabbed in the tonsils
With dicks so much that he should be fixed with a vagina
Who's behind ya? Cadillac Pac or that transvestite?
That dress like a Lil Kim fox
You're just like a little windbox
Press tight on the trigger of this Glock
Swallow that little shit you got left to help you eat
You knock Pac's songs without love to help you sleep
You got shot in your video trying mock Pac
You Mockaveli; get your own identity!

Doe rae me, fa-so-la-ti-da
Don't blame me ‘cause you washed up, lost your spot
Mama-say-mama-sa-ma-macosa
Ja, quit playin', knock it off, you're not 2Pac
Don't hate me, I'm too hot and you're not
Shooting at me, with the only shot you got
Ja, quit playin', knock it off, you're not 2Pac
You'll get popped poppin' all that shit you pop

Don't you never say my little girl's name in a song again
Fuckin' punk-pussy bitch! I'll fuck you up, boy! Never!
Don't you never in your motherfuckin' life…
I'll choke the shit out of you little motherfuckin' midget
Hailie'll whip your motherfuckin' ass

That's right, motherfuckers
Shady records, what you know about it?
Fuck Benzino! Fuck Ja Rule!
Nigga, this Obie Trice right here talkin' to you motherfuckers
Ja Rule punk ass, yeah, fuckin' Soul 4 Real ass
Nigga, that's Soul 4 Real
That the nigga from Soul 4 Real!
Candy Rain-ass nigga, he got a deal, now he rappin'
You don't know what's, faggot-ass motherfuckers
Get money to all my real niggas, man
Obie Trice, D-12, G Unit, 50 Cent, Hailie Jade

Daddy, is Ja Rule taller than me?
No, honey, you guys are the same size



This motherfucker, man!
Just won't shut up, will you?
Talking 'bout I owe him
Bitch, you owe me!
I'm promotin' you right now
Yo, let's put the nail in his coffin!

I don't wanna be like this
I don't really wanna hurt no feelings
But I'm only being real when I say
And old men have heart attacks
And I don't wanna be responsible for that
So, put the mic down and walk away
You can still have a little bit of dignity

I would never claim to be no Ray Benzino
An 83-year-old fake Pacino
So how can he hold me over some balcony
Without blowing his lower back out
As soon as he goes to lift me?
Please don't—you'll probably fall with me
And our asses'll both be history
But then again you'd finally get your wish
‘Cause you'll be all over the street, like 50 Cent
Fuckin' punk pussy! Fuck you, chump!
Give me a one-on-one, see if I don't fuck you up
Tried to jump the Ruff Ryders and they cut you up
And you put Jada on a track, that's how much you suck
Dick in the industry, swear that you in the streets hustlin'
You sit behind a fuckin' desk at The Source butt-kissin'
And beggin' motherfuckers for guest appearances
And you can't even get the clearances
‘Cause real lyricists don't even respect you or take you serious
It's not that we don't like you—we hate you, period
Talk about a mid-life crisis, damn
Last week you was shakin' Obie Trice's hand
Now he's a buster? What the fuck's with that?
Get on a track dissin' us, kissin' 50's ass
And askin' me what I know about indictments, bite me!
Bitch, I got two cases and probation—fight me!
What do I know about standin' in front of a judge like a man
Ready to take whatever sentence he hands?
What you know about your wife slicin' her wrists, right in front of the only thing you have in this world, a little girl?
And I put that on her, when this is all over
I would never try to make her a star and eat off her
I don't know shit about no choppin' rocks
But what you know about Hip Hop Shops rockin' spots
Where you the only white boy up in that bitch just rippin'?
Pressin' up your own fliers and your stickers, stickin'
Them bitches up after spendin' six hours at Kinko's
Just makin' copies of your covers of cassette singles
To sell them out of the trunk of your Tracer
Spendin' your whole paychecks at Disc Makers
What you know about being bullied over half your life?
Oh, that's right, you should know what that's like
You're half white; Vanilla Ice, spill the beans and rice
I'm eatin' you alive inside, Jesus Christ!
If you're that much of a gangsta, put the mic down!
You should be out killin' motherfuckers right now
Kill a motherfucker dead, kill him dead, bitch!
Shoot 'em in the fuckin' head—go ahead, bitch!
Slap my mom! Slap the fuck out of her!
She can't sue you, she wouldn't get a buck out of ya
‘Cause you're broke as fuck, you suck, you're a fuckin' joke
If you was really sellin' coke, well, then what the fuck
You stop for, dummy? If you slew some crack
You'd make a lot more money than you do from rap
You'll never have no security, you'll never be famous
You'll never know what it's like to be rich; life's a bitch, ain't it?
Raymond? Here, let me break the shit down in layman's
Terms for you, just to make sure that you can understand it
And Canibus ain't using
Too many complicated fuckin' words for you
Here, let me slow it down for you, so that you could understand if I say it slower… Let it go, dog, it's over

I don't wanna be like this
I don't really wanna hurt no feelings
But I'm only being real when I say
And old men have heart attacks
And I don't wanna be responsible for that
So, put the mic down and walk away
You can still have a little bit of dignity

Haha… talking 'bout I have motherfuckers callin' your crib
Bitch, you ain't even got a fuckin' crib!
You ain't even got a fuckin' phone… fuckin' bum!
Threatenin' to shut me down at your lil' fuckin' Source magazine, if I come back on you and attack you
Bitch, you attacked me first!
Take it like a man, and shut the fuck up!
Fuck your little magazine too!
I don't need your little fuckin' magazine
I got XXL's number anyways
And y'all can't stand it, ‘cause they gettin' bigger than y'all
Oh, and by the way, how'd I look on the VMA's?
When you was watchin' me
From whatever fuckin' TV you was watchin' me from
From Boston… the mean streets of Boston
Fuckin' sissy! And you got us scared up in here, motherfucker?
Suck our motherfuckin' dicks!
Oh! And for those that don't know



Obie, yo
I'm sick
Damn, you straight, dog?

That's why I ain't got no time
For these games and stupid tricks
All these bitches on my dick
That's how dudes be gettin' sick
That's how dicks be gettin' drips
Fallin' victims to this shit
From these bitches on our dicks
Fuckin' chickens with no ribs
That's why I ain't got no time

Yo, I woke up, fucked up off the liquor I drunk
I had a bag of the skunk, one and last night's tunk
Pussy residue was on my penis
Denise from the cleaners fucked me good, you shoulda seen us
Big booty bitch, switch unbearable
French role stylin', body like a stallion
Sizin' up the figure, while my shit gettin' bigger
Debatin' on to fuck her, do I wanna be her nigga?
Caressin' this bitch, plus I'm checkin' out them tits
Sippin' on that fine shit I ain't used to buyin'
I gotta hit it from behind, it's mandatory
Like takin' hoes' money, but that's another story
For surely your pussy on toast, after we toast
Her clothes fell like Bishop in Juice
The womb beater, clean pussy eater, insertin' my jock
In that spot hotter than the hottest block
"Don't stop!" – response I got when I was knockin' it
Clocks steady tickin', kinky finger lickin'
And carryin' on, semen at my tip when she moans
I gotta slow down before I cum soon
And work that nigga like a slave owner
When I dropped off my outfit she knew I wanted to bone her
She foamin' at the lips, the ones between the hips
Pubic hair's lookin' like some sour cream dip
Without the nacho, my dick hit the spot though
Pussy tighter than conditions of us black folks
We in the final stretch, the last part of sex
I bust a fat-ass nut, then I woke up next
Like, what the fuck is goin' on here? This bitch evaporated
Pussy and all just picked up and vacated
And now I'm frustrated, ‘cause my dick was unprotected
And doctor Wesley tellin' me I really got that shit – fuck!

That's why I ain't got no time
For these games and stupid tricks
All these bitches on my dick
That's how dudes be gettin' sick
That's how dicks be gettin' drips
Fallin' victims to this shit
From these bitches on our dicks
Fuckin' chickens with no ribs
That's why I ain't got no time

Now I don't wanna hit no woman, but this chick's got it comin'
Someone better get this bitch 'fore she gets kicked in the stomach
And she's pregnant, but she's eggin' me on
Beggin' me to throw her off the steps on this porch
My only weapon is force
And I don't wanna resort to violence of any sort
But what's she shovin' me for? Doesn't she love me no more?
Wasn't she huggin' me four minutes ago at the door?
Man, I'm this close to goin' toe-to-toe with this whore
What would you do if she was tellin' you she wants a divorce
She's havin' another baby in a month and it's yours
And you found it isn't, ‘cause this bitch has been visitin'
Someone else and suckin' his dick and
Kissin' you on the lips when you get back to Michigan
Now the plot is thickenin' worse
‘Cause you feel like you've been stickin' your fuckin' dick in a hearse
So you're paranoid at every little cold that you get
Ever since they told you this shit, you've been holdin' your dick
So you go to the clinic, sweatin' every minute you're in it
Then the doctor comes out, lookin' like Dennis the Menace
And it's obvious to everyone in the lobby it's AIDS
He ain't even gotta to call in you the office to say it
So you jet back home, ‘cause you gon' get that ho
When you see her, you gonna bend her fuckin' neck back, yo
‘Cause you love her, you never woulda expect that blow
Obie told you the scoop, how could she stoop that low?
Jesus, I don't believe this bitch works at the cleaner's
Bringin' me home diseases, swingin' from Obie's penis
She's so deceivin', shit, this ho's a genius, she geed us

That's why I ain't got no time
For these games and stupid tricks
All these bitches on my dick
That's how dudes be gettin' sick
That's how dicks be gettin' drips
Fallin' victims to this shit
From these bitches on our dicks
Fuckin' chickens with no ribs
That's why I ain't got no time

I'm busy
Yeah, fuck these bitches!
Fuck 'em all!
Get money, Shady Records
Ha, whoa!
Obie Trice! Eminem, motherfucker!
New millennium shit, yeah
Turn this shit off, turn this shit the fuck off!



Tell myself that I was doing alright
There's nothing left to do tonight
But go crazy on you
Crazy on you
Let me go crazy, crazy on you

Can't you see what you do to me, baby?
You make me crazy, you make me act like a maniac
I'm like a lunatic, you make me sick
You're truly the only one who can do this to me
You just make me get so crazy
I go schizo, I get so insane I just go schizophrenic
One minute I wanna slit your throat, the next I wanna sex
You make me crazy, the way we act
Like two maniacs in the sack
We fuck like two jackrabbits
And maybe that's a bad habit
'Cause the next day we're right back at it
In the same exact pattern
What the fuck is the matter with us?
We can't figure out if it's lust or it's love
What's that that's attractin' us to each other?
They say that every man grows up to marry his own mother
Which would explain why you're such a motherfuckin' bitch
But I stay and still stick it out with you
Even though I just hit you today
But you deserve it, you hit me first and provoked me to choke you
Just 'cause I came home late last night
Crawled in bed and I woke you
But if there's one thing about you that I admire it's, baby
Because you stay with me, maybe
Because you're as crazy as I am
'Cause when I look at you I can see an angel in your eyes
But if I look deeper inside I see your freakish little side
Like a devil in disguise, you're always full of surprises
You fucked yourself so much you barely feel those anymore
You're only twenty-four, but you're plenty more ma-ture
Than those other little hoes who just act like little girls
Like they're in middle school still
You're crazy, sexy, cool, chill
And you play your position, you never step outta line
Even though I stay in your business you've always kept outta mine
I wonder what's on your mind
Sometimes they say love is blind
Maybe that's why the first time
I dotted your eye you ain't see the sign
Or maybe you did, maybe you like being shoved
Maybe 'cause we're crazy in love

Go crazy on you
Crazy on you
Let me go crazy, crazy on you

You are the ink to my paper, what my pen is to my pad
The moral, the very fiber, the whole substance to my rap
You are my reason for being, the meaning of my existence
If it wasn't for you I would never be able to spit this
As intense as I do, and the irony is you rely on me
As much as I rely on you to inspire me like you do
You provide me the lighter fluid, the fuel to my fire
The only way that I am able to stay so stable
Is you're the legs to my table
If you were to break I'd fall on my face
But I'm always gonna make you feel I don't need you as much
As I really need you so you don't use it to your advantage
But you're essential to me, you're the air I breathe I believe
If you ever leave me I'd probably have no reason to be
You are the Kim to my Marshall, you're the Slim to my Shady
The Dre to my Eminem, the Alaina to my Hailie
You are the word that I'm lookin' for
When I'm tryin' to describe how I feel inside
And the right one just won't come to my mind
You're like the pillar that props me up, the beam that supports me
The bitch who never took half, the wife who never divorced me
You're like the root to my evil, you let my devil come out me
You let me beat the shit out you before you beat the shit out me
And no matter how much, too much is never enough
Maybe 'cause we're crazy in love

Go crazy on you
Crazy on you
Let me go crazy, crazy on you



And everyone should get along
Okay, children, quiet down, quiet down!
Children, quiet down please!
Mr. Shady will be your new substitute
Good luck, Mr. Shady!

Today we're gonna to learn how to poison squirrels
But first, I'd like you to meet my friend Bob
Bob's 30 and still lives with his mom
And he don't got a job 'cause Bob sits at home and smokes pot
But his twelve-year-old brother looks up to him an awful lot
And Bob likes to hang out at the local waffle spot
And wait in the parking lot for waitresses off the clock
When it's late and the lot gets dark
And fake like he walks his dog
Drag 'em in the woods and go straight to the chopping blocks
The ladies would all be so afraid, they would drop the charge
'Til one night Mrs. Stacey went off the job
When she felt someone grab her whole face and said not to talk
But Bob wouldn't knock it off, 'cause he's crazy and off his rocker
Crazier than Slim Shady is off the vodka
You couldn't even take him to Dre's to get Bob a doctor
He grabbed Stace' by the legs as he chopped it off her
And dropped her off in the lake for the cops to find her
But ever since the day Stacey went off to wander
They never found her, and Bob still hangs at the waffle diner
And that's the story of Bob and his marijuana
And what it might do to you
So see if the squirrels want any—it's bad for you

Drugs are just bad, mmkay?

My penis is the size of a peanut, have you seen it?
Speakin' of peanuts, you know what else is bad for squirrels?
Ecstasy, it's the worst drug in the world
If someone ever offers it to you, don't do it
Kids, two hits'll probably drain all your spinal fluid
And spinal fluid is final, you won't get it back
So don't get attached, it'll attack every bone in your back
Meet Zach, twenty-one years old
After hangin' out with some friends at a frat party, he gets bold
And decides to try five, when he's bribed by five guys
And the peer pressure will win every time you try to fight it
Suddenly, he starts to convulse
And his pulse goes into hyperdrive
And his eyes roll back in his skull {​​​*blblblblblb*}​​​
His back starts to look like the McDonald's Arches
He's on Donald's carpet, layin' horizontal barfin' {​​​*BLEH*}​​​
And everyone in the apartment starts laughin' at him
"Hey Adam, Zach is a jackass, look at him!"
'Cause they took it too, so they think it's funny
So they're laughing at basically nothing
Except maybe wasting the money
Meanwhile, Zach's in a coma, the action is over
And his back and his shoulders
Hunched up like he's practicin' yoga
And that's the story of Zach, the ecstasy maniac
So don't even feed that to squirrels, class, 'cause it's bad for you

Drugs are just bad, mmkay?

And last but not least, one of the most humungous
Problems among young people today is fungus
It grows from cow manure
They pick it out, wipe it off, bag it up
And you put it right in your mouth and chew it
Yum yum! Then you start to see some dumb stuff
And everything slows down when you eat some of 'em
Like fat women in G-strings with orange hair
And if you swallow too much of the magic mushrooms
Whoops, did I say magic mushrooms? I meant fungus
Your tongue gets all swoll up like a cow's tongue
See, drugs are bad, it's a common fact
But don't be me, 'cause if you grow up and you go and OD
They're gonna come for me and I'ma have to grow a goatee
And get a disguise and hide, 'cause it'll be my fault
So don't do drugs, and do exactly as I don't, 'cause I'm bad for you

Drugs are just bad, mmkay?

Drugs are just bad, drugs are just bad



If there's any bitches in this room
Then there's somethin' I gotta say
For all the fools who fell for the first girl who comes their way
I've been down that road
And now I'm back, sittin' on square one
Tryna pick myself up where I started from

I never woulda thought that I'd see you out of control
Even though my penis was deep down in your hole
You should know, between us we was like mates of soul
Nothin' could intervene us, especially no hoes
You was more so the chalant type I chose
To more shows, haunted you nights, I suppose
In the beginning friends, we decided to roll
So who's responsible when you get excited, explode
And Obie's grinnin', then you invite that Obie's cold?
But bitches, they gon' talk; niggas, they gon' hate
We established this way before we became mates
So what's required is that you chill with all that fire
Get your desire when I retire, and—

"Spend some time with me, say that you'll be mine"
I never thought I'd find someone to be mine
Lord knows I was right, ‘cause you just crossed the line
"Spend some time with me, say that you'll be mine"

I used to say I never met a girl like you before
Still ain't got a fuckin' clue as to who you truly are
Almost went as far as introducin' you to my daughters
'Til you went as far as goin' and snoopin' through my drawers
Now I just feel stupid for the loop that you threw me for
Can't believe I almost flew the coop for some stupid whore
You used to say all you wanted was for me to be yours
All I ever wanted from you was a few booty calls
If you recall, I used to treat you like a groupie broad
When we fucked I refused to even take my jewelry off
But it threw me off the first time I called and you blew me off
It was a shock, it struck me as odd, but it turned me on
You started gettin' moody on me, pretty soon we'd argue
And the ruder you got, the more beautiful you got to me
And who'da even knew that?
Who woulda even thought possibly
Cupid could shoot another one of them goddamn darts at me?
It's true that I got shot in the heart, but when someone seems
Too good to be true, they usually are, but see
When you're in it, it's too hard to see
'Til you pull up and see some other dude's car parked and reach
Up under the seat as your heart starts to beat
Before you make a decision that's life altering
And just as you halt and you turn and you start to leave
You hear them words echoing, almost haunting, that taunting ring

"Spend some time with me, say that you'll be mine"
I never thought I'd find someone to be mine
Lord knows I was right, ‘cause you just crossed the line
"Spend some time with me, say that you'll be mine"

Ha ha, yeah right, bitch!
Spend some time with my dick!

In most cases, Stat's attitude is "Fuck a bitch!"
My only motive is to get head and fuck a bitch
But you was diff-er-ent, thought we shared a covenant
Even held your hand in pub-a-lic
We sufferin' because of this
Shorty on some whole nother other shit
Tryin' to play slick, thinkin' I'ma trick off grip
I'll admit, I was caught in the mix, down to commit
Feedin' you the best of me, I shoulda fed you piss
We started off closer than close
But who coulda predicted to know
Your trifling ways woulda stopped our growth?
And the final result, back in that same boat

Then slid off and left her to kick it with me
With my imagination, I could see her suckin' my dick
We played the phone game, a week later, shit changed fast
Had her comin' over in a cab to give me some ass
Downtown Manhattan, on the balcony, stare at the skyline
Penthouse full of imported shit, you know how I grind
She got to talkin', talkin' like an opportunist, too
Why talk when suckin' my dick is the real career move?
Said she's an aspiring actress, she do videos for practice
Yeah, yeah, know how many times I done heard that shit?

"Spend some time with me, say that you'll be mine"
I never thought I'd find someone to be mine
Lord knows I was right, ‘cause you just crossed the line
"Spend some time with me, say that you'll be mine"



Welcome to the ill world of Mr. P-O
Ayy, keep the talk, B, I'm tryna see dough
If it ain't about bread, what we gon' speak fo'?
If it ain't no lead, then it ain't no beef, bro
You better get a leash ‘cause yo' freak ho
Specialize in wood like she Home Depot
I'm like Chico DeBarge, we stars
Roscoe P. Coltrane in these bars
Man, Amtrak, I'll break her damn back
Man, it's Ralph Lauren, this ain't no damn Chaps
It's all Polo, I'm so pro though
You bird-crazy; El Pollo Loco
Talkin' about cheese and this ain't no photo
Askin' about rings like the ho know Frodo
You better get out of my house and shit

Niggas be lyin', talkin' about they bust a heater
Once I see him, maybe more like Justin Bieber
Leavin' my rivals underground, like Skyzoo's, how I do
I have him layin' in the street and bleedin', butt-naked
With a bullet in his mothafuckin' head like Erykah Badu
I find irony in bein' in a place
Where I'm wearin' Gucci, mane, gettin' whiteboy wasted
I'm tryin' to get rid of this weight, like K-Fed
Me and Denaun got a gangsta bond
We like that once-in-a-lifetime thing to you
That ain't the prom
The next MC that rhyme official, with ref, with a whistle
That ain't Young Money, I'ma definitely diss you
If you rhymin' "packin' a MAC" with "back of the Acura"
Or perhaps you can't match my spectacular vernacular
You still rhymin' bottles with models, college for knowledge
Usin' the word swagger, you're probably garbage
You thugs funny, comparin' 5'9" to anybody
You comparin' Superman to Bugs Bunny

I'm like a white Michael – Vick, psycho enough to stick
Michael J. Fox in a microwave with a Rott
I might make a little Alizé with a side of NyQuil
And ride a motorcycle bike
Right through the side of my high school
Satan's disciple with a sniper rifle
And a knife and a white diaper
Liable to shit on you while I snipe you
So dope he gets off opiates
What an appropriate way to start off his day!
He may just smart off to Dre
He may be hard to contain
‘Cause his rage is so hard to gauge
See, Hannibal ate his face, and met Jason, gnawed off his leg
Amazin' hard-on for razors and blades
And anything sharp, even poisonous darts
It all plays a major part of his game
Holy water won't ward him off, crucifixes won't do the trick
He's so sick, it's ridiculous
Sawed the crazy part off his brain, he's still insane
Why's there bloodstains on his carpet, mane?
There's some crazy shit goin' on in Shady's apartment again

Okay, it's back to the blocks, slingin' yay like the old days
Superman on the beat, I carry my whole state
Oh shit, it's O'Shea Jackson… okay
A little bit of this twisted out with Obama in it
Mr. Porter back with anthrax, like Osama sent him
Bitch, I'm all that, I drive the girls crazy
They gotta look at Rorschachs to get they thoughts back
I ain't a small fry, small ticker, small tack
I make 'em all cry with big dick and raw sack
The potblood of science to return a raw rap
I'm the best, mane; Eli Porter stance

Y'all bitches should call Nickle the Don Bishop
A poet, a mixture of Don Goines and John Grisham
Flow'll have you rewindin' it four or five times
That landmine rhyme written with porcupine line
Step up in here with the Slaughterhouse
C.O.B. Gang will approach you
And bend your gun barrel to a horseshoe
Only fuck with monsters, we the truth
Monsters will pop up on you
Like you said "Beetlejuice, Beetlejuice, Beetlejuice."
I can't even see the booth, I could fit in Stevie's shoe
I'm sick, I got the Desert Eagle flu
I'm rich, lil' nigga, we don't need a cent, we Teflon
The doctor tried to take blood, the needle bent; ask Mom
Outta my mind if you can imagine
Usin' Magic's johnson without a condom, I'm bonkers
Got the streets goin', dude, it's tremendous
If I come for your blood, I ain't gon' be usin' syringes

Newsflash, I'm still trashed
Them pills shoulda killed my ass
But they didn't; they just made me stronger
It's like they rebuilt my ass
Like the Six Million Dollar Man after the crash
It's Aftermath, bitch! And my milk glass is still half-empty
Yeah, tempt me, Hell isn't enough
They need to invent somewhere new to send me
As sick as I'm getting
They'll stick me in a conventional oven
With a rotisserie setting and won't even notice me sweating
Shit, I done made a verse, said some foul shit
Tryna go back fix it, fucked around, and just made it worse
Yeah, I'm back, looking no worse for wear
Got these haters mad enough to rip off their hair
And start punchin' the air
Panties so in a bunch that they can't function
It's Shady and Royce, fuck yeah! What a dysfunctional pair!
So stop actin' like a punk, get a pair!
Take a pill and fall the fuck out, spill your lunch in the chair!

Look, I'm sick, somebody better get the Dimetapp
Who I gotta shoot just to prove that I can rap?
People ask where my shine is at
I say check the liner notes, I done done all kinda crap
I am so much of a star, bitch
That I can fart and piss on the red carpet
Look, my bank account's retarded
My debit card's got a helmet and a harness
Hey, meet demands, but they all are harmless
At shows my riders always the largest
I need four pounds of fried poultry carcass
And red M&Ms chartered from Charlotte
Look, and if you try to act dumb and start shit
I just yell at 'em, like, "I'm the artist!"
In fact that you know the deal
If you wanna play sick, we can all get ill
Look, measles, mumps
I made you bitches, I don't need you chumps
Y'all got cheese and I need my chunks
Hurry up, so I can go to burn rubber
And get some more dunks

Now, if your attitude determines your latitude
This house that we call hip-hop, I'm in the attic, fool
A mic and two turntables, fit for the unstable
Converted to a padded room
Keep a street sweeper; in fact, I call the mag a broom
You seein' beef, seein' things
You musta had yourself a bag of shrooms
I make a call, make 'em fake a fall
My clique is too sick, say goodbye
In the streets where the stakes is high, like Ruth's Chris
I'm from the city of true shit
Where the mayor went to jail
For bein' a player right after Proof split
Levels the head of competitors, Royce that
I'm drinkin' everyday
'Til Hex Murda get his regular voice back
Ras, I got ya, look scared at ya, blast from ya
From a block away; ask Tricky, I'm that niggie
I'm more hooder than black Dickies
I rap like committin' suicide
In the booth, takin' the track with me
Patrón's in my chromosomes
In order to leave it alone, you have to ween me off
That Lorena Bobbitt chopper will knock a weenie off
Put your body between chalk
I'm squeezin' the 9 iron, like I'm swingin' golf
I'm with the best rapper alive, put somethin' on it
Your sound's plain as a cheeseburger with nothin' on it

I'll do a hundred-yard dash just to slash Kim Kardash'
In the ass with a shard of glass from Nick Hogan's car crash
You may look like the passenger for that, don't be a smartass
Yeah, laugh while you sit there
Thinkin' that the hard part passed
You ain't seen pain 'til Leatherface flips, mayne
I'll cut your fuckin' balls off, homie, my saw's off the chain
I chopped the bitch in half with it, sawed off her legs
And the top half of the torso fuckin' crawled off insane
I ain't seen shit like that since I went to Mike Jack's
Took the Elephant Man's skull, fucked it, and put it right back
Handed my dick to Bubbles
While he sucked it and licked my nut sack
Gave him a reach-around
While I fucked him right in his butt crack
Nah, I ain't takin' it back, faggot, fuck that!
I give a fuck about nothin', so here's where you fucked up at
Don't go touchin' that can
Man, you don't wanna open up that
Wait a min, ah, shit… Alchemist, cut that!




Yeah, haha, whoo, shit
Yo, mic check, testing
One, two, um… twelve
This is my dance song, can you hear me?
Alright, aye, turn my headphones up

My favorite color is red, like the blood shed
From Kurt Cobain's head when he shot himself dead
Women all grabbin' at my shish-kabob
Bought Lauryn Hill's tape so her kids could starve
You thought I was ill and now I'm even more so
Shit, I got full-blown AIDS and a sore throat
I got a wardrobe with an orange robe
I'm in the fourth row, signin' autographs at your show
I just remembered that I'm absent-minded
Wait, I mean I've lost my mind, I can't find it
I'm freestylin' every verse that I spit
‘Cause I don't even remember the words to my shit
I told the doc I need a change in sickness
And gave a girl herpes in exchange for syphilis
Put my LP on your Christmas gift list
You want to get high? Here, bitch, just sniff this!

Cum on everybody

I tried suicide once and I'll try it again
That's why I write songs where I die at the end
‘Cause I don't give a fuck, like my middle finger was stuck
And I was wavin' it at everybody, screaming, "I suck!"
I go on stage in front of a sell-out crowd
Fuck rap, I'm givin' it up, y'all, I'm sorry
I'm bored out of my gourd, so I took a hammer and nailed my foot to the floorboard of my Ford
Guess I'm just a sick sick bastard
Who's one sandwich short of a picnic basket
One Excedrin tablet short of a full medicine cabinet
I feel like my head has been shredded
Like lettuce and cabbage
And if you ever see a video for this shit
I'll probably be dressed up like a mummy with my wrists slit

Cum on everybody

Got bitches on my jock out in East Detroit
‘Cause they think that I'm a motherfuckin' Beastie Boy
So I told 'em I was Mike D
They was like, "Gee, I don't know, he might be!"
I told 'em, "Meet me at Kid Rock's next concert
I'll be standin' by the Loch Ness Monster."
Peace out, then I jetted to the weed house, smoked out
'Til I started bustin' freestyles, broke out
Then I dipped quick back to the crib, put on lipstick
Crushed up the Tylenol and ate it with a dipstick
"It's Ken Kaniff from Connecticut, can you accept?"
I want to make songs all the fellas dub
And murder every rich rapper that I'm jealous of
So just remember when I bomb your set
Yo, I only cuss to make your mom upset

Cum on everybody



Yeah, ohh, yeah yeah, ohh
I feel like dancing, I feel like dancing
I said, I smell something in the air that's making me high

Okay, here we go, do-re-mi-fa-so, fa-so-la-ti-da-so
Lyrical rascal, kick back the Tabasco
You motherfuckers must just not know the tick-tock, so
Time to show you the most kick-ass flow in the cosmos
Picasso with a pick axe, a sick asshole
Tic-tac-toe comes with six-pack with Exacto
Knives, strangling wives with thick lasso
Big bags of the grass, Zig-Zags, I'm with the Doc, so
You know how that go, skull and the crossbones
This is poison to boys and girls who do not know
You do not want to try this at home, my lil' vato
This is neither the time nor the place to get macho
So crack a six-pack, sit back with some nachos
Maybe some popcorn and watch the show and just rock slow
It's not what you expected, not what you thought, so
'Bout time that you wake the fuck up, smell the pot smoke

It must be the ganja, it's the marijuana
That's creeping up on me, why I'm so high
Maybe it's the Henny that has gotten in me
Whatever's got into me, I don't mind
It must be the ganja, it's the marijuana
That's creeping up on me, why I'm so high
Maybe it's the Henny that has gotten in me
Whatever's got into me, I don't mind

Your dreams are getting fulfilled
Ooh, I'm literally getting a chill, spitting at will
Me and Dre have just finished splitting a pill
You're submitting to skill, sitting still
I'm admitting I'm beginning to feel like I don't think anyone's real
And be calm or bring drama, a step beyond of Jeffrey Dahmer
Please don't upset me, mama, you're looking sexy, mama
Don't know if it's the lala or the rum and Pepsi, mama
Don't wanna end up inside my refrigerator freezer
Be used as extra topping the next time I make a pizza
How many people you know
Who can name every serial killer who ever existed in a row?
Put 'em in chronological order, beginning with Jack the Ripper
Name the time and place; from the body, the bag, the zipper
Location of the woods
Where the body was dragged and then dumped
The trunk that they were stuffed in, the model, the make, the plate
And which model, which lake they found her in
How they attacked the victim
Say which murder weapon was used to do what in which one
Which knife and which gun, hat kid, what wife, and which nun
Don't stop, I like this, it's fun, the fucking night's just begun

It must be the ganja, it's the marijuana
That's creeping up on me, why I'm so high
Maybe it's the Henny that has gotten in me
Whatever's got into me, I don't mind
I said it's the ganja, it's the marijuana
That's creeping up on me, why I'm so high
Maybe it's the Henny that has gotten in me
Whatever's got into me, I don't mind

When I'm behind the mic, dynamite's what it's kinda like
You're stuck with the same stick that you're tryna light
Behind the board sits Dre, legends are made this way
Isn't it safe to say this is the way it should be?
Maybe you need some lyric syrup serum for your symptoms
Here's a dosage of the antidote, now you give him some
He can give her some, she can give them some
Get behind a LinnDrum
Make up a beat and kill the sucker syndrome
The spinning drum when it comes to lyrics and penning some
Starting from scratch and then ending up at the ending of
Capable of winning a Pulitzer
So unbelievable, it's a titanium cranium that's full of sur–
–prises when the smoke rises right before your very own eyes
Good evening, this isn't even a weed thing
I ain't even smoke anything, I ain't even drinking

It must be the ganja, it's the marijuana
That's creeping up on me, why I'm so high
Maybe it's the Henny that has gotten in me
Whatever's got into me, I don't mind
It must be the ganja, it's the marijuana
That's creeping up on me, why I'm so high
Maybe it's the Henny that has gotten in me
Whatever's got into me, I don't mind



Hello
Allow me to introduce myself
My name is... Shady
It's so nice to meet you
It's been a long time
I'm sorry I've been away so long
My name is... Shady
I never meant to leave you
Yeah

You see that chick in the gym, checking me out?
Any second I'm 'bout to stick her neck in my mouth
I lose a pill and I'm recklessly wreckin' the house
That was supposed to be breakfast, where the heck is it now?
There's the necklace I lost right next to Stephanie's blouse
Man, I should check to see if my mom left any out
Nope, guess I'll re-route
Maybe somewhere in the depths of the couch
Oh, jackpot, yeah, open sesame, mouth
Down the hatch and the feeling, you can't match it
I rat-tat-tap on your door with a damn ratchet
Attack-tack-tacking a whore with a damn hatchet
A knapsack packed with like forty-some Xanaxes
Shorty come back, I'm tryna score me some lap dances
I'm 'bout to relapse, so baby, pour me some Jack Daniel's
Formula 44D and 40s with bad capsules
The bad apple spoils the bunch, I'm back at ya

Girl, I don't mean any harm
All I wanted to do is just say hello
And are you menstruating, baby?
My little friend's waiting to say hello
The way your titties are wigglin'
And your bootie's shakin' like Jello
Girl, I don't mean any harm
All I wanted to do is just say hello
Yeah

My equilibrium's off, must be the lithium
I don't need to buy any drugs, man, people give me 'em
It just becomes everyday, extra-curriculum
No reason in particular, it was strictly fun
A fifth of rum and two bottles of 151
Fifty-one people asleep in my damn living room
Excuse me, hun, but what is your name, Vivian?
I woke up next to you naked, and uhh, did we, umm?
Of course we did, but didn't I strap Jimmy, hun?
I'm looking for the torn wrapper but there don't seem to be one
No offense, baby girl, I don't mean any harm
But disease is something I'm trying to keep my penis free from
I find the package and I'm cool, I immediately run
Like Speedy Gonzales to see if I see anyone
Who might have a couple of 3s, I'm fiending for some
My head is pounding to the beat of the drum

Girl, I don't mean any harm
All I wanted to do is just say hello
And do you happen to have anything on you
To make my mood mellow?
Some are oval and some are pink
Some are blue and some are just yellow
Girl, I don't mean any harm
All I wanted to do is just say hello

Oh, those were the days, they certainly were
It's hurting me to know that I'll be closing that curtain for good
Word-word, chk-word-word, chk-word, chk-chk-word
I second that and I third, rushed to emergency surgery
To try to flush me because of the drugs that he purchased
He's no longer getting them free
Hundred bucks for these Percodans
Plus it's getting to be where he lustfully search the den
Pain is hitting his knee and his muscles be hurtin' him
Tirelessly on the phone trying to rustle up
Muscle relaxers for his back and a couple of Paxils
Now he's doubling backwards and he's stumbling back
Slipped and fell, hit his back, boom, heard something go crack
Now he's up in the bathroom like he's busting a nap
Almost ended it that soon because of the fact
I'm just busting my own chops while I'm busting a rap
Resuscitated and rejuved, so fuck it, I'm back

Girl, I don't mean any harm
All I wanted to do is just say hello
And do you happen to have anything on you
To make my mood mellow?
Some are oval and some are pink
Some are blue and some are just yellow
Girl, I don't mean any harm
All I wanted to do is just say hello

And so I'm saying
Hello
Allow me to introduce myself
My name is, Shady
It's so nice to meet you
It's been a long time
I'm sorry I've been away so long
My name is, Shady
I never meant to leave you
Yeah
It's like starting over
Clean slate



"Breaking news
Detroit rapper Eminem cancels his sold-out European tour
To check himself into rehab
After admitting an addiction to sleep medication
We'll have more on this story as it develops"
"Shady Records recording artist Obie Trice
Has apparently survived a gunshot to the head
In what appears to be a random drive-by shooting
Meanwhile, Eminem is rumored to be alienated
On again/off again relationship with..."
"This just in, a tour bus involving Eminem's bus..."
"Updating a story we brought you earlier
About gunfire at an after-hours club
We've learned that the rapper Proof has been fatally shot."
"Shady/Aftermath recording artist..."
"Long-time best friend of Eminem
And a member of the rap group D12"
"D12, back in the news again today..."
"Is it a sabbatical or the end?
The rumors and speculation continue to swirl around Eminem
He insists he's just taking a break
But doubters believe he's retiring, leaving us all to ask
'Will the real Slim Shady please stand up?'"

So this is it, this is what I wished for
Just isn't how I envisioned it, fame to the point of imprisonment
I just thought the shit'd be different
But something changed the minute that I got a whiff of it
I started to inhale it, smell it, started sniffing it
And it became my cocaine, I just couldn't quit
I just wanted a little bit then it turned me to a monster
I became a hypocrite, concert after concert
I was raking in the dough, rolling in green
Had the game hemmed up, like a sewing machine
But I was losing my freedom, there was nowhere for me
To not go and be seen, and just go and be me
And there was no in-between, you either loved it or hate it
Every CD critics gave it a 3 then three
Years later they go back and re-rate it
Then called The Slim Shady LP the greatest
The Marshall Mathers was a classic
The Eminem Show was fantastic
But Encore just didn't have the caliber to match it
I guess enough time just ain't passed yet
A couple more years, that shit'll be Illmatic
And eight years later I'm still at it
Divorced, re-married, a felon, a father, sleeping pill addict
And this is real talk, I feel like The Incredible Hulk
My back has been broke and I can still walk

So be careful what you wish for, 'cause you just might get it
And if you get it, then you just might not know what to do with it
'Cause it might just come back on you ten-fold
I said be careful what you wish for, 'cause you just might get it
And if you get it, then you just might not know what to do with it
'Cause it might just come back on you ten-fold

I got a letter from a fan that said, he's been praying for me
Every day and for some reason
It's been weighing on my mind heavy
Cause I don't read every, letter I get
But something told me to go ahead and open it
But, why would someone pray for you
When they don't know you?
You didn't pray for me when I was local
And as I lay these vocals, I think of all the shit I had to go through
Just to get to where I'm at, I've already told you
At least, a thousand times in these rhymes
I appreciate the prayer but I've already got God on my side
And it's been one hell of a ride, hasn't it?
Just watching it from a opposite standpoint
Man, boy's got to look
Nuts, and that's the only word I can think of
Right now, on how to describe the shit
This is like a vibe you get, go ahead and bop to it
Just watch what you wish for 'cause I got the shit

So be careful what you wish for, 'cause you just might get it
And if you get it, then you just might not know what to do with it
'Cause it might just come back on you ten-fold
I said be careful what you wish for, 'cause you just might get it
And if you get it, then you just might not know what to do with it
'Cause it might just come back on you ten-fold



Yo, check it out, it's fucked up, and I don't see either one of us budging

"I'm withholding my anger
Though I'd like to be the strangler
Of this punk ass little pussy's puny neck
It's my right to insist
That he acknowledge my existence
But he just displays complete lack of respect"
That's what he says to himself
As he use his magazines to trash me
As he sits with both his feet up at his desk
Smokes a bag of his weed
And starts imagining things
And he just can't see that he's manically depressed
And in his jealousy and envy
It just whirls him in a frenzy
As he turns on MTV and sees my face
He don't exist in this world
So he just twists and he twirls
Spirals and spins till he hurls himself into rage
And it's destroying him slowly
Cause he does not even know me
Even though he sees me everywhere he goes
So he just tortures himself
He has no fortune and wealth
So he extorts someone else to get his dough
And now he's acting like a bully
So he tries to push and pull me
But he knows that he can't fool me so he's mad
He has no choice but to scream
And raise his voice up at me
Cause it annoys him to see that I ain't scared


Now I'm not trying to make no more enemies
No more unfortunately
There's so many other motherfuckers that just are
They just keep hounding at me
Now that I'm down with 50
But his ass is such a puppet
Irv could shove his whole hand up it
And just make him say what he wants him to say
But Suge has Irv's on a string
And Irv's so nervous that he
Says anything to this man to keep him at bay
So now Ja thinks that he's so tough
And Murder Inc.'s the big bad wolf
And they go huff and puff and blow our label down
But our building's made out of bricks
So you ain't taking out shit
And dog you just did a song with Bobby Brown
So now you try to pull a race card
And it backfires in your face hard
Cause you know we don't play that black and white shit
Plus this stylist that you fucked
When you was ecstasied up
Was just a man who's dressed up as a white bitch


Now what bothers me the most
About hip-hop is we so close
To picking up where we left off with Big and Pac
We just lost Jam Master J
Big L got blasted away
Plus we lost Bugz, Slang Ton, and Freaky Tah
It's like a never-ending cycle
That just seems to come full circle
Everybody's gotta be so fucking hard
I'm not excluding myself
Cause I been stupid as well
I been known to lose it when someone says something smart
But as we grow as men
We learn to let shit go, but then again
There's only so much bullshit we can really stand
We all got reps to uphold
When someone steps on our toes
It's no exception, it goes for every man
But if Irv really gave a fuck
About Ja like he claims he does
He'd wake him up and make his boy get off them drugs
But he just keeps feeding him pills
So if that E doesn't kill him
Someone from G-Unit will and I ain't buzzed
Dawg, I'm talking to you straight
If the situation escalates
Any worse, we're gonna lose another soldier to this game
And if I get killed for this rap
I got a million in cash
That says I will get you back in Hailie's name


Get at me, dog
Holla



Shady, Aftermath
G-G-G-G, G-Unit!

Cause we came here to set this party off right
Let's bounce tonight
And if they don't let us in through the front
We'll come through the side
Cause I don't ever wanna leave the game without
At least saying goodbye
So all my people on the left, all my people on the right
Scream one last time

Get your ass up for the doctor, one more time
Get your ass up for the doctor, come on now
Here we go, cliff hanger, it's another club banger
Got you hanging on the edge of your seat, get on down

Times up, game's over, you lose, I win
Bout to show these knuckleheads how to do this here
Ooh yeah, new year, next phase, begin
Look who's got you going crazy again
I'm a trend, I set one every time I'm in
I go out and just come back full circle again
You a fad, that means your something that we already had
But once you're gone, you don't come back, too bad

You're off the map now, radar can't even find you
We stay on the grind, you slip, we out-grind you
You walk around mad, you let your anger blind you
We walk around just playing the violin behind you
Enough with all the pissing and moaning, whining and bitching
Sit and observe, listen, you'll learn if you pay attention
Why ten multi-platinum albums later, three diamond
Worldwide, we're on the charts with a bullet and still climbing


When Dr. Dre say crunk, you will get it crunk
And when 50 Cent says jump, you get on one foot and jump

The buzz is tremendous, we drop you all to sense it
I don't gotta promote it for you to know that Doc is off the benches
We ain't showing off, we just going off popular consensus)
But critics say that Doc is soft, Doc is talk
Doc is all washed up, knock it off, who the fuck is Doc impressing?
Doc is this, Doc is that, you got the wrong impression
You must be on the cock of Doc, cause Doc left you all guessing
That's why we always save the best cut last
To make you scratch and itch for it like fresh cut grass

Cause we done swam with the sharks, wrestled with alligators
Spoke to a generation of angry teenagers
Whom if it wasn't for rap to bridge the gap, maybe raised to be racist
Who may have never got to see our faces
Grace the cover of Rolling Stone pages, broke down barriers
Of language and races, just call on the caped crusaders
And leave it to me and Dre to pass the mic and we can play the, back
And forth all day like the hot potato game, that's why we came to


50 Cent, come on!

Bounce now, hands up, you know how we do
We make the club jump everywhere we go
It's no secret, everybody know
When Dre's involved, there's plenty money involved

And plenty honey's involved, the sunny Sundays
And palm trees Cali, every day it's just another party
From the valleys, all the way to them 8 Mile alleys
Now raise up out your seat, Dre is about to speak
Blaze a pound of weed six days up out the week)
You could catch me in the studio banging out the beats to
Provide you with the heat that keep blazing out your speaker

So never say never cause Shady/Aftermath together
No one could do it better, we tear the club up
And leave without a shred of evidence and uh


Yeah, still Aftermath, 2006
And don't worry 'bout that Detox album
It's coming, we gon' make Dre do it
HAHA!
50 Cent, G-Unit, Obie Trice, D-Twizzy, Stat Quo, Dr. Dre
We ain't leaving, let's go!
Ladies and gentlemen, thank you all for coming out, peace!

Oh shit, I almost forgot, you're coming with me..



Now, I don't really care what you call me
You can even call me cold
These bitches knew as soon as they saw me
It's never me they'll get the privilege to know
I roll like a desperado
Now I never know where I'm gonna go
Still I ball like there's no tomorrow
Until it's over and that's all she wrote

You're starin' straight into a barrel of hate, terrible fate
Not even a slim chance to make a narrow escape
Cupid shot his arrow and missed – wait, Sarah, you're late
Your train left, mascara and eggs smeared on your face
Night's over, goodbye, ho, I thought that I told ya
That spilled nut ain't nothin' to cry over
Never shoulda came within range of my Rover
Shoulda known I was trouble soon as I rolled up
Any chick who's dumb enough after I blindfold her
To still come back to the crib must want me to mess with her mind
Hold up, she mistook me for some high roller
Well, I won't buy her soda unless it's Rock & Rye Cola
I wouldn't let you eat the fuckin' chip on my shoulder
If you was bleach and I was hair I wouldn't die for ya
Tryin' to pull five bucks from me is like tryin' to pull five molars
You'll get your eyes swoll up
I'm on my straight grizzly, so why would I buy you a gay-ass teddy bear? Bitch, you're already bi-polar

Now, I don't really care what you call me
You can even call me cold
These bitches knew as soon as they saw me
It's never me they'll get the privilege to know
I roll like a desperado
Now I never know where I'm gonna go
Still I ball like there's no tomorrow
Until it's over and that's all she wrote

TIP told me on this ho tip, best tip I could give you to hip you
Is never to let these tricks trick you
Mighty ambiguous of you to think I love you slut, shit
Dig you, ho? Take a shovel and dig you some dignity, bitch!
Shit, you talk about some advice that sticks with you
If I should listen to anyone, tell me to stick to my guns
Like double stick, it's you, but fuck ‘em, TIP, it's cool
I'm chillin' like a villain
Like the penguin in its fuckin' igloo eating fudgesicles
I’d rather slip and fall in shit than fall in love with you
Before I tie the fuckin' knot I’d tie you in one, bitch
You think this is some Nintendo game, how fuckin' dumb is you?
I’ll give you some lumps before I split some lump sums with you
So here’s a penny for your thoughts
But it won’t buy you a cheeseburger
But a nickel might just get you one pickle
Fuck it, it's official, so blow the whistle, I got a trust issue
Like I just cuss at you to fuckin' cuss at you
Like before I rapped I was a motherfuckin' stud, slut, this'll
Teach you not to come drunk stumbling my way, for shizzle
I still live like I budget a Gilbert's Lodge check stub, bizzle
So fuck Sizzler! These checkers are bust like a blood blister

Now, I don't really care what you call me
You can even call me cold
These bitches knew as soon as they saw me
It's never me they'll get the privilege to know
I roll like a desperado
Now I never know where I'm gonna go
Still I ball like there's no tomorrow
Until it's over and that's all she wrote

Yeah, I guess life is a bitch – ain’t it, TIP?
And each one thinks they the shit
Shirt off my back? I wouldn't give you the dirt off my handkerchief
I’m givin' these hoes a dose of their own medicine
Let 'em get a good taste of it
I’m sure you got that relationship memo by now
But in case you didn't, I’ll stick this whole pad full of sticky notes to your forehead and staple it
Life is too short and I got no time to sit around just wastin' it
So I pace this shit a little bit quicker; that clock, I'm racin' it
Double timin' it, but I still spit triple the amount of insults
In a tenth of the time that it may take you pricks
To catch on; while you strong arm like Stretch Armstrong
Man, I still say K-mart's like there's an apostrophe "S" on it, dog
And they say McDonalds isn’t a restaurant, well, I guess I’m wrong
But if you gonna tell me that A&W ain't the spot
For the best hot dogs, you can get the F on, dawg

Now, I don't really care what you call me
You can even call me cold
These bitches knew as soon as they saw me
It's never me they'll get the privilege to know
I roll like a desperado
Now I never know where I'm gonna go
Still I ball like there's no tomorrow
Until it's over and that's all she wrote

All she wrote, all she wrote
I said it's over and that's all she wrote
All she wrote, all she wrote
Yeah, goodnight, it’s over
And that's all she wrote



So I'm out the game, huh?
Yo, Dre, we ridin'?
Whatever
Haha, well, I'm with you, homie
Okay, let's handle the small shit

I was born to brew up storms, stir up shit
Kick up dust, cuss 'til I slur up spit
Grew up too quick, went through too much
Knew too much shit, corrupt
And I'ma pour it on like syrup, bitch
Thick and rich, sick and twisted, Mr. Buttersworth
Dre told me to milk this shit for what it's worth
'Til the cow just tilts and tips and stumbles to Earth
And if I fumble a verse, keep going
First take I make, mistakes, just keep it
No punches pulled, no punches, that's weak shit
Fake shit, if I ever take shit I'll eat shit
Wasn't for him, wouldn't be shit

Creep with me as we take a little trip down memory lane
Been here longer than anyone in the game
And I ain't got to lie about my age
He don't belong speaking mine or Timbaland's name
And don't think I don't read your little interviews
And see what you're sayin'
I'm a giant, and I ain't gotta move 'til I'm provoked
When I see you, I'ma step on you and not even know it
You midget, mini-me with a bunch of little mini-yous
Running around your backyard swimming pools
Over 80 million records sold
And I ain't have to do it with ten- or eleven-year-olds

‘Cause what you say is what you say
Say what you say how you say it whenever you saying it
Just remember how you said it when you was spraying it
So who you playing with, huh?

Second verse, it gets worse, it gets no better than this
Amateurs drink veteran piss from a Dixie cup
If you ever mix me up
Or confuse me with a Canibus, or Dre with a Dupri
We'll rub it in, every club you're in
We'll have you blackballed
And make sure you never rap a-fucking-gain
Dre ain't having it, long as I'm here to play devil's advocate

If there was some magic shit I could wave over the industry
That could save it when I'm gone and buried
To make sure the tradition carries on, I would

If I could only use this power for good
I wouldn't, not even if I could

From the hood, and I'm a hornet
And I'ma only sting when I'm cornered

And I'ma only sucker punch and swing without warning
And swing to knock somebody's fucking head off
‘Cause I know if they get up
I won't get a chance to let off another punch
I'm punk rock, no one's punk
When I was little I knew I would blow up and sell a mil'
Or grow up to be Atilla, go nuts and be a killer

And I'm something of a phenom, one puff of the chron'
I'm unstoppable, I'm alive and on top again
There's no obstacle that I can't conquer
So come along with us, c'mon!

‘Cause what you say is what you say
Say what you say how you say it whenever you saying it
Just remember how you said it when you was spraying it
So who you playing with, huh?

Now anybody who knows Dre
Knows I'm about fast cars and Alizé, partying all day
But I handled my business, ‘cause it's work before play
Don't look for trouble, but I'll serve you gourmet
However you want it, you can have it your way
You fuck my night up, I'ma fuck up your day
Bullet with your name, sending it your way
That goes for anyone who walks through that doorway
‘Cause this is my space, you invade it
Live to regret it, and you'll die trying to violate it
Fuck around, get annihilated, eyes dilated

…Like my old lady
‘Cause what you say is what you say
Sometimes what you mean is two different things
Depending on your mood if it swings
Think too many things, little hit of Dre's weed
I can do anything, catch a contact and I'm gone
And I'm back, I speed write
And my loose leaf's my launchpad

And I can pull any string; don't have to prove anything
Catch a contract on your head
You headed West, talk shit about Dre
You better get a vest and invest
In something to protect your head and neck

And it's back and forth all day, like Red and Meth
I joke when I say I'm the best in the booth
But a lot of truth is said in jest
And if I ever do live to be a legend I'ma die a sudden death
Five mics in The Source, ain't holding my fucking breath
But I'll suffocate for the respect
'Fore I breathe to collect a fucking check

‘Cause what you say is what you say
Say what you say how you say it whenever you saying it
Just remember how you said it when you was spraying it
So who you playing with, huh?

Watch your fucking mouth!
Yo, this Timbaland, tell him I said suck my dick!



*Eminem puking into a toilet*
There I go--thinking of you again

You don't know how sick you make me
You make me fucking sick to my stomach
Every time I think of you, I puke
You must just not know
You may not think you do, but you do
Every time I think of you I puke

I was gonna take the time to sit down and write you a little poem
But off of the dome would probably be a little more
More suitable for this type of song--whoa
I got a million reasons off the top of my head that I could think of
Sixteen bars, this ain't enough to put some ink to
So fuck it, I'mma start right here I'll just be brief I'm
Bout to rattle off some of the reasons
I knew I shouldn't go and get another tattoo of you
On my arm, but what do I go and do?
I go and get another one, now I got two
Ooh ooh ooh ooh ooh ooh ooh
Now I'm sitting here with your name on my skin
I can't believe I went and did this stupid shit again
My next girlfriend, now her name's gotta be Kim
Shi-ii-ii-ii-ii-ii-it
If you only knew how much I hated you
For every motherfucking thing you ever put us through
Then I wouldn't be standing here crying over you
Boo-oo-oo-oo-oo-oo-who


I was gonna take the time to sit down and write you a little letter
But I thought a song would probably be a little better
Instead of a letter
That you'd probably just shred up--yeah
I stumbled on your picture yesterday and it made me stop and think of
How much of a waste it'd be for me to put some ink to, a stupid piece a
Paper, I'd rather let you see how
Much I fucking hate you in a freestyle
You're a fucking coke-head slut, I hope you fucking die
I hope you get to hell and Satan sticks a needle in your eye
I hate your fucking guts, you fucking slut, I hope you die
Di-ii-ii-ii-ii-ii-ie
But please don't get me wrong, I'm not bitter or mad
It's not that I still love you, it's not cause I want you back
It's just that when I think of you, it makes me wanna
Yack-aa-aa-aa-aa-aa-aa-ack
What else can I do? I haven't got a clue
Now I guess I'll just move on, I have no choice but to
But every time I think of you now, all I wanna do
Is pu-uu-uu-uu-uu-uu-uke


Fucking bitch



Still love me? Take this
You ready? One, two, three

The more you, put me through
The more it makes me wanna come back to you
You say you hate me, I just love you more
You don't want me, I just want you more
I buy you flowers, you throw 'em at me
I know it's sad but it's makin' me happy
The more that you slap me, the more that it turns me on
Cause you love me, and I love you more

It's sick but who could ever predict, we'd be doin' the same shit
We say we do it for our baby but we don't
We do it for us, it's lust cause neither one
Of us trust each other, so we fuck 'til we bust
And we cuss each other, out, we know what it's about, shout
'til I throw you out the house, you throw me out the house
I throw you on the couch, punch you in the mouth
Fist fight 'til we turn this mother out
Then apologize after, laughter, pain
It's insane we're back in the same chapter again
And it's sad but it's true, when I'm layin' here with you
There ain't nothin' anyone could ever say or ever do cause

The more you, put me through
The more it makes me wanna come back to you
You say you hate me, I just love you more
You don't want me, I just want you more
I buy you flowers, you throw 'em at me
I know it's sad but it's makin' me happy
The more that you slap me, the more that it turns me on
Cause you love me, and I love you more

Cause I hate you, do you hate me?
Good, cause you're so fuckin' beautiful when you're angry
It makes me, wanna just take you and just throw you
On the bed and fuck you like I don't even know you
You fuck other people and I fuck other people
You're a slut, but I'm equal, I'm a mutt, we're both evil
In our ways but neither one of us would ever admit it
Cause one us would have one up on the other so forget it
We can make accusations, people spread rumors
But they ain't got proof, 'till they do it's just the two of us
It's you and me, cause any chick can say that she screwin' me
But you gotta believe me to a degree cause true indeed
If you didn't I wouldn't be hittin', yeah I would
Cause the sex is too damn good, if I ran who would I run to
That would be this soft and warm
So it's off and on, usually more off than on
But at least we know, that we share this common bond
You're the only one I can fuck without a condom on
I hope, the only reason that I cope is cause of that fact
And plus I can bust in that and that's why

The more you, put me through
The more it makes me wanna come back to you
You say you hate me, I just love you more
You don't want me, I just want you more
I buy you flowers, you throw 'em at me
I know it's sad but it's makin' me happy
The more that you slap me, the more that it turns me on
Cause you love me, and I love you more

I can never understand it, that's why I don't try
From junior high until we both die, it's silly
Oh why must we try, is it really so rough
That we must always call each other's Billy Goat's Gruff
Try to pull each other's legs, until the other begs
We're lyin' to ourselves, that's the beauty of it geah
Cause we truly love each other, that's why we always fighting
All we do is shove each other every other fuckin' night
And it's clear it ain't gon' change, it's pent up rage
We both had, we both feel like we've been upstaged
By someone else, we've both been someone else's someone else
And the problem is neither one wants help
It's an addiction and it can't be fixed
Our family's mixed up, there's a baby sister in the mix
And it hurts cause the pieces to the puzzle don't fit
And anybody who thinks they know us doesn't know shit
And they're probably just tired of hearin' it all the time
On every song, every lyric and every rhyme
All the hoop-la, all the whoopty-woo
What you put me through, fuckin' whoopty-do
But I won't be made a fool of, if this is true love
You wouldn't do what, you did last time, you wouldn't screw up
This time, cause this time girl I'm tellin' you what
You do it again I'm fuckin' you up

No matter what you say, or what you do
I'mma hunt you down 'til I find you
No matter where you run, I'll be right there
Right behind you, in your nightmares
So I brought you the flowers, and the candy
All the times that you threw it back at me
So when you hate me, you gon' hate me more
When you find out, you can't escape me whore

The more you, put me through
The more it makes me wanna come back to you
You say you hate me, I just love you more
You don't want me, I just want you more
I buy you flowers, you throw 'em at me
I know it's sad but it's makin' me happy
The more that you slap me, the more that it turns me on
Cause you love me, and I love you more



Oh fuck yeah, oh Shaggy
Uhh, this is why they call you '2 Dope', ain't it?
Uhh, fuck yeah
Uhh, take it out, take it out
Uhh, now give something to Jay
Uhh, Violent Jay
Don't bite it, don't be violent with it
Ow, just suck it, nice and slow, yeah
Uhh, uhh, fuck yeah
You got.. uhh, now give it back to Shaggy
He was sucking it better
Uhh, now say my name
Give me my dick back!
Fuck you guys!
Fuck you guys, Imma leaving!



It is not about lyrics anymore
It’s about a hot beat and a catchy hook

If we gotta dumb down our style and A-B-C it
Then so be it, ‘cause nowadays these kids
Just don’t give a shit 'bout lyrics
All they wanna hear is a beat—and that's it
Long as they can go to the club and get blitzed
Pick up some chicks and get some digits
And the DJ's playin' them hits
"Oh, this my jam! This my shit!"
We don't know a word to a verse, all we know is the chorus
‘Cause the chorus repeats the same four words for us
And the song's ginormous, the whole formula’s switched
‘Cause we don’t know anymore what are hits
Is it the beat? Is it the rap?
Is it a finger snap or the same 808 clap?
And how do we adapt and get TRL votes
When 13-year-olds control the remotes?
And Ashley's got a brand new nose
We gotta put some new em-pha-sis on our syl-la-la-bles

If the emphasis on the compact disc
Is in the beat, then I’m gon' feature Em and get rich
And let Dre mix the shit and drive off in the Range Ro
‘Cause everywhere I go they love the "bling bling" flow
Bang bang, look at the way my chain glow
The ring on my fing’ cost your man a lot of dough
Oh, the fuck am I bustin' my brain fo'?
It's just the way the game go, oh, it takes two to tango
You call this a lame flow? You bought the shit
I guess you to blame, too, I just found an angle
No more reality flow
I’m tryna time my album droppin' with a reality show
Cock the MAC-11 in front of Hot 97
And call my publicist, tell her we in press heaven
No one gives a shit except some kids
Who just got into sex on the Internet
So you want the chat room or the house in Malibu, Em?
Your emphasis is on the wrong syl-la-la-ble

They said 30's the new 20
Funny, must mean 40's the new 30
Interesting, ‘cause ever since then it's been in a sense
An extension for veteran rappers that are better than half
Of the shit coming out right now, it's all trash
The torch is gonna burn out before it gets passed
Jay said it’s his last, then 50 and Em
Then what? Detox drops, what do we got then?
So now our whole camps is running around
Scramblin' over what to do
Gamblin' every time we put a record out

Shorty, I love you
And you love me too
We were meant to be
‘Cause, shorty, you love me
And I love you too
And I promise I’ll be true to you

Go shorty, it's your birthday
You made it just in time to hear my wordplay
It's the kid that flip flows who used to flip O's
And run G for days, you should see how I get hoes
I'm international, I get my dick licked 'round the globe
I'm sick right into show, ridin' on lolo’s
Puffin' on coco, my bitch in Manolo’s
Don’t fuck with the dodo’s, that's slang for dumb hoes
I'm playin', I ain't got time to joke, joke
You fuck around, you could get your ass smoked, Loc
It's not a game, me, B, I ain't playin'
Beat behind me playin', so you don't hear anyway
You don’t hear what I’m sayin'
Me fin-nini-na, Fee-fi-dididee-yay
Just give me my check and I’ll be on my way
Sunny, bunny, money and funny
You ain't even listenin' and I just took your money

There once was a time everywhere you turned
Shady/Aftermath was all you heard
But they say 50 sing too much, and Em got soft
And they say Dre just fell the fuck off
Well, fuck the fuck-off's, all y'all eat salt
Be mad, we bad, fresh up outta the vault
Oh! New syl-la-la-bles, eat ball, you fuck-off's
Your house, your bitch, I'm getting sucked off
East, South, Midwest, even up North
Fallin' victim to wax, spittin', bring out the white chalk
All for the gingerbread, we get it and get lost
Catch me if you can, I’m runnin' past while y'all walk

Shady made me for bringin' it back
'Fore the history of rap is gone with a snap
A snare and a clap, what happened to just spittin'
About livin' in the mothafuckin' city you at?
In the grimiest condition, I breathe in drama
King Mathers and Cash me, that's freak karma
I'm everything, anything you can never be
It's a hidden rhyme of the month deep in the beef
I speak with a piece, no peace on my mind
I repeat every evil deed done of mine
No rest contest, contract to sign
By blood I'm in this squad for life
Hear about out my windpipes and I just chime
I'm the reason you guys won't say that line
I’m crazy, renegade like Em and Jay Z
I’m Rosemary’s baby, I want you to hate me

Shorty, I love you
And you love me too
We were meant to be
‘Cause, shorty, you love me
And I love you too
And I promise I’ll be true to you

It is not about lyrics anymore
It is not about lyrics anymore
It's about a hot beat, a hot beat
It's about a hot beat, a hot beat
A hot-hot-hot beat and a catchy hook
A hot-hot-hot beat and a catchy hook
Nobody gives a damn about them syllables
Sillyle-ables, whatever they are
I don't care if you gotta rhyme schmo, mo, Joe, toe and glow
Now, get out there and sell some goddamn records!
Now, get out there and sell some goddamn records!
Now, get out there and sell some goddamn records!
Now, get out there and sell some goddamn records!



You don't see me in the hood
That's 'cause I'm doin' this, man

I'm still gettin' chased by those lights
Only the light's lime, and my mic's on
And my time is none, because I'm writin' more
And I ain't here to meet a soul in this business
And I can’t let y'all derail me, man
I got Young Kobie, homie, you gotta let go of Obie
And that 'ac goin' on, soon as a nigga touch down, back from tourin'
It's whatever, put that on the cheddar, man
But in the meantime, it's Jimmy Iovine time
Chase cheese, rhyme 'til my voice give out
This is it my niggas, this what we boast about
Now I'm here, so shut your motherfuckin' mouth, and show me love, bitch

I just wanna love ya
I wanna hold you in the mornin'
Hold you through the night
I just wanna love ya
For the rest of my life
I wanna hold you in the mornin'
Hold you through the night

Right we wanna love alcohol
We wanna love guns, we wanna love money
We don't love no bitches, though

There's a certain mystique when I speak, that you notice
That's sorta unique 'cause you know it's me
My poetry's deep, and I'm Stillmatic, the way I flow to this beat
You can't sit still, it's like tryna smoke crack and go to sleep
I'm strapped, it's known any minute I could snap
I'm the equivalent of what would happen if Bush rapped
I bully these rappers so bad lyrically
It ain't even funny, I ain't even hungry, it ain't even money
You can't pay me enough for you to play me
It's cockamanie, you just ain't zany enough to rock with Shady
My noodle is cock-a-doodle, my clock's coo-coo
I got screws loose, yea the whole kit and caboodle, I'm just brutal
It's no rumor, I'm numero uno, assume it
There's no humor in it no more, you know
I'm rollin' with a swollen bowlin' ball in my bag
You need a fag to come and tear a new hole in my ass, you better love me, bitch

I just wanna love ya
For the rest of my life
I wanna hold you in the mornin'
I just wanna love ya
For the rest of my life
I wanna hold you in the mornin'
Hold you through the night

My buzz is crazy in the hood, they holla my name
If it ain't about the flow, it's 'bout the stones and the chain
If I was you, I'd love me too, I roll like a boss
911 Porsche same color as cranberry sauce
I ain't gon' front, I thought R. Kelly was the shit
Let me find out he fuckin' 'round with Bow Wow bitch
Niggas eatin' popcorn right, rewindin' the tape
Now shorty mama in precinct, hollerin' rape
I'm convinced, man, somethin' really wrong with these ho's
I thought Lil' Kim was hot, 'til she start fuckin' with her nose
I used to listen to Lauryn Hill, and tap my feet
Then the bitch put out a CD and didn't have no beats
That boy D'Angelo, he determined not to fail
That nigga went butt-ass, for his record to sell
My back shots 'll help Ashanti hit them high notes

I just wanna love ya
For the rest of my life
I wanna hold you in the mornin'
I just wanna love ya
For the rest of my life
I wanna hold you in the mornin'
Hold you through the night

I love the burners
The money, the bunnies, I just wanna hold ya
I just wanna love ya



Lord, please forgive me for what I do
For I know not what I've done

Father, please forgive me, for I know not what I do
I just never had the chance to ever meet you
Therefore I did not know that I would grow to be
My mother's evil seed and do these evil deeds

Momma had a baby and its head popped off
Head popped off, head popped off, head popped off, head popped off, head popped off
Well, Momma don't want me, the next thing I know, I'm gettin' dropped off
Gettin' dropped off, gettin' dropped off, gettin' dropped off, gettin' dropped off
Ring-ring-ring on the doorbell of the next door neighbors, on their front porch
Their front porch, their front porch, their front porch, their front porch
But they didn't want me neither, so they left me on someone else's lawn
Else's lawn, else's lawn, else's lawn
'Til somebody finally took me in, my great aunt and uncle, Edna and Charles
Edna and Charles, Edna and Charles, Edna and Charles, Edna and Charles, they were the ones who were left in charge
My elementary, they ganged up on me and sang this song
Sang this song, sang this song, sang this song, sang this song
It went a little something like, "Mary had a little lamb, little lamb, little lamb
Debbie had a Satan spawn, Satan spawn"
Momma why do they keep saying this? I just don't understand, understand
And by the way, where's my dad?

Father, please forgive me, for I know not what I do
I just never had the chance to ever meet you
Therefore I did not know that I would grow to be
My mother's evil seed and do these evil deeds

Predominantly, predominantly, everything's always predominantly
Predominantly white, predominantly black, well, what about me?
Where does that leave me? Well, I guess that I'm between
Predominantly both of 'em, I think if I hear that fuckin' word again, I'ma scream
While I'm projectile vomiting; what do I look like, a comedian to you?
Do you think that I'm kidding? What do I look like, some kind of idi-
Wait a minute, shit, don't answer that; why am I so misunderstood?
Why do I go through so much bullshit? It's such bullshit, it's tuch mullbish
"Woe is me, there goes poor Marshall again whinin' about his millions
And his mansion, and his sorrow he's always drownin' in
And the dad that he never had, and how his childhood was so bad
And how his mom was a dope addict, and his ex-wife, how they go at it
Man, I'd hate to have it as bad as that Mr. Mathers, claims he had it
I can't imagine it, that little rich, poor, white bastard
Needs to take some of that cash out the bank and take a bath in it
Man, if I only had half of it"
Shit, if you only knew the half of it

Father, please forgive me, for I know not what I do
I just never had the chance to ever meet you
Therefore I did not know that I would grow to be
My mother's evil seed and do these evil deeds

Evil deeds, while I plant these evil seeds
Please release me from these demons
I never had any of this shit planned, Mom, please believe
I don't wanna be Satan's spawn
Never got the chance to say I'm sorry
Now look at all the pain I caused
Dear Santa Claus, why you not comin' this year again?
What did I do that was so bad to deserve this?
Everything could have been so perfect
But life ain't a fairytale, I'm about to be hoisted up in the air
Forty feet below me, there's people everywhere
I don't even know why they feel like they know me, 'cause I'm in this ferris wheel
And all I wanna do is go to the mall and take Hailie on the carousel
Without this crowd everywhere I go, but life is like a merry-go-round
Here we go now, do-si-do now, curtains up, the show must go
Now ring around the rosie, the show's over, you can all go home now
But the curtain just don't close for me, this ain't how fame is supposed to be
Where's the switch I could just turn off and on? This ain't what I chose to be
So please, God, give me the strength to have what it takes to carry on
'Til I pass 50 back the baton, the camera's on, my soul is gone

Father, please forgive me, for I know not what I do
I just never had the chance to ever meet you
Therefore I did not know that I would grow to be
My mother's evil seed and do these evil deeds

Last one baby, let's go
Detroit!



Yo, if you could just, for one minute
Or one split second in time, forget everything
Everything that bothers you, all your problems
Everything, and follow me

If I was frozen inside of a moment
If I could capture time inside a capsule
An hourglass full of sand in the palm of my hand, it passes through it
If I can grasp it, and just control what happens to it
Then I can trap it, so no more time elapses through it
If raps could do it, maybe I could tap into it
Then I could try to channel it through Cadillacs and Buicks
To transmit through 'em, to make you put your ass into it
And that's when you hit the roof because you can't sit through it
Your passions too much for you to not be dancing to it
And as you do it, your movements become fast and fluent
You're mashin' to it, moshing until you're black and bluish
You're acting foolish, this music it has influenced you to be rowdy but in an orderly fashion
True it's chaotic, but it's got your body moving as a unit
Uniting together tonight, so make it last and you better just

Lose yourself in this music
You better move yourself 'cause tomorrow's ass can wait
Lose yourself in this music
You better move yourself 'cause tomorrow's ass can wait

'Cause when we descend together, we begin to move as one
In perfect unison just like the moon and sun
Illuminate the room and humans soon become aluminum
Rhythmically in sync, if you'll excuse the pun
But if you could lose it once, I mean if you could let shit go
Relax, take a breath, and just let it exit slow
To rest your soul, you could leave the rest to me
If I could give the world a hit of ecstasy
To make 'em feel the feeling that I'm feeling right this minute
'Cause I feel like the night won't end 'til I get finished
So close the shades, makin' sure no light gets in it
The sky's the limit tonight because the night's infinite
A high percentage of black people and white mixed in it
But no one really gives a fuck 'cause they just like what's spinnin'
His life was spinnin', the whole entire night just spinnin'
Like life's beginning, so come out from inside your skin and quit hidin' in it

Lose yourself in this music
You better move yourself 'cause tomorrow's ass can wait
Lose yourself in this music
You better move yourself 'cause tomorrow's ass can wait



What now nigga, what now? What? Brewster Projects nigga

One shot, two shot, three shots, four shots
All I hear is gunshots, this is where the fun stops
Bodies drop, hit the floor, music's off, party stops
Everybody hit the door, somebody's licking shots off

Security's gone, I'm trapped in the club
And I'm trying to run and get my motherfucking gun
I'm trying to run and save my motherfucking life
Oh, shit! The shooter's coming
Bitches hollering, niggas running
People, shot all over the floor
And I'm trying to make it to the Saint Andrew's door
Even DJ House Shoes fucked around and got shot
I done messed around, and forget my tec
I don't see nobody, but Fatt Father and Hex

I'm trying to slip through the exit and get to where my car is at
Bitches screaming everywhere and niggas is wylin
Two minutes ago we was all joking and smiling
This chick is clinging on to me, sobbing and sighing
Saying she didn't mean to diss me earlier and she crying
But it's real and it's on and caps is getting peeled
So I hugged her and used her body as a human shield and
I told her I'd be right back and the dumb bitch believed me!
I squeezed through the back door and made my escape
I ran and got my .38 I hope it's not too late!


I'm on 7 Mile {*gunfire*} what the fuck was that?
{*gunfire*} Damn, somebody hit me from the back!
{*crash*} And I just hit a pole, them niggas some hoes
Believe me, I'm leaving a carcass today
And I'mma park my car and walk the rest of the way
I'm in the mood to strut, my AK ain't even tucked
I'mma meet you at the club, we gon' fuck these hoes up!


I never seen no shit like this in my life before
People are still camped out from the night before
Sleeping outside the door, waiting in line still
Trying to get inside the club to see D12 perform
The fire marshals know the venue's too small
People are wall to wall, three thousand and some odd
Fans and some cumwad from out the parking lot
Gets in an argument over a parking spot
Decides to pull his gun and lets a few of them off
Missed who he's aiming for, six feet away’s the door
Into St. Andrew's Hall, now the strays flying all over the place
Grazed one bitch in the face
Another one of 'em came through the wall
Before anyone could even hear the first shot go off
I'm posted up at the bar, having a mazeltov
Bullet whizzed right by my ear, damn near shot it off
Thank God I'm alive, I gotta find Denaun
And where the fuck is Von? He usually tucks one on him
Wait a minute, I think I just saw Bizarre
Nah I guess not, what the fuck? Oh my God, it was!
I never saw him run so fast in my life
Look at him hauling ass, I think he left his wife
There she is, on the ground, being trampled
I go to grab her up by the damn hand, but I can't pull her
{*blam*} God damn, there just went another damn bullet
I'm hit, my vest is barely able to handle it
It's too thin, if I get hit again I can't do it
I scoop Dee, follow Bizarre's path, ran through it and
Made it to the front door and collapsed
On the steps looked up and I seen Swift
Shooting it out but I can't see who he's shooting it out with
But Denaun's right behind him, squeezing his four-fifth


Yo, it's Friday night, came to this bitch right
Big ass on my left, hand Desert Eagle in my right
I ain't come in this bitch to party, I came in this bitch to fight
Although I can't stay here to fight cause I'm popping niggas tonight
That's right bitches I'm drunk with revenge
Shot a bouncer in the neck for trying to check when I get in
Swift told me to meet him here, so it's clear that the schmuck
That shot out the back of his truck is up in this motherfucker
So one shot for the money, two is to stop the show
I just wanna know who driving the black Mitsubishi?
He tried to run, so Proof shot him in the knee with a three-piece




All aboard!
OK, next stop, my basement
Snap! Haha
I'll meet you down there!

There once was a saying that I used to say
Back in the day when I met Dre
I used to sit and goof on the phone with my friend Proof
That if I went gold, I'd go right through the roof
He'd say "What if you went platinum?"
I'd just laugh at him
"That's not happening, that I can't fathom"
Eighty-something million records worldwide later
I'm living in a house with a fucking elevator

Haters getting mad
They done had enough of Shady
You slay me
Nothing you say matters enough to touché me
Rappers try to play me
They use Hailie as a ukulele
Whoopsa-that-a-fucking-daisy
That’s a no-no
Even she knows
Dada’s fucking crazy
Fucking animal, cuckoo, bananas
Fuckin' A, B
Maybe it's because
I never had a mother raise me
Fuck around and throw a baby
At another baby
You may think it's 'cause
Of the way that I was brought up
But it's all caught up to me now
Karmas in the waters
Every line I ever said
Has got me in a corner
You might think it doesn't creep upon ya
But it all does
You wouldn't listen, man
I tried to warn ya when you started
Now your brain's all haunted
'Cause of all the shit you thought of
Chainsaw slaughters
Turn your daughters into sawdust
I never thought it'd come to this
I ought to just be honest

There once was a saying that I used to say
Back in the day when I met Dre
I used to sit and goof on the phone with my friend Proof
That if I went gold, I'd go right through the roof
He'd say "What if you went platinum?"
I'd just laugh at him
"That's not happening, that I can't fathom"
Eighty-something million records worldwide later
I'm living in a house with a fucking elevator

"Sorry Lance, Mr. Lambert, and Aiken ain't gonna make it
They get so mad when I call them both faggots"
All these fucking voices in my head, I can't take it
Someone shut that fucking baby up 'fore I shake it
You're standing adjacent
To Jason, slash, Leatherface, and
Together makes 'em
A fucking bad combination
I lashed at the doctor in my last operation
Shoved the Wiener Schnitzel up his ass
Hopped away, some-
-body please stop the patient
Get the cops to mace him
Homie, I'm the Scheiße
Ask Doctor Dreizehn
I can't leave the game, I just can't walk away, son
No, not a-now, not a chance, not today, son
I can't believe, I leave for one brief second
And you pussies queef all over the rap game, naked
And use a leaf to wipe up the crap stain, feck it
I'll just keep saying the same exact same, check it

There once was a saying that I used to say
Back in the day when I met Dre
I used to sit and goof on the phone with my friend Proof
That if I went gold, I'd go right through the roof
He'd say "What if you went platinum?"
I'd just laugh at him
"That's not happening, that I can't fathom"
Eighty-something million records worldwide later
I'm living in a house with a fucking elevator

Elevator in my house
I'll smell ya later
I blew the fuck up
A hamster in the microwave, I
Thinking 'bout an escalator now
Steps, I hate 'em
Told the neighbors step away
Then I just pepper sprayed 'em
Yeah, for every time you ride down the street
Or hideout, drive by my house and beep
Like, now mothafucka, try now to sleep
And you're tryna find out why now there's beef
Mace in your face, bitch, cry now pussy
This is my house, all nine thousand feet
So you can suck my dick with Amy Winehouse's teeth
Then I shove 'em in the elevator
Take 'em to the top
Stand above 'em
Just to cut the fucking cable
Let 'em plop
Walk an hour to the damn refrigerator
Get a pop
While I let 'em fall all the way to the basement
Yelling "Stop!"

There once was a saying that I used to say
Back in the day when I met Dre
I used to sit and goof on the phone with my friend Proof
That if I went gold, I'd go right through the roof
He'd say "What if you went platinum?"
I'd just laugh at him
"That's not happening, that I can't fathom"
Eighty-something million records worldwide later
I'm living in a house with a fucking elevator

Fucking son of a bitch, I can't believe this shit
This must be all that there is, this must be it
Fucking-A, even got a bidet
To wash my ass after I shit with gold toilet paper
Dishwasher's so big, when I'm pissed off
I can just toss a flying saucer in it
The shit's awesome
Yeah, fucking elevator
Living in a house with a fucking elevator



Yeah
Yeah, girl
Can you hear that?
It's playing our song
Are you sleepy? Take a nap
You're not afraid of the dark, are you?

You hear the beat as it makes you not want to go to sleep
I knock on Dakota's door—it's locked, so I go to creep
'Round the back with binoculars, not 'cause I wanna peep
But because I'm hungry—she smells like tacos, I wanna eat
Visions of hot chocolaty marshmallows, all so sweet
With sugar plums, oh look, here comes Marshall, he's on your street
He's placing hot smoldering charcoals beneath your feet
Now walk on 'em, he's dancing with carcasses cheek to cheek
Like a Thanksgiving turkey, a holiday ham
Cinnamon sprinkled on toast, strawberry marmalade jam
Flavor my favorite graham crackers with JonBenét Rams'
I guess a modern-day Jack the Ripper is all that I am

'Cause when the lights are off, I see the girl's asleep
But I can hear you, my love, you keep calling me
Although we're worlds apart, you mean the world to me
So once you call, I come, I will answer
'Cause when the lights are off, I see the girl’s asleep
I hear my music box playing a song for me
So won’t you twirl around and do a whirl for me?
And would you be my private little dancer?

I almost look comatose, who wants to be sober? Gross
I foam like a Doberman, mouth open, I overdose
Put coke up my nostrils in both my holes, then I plug my nose
My pupils quadruple in size, eyes are so bugged, I know
I put on my mother's makeup, get naked, and run around
Waving the gun around, I think I'm down to a hundred pounds
There's thunder, I wonder how come it rains, but the sun is out?
The devil's upset with his wife, they must be sluggin' it out
I must be buggin' the fuck out, but what the fuck about?
Voices are leading me up to the attic, I love my house
They pull and they tug my blouse, the sound of a music box
Comes from inside a toy chest, but what do I do? It's locked
I pick it and open it, but it's stuffed full of human parts
I dig 'til I find it, I wind it up, and the tune just starts
It's playing a song so beautiful, and the room is dark
The moon is full, I smell a funeral, guess I'll loom in the park

'Cause when the lights are off, I see the girl's asleep
But I can hear you, my love, you keep calling me
Although we're worlds apart, you mean the world to me
So once you call, I come, I will answer
'Cause when the lights are off, I see the girl’s asleep
I hear my music box playing a song for me
So won’t you twirl around and do a whirl for me?
And would you be my private little dancer?

I'm fixated on asphyxiatin' and breakin' this little chick's neck like a Pixy Stick
The sick, Satan-worshippin' bitches get horse whippings
I'm in the back, through the back door slippin'
Through the crack, leavin' the corpse drippin'
The mortician of love, sent from above
Forced entry, the more wenchy the more stingy I become
Been doing this for more than a quarter-century, I'm just numb
Am I dreaming, is it real? Someone pinch me on the buns
The time has come to tie her up, gotta roll me the ladder
I've had enough of the chatter, climb up to the window, look at her
Then climb in slow to shatter her brain matter and batter her
With a bat—a matter of fact, that will splatter her
But before I do that, I'll have a chat to flatter her
Give her two compliments back to back like, "Tabitha
I'm your secret admirer, I'm back to ravish ya
So strong is your fight, but you're no match for Dracula"
Prolonging her plight as I go back to stabbin' her
Zoom in with the lens, then pan back the camera
Stand back, 'cause here comes your man, Jack, so Pamela

'Cause when the lights are off, I see the girl's asleep
But I can hear you, my love, you keep calling me
Although we're worlds apart, you mean the world to me
So once you call, I come, I will answer
'Cause when the lights are off, I see the girl’s asleep
I hear my music box playing a song for me
So won’t you twirl around and do a whirl for me?
And would you be my private little dancer?



There's an intruder in my house
I scream for police, but I doubt
They're gonna hear me when I shout

A couple of cocktails'll send me to jail
There's a couple of cops hot on my trail
But this time, when I get pulled over
There's a Doberman Pinscher and a pit bull in the seat
These pigs'll get bit foolin' with me, quit foolin' with me
Bitch, you're gonna see, no pistol in the seat
Why it always gotta be an issue when you're me?
And which you're gonna see
In the long run, I'ma be the wrong one
You wanna harass with this limo-tinted glass
Flashin' that flashlight on my ass — where was you at
Last night when them assholes ran up on my grass?
Rapper slash actor, kiss the crack of my cracker slash ass
They took away my right to bear arms
What I'm 'posed to fight with, bare palms?
Yeah, right! They comin' with bombs
I'm comin' with flare guns; we as Americans

We as Americans, us as a citizen
Gotta protect ourselves, look at how shit has been
We better check ourselves
Livin' up in these streets
Through worse and through better health
Survivin' by any means
We as Americans, us as a citizen
We are samaritans, what do we get us in?
We better check ourselves
Look at how shit has been
Take a look where you live
This is America, and we are Americans

I make beaucoup bucks, wearin' beaucoup vests
Drama hangin' over my head like a voodoo hex
I coulda been next to fly over the cuckoo's nest
With you-know-who, with an S tatooed to my chest
But I've finessed it, now I've got the industry pissy
Ever since me and Dre split it fifty-fifty on 50
It's funny, we got a buzz spreadin' quicker
Than makin' paper airplanes out of a twenty
Fuck money! I don't rap for dead presidents
I'd rather see the President {dead}
It's never been said, but I set precedents
And the standards and they can't stand it
My name shoulda been bastard
The shit shoulda been plastered
On my forehead with a stamp, I shoulda been blasted
I shoulda been had a cap put in my ass
But I'm too swift and fast for that, I'm past it
I'm too old to go and cruise Gratiot — fuck that shit!
I done seen how fast this rap shit
Can turn into some pap-pap shit, that quick, snap click
But this time, they got the fucking automatic
Ain't no one gon' test this man — clack-click!

We as Americans, us as a citizen
Gotta protect ourselves, look at how shit has been
We better check ourselves
Livin' up in these streets
Through worse and through better health
Survivin' by any means
We as Americans, us as a citizen
We are samaritans, what do we get us in?
We better check ourselves
Look at how shit has been
Take a look where you live
This is America, and we are Americans

*sshhhhh* I got a secret, if you can keep it between us
I tuck two nina's under my jeans either side of my penis
Under my long johns, under my Sean Johns
When runnin' with the long arm of the law I'm long gone
I'ma do five years — no less than that, no questions asked
So it might be a good idea that I stop right here
And quit while I'm ahead, already in the red
Already got a steady infrared meant for my head
A target on my back, bigger problems than that
Bin Laden on my ass, he probably gon' send a task
I ain't gon' even ask, they ain't gon' let me pack
They ain't gon' give me my semi, but I got my weed back

We as Americans, us as a citizen
Gotta protect ourselves, look at how shit has been
We better check ourselves
Livin' up in these streets
Through worse and through better health
Survivin' by any means
We as Americans, us as a citizen
We are samaritans, what do we get us in?
We better check ourselves
Look at how shit has been
Take a look where you live
This is America, and we are Americans



Bars, like Paul Rosenberg
Alright look, I had class, I just got expelled
I excelled at nothing in school
So if you're tryna test my patience it just failed
But King Mathers, I still get hailed
So call me sire, like I exhaled
After I had a deep ass breath held
I guess well, that'll make my size double XL
So kiss your highness's hinded ass
While I'm trying to stretch, it's time to exercise
I'm flexing, isometrics
Twice the reps 'til I get extra-sized
And set my bis and pecs and triceps on fire
Cause I'm coming out guns blazing
Like flaming pythons, my suggestion is parental discretion
Be advised, due to this mental aggression
We advise you to back up, like Byron Leftwich
I'm infectious, I rhyme like I got a sinus infection
A virus, I'm congested and I just ingested
Five Allegras but the side effects from these anti-depressants, they're tryna mess with my mind
I'm a regular Hyde and Jekyll
White with freckles but I silence hecklers
You might wanna head for the fire exits
I'm coming through like a wrecking ball
You would swear I think highly of Miley
And I respect her, the way I backhand her
Excuse my French, Montana, but I am worried about nutting
God damn it, I'm a sexist, I drive a Lexus
Textses out of her mind, and I'm in Texas
With a chainsaw, wait, what did I forget this
Time, oh, my machetes getting upset, he said
He was ready for me to come get him from inside the shed
It was time, he's restless
He wants to make blood shed like a storage unit
But before I do it, let me think this through
Cause if I behead this bitch then I'd be headless *slurping noise*
Mic check, one, two
I ain't barely check the mic just yet
And I just sweared like twice as many times
In less than ninety seconds
Than Andrew fucking Dice ever did in his fucking life
But I guess I'm expected to make these kinds of violent records
It's why I keep rhyming reckless
Fuck it, I swear, like a diamond necklace
Since freestyling over phone tap, my line's connected
With rhymes that kept in touch with the fans, that's why the more bars, the better my reception
And I give a fuck about sales, and fuck pop, I don't even like refreshments
Cindy Crawford tryna fend me off with a bendy straw
At the waffle house, awful mouth
But if you don't like what I'm talking about then block me out
Just then Foxy Brown, walks up and knocks me down
Kicks me and socks me, ow
Apparently still mad over what I said last year
On that Vegas track, I just look stupid and stand there
And try to act like I can't hear
What? Sorry dear, but I think Pam Grier just stuck a tampon in my damn ear
That's when my man Denaun Porter ran behind me to pantomime
That if you wanna kick his ass, stand in line
Hands inside my pants as I fantasize taking advantage
Of Brandy and Janet by grabbing my Spanish Fly
Like a blind Hispanic guy with his zipper stuck
Give a fuck, it's all part of my grand design
To get Amanda Bynes to come and fucking blow me like a dandelion
Better watch your step, you 'bout to cross an outlandish mine
I'm what you get if Aaron Hernandez rhymed
So stand aside unless you plan to find out how handy I am with a branding iron
Fuck talking clear so you all can hear
I'd rather rap like a fucking auctioneer
Fuck around and walk from here to the Southpaw premier
Get on Paul's back, rapping "Paul Revere"
So call me queer, cause I'm always weird
So praise a Genius, hope this don't get taken out of text
But Hillary, I promise to wipe my server clean if you face subpoenas
Got a name that speaks for itself like Anthony Weiner
Hands in between my pants in a theater, jacking my meat
A fan of Trina, Angelina, and Christina and Serena and Selena
Scarlett Johansson, Tiffani Amber Thiessen
Give me a damn good reason and not wanna slip an Ambien in the Cappuccino
And try to have a 3-sum with Janet Reno
I'm fucked worse than Donald Trump
On Lexapro in Mexico across from a Texaco in McDonald's drunk
Broke and out of gas, busted water pump
Getting fondled up by Ronald, feeling him on his rump
Oh yeah, and me and Alyssa Milano hump
We do
Bringing the horror to emcees like the aura of the Run DMC fedora
Addidas and Diadoras but I need at least three to four of those Rita Oras
In a four seater Taurus but tell them my face is the best seat in the house
Heat seeking missile, duck, demented, sick, hate and see who gives a fuck
I invented prick, and that’s a true statement, I see the bitch in you Caitlyn
I keep the pistol tucked like Bruce Jenner’s dick
Oh and Azealia Banks just wanna tell you thanks
Now I got trailer skanks sending me ballpark franks in the mail as pranks
And hot pockets, thanks a lot
Awful, I made monopoly off misogyny
Sodomy, how many chocolatey jell-o pops can he possibly lace, walking atrocity
No wonder you scoff at me, it’s still obvious I’m as off-putting as Bill Cosby is
Treat women like property, possessive like a noun with an apostrophe
S’s, I’d probably stalk broccoli, yes it’s
Socrates with a block of cheese and a dollar stuck in this soda pop machine
Got emcees dropping to knees, copping a plea bargain
They keep sobbing, like, “please stop it”
Aftermath, bitch, still Detoxing
Looking for us? We over here
Like we’re eavesdropping



*Key*

I never meant to give you mushrooms, girl
I never meant to bring you to my world
Now you sitting in the corner crying
And now it's my fault, my fault
I never meant to give you mushrooms, girl
I never meant to bring you to my world
Now you sitting in the corner crying
And now it's my fault, my fault

I went to John's rave with Ron and Dave
And met a new wave blonde babe
With half of her head shaved
A nurse aid who came to get laid
And tied up with first aid tape and raped on the first date
Susan – an ex-heroin addict who just stopped usin'
I said, "Wait, first try this hallucinogen!
It's better than heroin, Henn, the booze or the gin
C'mere, let's go in here" "Who's in the den?"
"Shut up, slut! Chew up this mushroom
This'll help you get in touch with your roots
We'll get barefoot, butt-naked, and run in the woods
"Oh dag"
"I ain't mean for you to eat the whole bag"

I never meant to give you mushrooms, girl
I never meant to bring you to my world
Now you sitting in the corner crying
And now it's my fault, my fault
I never meant to give you mushrooms, girl
I never meant to bring you to my world
Now you sitting in the corner crying
And now it's my fault, my fault

"Yo Sue"
Oh shoot, she's tripping
I wasn't trying to turn this into something major
I just wanted to make you appreciate nature
Susan, stop crying! I don't hate ya
The world's not against you, I'm sorry your father raped ya
So what you had your little coochie in your dad's mouth?
That ain't no reason to start wigging and spaz out
She said
Would you calm down, you're starting to scare me
She said
I don't even have any kids and I can't cook
We need to get to a hospital 'fore it's too late
‘Cause I never seen no one eat as many 'shrooms as you ate

I never meant to give you mushrooms, girl
I never meant to bring you to my world
Now you sitting in the corner crying
And now it's my fault, my fault
I never meant to give you mushrooms, girl
I never meant to bring you to my world
Now you sitting in the corner crying
And now it's my fault, my fault

I'm not your dad, quit trying to swallow your tongue
Want some gum? Put down the scissors
'Fore you do something dumb
I'll be right back, just chill, baby, please?
I gotta go find Dave, he's the one who gave me these
"John, where's Dave at before I bash you"
"Dave! Pull up your pants, we need an ambulance
There's a girl upstairs talking to plants, chopping her hair off
And there's only two days left of Spring Break
How long do these things take to wear off?"
"I took three, she ate the other 22 caps
Now she's upstairs crying out her eyeballs, drinking Lysol"
"I know and it's my fault!"

I never meant to give you mushrooms, girl
I never meant to bring you to my world
Now you sitting in the corner crying
And now it's my fault, my fault
I never meant to give you mushrooms, girl
I never meant to bring you to my world
Now you sitting in the corner crying
And now it's my fault, my fault

My God, I'm so sorry! I'm so sorry!
Susan please wake up! Please!
Please wake up!!! What are you doing?!
You're not dead! You're NOT dead!
I know you're not dead!
Wake up, Susan, wake up! Oh God




Ryan's a homicidal misfit, I write the solution of biophysics
On the side of a cliff in some hieroglyphics
This my admission to having violent psychotic wit
Devour, polish it, politics
By the way I'm higher than the Eiffel Tower tip
I like writing, but I will stick this pencil in your ass
Before I write your shit, pause, inhaling hella kush
Us and Yelawolf like a heavy foot gas pedal push
Felons, crooks, going door-to-door
Like we selling books, Dolly Parton style, melons mushed
Now my bitch a dancer, I'm about as sick as cancer
If you could swallow my style, you'd probably rip your pants up
If you could bottle my style and sell it to somebody
It probably will smell like cologne made out of bits of panther
They call me Anchorman, I hold down the ship
Leave you niggas floating in water, then go and drown a fish
Fuck, I'm fucking heinous, I make you fucking famous
Them lead showers is coming, fuck is you saying?

FUCK! It's fucking raining, SHIT! There's lightning, BITCH!
It's thundering cause I'm cussing up a storm if you wondering, SHIT!
SHIT! You couldn't muster up enough thought
To take a dump during a brain fart, chump
If you want urine in your face, all you had to do was say
That you wish you would've just stayed pissed off in the first place
We came to monopolize the game, illuminati is here
Yeah, human oddities, at odds with us, your squad's gotta be
Cause we started out cold in a snowball, we froze
Soon as we rolled up on these hoes, all's we know
Is y'all lowered the bar like limbo, you know who you are
So quit fucking the dog before we start calling YOU Bizarre
Shit, screw the pooch, y'all done raped a pitbull
Fell in love with the shih-tzu, this missile's directed directly at you
And this for these hoes who don't know me from a can of paint
You must be huffing, fuck a ball sack
If the taints can't take you on a date, you mistake me for a gentleman
You 2000 and late, man, and Will I ain't, I'm the bad guy
Type of guy that will drag five girls up on stage
Pour ice in their pants, and the first one who pees gets a black eye

Must be outta your mind, you think you fucking with us
Suck on these nuts, bitch, hang it up, this game is over

Puffin' loosies, watching "I Love Lucy" with Gary Busey
Crazy, how the fuck could you son me? I'm Shady
Will there ever come a day when they could slay me?
I don't know, fifth month, black and yellow insect, maybe
'Til then I kill the bad man trying to slay me
Everything you kick weak, your spit kung fughesi
Nickel, I just picked up a Phantom, look how it rolls, Royce
Even if I wanted to quit, I ain't got no choice
Verses keep coming, I should invoice my own voice
You should see the kind of asses that my pole hoist
Hoes be like diamonds in your chain, man, so moiss
Bang bang, bang bang, House Gang, chainsaw
Here to kill you pussies, don't ask what we came for
I write until my right arm veins sore
Forearm feel like Thor's arm in a gang war
You hear that? Yaowa, you know who finna fall out
Definitively finish you, my fist take out that eyeball
Piranha mentality with a Jaws bite all night
Coming up, never saw light, but never lost sight

Jets and movers, cesspoolers, meth abusers
You step to us, text Rugers to respect the shooters
My men think in sync, roll with the best crew
Move to the beat of the same drum without Lex Luger
Welcome to Nayhood, big in the 'jects, G
Cheated death multiple times without rigging the deck
So I'm well-prepped if you just want war
There will be blood everywhere, you be laying on the Louboutin floor
It's raw, you keeping acting like you don't know Mouse, nigga
And you going to need the best doctors, house nigga
Guard your jewels and avoid large tools
Cause after I spill you at the light, you be in a car pool
Keep your distance from idiots, cause the truth told
They food for thought's rotten, they gems are fool's gold
Need results from my actions, mistakes I'll exonerate
I'm Martin King staring at a picture of Obama's face
Talking funds, niggas ain't never seen stock
I don't need the key to the game, I pick a mean lock

Must be outta your mind, you think you fucking with us
Suck on these nuts, bitch, hang it up, this game is over

Take off, you invited inside of the mind of
I'm grinding up rappers are lining up jackers, I'm climbing up ladders
I buy enough clappers to retire you factors, fire at drama
You liars and actors, I'm the genuine article
But read me wrong, get my gun and split you to particles
Not only heir to the throne, but my chair is suspended in air
Stay fly like unlimited fare
You got us pegged wrong, my circle don't fit in with squares
I smell shit and piss, know where it's coming from
You stepped on number two just to be number one
Now I'm a step on you, bring it to your yard
Bogart for arts, we go hard
You frauds just blow hard like broads, I coast guard the West
I'm Mozart, I compose dark shit with no heart

I got Jim Beam in the liver, getting head like clean clippers
With haters on my dick like a jeans zipper
When I throw up 16's like I drink liquor
You think you seen sick? Well, bitch, you ain't seen sicker
Than a cracker that will hop around in a hospital gown
Popping the trunk, my pump will stay cocking the round
I shit logs and I piss river brown
Cause I drink creek water and spit the river Nile
And that's as close as I get to a pyramid
Shit, they think I'm Illuminati, so fucking ignorant
Sick with a grin, here with this pen, so innocent
But when you win, they say you a sin, but in the end
They jump on the bandwagon and dance to the band playing
Skinny-ass pants sagging, it's only yourself you playing
Call me a clown, but you love what the clown's sanging
I'm a freak shows at the county carnival, then you paying
Bitch, I'm on a trapeze with no legs in the dark
Yelling "Go Shady!" Driving slower than an old lady
In an old '89, no piece if you pay me
Give me peace sign on my grill, no Mercedes
I'm getting paid for these shows that I throw lately
Same shows a year ago would have broken most of you crazies
They call me crazy cause I made it
Bitch, you crazy cause you quit, look at my clique lately
You ain't fucking with Budden, you ain't got no choice with Royce
You don't want to see the Crooked I, well, listen to Ortiz voice
That dirt road hit the 8 Mile, the point oh boys
And if Marshall want me to clap, then, homie, I deploy game over

Yo, I don't think they heard you, tell 'em again

Game over!



And I’m willing to borrow your grass
But I specialize in eating MC's
In the immortal words of LL Cool J
And for those of y'all who don't know what a G.O.A.T. is
It means the Greatest Of All Time
And I consider myself one of those
So thank you very much, here it goes

This is the part I was worried about
Everyone thinks that my career is down the tubes
And I'm in some dusty garage
Inhalin' them carbon monoxide fumes
And everyone's tellin' me what I should do
And how I should come out and what to rap about
And I know I got a lot up
In my medulla oblongata that I gotta get out
And I'm not sure how this is gonna come off
They're probably gonna think that I'm comin' off as cocky
Like I just started givin' a fuck what you really think about me
See, the thing about me
Is you don't really know a thing about me
Everyone's makin' a stink about me
Like there's some kind of an aura of that of the king around me
Surround me with nothin' but gangsters
Killers and bangers and the most dangerous criminals
And I feel like I'm more comfortable around them
Than I do my own motherfuckin' neighbors
But, see, my dream is to be remembered
As one of the best when I leave; why does it seem like I'm not even put up in the same category as other MC's?
So when Weezy says that he's better than Jay Z
Please be that just subliminally
Means he thinks Jigga's the best
And that he's the only one up in that league, see
And it's easy just to consider me
One of the greatest white rappers there is
Knowin' goddamn well that I'm one of the best motherfuckin' rappers who ever lived, period

I'm a G.O.A.T. and I don't mean to gloat
But I know what I know and I know what you think
And these magazines'll never put it in ink
Because how would it look
If they considered me as a G.O.A.T.?
And for those of y'all who don't know what a G.O.A.T. is
It means the Greatest Of All Time
And I consider myself one of those
So thank you very much, here it goes

Maybe they figure that I'm on my way out the game
So they gotta go try to find 'em
A new Eminem or a new Shady
If they think it's gonna happen, man, I thought I was crazy
Or maybe I could be takin' it wrong
And they're tryna pay homage to me in a strange way
So let me pay homage to my fellow white competitors
Almost in the same way
And Bubba Sparxxx, he just won't write
Because he's so caught up in that snow white
That Timbaland can't even get him in the studio
He's so gone off that coke, right?
And it's so sad, ‘cause he's dope, right?
America's next great white hope, right?
So now they feel like they gotta come up with
Some corny-ass White Rapper Show, right?
And which I'm still havin' mixed feelings about
They said it'd be real, I'm just spillin' it out
There's somethin' about a white boy talking black
And runnin' around with a damn grill in his mouth
And I love when the say that Tiger Woods shit
"Isn't it ironic that the best rapper's white
And the best golfer's black?"
And I'm the one who's gotta catch all the flack off of that
But these are the people who
Never had heard of an Eminem until 8 Mile had came out
But I had already hit middle America
Parents had all got to likin' me now
When suddenly I wasn't such a bad guy
All of the hatred for me must've died
Thought I committed career suicide
So I had to turn back into the bad guy
So faggoty faggoty faggoty gays
Anatomy God made Raggedy Ann and Andy
Not Raggedy Andy and Andy and Andy
And Angelina Jolie is just another ho, and Brad is a sucka
Because once I fuck her, she wants to go to Somalia to adopt another baby; you know what I say? "No."
You better save some of them kids from Madonna
She needs all the publicity she can get
You want a Shady, well
You got it, man, I ain't apologizin' for shit

I'm a G.O.A.T. and I don't mean to gloat
But I know what I know and I know what you think
And these magazines'll never put it in ink
Because how would it look
If they considered me as a G.O.A.T.?
And for those of y'all who don't know what a G.O.A.T. is
It means the Greatest Of All Time
And I consider myself one of those
So thank you very much, here it goes

Man, I'm takin' my ball and goin' home
Man, shit is too easy
Nobody even wants to pass me the ball
‘Cause I'm a G.O.A.T
So don't worry, I'm out the motherfuckin' game
And y'all can sit and argue about who's the motherfuckin' best
But y'all know that  I'm a G.O.A.T
And like I said, I'm one of the motherfuckin' best
Before you get your panties in a motherfuckin' bunch
But before I go, I'd like to say fuck you very much
To everybody who wasn't there from the start
And thank you very much to everybody who was
And y'all ain't gotta say it, just think it
‘Cause I know that you know that I know
That you know that I know that you know that I'm a G.O.A.T
I'm out, y'all, it's been real, peace



Now, what you know about a sweet MC from the 313?
None of these skills you 'bout to see come free
So you wanna be a sweet MC, you gotta become me
If you ever wanna be one, see

Yo, some people say I'm whack, now if that's right I'm
The freshest whack MC that you ever heard in your lifetime
My slick acapella sounds clever with the beats, boy
I'm the deepest thing since potholes to ever hit the streets
Forget a gold digger's succubus
My soul's thick with ruggedness
I got more different strokes than Philip Drummound
On open mic I bone your women
Just to keep my lyrics comin'
We elevated to new heights, premeditated
Let it be that I stated, they hate it
Now that they see that I made it
The escalated can be put to the test of greatness
Snatch the heart from MC's and I ate it
So I take it, that's the reason I'm hated
To represent's my temperament
If rap was a dick, all you so called hard MC's would not be impotent, but pimpin' it
And actin' like you could rock a show
Harder than LL's rock the bells, but yous a hoe
Everything that you collaborate I lacerate
My rhymes they keep comin'
Like nymphomaniacs that masturbate
At a faster rate, yeah, I got somethin' for your ass to hate
I blast your hate, and have you all runnin' master gates
And as for face clutchin' and touchin' the flows
I got them open like marijuana smoke up in your nose
Buckin' these hoes, I got that shit down to a science
Leavin' them hot and bothered, turned on, like an appliance
Defiance? No, we won't have that
You want your shit to blow up?
Well, I'ma stuff some dynamite in your ass crack
And blast that shit to kingdom come
Then bring them some of this real hip-hop
I drop beats and you ain't singin' or gonna do a thing but run
And you all knew from Meeko
That you couldn't hold your own
With the strength of Lou Ferrigno
So, stop that bullshit and flow, yo
You need to come with the real skills and act like you know

Now, what you know about a sweet MC from the 313?
None of these skills you 'bout to see come free
So you wanna be a sweet MC, you gotta become me
If you ever wanna be one, see

So what you know about a sweet MC in the 313?
You don't know shit, so when you see one, flee
You can be Run-D, you'll never be the MC
I stopped the alphabet at S and got it down to a T
I'm sure you're bound to agree, a sweet MC crash the spot
I'll make the roof hot like I was Rock Master Scott
Your ass forgot, so just in case you don't remember me
I'll run your brain round the block to jog your fuckin' memory
It's either them or me, man, kill or be killed
You will'll be sealed, your casket closed, you still'll be billed
My facilities filled with fans, packed to capacity
I'll send a rapper back with the crack of his ass shitty
If he's actin' soft and he cowers, he better come cleaner
Than Jeru jackin' off when he showers
You flowers got no clout with a thing
You could date a stick of dynamite
And wouldn't go out with a bang
I shout with a slang, simple as ABC's
Skip over the D's and rock the microphone with ease
Dethrone MC's, and I'ma max alone
Relax your dome, like a solo from a saxophone
So facts are known, biters get treated with shots
I rock a beat harder than you could beat it with rocks
I'm greeted with flocks of fellow followers' singers
You couldn't make the fans throw up their hands
If they swallowed their fingers
But you can bring yours, let's see what you got
But don't front, and never try to be what you're not
'Cause you can be quick
Jump the candlestick, burn your back
And fuck Jill on a hill, but you still ain't jack

Now, what you know about a sweet MC from the 313?
None of these skills you 'bout to see come free
So you wanna be a sweet MC, you gotta become me
If you ever wanna be one, see



Good evening
This is your fucking captain speaking
We will soon be reaching an altitude of
Four million and a half feet
That's eight million miles in the sky
Please, undo your seat belt for takeoff
You are now free to smoke about the cabin

I'm Dre, from back in the day
From N.W.A, from black and the gray
From choking a bitch, to smacking her face
From stacking up bodies, to racking AKs up
From racking up hits, to stacking them crates up
I'm still hungry, and I'm back with a tapeworm
And we're what's happenin' in rap entertainment
Me and Shady, as far as competition, faggot, there ain't none

Speak of the Devil, it's attack of the Rain Man
Chainsaw in hand, bloodstain on my apron
Soon as the blade spun, vrrunn, they run away from
Who wanna play dungeon? No one is safe from
In search of a brain surgeon, a great one
Wait, it ain't funny, man, it's urgent, I need one
Two boxes of detergent in a paint gun
And an emergency squirt gun to spray A-1

So one more time for old time's sake
Dre, drop that beat and scratch that break
Now just blow a little bit of that smoke my way
I said, one more time for old time's sake
Dre, drop that beat and scratch that break
Now just send a little bit of that smoke my way

Smoke signal in the sky like Verizon Wireless
A nice environment
Surprised entirely, hypnotized by the sound
I surround the hydrants, taking lives of firemen
Say goodbye, here I am again, naked wives and Vicodin
Before I begin to get so high, pussy boy, I could spin
Vinn-vinn, fuck the handle, I fly off the hinge
Let that boy off the bench, coach, and throw it to him
There he goes in his trench coat, no clothes again
Baby, make us some french toast and show us some skin
I'll show you every inch grows on my foreskin
Show me nipple, I pinch both, and throw up a ten
Now you know it's a sin to tease, blow us again
The sorcerer of intercourse; if it's forced, it's him
Don't fight the feeling if you're feeling the force within
And when you wake up in the morning next to the porcelain

So one more time for old time's sake
Dre, drop that beat and scratch that break
Now just blow a little bit of that smoke my way
I said, one more time for old time's sake
Dre, drop that beat and scratch that break
Now just send a little bit of that smoke my way

Now where there's smoke, there's fire
Where there's fire, there's flames
Where there's flames, there's chronic
Either you high or you ain't
I got no time for no games

Nuh-uh, he ain't playin'
He's gon' get the AK and aim it right at your brain
I'm slightly insane, vodka and creatine
Hpnotiq and Red Bull, it's an incredible energy drink
And it's given me wings, I believe I can fly
While I pee on a girl, you won't catch me CSI
It's as easy as pie, and as simple as cake
Dre, get on the mic and make 'em tremble and shake

Now put your smoke up in the air, raise your Henny and Coke
And if you really wanna get fucked up, just let me know
We can smoke 'til there's no more lighter fluid to do it
Let's get into it, you're smokin' with the triedest and truest
I got the Midas touch when it comes to rollin' shit up
You motherfuckers ain't smokin', you just holdin' shit up
Now here we go, let's get up, get down, hold up a blunt
I smoke the kinda stuff that make the records go number one
'Cause if at first you don't succeed
Won't hurt to smoke some weed
Now them words are just a little more personal for me
Seeing as how I blew up off of puffing them trees

Well smoke enough for me, fuck yeah, light it up Cheech
Come on, smoke me out cuz, give me contact buzz
Get me on track, they love me when I'm on that stuff
But this is Earth calling Shady, man, come on back – What?
Man, we're losing him, he won't even respond back, fuck!
Dre, it's hot, I think we better go check on their temperatures
I'll get the thermometer, you get the bandages
Now baby, just bend over, this won't hurt a damn bit, just —

Give me one more time for old time's sake
Dre, drop that beat and scratch that break
Now just blow a little bit of that smoke my way
I said, one more time for old time's sake
Dre, drop that beat and scratch that break
Now just send a little bit of that smoke my way



Oh foolish pride, oh, oh, oh, oh foolish pride
Oh, oh, oh, oh foolish pride, oh, oh, oh, oh foolish pride

Well foolish pride has a lot of things to say
You got foolish pride, like you got tooth decay
But tooth decay is another problem
So let's take this old foolish pride problem and solve it
Now, when I talk about foolish pride
I mean blacks and whites taking different sides
When blacks and whites take different sides
Unity never happens, and we will subside
We will subside and hatred will release
And everything will just crush that peace
But when we crush that peace, you see we start hatin' each other
But remember, you are my brother, and you are my sister
Just like I'm a mister
I seen a black girlfriend and I kissed her
I kissed her, I placed it on her cheek
And she didn't come back til next week
Now it was next week and she was back again
Wanting to kiss a white kid
So she was my girlfriend, we started going out
But that's okay because we were black and white
Blacks and whites they sometimes mix
But black girls only want your money cause they're dumb chicks
So I'mma say like this
Don't date a black girl, take it as a diss
If you want, but if you don't
I'mma tell you like this, I surely won't
Never date a black girl because blacks only want your money
And that shit ain't funny
So I'mma say look honey
Why do you do this?
You know, you step up to me like you a Brutus
Then you try to grab my spinach
Because it's green and that's cash
So get outta here, cause I don't need your ass
I said that before, but that's okay because like I said you're a whore
Black girls and white girls just don't mix
Because black girls are dumb and white girls are good chicks
White girls are good, I like white girls
I like white girls all over the world
White girls are fine and they blow my mind
And that's why I'm here now telling you this rhyme
Cause black girls, I really don't like
We don't mix, it's like riding a bike
When you're peddling hard, uphill both ways
You know it's kinda hard and that's why I say to you
I'm giving you a little advice
Don't date a black girl, if you do it once you won't do it twice
You won't ever do it again because they'll take your money
And that ain't funny
So I'mma say look honey
I thought he said that before
But like I said again you're nothing but a big whore
So when mike catch on the bass line
That's okay ‘cause we will not just waste time
I'll get straight to the point
Black girls are bitches, that's why I'mma tell ya you better pull up your britches
‘Cause all that cash is making your ass drag
From the boyfriend you ganked and that's pretty bad
I mean that's pretty sad when you're dating a black guy
And then you turn around and fuck another big black guy
Now that's pretty wrong, but you're just ganking
But that's okay because you need a goddamn spanking
From me, the funky M'n'M
I'm busting rhymes and I'm swallowing phlegm
I'm busting a freestyle just like this
I say swallowing phlegm and Howard gets pissed
But when Howard gets pissed that's okay
Because he leaves and he doesn't show up for two more days
So I'll just worry about that problem when I come to it
I'll cross that bridge when I come to it
Because, I forgot the chorus
But that's okay cause y'all saying bust a rhyme for us
So I'mma bust another rhyme about this black girl
She turned out to be a fuckin' wack girl
A wack girl, because black girls ain't funny
All they want is your goddamn money
They take you for everything you got
And then you stand with a bunch of snot in your hand
So I'mma kick it to you just like this
How does the chorus go, I forgot
But that's okay, cause I'mma tell you in stride
I'mma say oh foolish pride

Oh foolish pride, oh, oh, oh, oh foolish pride
Oh, oh, oh, oh foolish pride, oh, oh, oh, oh foolish pride
Oh, oh, oh, oh foolish pride, oh, oh, oh, oh foolish pride
Oh, oh, oh, oh foolish pride, oh, oh, oh
Date a white girl, cause they got the raw hide



Makaveli rest in peace
Irv Gotti, too much Bacardi in his body
Mouth like a 12 gauge shotty
And Ja said he should be
The lost forgotten seed of 2Pac
To lead this industry into the ways of the man
Follow me!

Come get me
If you motherfuckers want Shady
If Pac was still here now
He would never ride with Ja
Na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na

You ain't no killer, you a pussy
That Ecstasy done got you all emotional and mushy
Bitches wearing rags in photos, Ja's words being quoted
In The Source, stealing Pac's shit like he just wrote it
You loud mouths pray to god hoping no one's listening
See 50 coming for me, Oh my god ma, my position
No one will pay attention to me
Please Gotti, here I go, give me this pill
Ecstasy done got me feeling so invincible
Now all of a sudden I'm a fucking madman who screams
Like I'm Pac but I'm not, enemies, Hennessey
Acting like I'm great, but I'm fake, I'm crazy
Sweat drip, get me off this trip, someone stop this train
Some say my brain is all corrupted, fucked from this shit
I'm stuck, I'm addicted to these drugs, I'mma quit
Saying motherfuckers names before somebody fucks me up
Ain't no pussies over here, partner, see you in hell, fucker

Come get me
If you motherfuckers want Shady
If Pac was still here now
He would never ride with Ja
Na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na

Get off that E
Before you try to come and fuck with me
It's Aftermath here now
Shady Records got it locked
La-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-locked

Penitentiaries is packed with promise makers
Never realized the precious time that bitch niggas is wasting
Institutionalized, my bitches bring me product by the bundles
Hustle hard from a cell, G-Unit motherfucker, we balling
Catch me counting trees and when I'm calling, can you accept my call
CEO let me sip on Hennessey, can I sip some more
Hell, I done been to jail, I ain't scared
Mama checking in my bedroom, I ain't there
I got a head with no screws in it
Motherfuckers thinking they can stop 50, they losing it
Lil' nigga named Ja think he live like me
Talking 'bout he left the hospital, took 9 like me
You live in fantasies nigga, I reject your deposit
When your lil' sweet ass gon' come out of the closet?
Now he wondering why DMX blowed him out
Next time grown folks talking bitch, close your mouth
Peep me, I take this war shit deeply
Done seen too many real niggas ball to let these bitch niggas beat me
Black, you's a motherfucking punk and you can see me with gloves
Quit scaring them fucking kids with your ugly ass mug
And you can tell them niggas you roll with whatever you want
But you and I know what's going on
Nigga payback, Tah, I know your bitch ass from way back
Witnessed me strapped with Macs, you know I don’t play that
All these old rappers trying to advance
It's all over now, take it like a man
Irv looking like Larry Holmes, flabby and sick
Trying to playa hate on my shit, man eat a fat dick
Loving this shit that's how you made me
Feeling like I got you niggas crazy
Against all odds, hoping my thug motherfuckers know
This be the realest shit I ever wrote
Against all odds, up in the studio getting blow
To the truest shit I ever spoke
21 gun salute

I've been one of the most humble, rep the streets to the core
Hey Jeffrey, what the fuck you come involving me for
It's been a long time coming, like a bless and a check
You see 106 and Park fans don't even fucking respect you
It's kinda funny, wannabe Pac, wanna fake like you thug
Running around talking shit that he ain't capable of
Now let me off this cocksucker whilst we handle you, nigga
If I recall, Violator use to manage you, nigga
Then took a closer look and realized you was an impostor
There's never been a Violator on a Murda Inc roster
Dumb ass, now who's shooting?
Ah made you look
You said Bus singing the same old hook, you stupid
If y'all shooting
I take a look at your man, the bitch shot himself in front of Def Jam
Cheddar Bob ass nigga start adjusting your plan
You let the streets down nigga, 'pologize to your fans
Watch you pull a little stunt like we ain't know what it was
Little faggot desperate trying to re-establish a buzz
I know the shit is driving you crazy, you wondering how
The streets ain't never want you Beatrice, what you gonna do now
Now if you wanna beef with me, then I'm beefing with you
I think about the game and what it's like and what would it be without you
I'm finished, I ain't trying to repeat this
JJust cause I'm cool, you shouldn't take my kindness for weakness

It was fun
Next time you got a problem with me
Address me before you try to make shit a public issue homie
And I'mma return back to my regular self
And have fun again

Hahaha, BITCH! Haha
OUTLAWZ, haha
Makaveli the don, haha
Since you want to be 2Pac, motherfucker, hahaha
2Pac shoes too big for you to walk in you lil' faggot, hahaha




I don't understand! Why are you being so MEAN?
You're a MEAN, MEAN MAN!

You are just jealous of me cause you, you just can't do what I do
So instead of just admitting it, you walk around and say
All kinds of really mean things about me
Cause you're a meanie, a meanie
But it's only cause you're, just really jealous of me
Cause I'm what you want to be, so you just look like an idiot
When you say these mean things, cause it's too easy to see
You're really just a big weenie, big weenie

Alright listen, I need you to focus
I need you to go dig deep in your mind, this is important
We are going to perform an experiment of the sorts
I'm going to have to ask you to bear with me for a moment
Now I need you to open, your mind - your eyes close 'em
You are now about to be placed under my hypnosis
For the next four and a half minutes, we are going to explore
Into your mind to find out why you're so fucking jealous
Now why did they make Yoo-Hoo? Pippity ga-ga poo-poo
Psych I'm kidding, I just wanted to see if you're still listening
Okay, now I need your undivided attention
Sir I have a question - why do I always sense this
Undeniable tension, from the moment that I enter into the room
It gets all quiet and whispers
Whenever there's conversation, why am I always mentioned?
I've been dying to ask, it's been itching at me, is it just because


Alright now I, I just flubbed a line
I was going to say something extremely important
But I forgot who or what it was - I fucked up
Psych I'm kidding again you idiot, no I didn't
That's just what you wanted to hear from me is that I FUCKED up, ain't it?
But I can bust one take without looking at no paper
It doesn't take a bunch of takes or me to stand here in this booth all day
For me to say the truth, okay? You're drooling, you have tooth decay
Your mouth is open, you're disgusting, what the fuck you eat for lunch?
A bunch of sweets or something, what? You munch a bunch of Crunch 'N Munch?
Your tooth is rotten to the gum, your breath stinks, wanna chew some gum?
Yes I do sir, what am I on? You sir, are on truth serum
"Marshall I'm so jealous of you, please say you won't tell nobody
I'd be so embarrassed, I'm just absolutely terrified
That someone's gonna find out why I'm saying all these terrible
Evil and awful mean things, it's my own insecurities!"


Alright now we, we're going to conduct
That experiment that we were talking about earlier
Just to see what a frog, looks like when it takes two hits of ecstasy
Cause that's exactly what your eyes look like, want to check to see?
Here's a mirror, notice the resemblance here?
Wait, let me put these sunglasses on, now look in this mirror
How about now? What do you have in common?
You're both green with envy and look like idiots with sunglasses on 'em
You look like I sound like, singing about weenies
Now take my weenie out of your mouth
This is between me and you, I know you're not happy
I know you'd much rather see me lying in the corner of a room
Somewhere crying, curled up in a ball tweaked out of my mind dying
There is no denying that my weenie is much bigger than yours is
Mine is like sticking a banana between two oranges
Why you even doing this to yourself, it's pointless
Why do we have to keep on going through this, this is torturous
My point is this - that if you say mean things, your weenie will shrink
Now I forgot what the chorus is, you're just a


Get the fuck off my dick!



Ahh! You sick asshole let me go
Somebody please! Help
Oh my God, please help me!
"It fits, perfect"

Better watch out
Sucka, now I got ya where I want ya
Onslaught coming
And I'm packing in my lunch a
Bunch of missile launchers
And a bunch of contra–band
Van full of ganja
Now come on, jump
Man, stop moshing Marshall
Oh my God, ya
Doing the cha-cha
And the Cucaracha
With a quadra–plegic
Boogying down to Frank Sinatra
Lindsay to the Lohan, lick it
While you let me watch ya
Who'da knew
The Buddha'd do
To me what it's done
Such cynicism
When there’s izm
In my system
Blunt hypnotism
Lift the spliff up to my lips, son
So much on my hands
I got to give my kids a fist bump
Christo–pher Reeves
Swimming in my swim trunks
"Mister – Help me"
Is what he said to me and then sunk
Women, skinning them
And cutting them up in chunks
In comes
The woman with cocoa butter skin, once

Once again they call me Buffalo Bill
Buffalo Bill, Buffa-Buffalo Bill
Skin 'em up, hem 'em, sew 'em up in those kilts
Up in those kilts, uppa-up in those kilts
Man, you don't want to go up in those hills
Up in those hills, uppa-up in those hills
You better beware, stay clear of Buffalo Bill
Buffalo Bill, Buffa-Buffalo Bill

Always
You can see him lurking in the hallways
Carcasses of Caucasian females
In his crawl space
How the hell did he fit 'em all
Into such a small place
Hide 'em in the wall
Well, how long will the drywall take?
Well, fuck it then
I got nothing but time, I'll wait
Until it dries
For the moment I guess you're all safe
After I sand it and buff it
I guess that I'll paint
My chainsaw's out of gas
My regular saw ain't
Now here I come again
Damn stomach rumbling
You can even hear the evil spirits
Coming from within
Someone's in
The back of my damn house, rummaging
It's a girl, she looks pretty thin
But I want her skin
Vinn
On the hunt again
When
Will it ever end
Evelyn
Why you trying to fight?
You will never win
Severin'
Legs, arms; damn there goes another limb
Pull the lever then
Trap door, death is evident

Once again they call me Buffalo Bill
Buffalo Bill, Buffa-Buffalo Bill
Skin 'em up, hem 'em, sew 'em up in those kilts
Up in those kilts, uppa-up in those kilts
Man, you don't want to go up in those hills
Up in those hills, uppa-up in those hills
You better beware, stay clear of Buffalo Bill
Buffalo Bill, Buffa-Buffalo Bill

Now what you know about Buffalo Bill?
Nothing, so chill
Fucking ho, you better fucking hold still
Make sure none of that lotion in the bucket don't spill
Cut 'em, gut 'em, and just get to stuffing those girls
Man, I think she had enough of those pills
Sedate her
Then I wait, I come back later
Just a-clutching those steel
Blades, baby, when I cut ya don't squeal
I hate the loud noises, I fucking told you!
I keep hearing voices
Like "Wouldn't ya like to go and get your butcher knife
And push it right through her
While you put ya shish-kabob skewers
Into her
Barbecue her
Would you do to her
What you usually do
To a girl who's skin's newer?"
This is turning into a
Torment tournament of sorts
Christmas ornament you are)
I'll be sure to Ginsu ya
'Til there's no more skin to ya
Boo-yah
Who ya think you're fucking with
Duck because here he comes again

Once again they call me Buffalo Bill
Buffalo Bill, Buffa-Buffalo Bill
Skin 'em up, hem 'em, sew 'em up in those kilts
Up in those kilts, uppa-up in those kilts
Man, you don't want to go up in those hills
Up in those hills, uppa-up in those hills
You better beware, stay clear of Buffalo Bill
Buffalo Bill, Buffa-Buffalo Bill



There's not much you could do or say to phase me
People think I'm a little bit crazy
I get it from all angles, even occasionally Doc Dre-zy
Will have to step in every once in a while to save me
To make me stop and think about it 'fore I just say things
Sometimes I forget what other people just may think
A lot of rappers probably wouldn't know how to take me
If they heard some shit, I'd lay the tape 'fore they erased me
I may be a little too fast-paced and racy
Sometimes the average listener rewinds and plays me
Twenty times 'cause I say so many rhymes it may seem
Like I'm goin' too fast 'cause my mind is racing
And I could give a fuck what category you place me
Long as when I'm pushing up daisies
And gone as long as you place me amongst one of them greats
When I hit the heavenly gates I'll be cool beside Jay-Z
For every single die-hard fan who embraced me
I'm thankful for the talent in which God gave me
And I'm thankful for the environment that he placed me
Believe it or not, I thank my mom for how she raised me
In the neighborhood daily, they jumped and chased me
It only made me what I am today, see
Regardless of what anybody believes who hates me
You ain't gonna make or break me
Tryna strip me of my credibility and make me look fake, G
You're only gonna be in for a rude awakening
'Cause sooner or later you haters are all gonna face me
And when you face me with all the shit you've been saving
To say to me, you had all this time to think about it
Now don't pussy out and try to about face me
'Cause I've been patiently waiting for the day
That we finally meet in the same place to see

No matter how many battles I been in and won
No matter how many magazines on my nuts
No matter how many emcees I eat up
Oh, it's never enough
No matter how many battles I been in and won
No matter how many magazines on my nuts
No matter how many emcees I eat up
Oh oh, it's never enough

My flow's untouchable, now you gotta face it
Uh oh, it gets worse when I go back to the basics
You go say the wrong shit and get your face split
The smell of victory, love it so much I can taste it
I spot my target, blaze it, direct hit
Graze it, your peace talk, save it
You shit sounds dated, you're overrated
I'm obligated to study your moves then crush you motherfuckers
If I'm the best and the worst, then God's gift is a curse
Soldier trained to destroy – you payin' attention, boy?
I spit shit, slick shit, so quick you miss it
To be specific I go ballistic as hieroglyphic
My music is a drug, press play, you ain't gotta sniff it
Shoot it or pop it, roll it, bag it or chop it
Get you high over and over, but you gotta cop it
When it's hot, it's hot, your hatin' is undeniable, stop it

No matter how many battles I been in and won
No matter how many magazines on my nuts
No matter how many emcees I eat up
Oh, it's never enough
No matter how many battles I been in and won
No matter how many magazines on my nuts
No matter how many emcees I eat up
Oh oh, it's never enough



Ladies and gentlemen, make some noise!
You ready to get this shit started or what?
Aight, well I brought some friends with me too

Now I ain't back just for the sake of just saying I'm back
I could relax but I'd rather stack ammo on tracks
Couple Xanax, light a couple wax candles then black
Out and relapse 'til I yack Jack Daniels and 'gnac
Burp bubbles, attitude's immaturin'
Double shot of Bacardi, party, vision is blurrin'
Whoa-oh, I can't see shit, my words get to slurrin'
Uh-oh! You can call me R. Kelly now, you're in
Trouble! What's occurring befo', after, and during the show
Has no bearing on the bad news I'm bearing, whoa
What is it, wordplay? No, I'm pushing you out the do'
So suck my dick on the couch if you wanna cushion the blow
Now stomp your fucking feet 'til you get to squishing a ho
It's pandemonium, standing o when you see him, oh
Damn baby you look good, you're giving me wood
You should pull over like a sweatshirt with a hood
It's neck work, get her polly on, you and me both
Break bread while I'm copping over this game to pinch a loaf
Now homie who's your favorite pain in the ass?
Who claims to be spitting the same flames as me? I'm Kanye when he crashed
In other words I got the hood on smash like I stepped on the gas
Destroyed the front end
Deployed the damn airbags from the dash
Went through 'em and laughed
Came back an hour after the accident
And bit a goddamn Jawbreaker in half!
So stop faking the funk and start shaking your ass
Slaughterhouse in the house with the Caucasian of rap
And Just Blaze on the track, what's the fuck's more amazing than that?
Slut, answer me that, Royce where you at?

I'm right here Fire Marshall, verbal pair of pliers I pry apart you
Lump on your head designed by a bar stool
Designed by a cartoon
Before I need to be hired, Jimmy I'll fire Marshall
The 9 tucked against the lining
I pull it out and flip your partner upside-down
Like y'all are a couple 69ing
It's like Rick James is shooting up your house, nigga!
{rapid gunfire} FUCK YO' COUCH NIGGA!
You're screaming, "Fuck the world!" with your middle finger up
While I'm over here shoving my dick in a hole in the mud
My bitch know I'm perfectly fit for murder
Because I murdered her, so you can call me
Nickel to O.J. to Glove
I got a Posse of Insane Clowns
Blow your brains on your opposite ear
And ask you how your brain sounds
Bad, Evil, we go Alfred E. Neumann mad cerebral
You on your last burrito!
Get a beat then terrorize that bitch like I'm Middle Eastern
Slaughterhouse on FIRE, nobody touching that
Good day and good night, Ortiz, yo, where the FUCK you at?

I'm right here in my Nike Airs, Buzz Light-years
Ahead of my mic peers, quite scary to look at a nightmare
Where my book at? I write fear in the heart of you tight squares
I harbor the art of my nice wear
It's type weird 'cause that made me hotter than my dear
Uncle Al's breath after polishing off his ninth beer
Homie chill, listen, I swear
I'm God, I give tracks a Holy-feel, and they bite ears
I'm right here, why wouldn't I be?
Just waiting to be hooked to IV as Mumm-Ra's
Well, when you look at my pee
And this joint no exception, so just point a direction
And record the pig's oink when I rip his intestine
This isn't just an infection
This won't go away with penicillin injections
Millions of questions arose
After they did an inspection, what I exhibit
Seems to be non-contagious yet anybody can get it
Aw shiddit, I did it again, when I liddift this pen
I emitted this phlegm, this time it's alongside Edimminem
So tell a friend to tell a friend write a disgusting hook
Jump in shark water and swim, yo where the fuck is Crook?

I'm right here letting the shotty pop, quick as a karate chop
Get your body shot, get your top chopped, like a lollipop
Call it Maserati drop, in the body shop
Get your mommy knocked
And your Uncle Tommy molli-wopped
I take your life to the ninth inning
A knife in the gunfight, I love it, me and my knife winning
I laugh when you fall, the shit'll be funny
I'll buy my bitch a new ass and watch her sit on my money
Man, all the bitches holla - they wanna drop my britches
Then jaw on my dick and swallow, leave drawers in this Impala
I ball like Iguodala
I bear more arms than 6 koalas
As soon as I draw, get sent to Allah
Bilinguist don, I kill with the tongue, I'm Atilla the Hun
I'm Genghis Khan, I'm a genius spawn
I pillage your village for fun, an egregious con
A syllable gun, real as they come, Long Beach Saddam!
Slaughterhouse equals swine flu, are South flying
We do it to try to do without tryin
Where's Jumpoff Joe Beezy?



Oh! Yeah! So much for first single on this one

Shady's the label, Aftermath is the stable
That them horses come out of—erra
Of course we're about to stir up
Some shit thick as Ms. Buttersworth's syrup
It's the Mr. Picked-on-Christopher-Reeves just for no reason
Other than just to tease him
He used to be Superman, now we're pourin'
Liquor on the curb in his name for him
"Eminem, you wait 'til we meet up again, fucker
I'm kickin' your ass for everything you've ever said."
It goes one for the money, two for the fuckin' show
Ready, get set, let's go
Here comes the buckin' bronco stompin' and stampedin'
Up the damn street like them buffalo soldiers
I told ya I'm 'bout to blow, so look out below, Geronimo
Motherfuckers is dominoes, I'm on a roll
Around and around I go
When will I stop? I don't know
Tryin' to pick up where The Eminem Show left off
But I know anything's possible
Though I'm not gonna top what I sold
I'm at the top of my game, that shit is not gonna change
Long as I got Dr. Dre on my team I'll get away
We keep the Mark Fuhrman tapes
In a safe, locked them away {*slam*}
Better watch what you say
Just when you thought you were safe
Them fuckers got you on tape
You swear to God you was playin'
Whether or not you was little Joshua
Gosh, I wish I coulda told ya to not do the same
'Cause one day it could cost you your name

And this was supposed to be my first single {*burp*}
But I just fucked that off so
Fuck it, let's all have fun, let's mingle! {*burp*}
Slap a bitch and smack a ho!
This was supposed to be my catchy little jingle {*fart*}
That you hear on your radio
But shit's about to hit the shingle {*fart*}
Oh, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-no {erra}
Oh, ah {erra} oh, ah {erra}
Oh, ah {erra} oh oh ah ah
Oh, ah {erra} oh, ah {erra}
Oh, ah {erra} poo poo ca ca

Eri-Eri-Erick swallowed some generic sleeping pills
And woke up in bed next to his best friend Derrick bare naked
{chiga chigga Jigga jigga}
Janean just turned 16 and used a fake ID
To sneak in V.I.P. to see R. Kelly – he he he he he he
To be so young and naive!
Oh what I wouldn't give to live so Kim and carefree
Paris and Nicky's parents must be so tickled, they cherish
Every picture with their kids with hickeys all over their necks
Hickory dickory Dirk Diggler
Look at me work wizardry
With these words – am I a jerk or just jerk chicken?
Or {chiga chigga chig chig jer chig jer} jerkin' the chain
Twenty-two jerks in a jerk circle, or is it a circle jerk?
Wait a minute, what am I sayin'? Allow me to run it back
And rewind it {blblblblblblblb} – well, let me ask you again
Am I just jerkin' your chain? Am I berserk or insane?
Or am I just one of them damn amateurs workin' the damn
Camera, filmin' one of them Paris Hilton homemade pornos
Who keeps tiltin' the lens at an angle {chigga chigga}
Just recently somebody just discovered
Britney and Justin videotapes of them fuckin'
When they were just Mouseketeers in the Mickey Mouse Club
And dusted 'em and went straight to The Source with them
'Cause they coulda sworn someone said
Nuh – and then tried to erase and record over it
But if you listen close enough to it you can hear the
Uhh, uhh, and then they come to
Find out it was Justin sayin', "I'm gonna cum!"

And this was supposed to be my first single {*burp*}
But I just fucked that off so
Fuck it, let's all have fun, let's mingle! {*burp*}
Slap a bitch and smack a ho!
This was supposed to be my catchy little jingle {*fart*}
That you hear on your radio
But shit's about to hit the shingle {*fart*}
Oh, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-no {erra}
Oh, ah {erra} oh, ah {erra}
Oh, ah {erra} oh oh ah ah
Oh, ah {erra} oh, ah {erra}
Oh, ah {erra} poo poo ca ca

Any opinions or somethin' you just wanna get off your chest
And address it about my lyrics? I'd love to hear it
All you gotta do is pick up the phone and just dial up this number
It's 1-800-I'm-A-Dick-Sucker, I love to suck a dick
And if someone picks up
You can talk all the shit you want about me
Just type in your number back and follow it by the pound key
And I'll be sure to get back as soon as there comes a day
So fuck a chicken, lick a chicken, suck a chicken, beat a chicken
Eat a chicken like it's a big cock, ba-ca-BA-KAWK!
Or suck a dick and lick a dick
And eat a dick and stick a dick
In your mouth; I'm done, you can fuck off, fucka-FUCK-OFF!

And this was supposed to be my first single {*burp*}
But I just fucked that off so
Fuck it, let's all have fun, let's mingle! {*burp*}
Slap a bitch and smack a ho!
This was supposed to be my catchy little jingle {*fart*}
That you hear on your radio
But shit's about to hit the shingle {*fart*}
Oh, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-no {erra}
Oh, ah {erra} oh, ah {erra}
Oh, ah {erra} oh oh ah ah
Oh, ah {erra} oh, ah {erra}
Oh, ah {erra} poo poo ca ca {*burps*}



It's all bad now, man, it's all bad
But y'all done fucked up now
Yeah! Haha! New shit!
Ayo, I just want the whole world to know
That I did not start this, but I will finish it

Comin' up, it never mattered what color you was
If you could spit, then you could spit
That's it, that's what it was
Back when motherfuckers was straight backpackin'
Cipherin', fightin' for life in this rap
For the mic to get passed, and you psyched and you gassed
Then you hype, ‘cause you last
And you might whoop some ass; if you lost, then you lost
Shake hands like a man and you swallowed it
When the Unsigned Hype column in
The Source was like our only source of light
When the mics used to mean somethin', a four was like
You were the shit, now it's like the least you get
Three and a half now just means you're a piece of shit
Four and a half or five means you're Biggie, Jigga, Nas
Or Benzino—shit, I don't even think you realize
You're playin' with motherfuckers' lives
I done watched Dre get fucked on The Chronic
Probably ‘cause I was on it
Now you fucked me out of my mics twice, I let it slide
I said I wouldn't hold my fuckin' breath to get a five
Shit, I was right, I'da fuckin' died already tryin'
I swear to God, I never lie, I bet that's why
You let that bitch give me that bullshit review
I sat and took it, I ain't look at the shit, we knew
You'd probably try and fuck us with Obie and 50 too
{*Hock spit*} Fuck a relationship! We through!
No more Source to street credit, them days is dead
Ray's got AK's to Dave Mays's head
Every issue there's an eight-page Made Men spread
Will somebody please tell whoever braids his head
That I am not afraid of this fuckin' waste of lead
On my pencil, for me to write some shit this simple
So, listen closely, as I break it down and proceed
This old G's about to get smoked like rolled weed
You don't know me or my motherfuckin' mother
You motherfuckin' punk!
Put me on your fuckin' cover just to sell your little sell-out mag
I ain't mad, I feel bad, here's an ad
Here's a poster of Ray-Ray and his dad
You wanna talk about some shit
That you don't know about, yeah?
Let's talk about how you're puttin' your own son out there
To try to eat off him because you missed your boat
You're never gonna blow, bitch, you're just too old
No wonder you're sore now, lordy, you're bored now
I'm pushin' 30, you're kickin' 40's door down
Bitch, this is war now, and you'll never beat me
All you do is cheat me out of Quotables
But you know that you'll always see me on your TV
‘Cause you've got to stay up 'til three in the morning
To see your video played once on BET
So, hee hee hee, who has the last laugh? Aftermath, yeah
So, on behalf of our whole staff, kiss our asshole cracks
We'll never fold or hold back
Just know that Benzino's wack; no matter how many times I say his name, he'll never blow, jack
You're better off tryin' to bring RSO back
Look at your track record, that's how far it goes back
It's extortion, and Ray owns a portion
So, half of the staff up there is fresh out of jail from Boston
Bullyin' and bossin' Dave like a slave
They completely brainwashed him and forced him to stay
Locked in his own office
Afraid of the softest, fakest, wannabe gangsta in New York
And it's pitiful, ‘cause I would have never said shit if you'd
Have kept your mouth shut, bitch, now what?
Hit it, Clue! Spit it, Slay! New shit, exclusive
Yo, Lantern, yo Whoo Kid
You know what to do with this
Use it, I'm through, this is stupid
I can't believe I stooped to this bullshit to do this
And who you callin' a bitch, bitch?! You owe me!



"I'm low down and dirty, but not ashamed"
"Low down dirty even" I'm low down and I'm shifty!
And if you hear a man that sounds like me smack him
And ask him where the fuck did he get his damn raps from
"I'm low down and dirty, but not ashamed"
"Low down dirty even" I'm low down and I'm shifty!
And if you hear a man that sounds like me smack him
And ask him where the fuck did he get his damn raps from

Warning, this shit's gon' be rated R - Restricted
You see this bullet hole in my neck? It's self-inflicted
Doctor slapped my momma, "Bitch you got a sick kid"
Arrested, molested myself and got convicted
Wearing visors, sunglasses and disguises
Cause my split personality is having an identity crisis
I'm Dr. Hyde and Mr. Jekyll, disrespectful
Hearing voices in my head while these whispers echo
Brain size of a bread crumb, which drug will I end up dead from?
Inebriated 'til my stress is alleviated
"How in the fuck can Eminem and Shady be related?"
Illiterate, illegitimate shit spitter
Bitch getter, hid in the bush like Margot Kidder
Jumped out, killed the bitch and did her
Used to let the babysitter suck my dick when I was littler
Smoke a blunt while I'm titty fucking Bette Midler
Sniper, waiting on your roof like the Fiddler
Y'all thought I was gonna rhyme with Riddler, didn't ya?
Bring your bitch I wanna see if this dick gon' fit in her

"I'm low down and dirty, but not ashamed"
"Low down dirty even" I'm low down and I'm shifty!
And if you hear a man that sounds like me smack him
And ask him where the fuck did he get his damn raps from
"I'm low down and dirty, but not ashamed"
"Low down dirty even" I'm low down and I'm shifty!
And if you hear a man that sounds like me smack him
And ask him where the fuck did he get his damn raps from

I lace tunes, that's out this world like space moons
With a bunch crazed loons dismissin' brains like graze wounds
Nothing but idiots and misfits, dipshits
Doing whippits, passed out like sampler snippets
Where's the weed, I wanna tamper with it
I'ma let your grandpa hit it, lace it up with cocaine so he can't forget it
Fuck it, maybe I'm a bum
But I was put on this earth to make your baby mama cum
So what I'm on is way beyond the rum
Or any alcoholic beverage, losing all of my leverage
Went up inside the First National Bank broke, and left rich
Walking bio-hazard causing wreckage, smoked out like Eckrich
Dandruff's making my neck itch, what the fuck? Give me the check bitch
You just lost your tip, there's a pubic hair in my breakfast
Got shit popping off like bottle cap tips
Get your cap peeled like the dead skin of your mama's chapped lips
Slap dips, support domestic violence
Beat your bitch's ass while your kids stare in silence
I'm just joking, is Dirty Dozen really dust smoking?
If all your shit's missing, then probably one of us broke in

"I'm low down and dirty, but not ashamed"
"Low down dirty even" I'm low down and I'm shifty!
And if you hear a man that sounds like me smack him
And ask him where the fuck did he get his damn raps from
"I'm low down and dirty, but not ashamed"
"Low down dirty even" I'm low down and I'm shifty!
And if you hear a man that sounds like me smack him
And ask him where the fuck did he get his damn raps from

My head's ringing, like it was Spider Sense tingling
Blitzin' like Green Bay did when they shitted on New England
I'm out the game, put the second string in
This Brandy got me swinging, bobbing back and forth like a penguin
Delinquent, choking microphones with broken English
Make your mama be like "Whoo, this is good! Who sings this?"
"Slim Shady, his tape is dope, I dug it
It's rugged, but he needs to quit talking all that drug shit"
It was predicted by a medic
I'd grow to be an addicted diabetic, living on liquid Triaminic
Pathetic, but I don't think this headache's ever vanishing
Panicking, I think I might have just took too much Anacin
Frozen mannequin, posin' stiffer than a statue
I think I'm dying, God is that you?
Somebody help me, before I OD on an LP
Take me to ER ASAP for an IV
Motherfuck JLB, they don't support no hip hop
They say that's where it lives, the closest they gon' come is 2Pac
It's politics, it's all a fix, set up for these white blue-collared hicks
It's to make a dollar off of black music with a subliminal ball of tricks
For those who kiss ass and swallow dicks

"I'm low down and dirty, but not ashamed"
"Low down dirty even" I'm low down and I'm shifty!
And if you hear a man that sounds like me smack him
And ask him where the fuck did he get his damn raps from
"I'm low down and dirty, but not ashamed"
"Low down dirty even" I'm low down and I'm shifty!
And if you hear a man that sounds like me smack him
And ask him where the fuck did he get his damn raps from




Man, I’m gettin' so sick and tired of fuckin' with this steel
They only give us 30 minutes to eat lunch and chill
My body achin' just to get a buck
I’m sick of eatin' this shit off this fuckin' lunch truck
Nasty-ass food, I’m in a nasty-ass mood
I should’ve called in sick, shit, I had somethin' to do

I can’t believe that I’m hearing all this ravin' and rantin'
From Vanessa up in here at the New Detroit stampin'
You need to get your food and take your ass back to work
You're dreamin' if you think them corny-ass raps will work
Look at y’all stadin' out here, freezin' like dumb fucks
Rappin' away for food off this ragedy lunch truck
Who want what? Who pumped up to get rolled up?
I spit venom in every direction, soak some up
Look at this fat-ass nigga, sloppy sucker
You're a ugly motherfucker, your pop should’ve wore a rubber
Stop rhymin', keep your day job, Vanessa
Next time leave that bullshit home on the dresser
Speaking of dresses, take a look at Paul the fruitcake
When you travel you probably pack panties in your suitcase
Made out of lace from Victoria’s secret
If ten men came in a cup you’d probably drink it

Okay, folks, enough with the gay jokes
Especially from a gay broke bitch yourself, hey lo'
This guy's a doo-doo
You've worked here longer than me
And I get paid more than you do
Dawg, take a seat
What’s this guy standing in line for? He ain’t got money to eat!
Check this out, yo yo
This guy cashed his whole check and bought one ho-ho
Fuckin' homo! Little maggot
You can’t hack it; Paul’s gay, you're a faggot
At least he admits it, don’t even risk it
This guy's starvin' to death, someone get him a biscuit!
I don’t know what they told you, Mike
You must had them cornrows rolled too tight
This job, you wanna quit, but you can’t
You’ve worked at this plant so long, you're a plant
Look at your goddamn boots!
For Christ sakes, they’re starting to grow roots!
On this mic you get faded
You look like a pissed-off rapper who never made it
And why you fuckin' with the gay guy, G?
When really you're the one who's got the HIV
Man, I’m done with this clown, he's soft
Fuck it, I’ll let homegirl finish you off

A guy like you would never get a real woman
You jackass, go jack off; that's the only way you cumin'



"Uncle Marshall, will you tell us a bedtime story?"
Here we go!

Now, once upon a time not long ago
There was a little rapper about to blow
But his album came, and it was not good
I think it went lead or double copper-wood
So these silly little fans, they were misled
By a nerdy Internet computer hip-hop head
"Me and you, Clef, we're gonna make some cash."
"Grab this silver paint and just paint my ass."
Hey, mister, would you care to bear witness to
The ass-whippin' I'm about to administer
To this ass-kissin' little vaginal blister?
Stanibus, little Marshall Mathers' sister
And in this corner, we have the "Mr
Not-Havin'-It," it's the Mad, sinister
Dr. Evil, with his bag of tricks for
This little antagonistic faggot
Dick-sucking ex-LL Cool J fan from Windsor
I'm 'bout to murder little Kenny-Fag-Kaniff-sta
You bastard, I ain't wanna have to diss ya
Canibus, where the fuck you at? I miss ya!

Canibitch, oh, Canibitch
Wherefore art thou, Canibitch?
Please tell me what happened with
That style that you were rappin' with
Canibitch, oh, Canibitch
Are you from Los Angeles
New York, or just a janitor
From Canada? Oh, Canibitch

Now, at first, I ain't really understand this shit
Picture me, for a second, and imagine it
Chillin' in the Bat Mansion relaxin' when
All of a sudden some bullshit comes across the scanners, it's
Canibitch, on some 'Stan Lives' shit
It creeped me out at first; man, this is sick
But me, bein' just as sick, this conflict
Gets my dick harder than arithmetic
And I know how you jealous ones envy
I shoulda knew better from the first few letters you sent me
The first two letters, you were tellin' me shit like
You respect me, like any other regular MC
The third letter, you asked how come I ain't return
None of the messages at Shady Records you left me
The fifth letter told me you were comin' to get me
The sixth letter, there's a bomb threat on our building
This crazy motherfucker's really tryna kill me
So I went back and read the first few letters that said
Some shit about a message you left
Oh shit! That's not a E, that's an A!
This dude wants to leave me a 'massage,' he's gay!
Right away, I'm on the phone with Dr. Dre
"We got a bogey," "Marshall, I'm on the way."

Canibitch, oh, Canibitch
Wherefore art thou, Canibitch?
Please tell me what happened with
That style that you were rappin' with
Canibitch, oh, Canibitch
Are you from Los Angeles
New York, or just a janitor
From Canada? Oh, Canibitch

So, in two seconds flat, Dre's at my crib
Only thing is, we both know where this kid lives
And neither one of us have Canadian citizenship
"Shit. Oh, Dre, wait a minute, that's it!
All we gotta do is use a bit of turbo-boost
So we're off to Toronto and we're gainin' speed
{Grunt} "What was that? Oh, Jermaine Dupri."
"Fuck it," keep goin', no time to waste
"Wait, back up. Hit him one more time, in case."
"Okay," fuck, now he's draggin' under the car
"Oh well, only thirty more thousand miles!"
Meanwhile, me and Dre are tryna conversate
Just tryna find a reason for the constant hate
And tryna figure out what happened to 'Germaine Propane'
"He couldn't have fell off that hard." Ain't no way!
What happened to the way you was rappin'
When you was scandalous?
That Canibus turned into a television evangelist!
Plus, he raps with his regular voice
So, we pull up to the bridge where he last was spotted
His corpse was still movin', but his ass was rotted
And he kinda smelled a little like Courtney Love
I figured if I stick him with a fork, he's done
So I stabbed him twice, kept jabbin'—Christ!
He won't die! This guy's like a battered wife!
But he won't fight back, I cracked his jaw
Hold up! 'Bis, quit foldin' up!
Punch me in the chest, make my shoulders touch
Do something! At least one punchline!
Come on! 'Til the meter reads Nine! Nine! Nine-
Ty nine percent of my fans are blond!
'Bis, come on, answer me, man, respond!
Tell me 'bout the sun, rain, moon and stars!
Intergalactical metaphors from Mars!
Raw to the floor, raw like Reservoir Dogs!
Bite another line from Redman's song!
Suddenly, the stub of a dead man's arm
From a midget reaches out from under the car
It's J.D.! This motherfucker won't die, neither!
Dre starts sprayin' him with cans of ether
We swamped the bitch in it; stomped the bitch again
"Compton!" "Detroit, bitch, talk some shit again!"
"Stomp him!" "Switch feet!" "Stomp him!" "Switch again!"
"Dre, all right, he's dead, dog, quit kickin' him!
"Damn," "He disappeared, yo, he's gone, he did it again!"

Canibitch, oh, Canibitch
Wherefore art thou, Canibitch?
Please tell me what happened with
That style that you were rappin' with
Canibitch, oh, Canibitch
Are you from Los Angeles
New York, or just a janitor
From Canada? Oh, Canibitch



Yeah, boy
Them better ring the alarm, boy
Them know what's coming, boy
Bluh! Bluh-Bluh! Haha
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah

Oh my God
Fucking bumbaclot
I'm hard as Kenard
The little boy who shot Omar in The Wire
Tie a whore up with barbed wire
You're nothing but a brah, boy
I'm the real deal
And Charbroiler on the bonfire
And bon voyage, bitch
I'm like Chef Boyardee in this bitch
Send a bomb to my mom's lawyer
I'm a problem for you, boy
You think you're Tom Sawyer
Until I pull you out the fuckin' storybook and stomp on ya
Fuckin' ficti-tional characters and fairy tales
Prepare yourself
For Captain America on Ferris wheels
But it ain't fiction
It's fact boy, beware, it's real
Them lyrics you wield
Equal zero to a hero's shield
Mr. Fly by the seat of his pants parasail
Fall, hit the trampoline, bounce, and grab a pair of stilts
And I ain't wearing zilch
Zip, zero, nothing; no, nada
Like your fatha fucking your motha

Drop the bomb on 'em
Please don't drop the bomb on me
Shady, please, please don't drop the bomb on me
Drop the bomb on 'em
I don't want no doggone beef, see
Ain't no reason to sick the dogs on me
Drop the bomb on 'em
Please don't drop the bomb on me
Shady, please, please don't drop the bomb on me
Drop the bomb on 'em
I don't want no doggone beef, see
Ain't no reason to sick the dogs on me

Boy, I'm the Real McCoy
You little boys can't even fill voids
Party's over, kids, kill the noise
Here come the killjoys
Me and Dre the steel alloys
The rap Crown Royals
That scalp cowboys
Now, how that sound for you?
Yeah boy, you know we're about to put it down for you
So kick your shoes off in the foyer
Have a sound voyage
And sayonara
See you fuckers tomorrow
Get some R&R
And marinate in some marinara
And have a Coke and a smile
Don't make me open a jar
Of whip-ass on you
That's the last straw you're hopin' to draw
Yeah, you're fresher than most
Boy, I'm just doper than all
Boy, I'm that boy, boy
Them boys, them no up to par
I just show up
Go up to the stage
And blow up the spot
There ain't no boy who can do what I do
Boy, I'm a star
Boy, I told you, boy
I'm a soldier boy, I'm Deshaun
Holton in this bitch
I'm the Proof, boy, you're a fraud
I'll destroy you, boy
Fuck around and blow you to sod
Oh my God, boy
You didn't go there, no you did not
I got a whole storyboard for you
Boy, you're the plot
You're gettin' got
Whether you try to avoid it or not
Apology not accepted, boy
Detroit is a rock
We get to beefin'
Ain't no tellin' at what point it'll stop
All I got to do is point to the spot
When the bomb drops
Boy, does it drop
And when it does, boy, there's a problem

Drop the bomb on 'em
Please don't drop the bomb on me
Shady, please, please don't drop the bomb on me
Drop the bomb on 'em
I don't want no doggone beef, see
Ain't no reason to sick the dogs on me
Drop the bomb on 'em
Please don't drop the bomb on me
Shady, please, please don't drop the bomb on me
Drop the bomb on 'em
I don't want no doggone beef, see
Ain't no reason to sick the dogs on me

Boy, don't jinx yourself
Boy, I'm Micheal Spinks with the belt
Stringer Bell
Boy, my name rings bells for itself
I'm sick as hell
Boy, you better run and tell someone else
Bringing hell
Boy, sing them telegrams and get dealt
And to that boy on them sedative meds
Who said he was better
I bet he never seen Freddy
In a black and red little sweater
Back, better than ever
The cheddar shredder
The grater
The beef grinder
I'll settle vendettas a little later
Giving haters incubators
Think you made a mistake
By saying Shady was ghost
I ain't even close to the gate
You got one foot in the grave
Just stay put and behave
I'm 'bout to turn this fuckin' place
To Beirut in a day
So, hey, wouldn't you say I'm the shit?
Couldn't agree with you more
If you were to say that my fuckin' shit doesn't stink
Shady fucking Aftermath, boy
The ship doesn't sink
It just floats in the fuckin' water 'til we fill up the tank

Drop the bomb on 'em
Please don't drop the bomb on me
Shady, please, please don't drop the bomb on me
Drop the bomb on 'em
I don't want no doggone beef, see
Ain't no reason to sick the dogs on me
Drop the bomb on 'em
Please don't drop the bomb on me
Shady, please, please don't drop the bomb on me
Drop the bomb on 'em
I don't want no doggone beef, see
Ain't no reason to sick the dogs on me



Yo, mic-check
Testing, one, two… fuck
My dick… my nuts…

My attitude is worse than N.W.A's was
I'll battle you over stupid shit
And diss people who ain't have shit to do with it
You see me standin' outside of your buildin'
I look at my life in a new light
Fuck it, give me two mics
I write songs for me, fuck what you like
You probably hear me rap half-hearted
‘Cause I don't like rap anyway
I'm just tryin' to get my porno career started
Every place and event—been there, done that
Shit, Dre stuck me in a suitcase when he went
Want a deal? Study these five chapters
Don't give 'em a demo; kidnap 'em
And make 'em come to your basement and listen
Switch demos with Canibus
And put yours on the owner's table
"Hey, let me get your number! I'll call you tomorrow for sure"
Don't act like a fan, you wanna get signed
Get the whitest A&R you can find
Pull him aside and rap as whack as you can
Dress up like I.C.P. and have them come see you perform live
And that's the key, but when you see me on the street
I ain't givin' you shit, bitch, don't even bother askin' me
Toilet water splashes me right in the ass
Got a blowjob from Paula Jones
And stuffed it so far in her mouth
My balls broke both of her collarbones
Told Mya this shit was all about me-ah
Gave Alyssa Milano syphilis, mono and gonorrhea
And all three of my main girls said "See ya!"
‘Cause Brandy and Monica walked in
And caught me fuckin' Aaliyah
I splish-splash while I'm takin' a bath
Grab a handful of pills, break 'em in half, take 'em and laugh
White trash, fuckin' your wife in the ass
While you're out siphonin' gas
For your lawn mower to cut the grass

So if I hurt your self-esteem and you get dissed too bad
You know I just be sayin' that to get you mad
And when I rap about a buncha shit you wished you had
You know I just be sayin' that to get you mad
I can't listen to that song, that shit's too sad
You know I just be sayin' that to get you mad
He'll never make it, his wrist is slit too bad
You know I just be sayin' that to get you mad

What a wonderful day! I should go outside and play
Ain't no need to sit inside the house and hibernate
Hi, Renée! I was just about to toss a live grenade
In your driveway and drive away
Are you afraid of a blade made of a razor with AIDS?
Blood drippin' from it
Rippin' your stomach like a paper mâché
You talk a lot of shit, but you was never ill though
I'm sick enough to beat you to death with a feather pillow
Tipped over some cows, just for a joke and a laugh
Jumped up, choked a giraffe
Snapped his neck and broke it in half
Wagin' wars, went on stage
And sprayed Cage with Agent Orange
And wiped my ass with his page in Source
The demon is here, steamin' this year
It's not a gimmick, bitch—it's an image, I live it
Give a fuck? I don't know what a fuck is to give it
"Yeah, I don't think this guy is well"
I'm high as hell, I'll beat you with a live cat
When I'm swingin' him by his tail
I'll fuckin'… I'll fuckin'… lay your nuts on the dresser
Just your nutsack by itself
And bang them shits with a spiked bat
Cut your neck off and sew your head right back
And leave you like that
You just triggered a prick who just mixed liquor
Who's itchin' to leave you disfigured
And stiffer than Chris-stiff-er Reeves
I was teethin' with strep throat
While your mother was breastfeedin'
And gave her the flesh-eatin' disease
I'm iller than takin' a hammer and beatin' your knees
And walkin' through South Central L.A., bleedin' in jeans
Wakin' up the next day in breathin' machines
Flashin' back to bein' shot and repeatin' the scenes
On how you just got smoked; and if you do live
You'll be too scared to tell it, like a Biggie and Pac joke

So if I hurt your self-esteem and you get dissed too bad
You know I just be sayin' that to get you mad
And when I rap about a buncha shit you wished you had
You know I just be sayin' that to get you mad
I can't listen to that song, that shit's too sad
You know I just be sayin' that to get you mad
He'll never make it, his wrist is slit too bad
You know I just be sayin' that to get you mad



Check it out!
Hey, Kyu!

It's a broke day, but everything is okay
I'm up all night, but everything is alright
It's a rough week, and I don't get enough sleep
It's a long year, pretendin' I belong here

One day I plan to be a family man, happily married
I want to grow to be so old that I have to be carried
'Til I'm glad to be buried, and leave this crazy world
And have at least a half a million for my baby girl
It may be early to be plannin' this stuff
'Cause I'm still strugglin' hard to be the man, and it's tough
'Cause man, it's been rough, but still I manage enough
I've been taken advantage of
Damaged and scuffed, my hands have been cuffed
But I don't panic and huff, frantic and puff, or plan to give up
The minute shit hits the fan, it erupts
I'm antein' up, double or nothin'
I've been troubled enough and
I'm sick of strugglin' and sufferin'
See, my destiny's to rest at ease
'Til I'm impressed and pleased
With my progress I won't settle for less than cheese
I'm on a quest to seize all, my own label to call
Way before my baby is able to crawl
I'm too stable to fall, the pressure motivates
To know I hold the weight of boulders on my shoulder blades
I see the golden gates to Heaven on Earth
Where they don't pull a weapon on you
When you're steppin' on turf, Kyu

It's a broke day, but everything is okay
I'm up all night, but everything is alright
It's a rough week, and I don't get enough sleep
It's a long year, pretendin' I belong here

I'm goin' for broke, gamblin' and playin' for keeps
Every day in the streets, scramblin' and payin' for cheep
Prayin' for sleep, dreamin' with a waterin' mouth
Wishin' for a better life for my daughter and spouse
In this slaughterin' house
Caught up in bouts with the root of all evil
I've seen it turn beautiful people crude and deceitful
And make them do shit illegal for these Grants and Jacksons
These transactions explain a man's actions
But in the midst of this insanity, I found my Christianity
Through God and there's a wish he granted me
He showed me how to cope with the stress
And hope for the best, instead of mope and depressed
Always gropin' a mess of flyin' over the nest
To sellin' dope with the rest
I quit smokin' cess to open my chest
Life is stressful inside this cesspool
Tryin' to wrestle, I almost bust a blood vessel
My little brother's tryin' to learn his mathematics
He's asthmatic, runnin' home from school away from crack addicts
Kids attract static, children with automatics
Takin' target practice on teens for Starter jackets
I'm usin' smarter tactics to overcome this slum
I won't become as dumb as some and succumb to scum
It's cumbersome, I'm tryin' to do well on this Earth
But it's been hell on this Earth since I fell on this Earth

It's a broke day, but everything is okay
I'm up all night, but everything is alright
It's a rough week, and I don't get enough sleep
It's a long year, pretendin' I belong here



Yo, I dedicate to this to you
To all my fans, keeping y'all in health
Let's tell this Whitey Ford to go fuck himself
Cause it's cruel when you cause a bad heart condition and
Which I create, cause that's my mission
So listen close, to what we say
Because this type of fag claims to never be gay
I knew you was jealous from the day that I met you
I upset you, cause I get respect, I bet you
I'm even liked better by your niece and nephew
And now you hate Fred because Lethal left you
Peckerwood mad cause his record went wood
No respect in the hood, fled to his neck of the woods
Got in touch with his roots, found the redneck in his blood
And said, "Heck, country western rap records are good"
So he picks the guitar up and he strums a few notes
He can't rap, or sing, but he wants to do both
Puts an album out and rules for part of the year
Then Kid Rock and Limp Bizkit come from out of nowhere
It's the start of an era, rock rap's harder this year
No one's tryin to hear some fucking old fart in a chair
Sittin on stage, strummin acoustic guitar in your ear
So you start to get scared, sit back and spark an idea
Figure you can diss me to jump start your career
I punch you in your fucking chest 'til your heart kicks in gear
And fuck your underground buddies' nameless crew
Like I'mma say they names so they can be famous too

You just a quitter
And you bitter cause I came along
And the days of House of Pain are gone
And if you talk about my little girl in a song again
I'mma kill you, I'mma kill you
You just a quitter
And you bitter cause I came along
And the days of House of Pain are gone
And if you talk about my little girl in a song again
I'mma kill you, I'mma kill you

Heart attack to stroke from the crack you smoke
To the rap you wrote, your fuckin' answer back's a joke
And I'mma tell these motherfuckin' fans the truth
The reason why you dissed me first and I answered you
You said I passed you in a lobby and I glanced at you
Like I ain't notice you
Bitch, I had a show to do
Like I'm supposed to be star-struck, come over to you
You better shut your fuckin mouth while you oh-for-two
Back in '94 Limp opened the show for you
Rocked the crowd better and stole the whole show from you
Took your motherfuckin' DJ and stole him too
So you fall in a slump and get all emotional
So now you sing and mix slang with blues and pluck strings
Confused as fuck cause now your music sucks dick
Mr. Mr. Ass Kisser to get accepted in rap
Quicker but never last, and Everlast is a

You just a quitter
And you bitter cause I came along
And the days of House of Pain are gone
And if you talk about my little girl in a song again
I'mma kill you, I'mma kill you
You just a quitter
And you bitter cause I came along
And the days of House of Pain are gone
And if you talk about my little girl in a song again
I'mma kill you, I'mma kill you

Aight look
So this is what we ask of our fans
If you ever see Everlast, whoop his ass
Hit him with sticks, bricks, rocks, throw shit at him
Kick him, spit on him, treat him like a ho, bitch-slap him
Do it for me, do it for Fred, do it for Limp
Do it for Rock, do it for rap, do it for Kid
Do it for Ice-T, do it just to do it, fuck it
He's a bitch, he ain't gon' hit you back, he's nothin
Shit in five years we'll all be eatin' at Whitey's
And he'll be bussin tables in that bitch, cleanin the toilets
Aiyyo.. fuck this, cut this shit off

Aiyo Head...
That's why I fucked your mother you fat motherfucker
Kill Whitey
Kill Whitey, Detroit
What
What
Kill Whitey, yo, yo
Kill Whitey, haha, look
First off, fuck your songs and the shit you say
Diss my wife, but at least I got a bitch, you gay
You claim to be a Muslim but you Irish White
So fuck you fat boy, drop the mic, let's fight
Plus I punch you in the chest, weak hearts I rip
Whitey Ford, 40 and white, lethargic ass dickhead
I keep 'em comin while you runnin' out of breath
Steady duckin' while I'm punchin' at your chest, you need to rest
Dilated, go ask your people how I leave ya
With your three CDs
Nobody sees, when they released
Evidence, don't fuck around with real MCs
You ain't ready for no underground beef, so fuck geeks
I let you faggots know it's on for life
But Everlast might die tonight
Fat boy murdered on wax and killed
Fuck with me and take a heart pill, you know

Grab .380s when you see Slim Shady
Call the doctor to heal your heart
They shocked you back to life at the clinic
But you 'bout to get relapsed any minute
Honkey, I hit 'em up
Hahaha, yo check this out
You faggots ain't even on my level
I'mma let D12 ride on you bitch-made ass faggots

Yo, get out the way yo, get out the way yo
Whitey Ford's heart just stopped
Eminem shocked him back, he had another heart attack
Whitey Ford's gettin his ass floored for talkin' back
Little faggot Hamburgular, I show you where the burgers are
At your own restaraunt, while I'm servin' ya
Drop and stomp your whole heart 'til it stops
Call the cops, I'mma beat your ass while they watch

Ha ha, now we got the whole industry makin fun of you Erik
Where's your House of Pain now
There's only one of you Erik
You a petty coward
You ain't ready to steady go a round
With some killers from 7 Mile to the motherfuckin' Belle Isle Bridge

Grab .380s when you see Slim Shady
Call the doctor to heal your heart
They shocked you back to life at the clinic
But you 'bout to get relapsed any minute
Honkey, I hit 'em up
Hahaha, yo check this out
You faggots ain't even on my level
I'mma let D12 ride on you bitch-made ass faggots

Got in his ass and now this faggot wanna mention me still
This ain't no freestyle battle Everlast gettin' killed
With his chest open
Tryin to throw a fuckin' punch, but you just chokin'
Havin a stroke and now you learn why crackers never earned a dime
Cause you suck, motherfucker you should learn to rhyme
Talkin' about you packin' pistols but it's funny to me
You ain't never been in trouble, you just wanna be me
I'm a paleface killer whale
On his way to fuckin' prison
Pistol whippin' tail
Erik remember when I passed you in the lobby that day
That shit was obvious you probably was gay
Now it's all about country, you gave up hip-hop
49,000 copies the week your shit drop
While my sales making records break
Motherfucker I hit em up

I'm from Detroit's Pemberton Ave
Where bullets tear you in half
Fuck the music
We got an uzi for all you fags
Get the shit out of our stereo, Dilated you violated
Now you 'bout to get annihilated, we gon' bury you
Iriscience get choked up and yoked up
All you underground bitches get your throats cut

What the fuck
Is you stupid
I choke Whitey Ford with his fucking guitar cord
And stuff him in cardboard
Chopped up in a box
With sixteen parts
I stomped on his heart
D-12, Amityville, fuck your mother while you watch
Keep your restaraunt locked and block your door
Cause we "Hit 'Em Up" like motherfuckin 2Pac Shakur

You a, 'Black Jesus,' heartattack seizures
Too many cheeseburgers McDonald's Big Mac greases
White devil, washed up honkey
Mixed up cracker who crossed over to country
Yo, aiyyo cut this shit off

Fuck him!
That's it, I'm done, I promise, I'm sorry, I promise, I'm done, I'm sorry
I just believe in kicking a man while he's down
God-Damn! I quit!
Mention my daughter's name in a song again, you fucking punk. Aiyo!



*Music playing in the background*

I can't sell this fucking record
Do you know what it feels like to be told to have a record shoved up your ass?
Do you know why Dre's record was so successful
He's rapping about big-screen TV's, blunts, 40's and bitches
You're rapping about homosexuals and Vicodin








“Rhyme or Reason”


“So Much Better”


“Survival”


“Legacy”


“Asshole” Featuring Skylar Grey


“Berzerk”



“Rap God”


“Brainless”


“Stronger Than I Was”


“So Far…”


“Love Game” Featuring Kendrick Lamar



“The Monster” Featuring Rihanna


“Headlights” Featuring Nate Ruess

PRODUCED Emile Haynie and Jeff Bhasker

“Evil Twin”

ADDITIONAL GUITARS BY; Mike Strange



I use my voice to spit the fiery frame
Try and refrain, dying in vain
I be the nigga in the Shelter who be eyeing your chain

Three-one-three area, bound to bury ya with vengeance
My rhymes sentences'll put an end to your existence with the rigorousness
Niggas, I'm serious, delirious, cause a curious... pause
The fury calls from my jaws from devouring y'all raw

You forced to listen to individual, the metaphysical
The Mac Mitten, rhyme ritual, heterosexual
Syllables they sound complex to you, lines perplexing you
With words that could put a hex on you, snap that neck on you
Murder you, boil you, we keep a white boy or two
Let my man grab the mic, you see how Bunny Rabbit do

Your style is generic, mine's authentic made
I roll like a renegade, you need clinic aid
My technique is bizarre and ill; I scar and kill
You were a star until I served you like a bar and grill
As I proceed to cook and grill ya, that’s all it took to kill ya
You better recognize me like I look familiar
You want to battle? You beat around the bush
Like you're scared to lick pussy so you eat around the tush
I need a clown to push, someone that I can bully
Wait a minute, I don’t think you understand fully
See me without a style's like mustard without the Heinz’s
I lead the new school, you a Busta without the rhymes
I crush the shit out your lines

Now I'm the Rashiki smoking the lick licky
Ten freaky girls inside The Chin Tiki
Girl, when you see me you better believe me
This ain't a game and pimping ain't easy
Anything goes when it comes to hoes
I'm the kingpin when it comes to flows
You better ask someone if you don't know
When you see me girl, say what up doe
Ten freaky girls, ten, ten, ten freaky girls



"All I see is murder murder, my mindstate"
"Makes it too late for cops to try and stop the crime rate"
"All I see is murder murder, my mindstate"
"Murder, murder, murder and kill, kill, kill"

Left the keys in the van, with a gat in each hand
Went up in Eastland and shot a policeman
Fuck a peace plan, if a citizen bystands
The shit is in my hands, here's your lifespan
And for what your life's worth, this money is twice than
Grab a couple grand and lay up in Iceland
See I'm a nice man but money turned me to Satan
I'm thirsty for this green so bad I'm dehydrating
Hurry up with the cash bitch, I got a ride waiting
Shot a man twice in the back when he tried escaping
I want the whole pie, I won't be denied Nathan
Maybe I need my head inside straightened, brain contemplating
Clean out the register, dip before somebody catches ya
Or gets your description and sketches ya
Then connects you as the prime suspect
But I ain't set to flee the scene of the crime just yet
Cause I got a daughter to feed
And two hundred dollars ain't enough to water the seed
The best thing would be for me to leave Taco Bell
And hit up Chess King and have the lady at the desk bring
Money from the safe in the back, stepped in waving the Mac
Co-operate, and we can operate, and save an attack
This bitch tried escaping the jack, grabbed her by the throat
It's murder she wrote, you barely heard a word
As she choked, it wasn't nothing for her to be smoked
Then I slammed her on her back 'til her vertebrae broke
But I'm already wanted for selling ki's
And bunch of other felonies from A to Z like spelling bees
So before I dropped to the ground and fell on knees
I bust shots, they bust back
Hit me square in the chest, wasn't wearing a vest

"All I see is murder murder, my mindstate"
"Makes it too late for cops to try and stop the crime rate"
"All I see is murder murder, my mindstate"
"Murder, murder, murder and kill, kill, kill"

Left the house, pulling out the drive backing out
Blew the back end out this lady's Jag, started blacking out
"Shut your yacking mouth
'Fore I blow the brain from out the back ya scalp!"
Drug her by her hair, smacked her up
Thinking fuck it, mug her while you're there, jacked her up
Stole her car and made a profit, grabbed the tape from out the deck
And lost it out the window like the girl in Set It Off did
Jetted off kid, stole the whip, now I'm a criminal
Drove it through somebody's yard, dove into they swimming pool
Climbed out and collapsed on the patio
I made it out alive but I'm injured badly though
Parents screaming, "Johnny go in and call the police
Tell em there's a crazy man disturbing all of the peace"
Tried to stall him at least long enough to let me leap up
Run in they crib and at least leave with some little cheap stuff
Acting like they never seen nobody hit a lick before
Smashed the window, grabbed the Nintendo 64
When they sell out in stores the price triples
I ran up the block jumping kids on tricycles
And collided with an eighty-year-old lady with groceries
There goes cheese, eggs, milk and Post Toasties
Stood up and started to see stars
Too many siren sounds, it seemed like a thousand police cars
Barely escaped, must'a been some dumb luck
Jumped up and climbed the back of a moving dump truck
But I think somebody seen me maybe
Plus I lost the damn Nintendo and I must'a dropped a Beanie Baby
Fuck it I give up, I'm surrounded in blue suits
Came out with a white flag hollering "truce-truce"
And surrendered my weapon to cops
Wasn't me, it was the gangster rap and the peppermint Schnapps

"All I see is murder murder, my mindstate"
"Makes it too late for cops to try and stop the crime rate"
"All I see is murder murder, my mindstate"
"Murder, murder, murder and kill, kill, kill"




Hi! Original Bad Boy on the case, cover your face
Came in the place, blowed, and sprayed Puffy with mace
I laced the weed with insect repellant, better check the smelly
Eminem starts with E, better check the spellin'
With a capital, somebody grab me a Snapple
I got an aspirin capsule trapped in my Adam's apple
Somebody dropped me on my head, and I'm for sure
That my mother did it, but the bitch won't admit it was her
I slit her stomach open with a scalpel
Ain't you feelin' these kicks, cunt?!"
The world ain't ready for me yet, I can tell
I'll probably have a cell next to the furnace in Hell
I'm sicker than sperm cells with syphilis germs
And I'm hotter than my dick is when I piss and it burns
I kick you in the tummy until you sick to your stomach
And vomit so much blood that your clothes stick to you from it
Hit you in the head with a brick 'til you plummet
If y'all don't like me, you can suck my dick 'til you numb it
And all that gibberish you was spittin', you need to kill it
‘Cause your style is like dying in my sleep; I don't feel it

‘Cause any man who would jump in front of a minivan
For twenty grand, a bottle of pain pills, and a minithin
Is fuckin' crazy – you hear me? Ha?
Is fuckin' crazy – hello, hi!
‘Cause any man who would jump in front of a minivan
For twenty grand, a bottle of pain pills and a minithin
Is fuckin' crazy – do you hear me? Is fuckin' crazy

I'm ice-grillin' you, starin' you down with a gremlin grin
I'm Eminem, you're a fag in a women's gym
I'm Slim, the Shady is really a fake alias
To save me within case I get chased by space aliens
A brainiac, with a cranium packed
Full of more uranium than a maniac Saudi Arabian
A highly combustible head
Spazmatic, strapped to a Craftmatic adjustable bed
Laid up in the hospital in critical condition
I flatlined, jumped up, and ran from the mortician
High speed, IV full of Thai weed
Lookin' Chinese with my knees stuck together like Siamese
Twins, joined at the groin like lesbians
Uhh, pins and needles, hypodermic needles and pins
I hope God forgives me for my sins
It probably all depends on if I keep on killin' my girlfriends

‘Cause any man who would jump in front of a minivan
For twenty grand, a bottle of pain pills, and a minithin
Is fuckin' crazy – you hear me? Ha?
Is fuckin' crazy – hello, hi!
‘Cause any man who would jump in front of a minivan
For twenty grand, a bottle of pain pills and a minithin
Is fuckin' crazy – do you hear me? Is fuckin' crazy

Last night I O.D.'d on rush, mushrooms and dust
And got rushed to the hospital to get my system flushed
I call in at work, ‘cause all I do is frolic and play
I swallow grenades, and take about a bottle a day
Give me eleven Excedrin, my head'll spin
Medicine'll get me revvin' like a 747 jet engine
Scratched my balls 'til I shredded skin
"Doctor, check this rash! Look how red it's been."
"It's probably AIDS!" "Forget it then."
I strike a still pose and hit you with some ill flows
That don't even make sense, like dykes using dildos
So reach in your billfolds for ten ducats
And pick up this Slim Shady shit that's on Rawkus
"Somethin', somethin', somethin', somethin', I get weeded."
My daughter scribbled over that rhyme, I couldn't read it

‘Cause any man who would jump in front of a minivan
For twenty grand, a bottle of pain pills, and a minithin
Is fuckin' crazy – you hear me? Ha?
Is fuckin' crazy – hello?!
‘Cause any man who would jump in front of a minivan
For twenty grand, a bottle of pain pills and a minithin
Is fuckin' crazy – do you hear me? Is fuckin' crazy

Hi, something's not right
I'm sorry, I'm mentally retarded
Slim Shady, I think that's my name
Rawkus Records, fuckin' crazy
Do you hear us? We're fuckin' crazy!
All of us! Hi… bye… goodnight, somethin'



Yo...Dre Man..Make my vocals sound sexy
Come on man, come on man, okaaaay

It feels so wrong cause it feels so right
But it's all right, it's ok with me
I'll do my steps all by myself
I don't need nobody to play with me
But if you just give me a chance
I can put you in a trance the way I dance
But don't nobody wanna play with me so I'm
Taking my ball and going home, home

I'm that guy man, shove a diamond up my hind end
And crush it with my butt muscles while I cut vocals
Slut poke holes in ya shirt, jump in mud puddles
While I stomp mudholes in ya ass girl, now lets cuddle
Blood curdlin', your gurglin' on your blood, what'll
I do for my next trick? I'm feelin' won-der-ful
I think I might just do somethin' a little less subtle
Shove a fucking tonka truck up a little kid's butthole
Feel the wrath of a psychopath slash ambassador
Of the valentines day massacre
Slash assassin, I slash her in the ass with a
Icicle and leave her layin' a blood bath while I
Put a catheter in and jump in the bath with her
In my spiderman mask man, just imagine the fun I can have with a strap on
Stick it up Kim Kardashian's ass and make the bitch run a triathlon
Are those pistachio's damn, I'd like to have some
Laying on the patio man, rolling a fat one
Shady drop the magic marker, put the cap on
God damn man, are you that much of an asshole?


I'm like Houdini, tuck my teenie eenie weenie between each
One of my thighs and make it disappear like a genie
Make the shit disappear like Tara Reid in a bikini
Believe me homie, you don't know the meaning of a meanie
They call me the fruit loop from jupiter
I'm tryna to maneuver the hoover up in your poop shoot
Don't move or ya might get it stuck so fucking far up in your uvula
You ain't gonna know what he was tryna do to ya gluteus
Totally tubular, sniffin' glue through a tube in the studia
Now who do ya think is more fruitier
Weenier smothered in peanut butter puttin' on a tube of ya
Eye shadow and man it looked nice, you should've seen it mother
I think I'll put a piece of art on my visa card
Then I'll go beat Mischa Barton with a Cuisinart
Then mosey on over to Rosie O'Donnell's with McDonald's
Jump on her lap and watch The Sopranos


Shady, what are you doin' chewin' on a human?
Grab an aluminum bat hit Heidi Klum in the back, BOOM!
And assumin' the fact that that dudes in the back room
Usin' the bathroom vacuumin' a raccoon
Skewin' a rat, a cat screwin' a baboon
You shouldn't ask what is he doin' with that broom
You should be glad he ain't leave you full of stab wounds
You in a trance, I'm back doing my dance, ooh
But they're afraid I might get Sarah Palin by the hair
And make her wear a bathin' suit and take her parasailin'
Shady why you gotta pick on the lady for
Why you make her read 84 bed time stories to you in baby talk?
Cause I'm scared there's monster's under my bed
Kellie Pickler hid my juice box under my bassinet
No wonder my ass is wet, my diaper needs to be changed
You like graffiti, dike? Well I can pee pee and write your name


Fine nobody wants to play with me
Fuck you then bitch!
You guys are always mean to me anyways
All you ever do is rub gum in my hair and stuff
You guys are gonna make me...make me sad, I'm sad
I'm gonna cry...I'm crying
I'm going' tell my mom....mom















































I know there’s something in the wake of your smile
I get a notion from the look in your eyes, yeah
We’ve built a love but that love falls apart
A little piece of heaven turns to dark
Listen to your heart

There’s a certain mystique when I speak
That you notice that it’s sorta unique
Cause you know it’s me, my poetry’s deep
And I’m still matic the way I flow to this beat
You can’t sit still, it’s like tryin to smoke crack
And go to sleep, I’m strapped
Just knowing any minute I could snap
I’m the equivalent of what would happen if Bush rapped
I bully these rappers so bad lyrically
It ain’t even funny, I ain’t even hungry
It ain’t even money, you can’t pay me enough
For you to play me, it’s cockamamie
You just ain’t zany enough to rock with Shady
My noodle is cockadoodle, my clocks cuckoo
I got screws loose, yeahhh, the whole kitten-kaboodle
I’m just brutal. It’s no rumor, I’m numero uno, assume it
There’s no humor in it no more, you know
I’m rollin with a swollen bowling ball in my bag
You need a fag to come and tear a new hole in my ass


I’m supposed to be the soldier who never blows his composure
Even though I hold the weight of the whole world on my shoulders
I ain’t never supposed to show it, my crew ain’t supposed to know it
Even if it means goin’ toe to toe with a Benzino it don’t matter
I’d never drag them in battles that I can handle unless I absolutely have to
I’m supposed to set an example
I need to be the leader, my crew looks for me to guide ‘em
If some shit ever does pop off, I’m supposed to be beside ‘em
That Ja shit I tried to squash it, it was too late to stop it
There’s a certain line you just don’t cross and he crossed it
I heard him say Hailie’s name on a song and I just lost it
It was crazy, this went way beyond some Jay-z and Nas shit
And even though the battle was won, I feel like we lost it
I spent too much energy on it, honestly I’m exhausted
And I’m so caught in it I almost feel I’m the one who caused it
This ain’t what I’m in hip-hop for, it’s not why I got in it


I’m the man in my city ain’t nobody wit me
You can ask the real niggas and all the bad bitches
I’m a known drug dealer I always have 50′s
And the thugs and the killers was all in class wit me
SS’S on 26′s watching some television
Shorty I’m never slipping got the berretta in vision
And ready to pop the clip in, ready to get to tripping
Ready to show these folks a celebrity pistol whipping
Pimp stolen’ the automobile and the roof for the tag missing
Polices’ try to pursue me it’s nothing but gas given
Addicted to fast living, guess I’m one of my dad’s children
Think I’m bad now shoulda seen me before I had children
Give dick to ya daddy’s daughter and dare her to have children?
Hope he got some insurance ’cause death her is enduring?
Kill her in Mississippi and drive her to Missouri
Still my wet paint drippin’ while I’m woodgrain gripping


There used to be a time when you could just say a rhyme
And wouldn’t have to worry about one of your people dyin’
But now it’s elevated cause once you put someone’s kids in it
The shit gets escalated, it ain’t just words no more is it?
It’s a different ball game, you callin’ names and you ain’t just rappin’
We actually tried to stop the 50 and Ja beef from happenin’
Me and Dre had sat with him, kicked it and had a chat with him
And asked him not to start it he wasn’t gonna go after him
Until Ja started yappin’ in magazines how we stabbed him
Fuck it 50 smash ‘em, mash on ‘em, let him have it
Meanwhile my attention is pullin’ in other directions
Some receptionist at The Source who answers phones at his desk
Has an erection for me and thinks that I’ll be his resurrection
Tries to blow the dust off his mic and make a new record
But now he’s fucked the game up cause one of the ways I came up
Was through that publication the same one that made me famous




Welcome back to the stage of history


Yo, I'll fuckin', I'll... I'll puke, eat it, and freak you
Battle? I'm too weeded to speak to
The only key that I see to defeat you
Would be for me to remove these two Adidas and beat you
And force feed you 'em both, and on each feet is a cleat shoe
I'll lift you off your feet so fast with a roundhouse, you'll think I pulled the fucking ground out from underneath you
I ain't tryin' to shoot you
I'm tryin' to chop you into pieces and eat you
Wrap you in rope and plastic, stab you with broken glass
And have you with open gashes strapped to a soakin' mattress
Coke and acid, black magic, cloaks and daggers
Fuck the planet 'til it spins on a broken axis
I'm so bananas I'm showing up to your open casket
To fill it full of explosive gasses and close it back
With a lit match in it while I sit back and just hope it catches
Blow you to fragments, laugh, roll you, and smoke the ashes

I see the light at the end
But every time I take a step it gets dim
Tell me, is this Hell we're livin' in?
If so, Heaven's got to be better
But if we're hellbound, whatever, let's go down
I see the light at the end
But every time I take a step it gets dim
Tell me, is this Hell we're livin' in?
If so, Heaven's got to be better
But if we're hellbound, whatever, let's go down

Am I the worst because I never go to church?
I run a red light then sideswipe a hearse
I'ma drink till my liver rot, see the doc leave the E.R
Then hit a bar for a liquor shot; fuck the liver spot!
One day we all gon' die
But when I die, I'ma be so high
That I'ma get up and walk, leaving the concrete bare
With the chalk outline still there
I smoke 'til I choke and I sex a lot
I got a cross on my chain, but it's just to rock
Now if I pray every night
Do I still have to hold my tre very tight?
You feel me, God? I done did so much shit while on Earth
I smoke, I drink, I curse, and to make matters worse
I bust my gun first, and then I chat with your corpse
Since way back, I was one to never like back-talk
See me at the pearly gates in line, wearing a North Face
Nickle 9 at my waist, God done lost faith
Angels greet me, but I don't reply back
Just show me to my quarters, and oh yeah, where's Thai at?

I see the light at the end
But every time I take a step it gets dim
Tell me, is this Hell we're livin' in?
If so, Heaven's got to be better
But if we're hellbound, whatever, let's go down

Maxi was seriously wounded
But the soul still burns
Final battle, fight!

Analyze the strength of my game, like Lee Corso
Call me a lost soul, with a vest on my torso
And of course, yo, y'all know I'm no stranger to danger
Like Christ in a manger, feel a whole range of my anger
I breathe down shit so hard you can see sound
And beat down these rap clowns in like three rounds
My pen 'bout as sharp as a dagger, walk with a swagger
Tie your wife to the back of a black Jag and I drag her
Ten blocks, untie the bitch, and I still bag her
Give her a smack in the ass and a six pack of lager
My shit go as deep and as dark as a train tunnel
My flows spill, like using the wrong end of a funnel
Everyday I grow more older and more colder
Fly you to Colorado, roll you over with a boulder
I know you want to retaliate but you won't dare, ‘cause you fucking with some niggas like this who just don't care

I see the light at the end
But every time I take a step it gets dim
Tell me, is this Hell we're livin' in?
If so, Heaven's got to be better
But if we're hellbound, whatever, let's go down

Time's up! You lose!

Gotham!




Hey yo, what's up, man?
Hey yo, you been here all day, man
Y'all been here every weekend, man
I don't ever get a chance to rap first, man!
That's ‘cause you wack!
What?!? I ain't wack, nigga, I got some raps for all y'all
Nigga, my raps fresh, I'ma bust my raps first
You can bust yours after me if you want to
No, no, man, I'm goin' first
I'm gettin' tired of everybody wantin' to go first, man
You always rap first, I'm rappin'
I don't care what none of y'all say; I'm fresh, I'm fresh

Ayo, who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
Point him out! Man, I wanna know
Who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
"I wanna know, I wanna know"
I said who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
Point him out! Bitch, I wanna know
Who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
"I wanna know, I wanna know"

I'll have you taken back to Christ when you're sacrificed
The way you're hacked and sliced
When I fill your back with knives
Jackin' life's of MC's, now I'm set to launch a plan
For blowin' up the stage with illegal contraband
I stomped your man, so unless you want what he got
You better set the mic down, I'm steamin' like a teapot
I make the D hot, people get in my face and ask
If I wanna battle, then I chase them in a Jason mask
It's an amazin' task to battle with success
I never gave a fuck, now I give a fuck less
And win a slug fest, I get physical like physicians
Invisible like magicians with mystical mic traditions
Wicked wizardry like a sorcerer, no remorse for you
When I torture you throughout the course of my orchestra
So feel the force of my spiritual images
Slicin' up an enemy's appendages 'til he hemorrhages
My skin itches every time a rapper recites
And when he's through with his verse
I'm all covered in flea bites
You wanna see fights, I got a match for ya
You couldn't flip shit playin' in toilets with a spatula

Ayo, who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
Point him out! Man, I wanna know
Who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
"I wanna know, I wanna know"
I said who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
Point him out! Bitch, I wanna know
Who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
"I wanna know, I wanna know"

You bitches get a hysterectomy disrespectin' me
You wanna feel the full effect of me, hand a TEC to me
Intellectually superior, I'll make the whack wearier
Inferior, deteriorate, like bacteria
Materially, killin' serially, clearly you'll see
How much in fear when you hear me you'll be
Shiver and shake, quiver and quake
Bite a rhyme and feel your jaw get stiffer and ache
Wither and break, you slitherin' snake
Gibberin' fake, fibber and flake
I'll twist you in a different shape
And toss you in Michigan Lake, for fisherman sake
If this is a dream, you wish you can wake
Every diss you can take, personal
We ain't friends tryin' to make amends
If you ain't ever stole a gate you can take offense
I make intense masterpieces
And smash to pieces your last releases
You pass diseases, that's the reason
I'm showin' you the proper way to
Operate a mic, so pass it like a hot potato
I've never been less than clever and fresh
Severin' flesh of fools who never impressed ever infest

Ayo, who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
Point him out! Man, I wanna know
Who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
"I wanna know, I wanna know"
I said who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
Point him out! Bitch, I wanna know
Who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
"I wanna know, I wanna know"

Whhhooo the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?!
Point him out! I wanna know
Who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
"I wanna know, I wanna know"
Who the fuck passed you the mic
And said that you can flow?
Who the fuck passed you the mic?!
Who the fuck passed you the mic?!




"I'm gonna kill this bitch, I'm gonna kill her. I'm going to fucking jail 'cause I'm gonna kill this bitch!"
"Yo, man..."
"What?"
"I don't know, I got a really, really bad feeling about this..."
"Man, would you shut the fuck up, Gary!? You always got a bad feeling, man..! That's her car right there, just park."
"Alright, just let me park... I'm parking!"
"Fucking turn the car off, dawg."
"Alright..."
"Alright, we wait."
"We wait for what?"
"We wait until she comes out and then I'm gonna fucking kill her."
"Man... you ain't gonna kill no one—what the fuck did you bring that for!?"
"Man, don't point that shit at me!"
"Dude! God, I fucking hate when you do that shit!"
"Yeah, but it's funny as fuck!"
"Gonna fuck around and kill me one of these days, I swear..."
"Gets you every time."

"Is that her?"
"Where?"
"Right there, motherfucker."
"Oh, yeah..."
"Alright, get down, get down."
"Fuck, here we go again..."
"Get down!"
"The fuck? You want me to get under the car?"
"Yo, who's she walking with..?"
"The fuck am I supposed to know? You told me to duck down!"
"It's the fucking bouncer—did she just kiss him?"
"I don't think so."
"Dawg, sh... She just fucking kissed him!"
"No, she didn't."
"No, she's not—Aw, shit..."
"Marsh!"



Aw man...
You ever be in the club man, you get in a fight
And people that you don't even know jump in?

You feel like you wanna hit something, your fist clenches, you're pissed
You just wanna get someone with shit, jump on this
You're 'bout to get your shit pushed in, I'm just inches away
From splitting your shit wide open, no stitches can save
You'll die with your eyes open, you hope this isn't the way
You end up going out, but I guess it just is I'm afraid
Razors, scissors and blades make Jason say "Isn't this great?"
On-lookers participate in this ass-kicking debate
That's starting to take place in the middle of the street
Little did you know there'd be an all-out brawl soon as you heard this beat
Emergency personnel rush to the murder scene but it's too late
It's absolute pandemonium
Whisked away in an ambulance is your fate
Nothing nobody told you when you left the house today
Could of made you anticipate such an ass-whipping, okay
'til the anger dissipates
You'll get punched in the face, reciprocate, come on

So what the deal ridaz?
Would you excuse me while I feel my nuts?
My balls are feeling a mighty big now
I might just have to dig down and pull 'em through my britches

You step in the place with enough misplaced anger to catch a case
Anxious to get in some shit, got your gangstas all with your ladies
You better go get your mace 'cause Shady said so
You may wanna pick up the radio and bang it against your face
That's how fuckin' rowdy you feel, now you still wanna grill?
If you don't wanna get the shit beat out of you, chill
'Cause if you doubt me you will, yeah got me a pill, found me a thrill
I got a couple of drinks here, and I'm bound to refill
Girl howdy, how do you feel ma?
This cocksucker did not spill my drink, oh hell nah
He must be trying to kill my buzz
I will not budge, so what the deal ridaz?
Now here they all come and they got your back in like 2 seconds flat
And that's probably a record, yeah, you wasn't expecting that
'Cause they want in on the act, there's a cognac bottle
We snuck it in 'cause the beer that they was serving here was only tap
I'm biting, I fight dirty, you might get kicked in the nuts
You're frightened like "This guy might hurt me"
You're quite certain he's nuts, I've hit myself in the face harder
Play smarter, you may start her over, you need a chainsaw to
Dig your way out or go powder your nose
Pussy the louder you yell the harder I slap the shit outta you hoes
You set it off faggot so now how do you 'spose
We settle it, hit me in the nose, we'll see how it goes


It's sheer hustle, I bob, weave, deflate your beer muscles
We're tussling, the crowd's starting to cheer us and
Adrenaline's rushing through us just like a geyser gushing
Too much Budweiser in my blood, I'm strangling your windpipe for nothing
My signature ligature marks, look at you all
Big with your remarks 'til I swing an icepick at your heart
At least that's what it feels like when I pick you apart
And dig at ya, and break you down like the bitch that you are
The predicament starts when I throw a brick at your car
The pain inflicted upon you is so sick it's Bizarre
Shit this is almost ridiculous, addictive as far
As having me wanna rip out your fricking ligaments, ahh
You hit like a bitch, you scratch me with your nails for that
You catch an open hand slap like a female like bap
In fact I'll have the crowd smacking you themselves
Where's D12? I don't feel like doing this by myself, come on


Yeah, what the deal?
I'm feeling hard as hell right now homie
I almost feel... Invincible and shit
Ay Dre! You got me feeling like I can't be touched right now fool
I'm unstoppable
Damn



Suma Luma Duma Luma, You're Assumin' I'm A human, what I got to




I'm gettin' mad love, I'm snugglin' hugs
Strugglin' thugs, smugglin' drugs
Jugglin' jobs, guzzlin' jugs
So here's a toast to federal checks
Hetero sex, unaffordable medical debts
We travel in packs, unravelin' facts
And gravel in cracks to find babblin' max, gafflin' tracks
I grapple an axe for them bafflin' acts
Of mysterious stab-in-the-backs who dabble in wax
Stealin' my art when I sculpt it
The culprit that stole shit'll end up with his skull split
Then I buried the hatchet, I carry the fat shit
Butterfingers is here when it's necessary to scratch it
Baby, all I wanna do is swallow one or two
Smoke a little bit and follow one of you
Back home when the party ends
So tonight I'm droppin' naughty hints
To the finest women in the audience

’Cause we came here to do this tonight
We don't wanna fight
We don't want no one feelin' uptight
’Cause we came here to do this tonight
’Til the morning light
Hope that everyone's feelin' alright

Ayo, biters are like tarantulas, vandalous
Livin' as scandalous as a television evangelist
But I can handle this; I'm the rhyme biter, crime fighter
Caped crusader, takin' care of undeservin' lime lighters
I think we live in era meant for me
Experimentally I found a way to spread the terror mentally
When I stumbled upon this resolution
By usin' a special fusion
Of chemical solution for this fresh illusion
You couldn't see me with binoculars
I'm armed like an octopus
Step on stage and you'll get socked and pushed
Talkin' that junk like you had Black Bart at your back
Come to battle me and you get smacked hard as you act
When I rep-a-resent it, and will have a referee in it
Every minute, so when I win it you never resent it
I'm forever demented
Come up with funk, I'll never be scented
You got the point when I cleverly sent it

’Cause we came here to do this tonight
We don't wanna fight
We don't want no one feelin' uptight
’Cause we came here to do this tonight
’Til the morning light
Hope that everyone's feelin' alright

Eminem is headed skyward
For those who thought that I would
Make you bored and treat you like a piece of plywood
I've got miracle lyrical capability all in me
With the agility to escape a killer bee colony
So get your cameras and capture how miraculous
I rap for all you Draculas
And showed you all how wack you was
I meant it as a diss
‘Cause you don't posses the pizazz of this
I'm hazardous enough already as it is
Without you addin' fuel to the fire; I'm cruel to the liar
Who fails to recognize my reign and hail rule to the sire
Clinical studies show that I'm cynical
There's no one who's identical
To my fresh and authentic flow
I'm sure the party people can agree
That I'm enchantin' rhythm romantically
Freakin' vocals so frantically
So throw your hands up in the atmosphere
And let them know the only party that was phat was here

’Cause we came here to do this tonight
We don't wanna fight
We don't want no one feelin' uptight
’Cause we came here to do this tonight
’Til the morning light
Hope that everyone's feelin' alright



Maaaaan! Let's go
Hey yo, Fif'
Yeah?
Call 'em and tell 'em it's time to hate us again
We're back
Haha

Jimmy can crack corn, but I don't care
My enemies crack corn, but I don't care
You can be black white or albino, yeah
You can have cornrows inside yo' hair
I give a fuck if I don't like yo' stare
This bottle of wine goes upside yo' head
A little bit psycho, but I know that
Think you just don't say it and I won't say it
See, if you don't brag then I don't brag
I know I'm bad as long as I know I'm bad
I don't need ya'll to co-sign no shit
You can just keep making them tired old threats
Little bit like the boy who cried wolf did
See me but don't dare to try no shit
Cuz you know that somewhere inside those layers
The rattlesnake's right there to bite your ass
And I can be so quiet and strike so fast
Like lightening bolts right out the sky go blast
From out of nowhere you might find your career
Come to with *eek* and I'm just like OH YEAH

See us on the award shows and we're like OH YEAH
Can we get more of those? They like OH YEAH
See us keep blowing up, we're like OH YEAH
So Jimmy can crack corn, but I don't care
See me in the videos, I'm like OH YEAH
See me ride up close, you're like OH EM'
And where's D12 at? They like WE OVER HERE
And where the fuck we goin'? We're like NOWHERE

You jealous little fucks beg for my attention, but
I done told you once I'm not the kind of attention you want
If I tell you twice then I won't be so nice
If you keep coming back
That only means you know you lost the fight
They wanna talk shit, let them talk shit cuz they talk shit
Knowing deep down they really just wanna squash it
Cuz no one wants to walk around stepping in dog shit
And get doo doo on their shoe again as soon as they wash it
But the pride won't let 'em inside, they like, "Go get 'em!"
And I'm just like, "Why you trying to fight momentum?"
We just keep winning by landslides, oh, and um
Shady Limited in any size, yo, denim
To velour, even our clothing lines on fire
As 50 would said our clothing lines on FIRE
Meanwhile your mind's on us like mine's on Mariah
And you all just like her your all fucking liars
But I'll just keep fucking you like I fucked her
Right in the ass with K-Y, yessir
So full of joy, boy, am I absurd?

See us on the award shows and we're like oh yeah
Can we get more of those they like oh yeah
See us keep blowing up we're like oh yeah
So Jimmy can crack corn but I don't care
See me in the videos I'm like oh yeah
See me ride up close your like oh Em'
And where's G-Unit at they like we over here
And where the fuck we goin' we're like no where

Your homie got clapped on, man, I don't care
The cops in my nana crib, but I'm not there
It is what it is, dog. Man, life's not fair
Your friends should have known not to front 'round here
Listen, kid, where I'm from the wolves smell fear
They'll strip your ass of your jewels right here
Man, I'm gonna say this one time and get this clear
Man, you can catch a hot one like out of nowhere
Beautiful day without drama is rare
Your girl's a freak, man, sometimes we share
Yeah, I wear a condom and you go bare
You probably heard about me, I'm a shown up player
In the hood politicin' like I'm running for mayor
Running, winding, donning and shining
You know what I'm sayin'?
I ain't got time for fucking around and horse playin'
I'm making hits, my homies taking hits whose stayin'

See us on the award shows and we're like OH YEAH
Can we get more of those? They like OH YEAH
See us keep blowing up, we're like OH YEAH
So Jimmy can crack corn, but I don't care
See me in the videos, I'm like OH YEAH
See me ride up close, you're like OH EM'
And where's D12 at? They like WE OVER HERE
And where the fuck we goin'? We're like NOWHERE

Haha, yeah. It's the Re-Up
Haha
God, I love it
You know you hate that laugh don't you
Haha, keep doing it
Do it again
What?
The laugh
Oh, haha
I like that
Haha
Haha
You don't think they gonna think we're really crazy, right?



Psst, hey, listen
La la la la la la la la la laaaa
I love my job
Makes me feel like Superman!
La la la la la la la la la laaaa
Can you fly? I can, wanna see?

I'm only entertainin' you, my
Goal is to stimulate, makin' you high
And take you and I
To a place you can't see, but I believe you can fly
I don't mean nobody harm, I'm just partyin'
I'm not your dad, not your mom, not your guardian
Just a man who's on the mic
So let me entertain you

My lyrical content is constantly under fire
No wonder why I constantly bomb back
To combat attacks with constant concepts
When lyrics are constantly took outta context
Failure to communicate with Congress has
Been a problem for the longest, I guess
But maybe one day we can make some progress
Food for thought, see how long it takes to digest
Feelin' good when I should be ashamed
Shit, I really shoulda fell but I stood, see, I came
Like a flame in the night, like a ghost in the dark
There's a ray, there's a light, there's a hope, there's a spark
But when planets collide they'll never see eye to eye
Until they decide to set the differences aside
And this is why only one of us will survive
So children, follow my lead and feel the vibe, because—

I'm only entertainin' you, my
Goal is to stimulate, makin' you high
And take you and I
To a place you can't see, but I believe you can fly
I don't mean nobody harm, I'm just partyin'
I'm not your dad, not your mom, not your guardian
Just a man who's on the mic
So let me entertain you

My music can be slightly amusin'
You shouldn't take lyrics so serious, it might be confusin'
Just tryin' to separate the truth from entertainment
It's stupid, ain't it? I get sick of tryin' to explain it
See, I could sit and argue with you, but it goes beyond
Just being a snot, pointy-nosed bleach-blond
'Cause I came here to uplift, let your woes be gone
Tell 'em to get fucked and just mosey on
Constantly movin', constantly usin'
The Constitution as a form of restitution
Bless the children, nothin' less than brilliant
Let me entertain you like Robbie Williams
I'll be here when y'all are gone, rebuildin'
World revolvin', still evolvin', still Slim
How many kids will copy? Prob'ly millions
But I'ma do this as a fuckin' hobby till then, 'cause—

I'm only entertainin' you, my
Goal is to stimulate, makin' you high
And take you and I
To a place you can't see, but I believe you can fly
I don't mean nobody harm, I'm just partyin'
I'm not your dad, not your mom, not your guardian
Just a man who's on the mic
So let me entertain you

My lyrical content contains subject matter
That sucks up all these fucked up young kids
At an alarming rate; common denominate
Add it up and you'll see just why I dominate
I try to stimulate, but kids emulate
And mimic every move you make, "Slim, you great!"
But wait, can't you see I'm only here to entertain?
I gotta be the one to go against the grain
'Cause man, I see it, feel it, live it, but it's inhumane
For me to see you be influenced and pretend you ain't
But they don't understand that I've been through pain
If you get to know me I could be a friend you gain
But you can't just stand there and try to judge
It hurts but your jealousy probably tears you up inside as much
And it's such a pleasure, every button that I touch
I treasure every glutton that I punish in my lust, but—

I'm only entertainin' you, my
Goal is to stimulate, makin' you high
And take you and I
To a place you can't see, but I believe you can fly
I don't mean nobody harm, I'm just partyin'
I'm not your dad, not your mom, not your guardian
Just a man who's on the mic
So let me entertain you

{Backmasked}
I'm not here to save you
I'm only here for the ride
So let me entertain you
And everything will be fine



I'm possessed by evil demons that torture me while I'm sleeping
I keep dreaming of death and I'm hearing people screaming
The devil's spirit's trapped inside me and I want it out
I'm on the couch bleeding to death in a haunted house
With both of my wrists slit, I'm lifted up in the air
And suspended in animation like someone's holding me there
I feel somebody's cold hands wrapping around my neck
While I choke on my own blood that I swallow and drown to death
But I found a breath and somehow managed to slip the clutches
Nearly blacking out from dizziness and head rushes
Tripping over OD'd bodies of dead lushes
Bloodstains paint the plush carpet like red blushes
Door's open and close by themselves
Books fly off shelves, curtains catch fire, the house melts
My skin blisters and sticks together like twin sisters
The wind blows and shatters windows like ten twisters
Caught a piece of shrapnel in the Adam's apple
Two cups of holy water and I'm looking at 'em half full
But as soon as I go to touch 'em they turn into red rum
It got silent, then all these voices said
"Come follow me into the gates of Hell"
I heard 'em yell "Welcome to the Norman Bates Motel!"
I ring the bell for service and I was greeted by his mother
Covered in dry blood, head still dented from the shovel
I said I need a room so I could try to get some rest
She gave me the keys to the best suite and a bag of cess
And told me that's just for starters, Satan'll be in to see me later
To see if I'm interested in being partners



Once again, it's the sinister cynical minister Shady
Kryptonite to Superman, he's a dentist to Amy
Administerer of the pain, he just finished huffin' the paint
And muffler fumes like it was nothin', because it ain't
Anything in his way, his enemies he just slays
His venom he sprays, reaches like beams of energy rays
Menacing stares, he glares, making the hairs
All on the back of ya neck stand like Dracula, yep
Spectacular rep, he's a tarantula, gargantuan
Yeah, Angela, so I command ya to start dancin'
Part Manson, part Hannibal, part mechanical shark
Throwing animal parts at Scarlett Johansen
Enter my gas chamber, you gangsta? My ass
He's got his fangs to your neck, he's set to strangle ya ass, hater
You're facin' a task greater, he's chasin' your ass
He's got his face in a mask, your blood stains on his glass table

I'm checking the exposure of photos of me exposing
Myself locked inside of a cozy hotel posing
With or without clothing, next to the decomposing
Bodies eroding while I'm dozing off, overdosing
Windows opening, shutting; doors opening, closing
I think there's a ghost, too much hydrocodone and codeine
I was only 'sposed to swallow a half, I took the whole thing
I'm not joking, I think I just snorted my nose ring
I need a drink, I'm standing over the sink hosing
Myself, self-loathing, cause I'm on a brink, mostly
I don't wanna think; this will make everything rosy
Beverly sings, scream while I'm severing three toesies
Totally frozen while I close in
I'm yodelling "Rosie, won't you come out to play?"
And no sense wasting time, cutting and pasting headlines
In the papers, making shrines of my crimes and capers
My words are whirlwinds, I murder my girlfriends
Go to Europe and put Nurofens in my syrup and stirred 'em
You never heard 'em like this, so don't encourage him
The neurosurgeon, coke mirrors, and lyrics worse than
The kinda person to get Katie Couric to cursin'
Eighty spirits of ladies cause Shady murdered the virgins
Crazy turn of events  that he emerged
Took over the world and reeled in all the children
Lured 'em into the building and killed 'em
Buried 'em in the mulch and mildew and he will do what he feels
And still can spin, straw to gold like Rumplestilskin
Cotton to silk, Motrin to Tylenol 3 pills
The Real Slim Shady's entered the buildin'
There's nothing but crumbled leaves and tumbleweeds up in this bitch
Mildred, he's ill with it, he still shouldn't be healed
There's no one as sick as he, MC's will get fricassed on the grill, then



I'm the illest rapper to hold a cordless, patrolling corners
Looking for hookers to punch in the mouth with a roll of quarters
I'm meaner in action than Roscoe beating James Todd, Sr
And smackin' his back with vacuum cleaner attachments
I grew up in the wild hood as a hazardous youth
With a fucked up childhood that I used as an excuse
And ain't shit changed but kept the same mindstate
Since the third time that I failed 9th grade
You probably think that I'm a negative person don't be so sure of it
I don't promote violence I just encourage it
I laugh at the sight of death as I fall down a cement flight of steps
And land inside a bed of spider webs
So throw caution to the wind, you and a friend
Can jump off of a bridge and if you live, do it again
Shit, why not? Blow your brain out, I'm blowing mine out
Fuck it, you only live once you might as well die now

It's only fair to warn, I was born with a set of horns
And metaphors attached to my damn umbilical cord
Warlord of rap that'll bash you with a 2 by 4 board
And smash into your Honda Accord with a 4 door Ford
But I'm more towards droppin an acappella that'll chop a fella
To Mozzarella, worse than a helicopter propeller
Got you locked in the cellar with your skeleton showing
Developing anorexia while I'm standing next to ya
Eating a full course meal watching you starve to death
With an IV in your veins feeding you liquid darvocet
Pumping you full of drugs, pull the plugs
On the gunshot victims full of bullet slugs
Who were picked up in an ambulance and driven
To receiving with the asses ripped out of they pants and given
A less than 20 percent chance of living
Have a possible placement, it's a hospital patient
Storing the dead bodies in grandma's little basement
Doctor Kevorkian has arrived
To perform an autopsy on you while you scream "I'M STILL ALIVE!"
Driving a rusty scalpel in through the top of your scalp
And pulling your Adam's apple out through your mouth
Better call the fire department, I've hired an arson
To set fire to carpets and burn up your entire apartment
I'm a liar to start shit
Got your bitch wrapped around my dick
So tight, you need a crobar to pry her apart with

Met a retarded kid named Greg with a wooden leg
Snatched it off and beat him over the fucking head with the peg
Go to bed with the keg, wake up with the 40
Mix it with Alka Seltzer and Formula 44D
Fuck an acid tab, I'll strap the whole sheet to my forehead
Wait until it absorbed in and fell to the floor dead
No more said, case closed, end of discussion
I'm blowing up like spontaneous human combustion
Leaving you in the aftermath of holocaust and traumas
Cross the bombers? We blowing up your house killing your parents
And coming back to get your foster mommas
And I'm as good at keeping a promise as Nostradamus
Cause I ain't making no more threats
I'm doing drive-bys in tinted Corvettes on Vietnam war vets
I'm more or less sick in the head
Maybe more cause I smoked crack today, yesterday and the day before
Saboteur, walk the block with a labrador
Strapped with more corral for war than El Salvador
Foul style galore, verbal cow manure
Coming together like an eyebrow on Al B. Sure!



Haha... So do I... at least I thought I did

This is a beat with no words at first, it’s a blank painting
Exercising the mind, it’s brain strength training
It starts off something like, "Shady's an insane maniac
Yeah, Slim Shady, that's a zany name, ain't it?"
Now all you need's an image to go with the name, baby
Wifebeaters and white t-shirts, Hanes mainly
It's a long shot, but is it possible? There's a lane, maybe
If not he's gon' have to come and change the whole game, ain't he?
He wants the fame so bad he can taste it, he can see his name up in lights
Women screaming his fucking name, fainting
Shady did it, he sold out the whole dang stadium
Joe Shmoe made it, he took his Plain Jane lady
And his baby Hailie out the trailer but he ain't trailing anymore
He's ahead of the race, while maintaining his innocence
Little does he know his train is derailing
And he's about to be raped by this game anally, now

What would you do for a little bit?
What would you give for a little bit of that C-O-C-A-I-N-E?
I got to have it, yeah I made it, I'm addicted, yeah I'm fading

You’re operating on all cylinders, syllables spit like dillingers
Spilling your guts, people are feeling your mic skills
But these haters are ice grilling ya
Willing to sacrifice anything for the life that they might steal from ya
Fake friends will kill for ya, die for ya but you can’t decipher
Why for the life of ya, it wasn’t like this when you were cyphering
Argue with your wife again, she found Vicodin
In your pants last night again, your dispute's public
Nothing is private anymore, oh, and your best friend?
Say bye-bye to him, what kind of apple you take a bite of Slim?
The way that it turned out was nothin' like the picture that I painted
In my head, sometimes a dream and making it's more fun
Than it's to actually make it, the game stripped me naked
It robbed me of ever having another real relationship
With another girl, this world is a fucking trip
As I slip in another world, proceed, take another hit
Sniff 'til I fucking hurl, tell 'em all to fucking sit
And spin 'til they fucking twirl, middle finger up again
Relapsing back in this game, oh well, fuck it then, now


You start off bright, just to see your name in lights
Just so you can live the life
You think you're good, just cause you got out the hood
Concerned only with getting dough, no longer poor
I hear it callin', my name is callin'
Why you struggling when you could be ballin'?
My head is saying yes but my feet is stallin'
So many walkin' by the end they fallin'
But I gots to have it, like Eve and the apple
She had to grab it, I got to take it, I got to make it
That's the plan and I can't forsake it, yeah




"Morning, Marshall."

"Morning, doc."

"So we're discharging you today, how are you feeling?"

"Ah, anxious."

"Anxiety?"

"Well, anxious to get home, anxious to get back into the world. Nervous."

"Nervous? C'mon, Marshall, you're a big boy now
You're sounding like a bit of a baby, you can do this
You found a sponsor yet?"

"Um, not yet. But I mean, when I get back..."

"Well, if you find one, you find one. If you don't, you don't."

"Well, yeah, I mean I gotta start going to meetings first and... Wait, what?"


"Well, yeah, but I thought sobriety was the most important thing?"

"So what else are you thinking?"

"Um, well, I know I gotta start practicing the steps, and I mean learn 'em, and start being able to apply 'em."

"The steps?"

"Yeah, the steps."

"There's a lot of them, aren't there?"

"Well, twelve, but–"

"Christ, I don't even know them all."

"Really?"

"Anything else?"


"Take a drink."

"What?"

"Take a drink, and y'know, take the edge off."

"Take the edge off? Man, if I have a drink I already know what that's gonna lead me to."

"What, you mean these?" *shakes pills*

"No, what the fuck?!"


"Oh no, no, no! Come on, man!
Oh, fuck you, man!
No, no, no, NO!"
*Alarm beeps*
"Oh, shit!"



This is another public service announcement
Brought to you, in part, by Slim Shady
Slim Shady does not give a fuck what you think
If you don't like it, you can suck his fucking cock
Little did you know, upon purchasing this album, you have just kissed his ass
Slim Shady is fed up with your shit, and he's going to kill you
A-anything else?

Yeah
Sue me



People say that I'm a bad influence
I say the world's already fucked, I'm just addin' to it
C'mon, do as I do, go ahead, get mad and do it!
People say that I'm a bad influence
I say the world's already fucked, I'm just addin' to it
They say I'm suicidal, teenagers' newest idol
C'mon, do as I do, go ahead, get mad and do it!

Hand me an eighth, beam me up and land me in space
I'ma sit on top of the world, and shit on Brandy and Mase
I'm more than ill
Scarier than a white journalist in a room with Lauryn Hill
Human horror film, but with a lot funnier plot
And people'll feel me, ‘cause I'ma still be the Mad Rapper
Whether I got money or not
As long as I'm on pills and I got plenty of pot
I'll be in a canoe paddling, making fun of your yacht
But I would like an award
For the best rapper to get one mic in The Source
And a wardrobe I can afford
Otherwise I might just end up back strikin' at Ford
And you wonder what the fuck I need more Vicodin for?
Everybody's pissing me off
Even the No Limit Tank looks like a middle finger sideways flipping me off
No shit, I'm a grave danger to my health; why else
Would I kill you then jump in a grave and bury myself?


I'm the illest rapper to hold the cordless
Patrollin' corners, lookin' for hookers to punch in the mouth
With a roll of quarters
I'm meaner in action than Roscoe beatin' James Todd Sr
Across the back with vacuum cleaner attachments
I grew up in a wild hood as a hazardous youth
With a fucked up childhood that I used as an excuse
And ain't shit changed, I kept the same mindstate
Since the third time that I failed 9th grade
You probably think that I'm a negative person
Don't be so sure of it
I don't promote violence, I just encourage it
I laugh at the sight of death
As I fall down a cement flight of steps
And land inside a bed of spider webs
So throw caution to the wind; you and a friend
Can jump off of a bridge, and if you live, do it again
Shit, why not? Blow your brain out, I'm blowin' mine out
Fuck it, you only live once, you might as well die now


My laser disc'll make you take a razor to your wrist
Make you satanistic, make you take the pistol to your face
And place the clip and cock it back
And let it go until your brains are rippin' out your skull so bad to sew you back would be a waste of stitches
I'm not a role model, I don't wanna babysit kids
I got one little girl, and Hailie Jade is Shady's business
And Shady's just an alias I made to make you pissed off
Where the fuck were you
When Gilbert's paid to make me dishwash?
I make a couple statements and now look how crazy shit got
You made me get a bigger attitude than 80 Kim Scotts
And she almost got the same fate that Grady's bitch got
I knew that "Just the Two of Us"
Would make you hate me this much
And "Just the Two of Us," that ain't got shit to do with us
And our personal life, it's just words on a mic
So you can call me a punk, a pervert or a chauvinist pig
But the funny shit is that I still go with the bitch!




Some people ask me, where I've been lately
They thought I fell off, nobody can save me
They play in the background, I don't back down
So don't get it twisted or try to play me
First I come out, they underrate me
Then I come back, they still try to fade me
They say I'm nasty, they say I'm crazy
They ask what me I think and I say maybe I'll fly away
And ain't nothing in the way so I may as well fly away
There ain't nothing else to say so I may as well fly away
I know you wanna see me down but we ain't gon' die today
'Cause I done been to the top and there's nowhere else to go
And the only way to see me's if you looking up from down below
And there's nothing else to say so I may as well fly away
And there's nothing in my way so I may as well fly away
I'm on top of this thing so I may as well fly away

Got my self esteem back, got my confidence up
I'ma step up on this stage now, I'm gonna strut
And walk around with my pants hanging offa my butt
And you ain't 'bout to tell me nothing boy, get off of my nuts
It goes one for the money, two for the show
My shit don't stink, I don't think so
Wipe my ass with the tissue and roll it back up in the roll
Are you ready now, here we go, the bald eagle has landed
I'm back in your hair, sorry for leaving you stranded
I'm twice as dreaded, evil and rancid
They can't sit, I don't think anybody understands it
Especially when the world's silly putty in your hands
It's Play-Doh, I ain't back to play, though
They say he died in a fatal car crash, shows what they know
Shit if I did, it'd be a trailer not a car
The white trash star, I fuck an RV-up like Brett Favre
Homie you got it backwards, you're dipping your soup
Inside your crackers, I can carry rap till my back hurts
Set it down, go right back to the chiropractors
Get my back right then I'm right back on you bastards
I was chasing the dragon, I don't know what happened
It's like the feeling I had when I first started rappin'
I just couldn't seem to get back and recapture that magic
So I went back to the lab, that's where I been at, when

Some people ask me, where I've been lately
They thought I fell off, nobody can save me
They play in the background, I don't back down
So don't get it twisted or try to play me
First I come out, they underrate me
Then I come back, they still try to fade me
They say I'm nasty, they say I'm crazy
They ask what me I think and I say maybe I'll fly away
And ain't nothing in the way so I may as well fly away
There ain't nothing else to say so I may as well fly away
I know you wanna see me down but we ain't gon' die today
'Cause I done been to the top and there's nowhere else to go
And the only way to see me's if you looking up from down below
And there's nothing else to say so I may as well fly away
And there's nothing in my way so I may as well fly away
I'm on top of this thing so I may as well fly away

I took a hiatus, haters now I'm back to cause trouble
Got the fucking shape of mushroom clouds for thought bubbles
I'm the... you ain't fucking sick, the hospital
Won't even give you cough drops for coughs cocksucker
You think you hot? You ain't even lukewarm
My puke's hotter than you, you're soft
I use fire to cool me off
I told them I would grow up one day and show them
I'd be able to choke clouds
Pick up lightning bolts and throw them
Take the world by storm with these words I form
Georgi-porgi kissed the girls, make the girls cry for it
Make 'em swarm, make 'em fight over the shirts I've worn
Swoon over my sweat towels, it's mind blowing
Yes I'm living the dream homie, can't nothing compare
I’m so up, I’m stuck in mid air, I’m loving it yeah
It's like these people are steps now, all they do is stare
These haters are so pussy they afraid to be scared
This is pay back, like I owe 'em back pay
They spat in my face now I'm back to do them the same exact way
And leave this rap game with a bad taste
And slap it back out before I step back outta this crap, they
Slap me now I'm slapping them back hey, fuck it
We're slap happy, yeah okay, now I'm talking some smack, aye
And I ain't looking back, in fact, they can stare at my ass crack
How's that for hind site, what the track say?

Some people ask me, where I've been lately
They thought I fell off, nobody can save me
They play in the background, I don't back down
So don't get it twisted or try to play me
First I come out, they underrate me
Then I come back, they still try to fade me
They say I'm nasty, they say I'm crazy
They ask what me I think and I say maybe I'll fly away
And ain't nothing in the way so I may as well fly away
There ain't nothing else to say so I may as well fly away
I know you wanna see me down but we ain't gon' die today
'Cause I done been to the top and there's nowhere else to go
And the only way to see me's if you looking up from down below
And there's nothing else to say so I may as well fly away
And there's nothing in my way so I may as well fly away
I'm on top of this thing so I may as well fly away






Your mother.. you fuckin' faggot
Ayo, this next song is dedicated to the memory of Erik Shrody
Rest in peace, we ain't forget about you, you fuckin' homo, we still remember

There once was a man who liked to jump around
But he got too old to jump up and down
So he put the mic down and picked the guitar up
Started singin the blues like there was no tomorrow
Left his boys in the House of Pain
It was the wisest decision he ever made
But the dumbest thing he could ever do
Was try to buck a .380 on those that act shady
Tell me now what you gonna do

Cause I remember all those years, how it was when you were here
I remember how it was, how it was when you were young
Yesterday was so long ago, Kid Rock and Limp Bizkit came along now
Don't nobody wanna hear your old ass sing no more

I remember back when you had the Knack
And I remember when you had your first heart attack
I was right there laughin when I heard the news
I just wish the cardiac woulda murdered you
Maybe Ice-T's right, you are a bitch
You come around when you're broke and you leave when you're rich
But the dumbest thing you could ever do
Was try to buck a 380 on those who act shady
Tell me now what you gonna do


Remember back in '94, like right before Ms. Everlast was Whitey Ford
Before his heart attack had him on life support
When House of Pain was outta fame like someone doused the flame
And they became destined to never jump around again
Or even further back, when I first had heard "The Knack"
And you were down with Syndicate, I went to get your shit, man I was into it
But then you went and took your style and switched the shit
Now you sound ridiculous, you dickless piece of shit
How could you diss me, bitch?
I liked you, thought you was alright for a white dude
Remember Sway and Tech when I came up and sat beside you
Started rhymin, then you left the room and didn't say goodbye or nothin'?
Like you mad that someone else was white and tried to rhyme or somethin
I'm sorry man, I wasn't tryin to steal your light or nothin
Man I wish I was Irish, I could be a *Muslim* too
Then I'd be confused as you, and I wouldn't know what to do
What's up with you? I never fucked with you, why would you fuck with me?
Knowin' I could rap circles around you, what, are you as nuts as me?
Plus I can sing better than you and I don't fuckin' sing
And probably play guitar better, and I ain't never touched a string
But I ain't mad at you, I'd hate me too if I was you
I'm what you used to be, shit you was me in '92
So everytime I write a lyric, I'mma think of you
And maybe that will help me know what it's like to sing the blues


You fuckin' punk pussy, you fuckin faggot, sissy fuck
And by the way, a .380's a fuckin' sissy gun
If you're gonna shoot somebody use a fuckin' real gun, you little bitch
Next time say my fuckin' name in a song, don't be subliminal about it
You wanna fuckin' diss me, diss me you fuckin' faggot
You fuckin' punk pussy, you fuckin' little bitch, fuckin' cunt



Attention all units, attention all units
We have an all-points bulletin out on a man with green hair
I repeat, we have an APB on a man with green hair
He's armed with a knife, I repeat, he's armed with a knife
Proceed with caution, watch your back, fellas
He could be coming at your girlfriend next

There's a joker on the loose from the psychiatric ward
His face is up on the bulletin board with a reward
He'll stab you with a sword, don't be fooled by his charm
He's probably armed with intent to do bodily harm
Ring the alarm, look for a man with green hair
Check at your girl's house, he was last seen there
He's has a mean stare but usually cracks jokes
Good luck on your mission and guard your backs, folks

Come here, you fuckin' backstabber!
Haha, come here, you fuckin' backstabber!
Stay away from him, he ain’t no good!

We got the walkie-talkies to keep us all informed
Suited up head to toe in detective uniforms
Our unit storms in, we split the ghetto in sectors
Lockin' down every block and put up metal detectors
Protect yours and be sure that you stand close
Watch each other's backs and guard your command post
And most of all be advised that he's wise
He could be disguised as one of your very own guys

Come here, you fuckin' backstabber!
Haha, come here, you fuckin' backstabber!
Stay away from him, he ain’t no good!

I'm on a solo mission to find him personally
To settle the score and to beat him unmercifully
For what he first did to me, it's sure to be the last
Followin' footprints with a magnifyin' glass
To drag his lyin' ass back to his padded cell
I'm mad as hell, on the trail of this tattle tail
I heard a yell, the voice sounded familiar
"Give me your girlfriend or I'm gonna kill ya!"

Come here, you fuckin' backstabber!
Haha, come here, you fuckin' backstabber!
Stay away from him, he ain’t no good!

I followed the voice that led down a flight of steps
Sneezin' at dust, and swingin' at the spider webs
Inside the depths of his basement
I taste lint, in my mouth
Then the lights in the place went
I saw my life flash in front of my eyes
I felt a butcher knife slash at one of my thighs
None of my guys knew where I'm at, I was doomed
Then I remembered the flashlight in my costume

Come here, you fuckin' backstabber!
Haha, come here, you fuckin' backstabber!
Stay away from him, he ain’t no good!

Dealing with backstabbers, there was one thing I learned
They're only powerful when you got your back turned
I yearned for the day that we finally met again
So I can give him a taste of his own medicine
He shed his skin, then he promised to come clean
I took his butcher knife and jabbed it into his spleen
Cuffed him at the scene, then dragged the fella home
Beating him over the head with the telephone

Attention all cars, attention all cars
Unit 313 has apprehended the suspect
He's going back to the crazy home
I repeat, he's going back to the crazy home
Job well done

Come here, you fuckin' backstabber!
Haha, come here, you fuckin' backstabber!
Stay away from him, he ain’t no good!



Yeah, Bizarre Kid comin' at you
Eminem and Fuzz and Mr. Swifty, ha ha
No one, no one is iller than me
No one is iller than me
It's Mr. Swifty from the 313

I make rappers wanna turn into singers
I keep hoes lickin' they fingers
Bring this competition and face this meaning
Got your whole crew doin' subpoenas
Hell nah, you ain't seen a crew, genius
Murder whoever's between us, pack your heaters
Keep it close, you can't beat us
While your whole crew treat us like G's, you best believe this
I done made quadriplegics outta these non-rappin' rejects
While the whole world ejects your tape
It ain't no secret that your shit sounds fake
You can't stop it, my mind state
Makes it too late for cops in tryin' to stop the crime rate
Then you can tell from these shells
How I gotta bend 'em like root canals
I erase all trails, somethin' farther from gettin' bail
Makes you wanna kill an emcee yourself, you might as well
Be within a 25 to life sentence, on linking trials
Horrified, and keep on frontin', repentin' and lose they bowels
Everything is foul when Swift's around, vacate now
Niggas dumb enough to try to front and escape, how?
I'm gonna take this 'gnac and drink it straight wild
Niggas steady fallin' in my face like milk crates – BLAAAOW!
It's Swifty from the 313
Like I said, no one is iller than me, unnhh

Me and Eminem and Mike, drivin' down Van Dyke
Get my dick sucked late at night by a fuckin' transvestite
Still on probation for stranglin' my boy Jason
Should be takin' my medication, it's 9 to 10 I'm facin'
Last week this old man I had to blast
‘Cause he tried to help me out when my car was out of gas
Ripped this old lady, hung her neck by a hook
Didn't realize it was my grandmother 'til I checked her pocketbook
Fuckin' with the white boys got me back on crack
Better explain where the hell your TV's and VCR's is at
I done lost 100 pounds, I ain't been eatin' like I should
This wounded dog in the street is sure lookin' good
Rob this little boy in his fuckin' paper route
My girl beat my ass and shot me in the back with a 2-piece
‘Cause she found out I was havin' an affair
With her 10-year-old niece

No one, no one's iller than me
It's Bizarre Kid straight from the 313
No one, no one is iller than me
It's Bizarre Kid straight from the 313

Nobody better test me, ‘cause I don't wanna get messy
Especially when I step inside this bitch, dipped freshly
New Lugz, give the crew hugs, guzzle two mugs
Before I do drugs that make me throw up like flu bugs
True thugs, rugged unshaven messy scrubs
Whippin' 40-bottles like the fuckin' Pepsi clubs
Down a fifth, crack open a six
I'm on my seventh 8-ball, now I gotta take a piss
I'm hollerin' at these hoes that got boyfriends
Who gives a fuck who they was?
I'm always takin' someone else's girl like Cool J does
They probably don't be packin' anyways — do they, Fuzz?
We walked up, stomped they asses and blew they buzz
Mics get sandblasted, stab your abdomen
With a hand-crafted pocketknife and spill your antacid
Sprayed your motherfuckin' crib up when I ran past it
Fuckin' felon, headed to Hell in a handbasket
Talkin' shit'll get you, your girl and your man blasted
Kidnapped and slapped in a van, wrapped in Saran plastic
Get your damn ass kicked
By these fantastic furious four motherfuckers
Flashin' in front of your face without the Grandmasters
Slim Shady, ain't nobody iller than me

I run shit like an ass with legs
Massive lead to leave your cabbage red
Similar to your ass in a casket dead
Drastic spread of acid heads
Come to abort you like a bastard egg
That trash you said got you standin' on plastic legs
Ask the feds if I'm past the edge
Rockin' the most classic threads, flashin' bread
You can get 'til that ass get red
You can get 'til that ass get red
Bizarre, you get him and him
Swift, you get him and him, I'll get him and him
Leave the other two for my nigga Eminem
Never writer's block, I block writers
My block's tighter, ante up and get your top fighters
Got fired for jumpin' the counter with a mop stick
Some bitch ran up screamin', "Get the cops, quick!"
And got drop kicked, now she screamin', "Stop it!"
Got clips to stop shit, rock shit and grab this hot shit
Wherever you shop, bitch, Fuzz Scoota '97 crop pick
Sick of y'all niggas lookin' at me like I got tits
I shoot a rocket through your optic
You niggas still don't know the top pick
I got bricks, lose my foot in your ass
And have you shittin' socks, bitch
P Rock shit, leave your fuckin' knot split
Grab the green from Al by showin' him hot grits

It's the Mr. Fuzzy from the 313
No one, no one is iller than me
It's Eminem and Swift from the 313
No one, no one is iller than me
It's Fuzz and Buzz-arre from the 313

You have now witnessed four ill emcees
From the home of potholes and trash
We'll lyrically blast



I'ma tell you this for your own benefit
Your shit was dope as hell
Especially when you wrote 90 percent of it
What you need to do is practice on your freestyles
'Fore you come up missin', like Snoop Dogg's police files
This type of shit? Bitch, be sure that I'm spittin'
Be hittin', you gonna pray to God this shit was written
But it wasn't, I'll kill a dozen rappers when I'm buzzin'
Guzzlin', beat your ass like a jealous husband
Now who's your boy? Bitch, you about to suffer and see north
When you go in a coma longer than Vladimir Konstantinov
Cut the damn machine off
Get a clean cloth, and wipe this bloody video screen off

I'm movin' in for the kill, plus I got the trap set
I can tell you're wack as fuck, and I ain't even hear you rap yet
Look at you thinkin', "I'm about to whip his ass
‘Cause I'ma do some written shit, plus I get to go last."
Well, guess what? Even if I go first, it's no worse
My shit's still gon' demolish yo' verse
I'm 'bout to slice you like a Ginsu
And anything you say can and will be used against you
In a court of law, I'm short and raw
Take your fuckin' shit and cut it off
Yo, you wanna be a dope emcee?
Look, don't get mad and start takin' your period out on me

You wanna represent on the microphone, but you rap sleazily
I ain't about to battle this fake ass Eazy-E
There ain't no way I'ma do this bullshit
I don't give a fuck, I'm loaded up with a full clip
Time of the month? You couldn't get the tape of the day
Take him away, I rip him like a paper mache
I've heard you rap before, you ain't about shit
This whole battle was mismatched, like your outfit
Try to battle me and get your mouth split
You sold out, like Ticketmaster Outlet
Ha ha, I bust and I crush, I don't give a fuck
Ain't no way that you can fuck with us
I'm givin' back with pimp shit
I laminate that ass in a badge and wear it at the Rap Olympics

Blah-badee-blah-da-blah-blah—stop babblin'!
You so fuckin' wack I'ma walk away while you battlin'
Fuck that, I'm on a brand new solo mission
To make sure that Wendy Day kicks your ass
Out of the rap coalition
I throw a switch at an execution
With an overdose of devotion
Don't talk back, I'm the dope, bitch
So who you sound like on the mic?
There was only one 2Pac, your thug style is just one big psyche
Take a big hike, bitch, you can't catch me
Your best rhymes still ain't shit, like a patsy
What the fuck you gonna do?
I'll battle anybody in your crew, and I don't give a fuck
I slaughter boys, especially wack-ass emcees
That will wear a fake-ass corduroy

I'm 'bout to make this mic short circuit
This beat is wack as fuck—this shit fits you perfect!
I got so many ways to diss you that I'm playful with you
I'll let a razor slit you, 'til they have to staple-stitch you
And everybody in this fuckin' place'll miss you
If you try to turn my facial tissue to a racial issue
Nobody's hearin' you, you're a wack liar
Damn! All your white jokes just backfired
‘Cause, bitch, you barkin' up the wrong tree
Now go tell all your boys that you was beat by a honkey
I don't give a fuck, I'll kill ya
Bitch, you better recognize me, like a look familiar
Anything you say, I'ma kill ya
Grill ya, when I fuckin' drill ya
I'm Marsh, but you're the one that's mellow



I want you
To understand something
That when I come up in this bitch
I want the fans jumping
I want the fists pumping in the air
I don't look like a millionaire
But I feel like a million bucks
Ladies won't ya fill your cups
Shady's come to feel ya up
Are you a D or a C cup?
You could even be a B
It's just me and D-R-E
You'll be in the ER
We are strapped with so much TNT
We may blow
No not even CPR from the EMTs
Could help you to resuscitate
You busters must be flustered, wait
You can't cut the mustard
What's your problem, can't you bust a grape?
Shady came and just crushed the game
It's really not even fair to them
'Cause they pale in comparison
So much they might as well wear his skin
Don't you wish you could just share his pen?
'Cause this shit's getting embarrassin'
The fog is thick and the air is thin
'Cause he won't even let them try to breathe
La-dididi-dadada-didi
He makes it look so easy
Girl, you just hit the lottery

Now this'll be the part of the song
That they drop the needle on
And hell breaks loose
Try to restrain us
You can't contain us
We're still gonna make a stink
No matter what we do
Everywhere we go it seems
We're looking for any excuse
To just cut loose
So this'll be the part of the song
That they drop the needle on
And hell breaks loose

This is when shit hits the fan
Like it just splattered on Stan
This is the only moment that matters
Your homie rolled in with Mathers
Now chaos erupts
Em's in back, Dre's in the front
So do what we say at once
This song’s like a seance, it haunts
No choice, they have to dance)
It's like the playoffs
Just making sure that we stay in the hunt
Take a day off of what?
Man, you better lay off the blunts
You must be smoking something
You think I ain't smoking nothing
Stay off my nuts
Now hit the floor baby
Time to wipe away all the rust
Shake all them cobwebs loose
Loosen up with a little bit of Grey Goose
Yeah, girl, shake that caboose
I don't wanna see you try to make no excuse
D-R-E is on the loose
A mongoose when it comes to the chronic use
You know I can't stand to lose
Me and my goons are like animals
We come through like a pack of wolves
And we came here to retract the roof
Yeah man, ain't that the truth
Girl, your man's back in the booth
Definitely back up in this bitch
And this is when all hell breaks loose

Now this'll be the part of the song
That they drop the needle on
And hell breaks loose
Try to restrain us
You can't contain us
We're still gonna make a stink
No matter what we do
Everywhere we go it seems
We're looking for any excuse
To just cut loose
So this'll be the part of the song
That they drop the needle on
And hell breaks loose

Now I know you're feeling discouraged
But homie just mark my words
I'm murdering the flow
Liquid courage
I'm fin' to blow
As soon as we hit the door
Power surges head to toe
I'm sure
To push it as far as words
Are meant to go
We're in the indigo Winnebago
With tinted windows
Ferocious
As we proceed
To beat up the block wit' your ho
With speakers knocking
It's 3 o'clock
Me and Doc
Then proceed to drop E
And hop out the vehicle
And knock on your do'

Yeah, so let us in
'Fore we huff and puff and we blow
We ain't bluffing for nothing
We'll knock the stuffing out you
Revenge is so sweet
Move 'til you injure your feet
Yeah, move it or lose it freak
Move to the beat
Lose yourself indubitably
Pass up on that little cute chick right there
That'd be pretty damn stupid to me
Born and raised in the CPT
Yeah, Los Angeles, rules of the streets
Them haters hating on me
But I refuse to lose any sleep
Keep that deuce-deuce in the seat
Dre fall off? That's news to me

Now this'll be the part of the song
That they drop the needle on
And hell breaks loose
Try to restrain us
You can't contain us
We're still gonna make a stink
No matter what we do
Everywhere we go it seems
We're looking for any excuse
To just cut loose
So this'll be the part of the song
That they drop the needle on
And hell breaks loose



It's hell to be Shady
Yesterday I yelled a degrading insult
At an elderly lady
Then I asked her how it felt to be eighty
Fuck a senior citizen
Suck a wiener, sit and spin
And why you driving so slow for
Don't you wanna get where you going faster
Since you probably gonna die tomorrow
You old whore, die old bitch, die
Before I murder you



I'm a little nutty and I know it but if you go back and take a look at my history
You will see that I am not the only one who's off his rocker, there were many before me
I was always labeled the black sheep of the family, what a bad seed I'd grow to be
But if you take a look at us now you'll see the apple didn't fall too far from the tree

Alright look, I'mma tell you the story from my side
Maybe you'll understand, check it out

You done witnessed unexplainable shit
Too insane to explain, people run from what they just don't get
Maybe Shady should have just hit 'em with a little bit
Did I spit too soon? Should I have spoon fed 'em it?
But I was just so eager to prove I was even
Worth bein' in the same league or the room
Of the people of whom I was in
Every now and then, I look up like I was seekin' approval
Was it because of the pigment of my skin?
Or was it a figment of my imagination?
Maybe it bothered me more than it did them
Maybe it wasn't a big deal back then
But to me it was, see what it was
Was I had developed a complex from being judged
Proof spit his verse, now I'm next, let's see who balks
I'm in the booth staring back to see whose mugs
I get a reaction from, usually the first thumb
Was from Proof and the rest of the crew backed him up
And no one lied to each other 'cause none of us had deals
It was real, we just wanted tickets for that meal

Sometimes I feel like it's just me
Sometimes I'm feel like I'm goin' crazy
But take a look at my family
'Cause the apple don't fall too far from the tree
I said sometimes I feel like it's just me
Sometimes I'm feel like I'm goin' crazy
But take a look at my family
'Cause the apple don't fall too far from the tree

Ever since my mother was pregnant with a second egg
'Cause she said that I had a baby sister
Who fell outta the window, I was too young to remember
Kansas City projects, I was like 5-6
And how come, I remember Malcolm, Isaac, and Boogy
If it was the projects in Missouri?
'Cause those were my best friends until Isaac
Took my tricycle and my Uncle Todd went to try to go get it back
And ended up gettin' jumped and cut in the gut
With a switch and 70 some stitches
Which is, to this day, why my mother still tries to show me
Some old fake pictures
Of a fictitious little sister who never existed
And this is why part of my life's so twisted
But I can never be as sick as that bitch is
And by the way, that pictures one of my relatives

Sometimes I feel like it's just me
Sometimes I'm feel like I'm goin' crazy
But take a look at my family
'Cause the apple don't fall too far from the tree
I said sometimes I feel like it's just me
Sometimes I'm feel like I'm goin' crazy
But take a look at my family
'Cause the apple don't fall too far from the tree


You probably have to peel back layers upon layers of pain
To see why everything I say is so insane
What's different about my brain
That separates me, from other players in this game
On the surface it may seem like a scheme
Or some sort of scam for me to get some damn sympathy
But that's the last thing I need
Is for people to walk around feelin' sorry for me
And I am not a G, never claimed to be
I gave my vest to Cashis, just hope he don't need it more than me
But we'll see, 'cause we ain't lookin' for beef
But if it comes our way, what do we turn the other cheek? Come on

Sometimes I feel like it's just me
Sometimes I'm feel like I'm goin' crazy
But take a look at my family
'Cause the apple don't fall too far from the tree
I said sometimes I feel like it's just me
Sometimes I'm feel like I'm goin' crazy
But take a look at my family
'Cause the apple don't fall too far from the tree


Yeah, and I'm the crazy one right?
Whatever, then let me be the crazy one
Cuckoo, cuckoo, tweet



This is a public service announcement brought to you in part by Slim Shady
The views and events expressed here are totally fucked
And are not necessarily the views of anyone
However, the events and suggestions that appear on this album
Are not to be taken lightly
Children should not partake in the listening of this album
With laces in their shoes

Yeah. Don't do drugs



Mr. Berman?

What?

We have Eminem here to see you

About fuckin' time! Send him in
Steve! Good to see ya, man. Um, hey, I just w–
Well, look who decided to show his face!
I hope you've had fun in the last four years
Look man, I apologize again for–
For shooting me?! Do you know I lost the use of my right arm?
Again, it was a mistake, a terrible mist–
Are you wearing a bulletproof vest?
And then you go and do what? Hide out?
Stay in Detroit for almost five years
While the music industry melts the fuck down?
Do you know how many people lost their jobs
Because of your fuckin' vacation?
Well, that's actually why I'm here
I was gonna put out some new music
And I wanted to play it for you and get your opinion
Do I really need to hear it?
I'm so famous that it's ruined my rich little life
And I'm such a tortured artist, let me make music about it
And my tragic love life!" Am I on to something here?
Come on, man, it's not like that
You know what? Just hand the fuckin' thing over!
I'm done talkin to you!
Think you can just come and go as you please
Big selfish superstar?
Steve, I had a drug problem!
"Oh, poor me! I had a drug problem!"
Who hasn't had a drug problem in this town?
Hey! hey!
Just lay the shit down on my desk and get the fuck out!
Whoa, whoa, whoa, Jesus Christ, man
Alright, alright, here, fine
What's this shit? Two CDs?
That's what I've been tryin' to tell you, man, there's two albums
Just get out!
Alright!
Get the fuck out!
Alright, man, see you later



Once you call my name out things will never be the same
They should have never let us get our foot in this game

Ever since I was introduced to rap music
I been missing a screw like Bishop in Juice, I could lose it
At any moment, those who know me know it
So they probably told to go with the flow, just so that
I don't explode and, have another episode
Where I let it go as far as the one with Benzino did
I'm waiting for that next beef, I'm cocked locked and loaded
I'm ready to go so bad
I'm going bananas, my dick's so hard Anna Nicole could
Use it to fucking pole vault with
Oh shit! I mean when she was still bloated
Before they cut her stomach open and lypo'd it
Anybody I throw flames at, gets a name
It's a game, 'cause they know that they don't spit the same
It's a shame, what people do for ten minutes of fame
Everyday it's the same thing
People in this game try to buddy-buddy us
Just to get close enough to study us
Everybody just wants to have something to do with that
They all trying get that stamp
They after that Shady/Aftermath money
It's like a monopoly
They probably just now finally understand "How to Rob" fully
50 Cent was like a fucking jackpot for me
And Dre, it's like we hit the fucking lottery
And the damn slot machine at the same time as each other
Why the fuck you think we ride like we brothers?
When we rhyme with each other, in time we discovered
That we had more in common that we thought with each other
Both robbed of our mothers, our fathers ain't want us
What was wrong with us, was it our fault?
'Cause we started thinking God doesn't love us
Two odd motherfuckers who just happened to meet at the right time
What a coincidence it is, 'cause when 50 got shot up in Jamaica
Queens, I still remember the call up at Chung King 'cause
Big L had just got popped just a month before
If 50 lives he's getting dropped from Columbia
Two years later me and Doc had to come and uhh
Operate, that's when he popped up at number one
And we ain't never gonna stop if you wondering
Even if I'm under the gun
You ain't got to agree all the time with me or see eye to eye
There'll always be animosity between you and I
But see the difference is, if it is, I could give a shit
Still gonna conduct motherfucking business as usual
Egos aside 'fore I bruise 'em all
Swallow your pride 'fore I step on it with shoes you call
Nikes, Earthlings, how do you like these?
You gotta love 'em, look at the bottom of 'em, they're like cleats
Stomping, I been romping
Since Tim Dog was, hollering, "Fuck Compton"
I was whiling, freestyling
Back when, they were still making, Maxell casettes
I wasn't even rap's Elvis yet, that tells us that
Any doubts in your head that seals the shit
Ricky ticky toc, ticky ticky toc
Still with the Diggy Diggy Doc, Diggy Diggy Doc
And ya don't stop



Em? It's Paul
Ah, I just listened to the entire album
You gotta be fucking kidding me
I mean with this Christopher Reeves shit?
You know the guy's dead, right?
And then the whole gay stepfather incest rape thing?
I don't have your back on this one
I can't even fuckin' handle it, I'm done



Eminem riddled everyone by posting the squared picture of "The Equalizer" on Instagram - the movie with his favorite actor, Denzel Washington.

Just a day later, trailer has arrived.


Eminem is most likely to do a full soundtrack, maybe even a music video for this song and/or make a cameo.

Stay tuned for more info on the song. As for the movie, it's coming 26th September.




Yea Ya'll know what it is
Rap City presents Em360
Slaughterhouse, Eminem, Big Tigg, Just Blaze!
On the 1s and 2s, oh-oh

Yo Tigg, get in the not booth
And spit the truth, to the young youth

Aight, ay, Amex don't leave home without your cards
But this Hip Hop, so don't leave home without your bars
And for some of these rap stars, that's just too bad
Cause you can't bring out them bars, that you ain't never had
It's Eminem and Slaughterhouse, yeah you know we the truth
And ohh the game is out of order, since we closed the booth
Yes indeed original, beats the replacement cause
The back room will never be what the basement was

I'm the realest mo'fucker that I know
Wasn't always the case guess the figure had to grow
I do it for the love I don't do it for the dough
But I know these sucker figures will so they keep me on my toes
What's sad is I couldn't tell you what I'm hated for
And them painkillers didn't murder the pain they gave me more
These fans on my head now they say they want the old Joe
I grew up mature y'all can't see that this the old Joe
Want to see me lose every battle of depression
No matter what it do to me, no matter my regression
They want to see me fall, want to ruin my regiment from the start
Want to cut the beat off soon as I let em in my heart
I'd be the first to admit it, lost focus for a while
Sendin' unsolicited dick pics to dimwitted thick chicks
Was so high I lost track of my ways
Then I fell in love with a baby and got mad at her age
The way she act and behave, was it an act or a phase
How you trife when I gave you life
You was lacking in wage
You don't want say hi or speak to me
Bet you makin 200 dollars by weekly
Try to help the world out, bring some reparation
And forget being humble in a state of desperation
Ain't gotta ask what to help with no hesitation
And for me to deal with it I might need some meditation
I love you but its best we stay apart, segregation
And to cope with the feeling I might need some medication
Trust me I don't never want to see that side of Joe
It would kill us all slow, one reason I'm the realest mother-mother I know

Its Nickle, riding round in that Maserati four seat
Symbol on the grill looking like Tony Stark's goatee
Best rapper alive and you know me
The most distinguished shooter that's coming up out of the D since Joe D
I take mines at lead point
At the risk of having to shave my garlic clove in a razor inside a fed joint
Hip hop is alive, but the rhymes died
Only fear I have is "world star" being yelled from my blind side
Don't get me wrong it ain't like I ain't never lost a fight
But these days I'm more like a lyrical artiste
I'm outlining everybody in chalk white
The off-beat deceased version of Dr. Narcisse
This ain't blueprint, your idolizing
You tryna jump fast that's foolish of you in my drunk past and handing me my pilot's license
That's plain stupid, your boy's a star
Sitting in that drop top fish bowl and the doors ajar
It's ironic I remember when I couldn't afford a car
And now it's back and forth
The black one or white one I call 'em Macklemore
And Lord Jamar, first we defyin' the odds
We not a group, we more like a circular firing squad
This not a booth, this is our house and we won't stop
We killed the cypher two times already
What you gon' give us an award
But we won't stop for shutting down the internet
Now tell ya momma hi, and tell Rihanna we ain't finished yet

When we step in that booth, that's when the flame enters
Best spit, make any set trip, yeah its the gang members
Waving that shady flag, navy jag
Matching the yank' fit, with the polo brief showing, due to the lazy sag
I'm in a crazy kind of place
I got this thing right on my waist that'll leave tears on your baby mommas face
So chill, I'm in a crazy kind of place, I got this thing below my waist
That'll leave kids on your baby mommas face, for real
The flow gets cracked, as it came in capsules
Your cap just started snapping
My starter caps was snapping
When cross color was cracking
And my cane was half full
With the half moon park, hope you rap dudes smart
Don't piss me off like the bathroom mop
You don't want it with me
If I'm throwing hooks at you, that don't mean the chorus for free
So save your jabs its way better
If I start throwing jabs I'm talking Zabs first three round against Mayweather
Broke cook, I'm so dope look
Bring the beat back with no hook just bars
Just a thing of ours that make their pants drop, make em open up their bras
Move g-strings like guitars, that's nothing, that's something light
Like Riesling at the bar
Y-A-O-W-A, if y'all ain't saying Yaowa by now you got nothing to say
This like NWO vs NWA, y'all like the rockers versus the ROC
Full of nothing but Jays
Check the rocks its nothing fugaz'
But don't get stupid my Cooper clique will throw shots for a couple of days
Make it horny when we out, Amityville horror, y'all don't want it with the house

Slaughter season, y'all the reason
Real dudes I'm bringing some more in
Like a Polynesian
Sick with the llama squeezing
Bullets flew and the chopper sneezing
Got your body and legs torn, but before you was airborne
You was bob and weaving still getting hit till your nos' is weezing
They set you deep in your coffin sleeping
I'm gone off the deep end, I'm a wolf, this industry my sheep skin
I'm out here hunting with my ink pen
I'm living like a kingpin
Doing it for my g's in the pen
Dreaming about two-piecing a police chief's chin
You rappers something candy coated, I don't like suckers
I'm Iron Mike, I don't like Busters
You looking for em' fly dudes like Orville and Wilbur
You got the Wright brothers
No bright jeans, no bright colors
I'm the second coming, the one that Pac predicted
Islamic, Gnostic and Christian, the flow so godly you got to listen
I backed you in a dodge a minute
Like MC Eiht in a L.A. hat, these rappers straight tryna dodge a menace
I'm looking at your videos, look like your watching tennis
Brothers dressed like Maria Sharapova wearing yoga pants
Meanwhile Big Poppa was rocking linens
I guess that era's over man, hold on
I'm splitting atoms when the scientific spitting is getting at em'
I give em' different patterns, they didn't fathom, they stealing my styles
Before me you didn't have em'
You rappers made in my image like when God was inventing Adam
Stab em in the abdomen when its crunch time
I truly flip like Mayweather pissed of at a movie script
Too many punchlines
Family I'm amongst mine
I keep the peace like a monks mind
.357 fade your favorite barber
Leave you in an old bush like an unshaven Barbara
Don't stop what we doing
When you see L.A. your team will be ruined
This game need a new villain, I'm the kind to murder you on vine, ooh kill em'

Ladies and gentlemen
Now introducing the man, the myth, the legend

Ayo can we cut this beat off
I might need to do this acapella, yo
Role model?
I'll roll a model down a hill over broke bottles of coke products
If she don't swallow, and tie her to the bumper, hit the throttle
While I'm tryna hit the pot holes, I'll freaking take Madonna to McDonalds
Any ho'll end up horizontal gettin' fondle
I don't cuddle, I don't coddle
Only motto that I follows any thing I drive, whether its a  Navajo or a Tahoe
Its got a ho in it
Nah ho, I don't got no freaking bronco
You looking for a buck, get a horse, fuck Tonto
I got a rusty Hondo with a bondo
And a box of condoms you little blond ho
Fuck me? fuck you too, like I'm at Bonnaroo booing Bono
And I ain't from this planet so nanu, nana, nanu
I'm intolerable, too volatile, screw it I don't got too make honor roll
To be on a roll
I don't know much, what I do know I do it pronto though
So knock it off, all these knock off me's,
The last thing the world needs is another me
But if you think this is part 2 to Recovery
Or Love The Way You Lie part twelve
Or something heart felt, you bout to make a discovery
Like you found Christopher Columbus' compass
Ain't dumbing shit down for you dumb motherfuckers, so suck it
I took your best punchline like a punch in the stomach
That punctured a lung punk and I'm still functioning from it
Chump it was nothing
Now watch while I fuckin' one up it and toot my own horn
Once I think of something to trump it
And I don't need a fucking instrument to sound off
Like the trunk of an elephant. The triumphant
Return of the ether spitting retard, reborn
But chances of you having another re-birth, slim to none
Like a skinny Mother Teresa, give a fuck if its Easter, so kiss my keister
Cus that's the only thing I'll turn the other cheek for



It's only fair to warn, I was born with a set of horns
And metaphors attached to my damn umbilical cord
Warlord of rap that'll bash you with a two by four board
And smash into your Honda Accord with a 4-door Ford
But I'm more toward droppin' an acapella
To chop a fella into mozzarella worse than a helicopter propeller
Got you locked in the cellar with your skeleton showing
Developing anorexia while I'm standin' next to ya
Eating a four course meal, watching you starve to death
With an IV in your veins, feeding you liquid Darvocet
Pumping you full of drugs
Pull the plugs
On the gunshot victims full of bullet slugs
Who were picked up in an ambulance
And driven
To receiving with the asses ripped outta they pants
And given
A less than 20 percent chance
Of living
Have a possible placement
As a hospital patient
Storing the dead bodies in grandma's little basement
Doctor Kevorkian has arrived
To perform an autopsy on you while you scream "I'M STILL ALIVE!"
Driving a rusty scalpel in through the top of your scalp, and
Pullin' your Adam's apple out through your mouth
Better call the fire department
I've hired a arson
To set fire to carpet
And burn up your entire apartment
I'm a liar to start shit
Got your bitch wrapped around my dick
So tight you need a crowbar to pry her apart with
Motherfucker, Slim Shady bitch! Recognize!

Met a retarded kid named Greg, with a wooden leg
Snatched it off and beat him over the fucking head with the peg
Go to bed with the keg, wake up with the 40
Mixed it with Alka-Seltzer and Formula 44D
Fuck an acid tab, I'll strap the whole sheet to my forehead
Wait until it absorbed in, and fell to the floor dead
No more said, case closed, end of discussion
I'm blowin' up like spontaneous human combustion
Leaving you in the aftermath of holocaust and traumas
Cross the bombers
We blowin' up your house, killing your parents
And coming back to get your foster mommas
And I'm as good at keeping a promise as Nostradamus
Cause I ain't making no more threats
I'm doin' drive-by's in tinted Corvettes on Vietnam war vets
I'm more or less sick in the head
Maybe more cause I smoked crack
Today, yesterday, and the day before
Saboteur, walk the block with a Labrador
Strappin' more corral for war than El Salvador
Foul style galore
Verbal cow manure
Comin' together like the eyebrow on Al B. Sure!
Motherfucker!

Like this, like that, like this)
I'm the illest rapper to hold a cordless, patrolling corners
Looking for hookers to punch in the mouth with a roll of quarters
I'm meaner in action than Roscoe beating James Todd Sr
And smackin' his back with vacuum cleaner attachments
I grew up in a wild hood
As a hazardous youth
With a fucked up childhood
That I used as an excuse
And ain't shit changed
I kept the same mindstate
Since the third time that I failed 9th grade
You probably think that I'm a negative person, don't be so sure of it
I don't promote violence, I just encourage it
I laugh at the sight of death
As I fall down a cement flight of steps
And land inside a bed of spider webs
So throw caution to the wind
You and a friend
Can jump off of a bridge, and if you live, do it again
Shit, why not? Blow your brain out
I'm blowing mine out
Fuck it, you only live once, you might as well die now

Yo, yo, yo!
My mom sent me up to the store with a food stamp
Two dudes ran up and jumped out of a blue van
I looked down at the ground and picked up a huge branch
I swung it at the first dude, the other one with him
Seen it snap so fast, it looked like it broke before it hit him
So he tried to rush, I swept his legs, pinned him, and bit him
He came back with 6 or 7 dudes screaming "GET HIM!"
I grabbed one,  lit him on fire, pinned, and bit him
The next faggot gave me his shoes like they didn't fit him
One by one I just kept dropin' 'em in a rhythm
Then I woke up swingin' the middle of the kitchen




Look at that bitch, shit! Hey!
There she goes, shakin' that ass on the flo'
Bumpin' and grindin' that pole

I bought a girl Patron, I get in the Henn', I'm gone
My eyes ain't clear and I'm long so she hearin' me wrong
I'm kinda in the zone 'cause the DJ playin' my song
Just another opportunity for sayin' I'm known
I'm from Atlanta so Southern ain't just a part of my grammar
I can dump and cock my hammer for any nigga with ammo
But I came here to get on Goose and Tropicana
Get loose, put some more in my juice and your caboose
Sippin' everything from white cran to deuce-deuce
With nothin' to gain but migraines and loose tooths
Eminem came, then Obie, Stat and Proof too
Bobby Creek is in the place, the name is new too
But the money been around, my drinks is ten around
I can make her spin around, least she keep her dinner down
Simmer down, we can hit the telly when the fun stops
And I let you and your girl come tickle my gumdrops, yo

Three to the one from the one to the three
I met a bad bitch last night in the D
Let me tell you how I made her leave with me
Conversation and Hennessy
I've been to the motherfuckin' mountain top
Heard motherfuckers talk, seen 'em drop
If I ain't got a weapon I'ma pick up a rock
And when I bust yo' ass I'm gon' continue to rock
Get'cha ass of the wall with your two left feet
It's real easy, just follow the beat
Don't let that fine girl pass you by
Look real close 'cause strobe lights lie

We 'bout to have a party – turn the music up!
Let's get it started – go 'head and shake your butt!
I'm lookin' for a girl with a body and a sexy strut
Wanna get it poppin', baby? Step right up
Some girls, they act retarded
Some girls are 'bout it, 'bout it
I'm lookin' for a girl that will do whatever the fuck
I say, everyday she be givin' it up

Now shake that ass for me
Shake that ass for me
C'mon, girl, shake that ass for me
Shake that ass for me
Aw, girl, shake that ass for me
Shake that ass for me
C'mon, girl, shake that ass for me
Shake that ass for me

Obie Trice!

One slug couldn't snuff young cuz
Goodness gracious, haters stay on his nuts
Wood just like a hoodrat chick who was curious
Serious, full breast, ready to touch
Who's that in the Coupe blew back with a blue new hat
Givin' head while he poppin' the clutch?
True that, I had a few, Obie rollin' with brews
And Nathaniel annually knockin' the boots
It's all manual the way I get 'em outta they shoes
Talk a lil' shit, then they anus'll ooze
Hock a lil' spit on my dang-a-lang boo
It's Shady – you know the name of the crew
You know the aim is to bang you in a mansion
With a Magnum when the night came to the matinee
Mathers, Nate, Obie came to party
You better ask somebody

Now shake that ass for me
Shake that ass for me
C'mon, girl, shake that ass for me
Shake that ass for me
Aw, girl, shake that ass for me
Shake that ass for me
C'mon, girl, shake that ass for me
Shake that ass for me

Shady!



Ya, We gots money baby, I'm talking about, talking about that long money, when you see us come through, you just know...

Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ba-ba controllably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably

Man, I got everything candy-painted, candy-painted tint, it's so dark
I'd be lying if I said I ain't hit at least nine of my friends
Plus, I got so much candy paint in my rims
Paint be flyin' off my car be candy paintin' the neighborhood kids
I got that whole block lookin' like it's Candyland
Ask about me, man, they be like, there go the candy man
I park the car in the garage and go in and
Come back the next mornin', the rims are still spinnin'
Hit the doors on that Phantom, man, that shit looks like the Batmobile
Thirty-two inch rims, shit, I ain't even got no wheels
Custom-fitted, custom-kitted wood grain
Custom everything, what's that on the seat, custom mustard stain
Now let's go hit the mall, y'all know that we finna ball
Get out the car, they be like, ah, there go them superstars
Hit every single store, flash a fuckin' wad of cash
But I ain't buying shit, bitch, kiss my candy-painted ass, we

Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ba-ba controllably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably

Hit the corner liquor store to get Corona, tip the owners
Sipped it on the way out as I dipped, I wanna rip the road up
And I'mma hit the cinema and I'mma get the hoes
When I be at a theater shit, anything goes
I'm ballin' outta control, girls know I'm loaded with dough
But shit, I'm stingy as fuck, I'm fuckin' stingy as hoes
These bitches don't get a crumb, and it come but I'm like what up
Shut up, bitch, sit up, get up off them knees, my candy paint's enough
If you're lucky, I'll let you hug me, but that's all you get
Then I'mma split, disappear, a cloud of smoke is all you see

Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ba-ba controllably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably

Bitch, get the fuck out my car if we ain't finna fuck
I'm horny as fuck bitch, are you suckin' my dick or what
I'll fuck a chick in the butt, I really don't give a shit
Is pretty Marshall gonna have to go choke me a bitch
You fuckin' keyed up my Benz bitch, I beat up my friends
Don't think I won't beat a bitch, I'll kick a six-year-old in the ribs
You fuckin' retard, I'll have you suckin' farts out my seat
I'll teach you not to know how to control your bowels when you eat
What the fuck do you think that colostomy bag is for, looks?
I ain't waste nine bullets on you for you to not sing no hooks
I fuckin' take a Make a Wish Foundation patient with me
How 'bout some coke inside of your saline solution IV
Turn around and use it on me, you tryna snort all my keys
You fuckin' get in back, you're comin' to Florida with me
Tell your momma I'mma drop you off at the hospital later
We finna make this run, take this gun and cover me, Slater and quit your

Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ba-ba controllably
Ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably, ballin' uncontrollably ba-ballin' uncontrollably

Tracy, I joined this class cuz I thought I’d be cooking with a partner
But she’s never here, and I don’t get twice the credit for all the work

I didn't invent odd numbers Seth




How the fuck he got an Oscar
Passed out in his red Mazda
With his fucking head in his pasta
In the parking lot of K-Mart plaza
Across from the Red Lobster
Looking like the Loch Ness Monster
Dressed like a cross-dressed mobster
Talk is cheap, it costs less to gossip
I'll probably be a lot less hostile
If you snots kept your schnozzes out the air holes
You'll get fucked in all seven holes
Ass, mouth, pussy yeah, both ears and ha yes nostrils
At the OzzFest with Nas
Bumping Das EFX in a wrecked up Datsun
And dropped two extra strength Watson Vicodin out my pocket
They cost less
I'm a hot mess
Cause I tripped and got my head stuck
In a wasps nest in the process, awesome
Drunk as fuck, one sock
Pulling my boxers up with boxing gloves
But I keep dropping my fucking binoculars
Got two fucking Hydroxycuts
And four oxi’s stuck in my esophogus
These three lesbian little stocky sluts
Thought I swallowed two hockey pucks
Started screaming "serves you right you cocky fuck
That's what you get for mocking us
Ain't as cool as you thought you was"
Bitch all I did when I walked up was have my dick in a sock
Said it was a sock puppet
So no strings attached
You can all suck it
Chicka get it, ah fuck it
Shit’s bout to get as hairy as motherfucking Chewbaca's nuts
Cocksuckas



Cause I'mma keep doing hip hop music

Yo I'm into voodoo, tarot cards and Ouija boards
Lighting candles camping out at haunted beach resorts
I write the dark shit, and rap about perverted violence
Ghost stories of people murdered on deserted islands
Dressed in jean shorts, high tops and tube socks
Holding a rifle, with a life full of drama like 2Pac's
Jumping off roof tops drunk after I do shots
Landing in someone's backyard getting chewed up by two rots
I got a new watch and two rings with huge rocks
This rap shit got cash coming out the blue like nude cops
I use to sell pizzas, now I got twelve visas
So tell Jesus that I'mma quit sinning when hell freezes

That's why my brain is out of order
That's probably why my nights are getting colder and my days seem shorter
But as the world turns and I keep growing older
I'll be living this hip hop till hell freezes over
Bitch till hell freezes over
I'll be living this hip hop till hell freezes over
And as the world turns and I keep growing older
I'll be living this hip hop till hell freezes...over

Yo I use to be too heavy in that cruising Gratiot crap
I think I fucked my head up listening to acid rap
I go to parties bumping Nasty Nas's new song
And smoke pot till I get high and stare at shit for too long
Like this weed is laced ain't it, it tastes tainted
The whole place fainted, I woke up with my face painted
Spaced out like Sci-Fi TV, "Fuck ICP, buy my CD!"
That's what I'm screaming while I'm handing out promo tapes of my debut
Telling bitches let me eat your pussy while I shave you
Ain't no shame in my game I turn the party out
Making everybody shout for the rapper with potty mouth


Uh, uh uh uh uh
Ah ah ah ah
Uh uh uh uh
Ah ah ah ah



Hello, what up? Hello?
Yo, I can't, I can't hear you
Let me call you right back

I sense someone's tappin' into my phones, why do
I got this feeling in my bones I might die soon?
The FBI might be tryin' to pull my file soon
I might be walkin' blindfold into a typhoon
I might be seein' rockets light up the night sky
Right outside the window of my living room
And if they do, you can say good night
And bye-bye to them my tunes
If I don't try to record as much before I do
The plan is to have as many in the can as I can
As I stand before you in this booth a walking-dead man
Blank stare, dead pan, look on my face
As I gaze into space, ss I wait to be scooped up in that van
As I mysteriously disappear into thin air
And they gonna say a sniper just appeared outta nowhere
And I'll go down in the history
As the bloodsuckin' leech
Who hid behind the freedom of speech
Tried to take the 5th Amendment, use it, twist it and bend it
And ended up dyin' the villain, not the hero, splendid
Stupendous way to end this
I can feel the tremors tremendous
In remembrance of September 11th
Flashback to September 7th
When 2Pac was murdered in Vegas
He said it, he predicted his own death, let us never forget it
Should we ever live to regret it
Like the day John F. Kennedy was assassinated in broad day
By the crazed lunatic with a gun
Who just happened to work on the same block
In the library book depository
Where the President would go for a little Friday stroll
Shots fired from the grassy knoll
But they don't know, or do they?
Who's they for them to say "touché"?
We're all vulnerable and it's spook-ay
This is about as kook-ay as I've ever felt now
Count down to nuclear meltdown
Seven, six, five, four, three, two, one
You can run, you can do what you want to
But you know you ain't gonna do nothin'
When it's time, it's your time, you are the prime target
You have become Public Enemy number one



Fucker
Yeah
Oh shit, it's the evil genius
Green lantern
Yeah
A yo Em
Ha ha
What we call this shit right here
The invasion
You have part one u got part two now its
Part three
The final chapter mother fuckers
Armageddon, lets go

I got a riddle what's little and talks big
With midget arms and creamy white fillin' in the middle
That will do anything to throw dirt on my name
If it means walkin' the whole Mediterranean
Is he an Albanian, Armenian, Iranian, Tasmanian no
His name's Raymond and oh, so sorry yo, Osorio
But that was a long time ago when I was just Joe Shmoe
Rappin' in Joe Blows basement I apologized for it befo', so
Either accept it or you don't and lets move on
If I've shown that I've grown and get the bone
Keep lickin' these nuts you industry mutts
Keep walkin' around sniffin' each others butts
Or should I say asses
What would be the more politically correct term to use for the masses

Hold up hold up hold up
New york city man
It's the kid Lloyd Banks
And if you hearin' what I'm hearin' right now
You know this ain't no regular shit homy
This something special and we gotta bring this back
Green come on
Countdown to

Armageddon
Lets go

I got a riddle what's little and talks big
With midget arms and creamy white fillin' in the middle
That will do anything to throw dirt on my name
If it means walkin' the whole Mediterranean
Is he an Albanian, Armenian, Iranian, Tasmanian no
His name's Raymond and oh, so sorry yo, Osorio
But that was a long time ago when I was just Joe Shmoe
Rappin' in Joe Blows basement I apologized for it befo', so
Either accept it or you don't and lets move on
If I've shown that I've grown and get the bone
Keep lickin' these nuts you industry mutts
Keep walkin' around sniffin' each others butts
Or should I say asses
What would be the more politically correct term to use for the masses

The question I ask is
How can I explain this
How can I swing this in English language
If I switch to slang and turn man to mayn
Do I do it in vain or simply to entertain
Am I being real or am I being fake
Am I just a fraud or am I truly genuine
Or am I caught up in this hot water wody on my daughter
I told ya I love this culture don't let em' insult ya
But every now and then I use my pen to get rid of some frustration
Or should I say or should I say shun
Is it just another one of my subliminal ways of racism
Your face is numb your stunned your look is cold
Like that of a man of seventy some years old
And it only gets colder which Is why I understand
And can't be mad at a forty four year old fan
With a chip on his shoulder who only owns a half of a magazine
And the only way to have it seen is to put me on the front of it again
Only thing that makes him grin is to see me frown
Papa can't stand me papa needs to take his medication and sit the fuck down
In his new chair that goes round and round
That he bought from new money in his bank account
That I get him every issue when the thang comes out
Sit back and let his puffy clown hair come out
And let his black side arm wrestle his white side
Yell Apartheid loud enough that he might slide
He might find someone dumb enough who might ride
But ain't nobody over here buyin' two white guys disguised as pro black
There is no slack
Far heart for college grad. In a fitted hat and a hunch back
Standin' by the clearance coat rack
In some old slacks and tomorrows old throw backs
Yeah

Shady in the place to be seen
And i got what it takes  to rock the mic right
Still not gonna cater these punks
Fuckin' cocksuckin' pussy lips haters dicks cunts



Ayo 50
What I tell you?
We ain't even have to say shit
They did it

Monkey see, monkey do
Don't ever make the first move
Just let 'em come to you
Cause they gon always see and do
What the other one do
So let them come to you
The rest'll just follow suit
Monkey see, monkey do
Tweedle-dee, tweedle-dum
If they really want it bad enough
Well then they gunna come
Now here they come
As we expected
Now we just set 'em up
Check-mate motherfucker
Games over, we won
Tweedle-dee, tweedle-dum

Doesn't take much
For me to raise such a stink up
When motherfuckers hate your guts
You ain't even got to say much
For me to put a pen to a blank sheet of paper
S'like smearing a bloodstain with a paint brush
I can’t explain what it is my brain does
But however it works
It's insane, its plain nuts
And it ain't just my brain that’s dangerous
It’s a whole combination of things
It takes nuts
And I’m not afraid to raise the stakes up
I got a million bucks in the bank
And 8 trucks
For anybody who gets on the track and spanks us
I'm patiently waiting for the day
I’m anxious
To see the look on ya fake mugs
When you thugs go bankrupt
Ya drunk
You ain't tough
Whatever you drank must of just
Turned you into some gangstas
This is me talking motherfucker
This ain’t drugs
You wanna pop shit?
Wake-up
Then make-up
FUCK THAT
It’s too late chump now
Face up
I pray for the day
That someone who spits with the caliber
That Nas and Jay does
Opens up his jaw to say somethin'
Or rattle my name off
Or rattle the first thing
From the top of his brain off
So I can blow the fucking dust off of this chainsaw
And give him the surgery that he came for
'Til I pull the paint off
I never been shot
But I think me and Fifty must of been cut
From the same cloth
Cos I’ve always came off like Ja's chain
When they try to rush him and lost
And came back
And gave him a watch in exchange for it
I don’t stop
The only thing that I wait for
Is the day I don’t have to report to probate court
Cos im'ma give ya' all a reason to hate more
Cos I been holding my tongue 'til I got a sprained jaw
Alot of rappers on my list
That just ain’t Ja
And im'ma read that motherfucker off come April
You pussies think I went soft since 8 mile
When I come back I’ll be shooting more than paintballs
Trust me

Monkey see, monkey do
Don't ever make the first move
Just let 'em come to you
Cause they gon always see and do
What the other one do
So let them come to you
The rest'll just follow suit
Monkey see, monkey do
Tweedle-dee, tweedle-dum
If they really want it bad enough
Well then they gunna come
Now here they come
As we expected
Now we just set 'em up
Check-mate motherfucker
Games over, we won
Tweedle-dee, tweedle-dum

Fucking dummies
This ain’t chess
You playin' motherfucking checkers
This shit is all day man it’s too easy
We playing chess you playing checkers
You 'bout to get your mother fucking asses jumped
Fucking punks
And by the way
We ain’t just talking to one person
We talking to every motherfucking body who wants to bring it
Cos we bring it into anybody who wants to bring it
So bring it
Don’t pick up the ball if you don’t wanna play man
It’s all fucked up now
The fuck I’m suppose to do now
Huh?
The fuck I'm suppose to do
Yo we out



Yo, weed lacer, 97 burgundy Blazer
Wanted for burglary, had to ditch the Mercury Tracer
I’m on some loced shit, some fed up with the bein’ broke shit
I’m not to joke with, bitch I don’t sell crack, I smoke it
Havin' a coke fit, goin' through withdrawals daily
Shoot up with mescaline in front of my baby daughter Hailie
My brain’s dusted, I’m disgusted at all my habits
Too many aspirin tablets, empty medicine cabinets
Losin' battles to wack rappers cause I’m always too blunted
Walkin’ up in the cypher smokin’, talkin’ about “Who want it?”
Thug and a crook; every drug in the book I’ve done it
My 9’s at your brain, is that you chain? run it
Crews die from an overdosage of excessive flavor
Aggressive nature got me stickin’ you for your Progressive pager
Spectacular, battle rap manufacturer
Stole your momma’s Acura, wrecked it, and sold it back to her
Boostin’ Nike jackets, escaped from psychiatrics
Told the nurse to save my bed for me, I might be back trick
So barricade your entrance, put up some extra fences
A woman beater, wanted for repeated sex offenses
Chasin’ dips – take ‘em on long vacation trips
Kidnappin’ ‘em and trappin’ ‘em in abusive relationships
Mess up your face and lips, slit your stomach and watch your gut split
Gut you with that razor that I use to shave my nuts with
Mama, don’t you cry, your son is too far gone
I’m so high, I don’t even know what label I’m on
I’m messed up, I feel just like an overworked plumber
I’m sick of the crap, what’s Jack Kevorkian’s phone number?



*Beatboxing* We should do something like that, yeah

Boom boom chuck, boom b-boom chuck!
Boom boom chuck, Yeah, that's what's up!
Boom boom chuck, boom b-boom chuck!
Boom boom chuck, b-boom, Shady!

There's never been this, much of a menace in this game as this
And it's the, most sinister duo in the business
Once again its the, illest and realest killas
The most villainous, Dre protege, Shady apprentice
Drop them zeros and get with these heroes
Do you want losers or winners, this music is in us, and it's
Not over till we say it's finished and G-Unit spinners
Will keep spinnin', this is Hip Hop when it's in it's
Truest form, the greatest, Hate us or love us
Make voodoo dolls of us and keep sticking them pins in us
Thick as his skin is or as short as his wick is
The trick is to be able to walk big as his dick is
And as sick as his music is, or was, still is
Whatever, forever, he will be the illest
To ever sh-shock the world, what to do next
He's already reconciled with his {ex}, a chainsaw and an axe
Choke a bitch to death, strangle her neck
While we have sex, while Bill Clinton plays the sax
I sprays the facts, yeah, bring Shady on back
The maniac of rap, devil baby on crack
Resurrect, I never left, baby, I'm bad
I've gone mad, my comrade Dre-zie automatically
Says I'm too broke to fix, way beyond that
I may be off drugs, but it's made me off track
In fact, this right here very well could be the last rap
I ever do spit, I'll never do shit, that's that
Fuck it, I quit, suck on a dick, jackass
I'm done with this whack ass rap, kiss my black ass!

Nah, Em, tell them to kiss my black ass, the clean parts, the shitty parts
My bullet wounds, my beauty marks, the Fif'll tear you're ass apart
I came in this game crushin' motherfuckers from the start
Shady paid me, Shady crazy, Fifty crazy rich, bitch
Different day, nothing change, it's the same shit, trick
Teflon wrapped on, case I get clapped on
D's searching the whip, glad I left the mac home
Still grinding, still shining, nigga lord knows
You rocking with the kid to spit sicker sick flows
I carried Game's style for nine months and gave birth to it
Now I'm feeling like a proud father watching him do it
Everyday Dre day, front and cause a melee
Turn the town upside down with a frown upside down
I smile through something fowl, and watch my money pile
I'm fucking with straight stacks, I'm kicking you straight facts
I hit you with it, bag it, pump it, bring me mines right back!

Boom boom chuck, boom b-boom chuck!
Boom boom chuck, Go 'head front, get fucked up!
Boom boom chuck, boom b-boom chuck!
Boom boom chuck, Yeah, that's what's up!
Now boom boom chuck, boom b-boom chuck!
Boom boom chuck, I hit your ass up!
Boom boom chuck, boom b-boom chuck!
Boom boom chuck, boom b-boom chuck!
Shady, Shady



Torture chambers, secret passageways, vats of acid, and deadly vaults

I said, ohh
Damn, it feels good to be back
I'm having a Relapse

How the hell did he manage to get more felony charges?
He's already got life in jail man, what the hell is his problem?
Well to be honest, the smell of these chronic leaves make me hella demonic
They've compelled me to kill this elderly man
And I get these panic attacks, pop a Xanax, relax
Trying to stick my fucking dick inside a mannequin's ass
Then I get manic depressed, see the orthodontist, get gassed
Man, it's kick ass, the first thing I put on is the mask
Speaking of masks, man, it ain't too late to have a change of pace
And take it off and show my face, so you can see the things you face
And slice you up and cook you after you're murdered by strangulation
That's bacon souffle you making, ain't you? Well, thank you, Jason
There goes one more coma, due to blunt force trauma
Just give me one more Soma and I'll be done for mama
Go in the damn broom closet, another Valium, lost it
Shoving the vacuum nozzle, down the bathroom faucet
It seems like everyday I get a little flakier
The medication is making my hands a little shakier
Hand me that eighteen-month-old baby to shake him up
It'll only take me a second to choke his trachea
Breaking his neck in eighty-some places baby, here Shady comes, lady
He's got the razor b-blades and the ch-ch-chainsa-saw, baby
You b-b-blundering, bumbling, m-m-mumbling dum-dums
Yeah, here I come-come, you hear the rumbling vrumm-vrumm?
There's something inside of that blue tub and that drum, drum
A head and torso of someone, where'd it come from?
Who's it belong to? Maybe the girl with the long, blonde
Hair who disappeared and left her cheerleader pom-poms
Clearly there's somethin' wrong, cause she didn't come home
She's missing, where is she? Something fishy is going on
I guess he stuck the bitch with the pitchfork with the long prongs
Now everybody get your dance on to my damn song, come on



Justin?
It's Zoe um
Kelly did not have me call however I just listened to Eminem in her car and
It is the most DISGUSTING thing I have ever heard in my entire life
And I seriously wanna call his fucking agent
And tell him how FUCKING disgusting he is
It like makes me upset
I'm now nauseous and I can't eat lunch
Goodbye



High on? What'd you say, trick? What am I on?
Two tubes of airplane glue and a can of Krylon
Eatin' a crayon, settin' fire to rayon
Flamin' the nylons of two white lesbians screamin', "Die, blondes"
Strike matches on white patches of dry lawns
And I run and jump right in front of the fire hydrants
Five blunts, and you expect me to die once
With nine lives, fuckin' chickens in front of my blind wives?
Suicidal, my friends tell me to try knives
You wanna mess with a mothafucka who skydives
Out of a plane to give the Statue of Liberty high fives?
Doin' drive-bys and miss you with five tries
It's Slim Shady and BET and Big Tigger, all y'all who see me flee



I put my orange
4 Inch
Door hinge in storage
And ate porridge
With George



Denaun, what up, man?
What up, dawg?
You alright?
Chillin', cold as hell
Yes, it is. Hey, bus didn't come here, didn't he?
No. Hey look, you got 15 cent?
Nah, I got just enough to get on the bus, I'm broke
We gotta go to the store. Alright, man?
Quick, ‘cause I'm short
Yeah, we gonna have enough time to go to the store?
Nah, look
You should just, how much you got there?
I only got 75, I'm sure I got a dollar, know what I mean?
Just throw it in there, they ain't gonna know. You know what? Aye look, I'm sick of takin' this damn bus everywhere, man
You gotta make some moves or somethin'
I know, look, I'm tryna get rich
I got a baby on the way, I don't even got a car. You know what I'm sayin'?
I still stay with my moms, 21 and still with my moms
Yeah, look, hey, we gotta make some hit records or somethin', you know what I'm sayin'?
‘Cause I'm tired of bein' broke

‘Cause all I do is yearn a life without a concern
And dream of havin' a turn to earn money to burn
Mappin' out my strategies to get rich, huh
My desire is like a scratch that needs to get itched, huh
‘Cause, man, I live in the D, this shit ain't given for free
Nothin' is different to me, so what else is there to see?
I'll be the prisoner to flee from all of this misery
I'm not wishin' to be another fish in the sea
But just an MC, so listen to me for this and agree
You're missin' the key, you ain't even in the vicinity
Unconditionally, my aspects to cash checks
My objects were never to swab decks
It's up to you, the decision is yours
If what you vision is tours, or a missionless course
When your shit is in the stores, ‘cause you can be a star

No matter wherever you are
You're never too far from revenue par
‘Cause you can be king
You can rule the world, you can do anything
It's on you, baby, ‘cause you can be a star
No matter wherever you are
You're never too far from revenue par
‘Cause you can be king
You can rule the world, you can do anything
It's on you, baby, ‘cause you can be a star
No matter wherever you are
You're never too far from revenue, huh

A million dollars ain't even that far away, man.
I can't be broke for the rest of my life!
Bummin' rides everywhere I go.

Yo, I'm not about to chance it and dismiss handlin' business
I'm cancelin' Christmas to gamble and risk this
Financial interest is the matter at hand
I got an adequate plan for stab at a grand
I grab what I can and do what I must
Pursue what I lust, it's true that I just
Choose the few that I trust
Them's the people that I still got
Fuck with gangsta Philpot, get your grill shot
Proof, Kyu and Denaun, we move through in the nine
My crew's true and divine, we never fronted
We just wanted to be funded, and live to be a hundred
Instead of hunted or bein' wanted as fugitives
It's all about a man plannin' what his future is
What he can do for his to be a star

No matter wherever you are
You're never too far from revenue par
‘Cause you can be king
You can rule the world, you can do anything
It's on you, baby, ‘cause you can be a star
No matter wherever you are
You're never too far from revenue par
‘Cause you can be king
You can rule the world, you can do anything
It's on you, baby, ‘cause you can be a star
No matter wherever you are
You're never too far from revenue, huh

I'm not tryna be the player, I'm tryna be the mayor.
I want to be president.
I'm tryna be king, makin' dead presidents.
You know what I'm sayin'?
Gettin' money any time I want, ownin' my own businesses and all that. You know what I'm sayin'?
You only live once, '96, baby



Yo, yo, I'll start it off, yo, yo…
My name is Shady, his name is Proof
Yo, we used to have a roof up on my house
And now we had a mouse that ate the cheese out of the fridge
Didn't want to admit that I was on welfare when I was three
Plus, when I was four, my mother used to leave
She used to always slam the door and say
"Goodbye, goodbye, Marshall, I'm leaving, I'm single
And right now I'm going to mingle at bingo."
"Yeah, see you later, alligator," is what she said
And I would always stay at house, freezin' till I'm dead
'Cause it was cold inside that house, we never had no heat
Yo, Proof used to come walkin' up right up the street
And be like, "Yo, what up, Em? How you doin'?"
I used be like, "Yeah, man
It's good to see you, dawg, but my life's ruined
'Cause my mom just left," she left my brother Nate
And I hate the fact that we never had no food on our plate
Yo, so I said "Proof, won't you come in?"

Yeah, yeah, come in, what’s up with dat?
Tango and Cash, came to mingle and blast
Together tougher than Alcatraz prison bars
Drivin' foreign cars
Yes, it's me and my man compadre
Black and white, white and ivory and black ebony
They can't step to me, rubbery and heavenly
They can't see us in the 313 vicinity
Ayo, Em, ha ha ha ha

What up? Ha, ha, I'm comin' like ha ha
I'm ill like nah nah, and y'all don't wanna see me
'Cause I'm ill with the skill
And I can grill and I always keep it real
When I built my garage back after it just got burnt down
Sorry that my parents weren't always around
But it was really hectic growin' up
But now I'm blowin' up
To the club drunk as hell, drunk as fuck, drunk as what?
Can't say that on MTV
But remember it? Little old wimpy me
Who used to always dream to be on MTV
Now you can't see me
I know you remember that rhyme
Ayy, wait a minute, yo check it out, I'm 'bout to flatline
Pass the mic back to Proof
'Cause we get loose, we drink gin and juice
Sip it 'cause we always raise the roof

Ayo, ayo, we all up in your sight like cataracts
Me and Em tag-team
Beat any of y'all on some battle rap
See us next time we strippin' out your Cadillac's
How you like that? Soon you down like a battle axe

I'm down like a battle axe
I got a phatter axe to smash
And I smash your cataracts
'Cause it's a Cadillac's that I be drivin'
When I be high off fuckin' vivarin
Now you can't see me 'cause I'm revivin' and survivin'
In the D, every single day in Detroit
If rappers wanna step to me, they better get to the point
'Cause they don't understand the way that I do it
The fluid that I be spittin' is never written
'Cause I'm always, always bitten, 'cause it—

Ayo, you make your neck crack like a snare pop
We're fresh and they're not
So give it up, don't even do this
You're wack, in fact you get flat-lined
You need practice
We stick you like a cactus
Nah, you're not a guy, you're an actress
The fact is—

Here's my address, this is my old address
And called… a street called Dresden
Yo, dead presidents is what I'm resurrectin'
Gotta say what's up to Desmond and J.L.B
But yo, they don't help me
Do a thing, they never did
When I was a clever kid, rhymin'
I always used to go to school and climb in
The back baseball diamond

Hey yo, abort, hold up!
Hurt shoulder
Peace for Kurt Loder
Yeah, we're doin' an interview
In a minute or two
We're gonna enter in you

In the nude, when we intrude
Don't mean to be rude
But yo, what's up, dude?
How you doin', MTV?
How you doin', Kurt?
How you doin' everybody else in the world?
You gettin' hurt
By this freestyle that I be comin' up with
Eruptin' and kick your mother in the tummy
And in the stomach

Ayo, ayo, and all of this we just done is freestyle
Ah, ah, ah, don't touch that dial, yeah

Hold it right there, I'm your worst nightmare
Wipin' diapers on my high chair

What?! Yeah!

When I was this big
Now I'm still bigger, but I'm skinny like a twig
Skinny little white boy
Growin' up I liked noise
I spike punch and light joints

Ayo, everybody looks for us to follow
We thrust the bottle, thrust the throttle
Bust a bottle over your head
Train your thoughts just like Cus d'Amato
Your guts is hollow
Back up, Proof and Em

And all them wack MC's steppin' to me at Saint Andrews
Just remember that I hate you, and yo, I can't stand you

Yeah!

Bye bye!
Goodbye, good night!
Bye bye, good night!
Bye bye, good night!

Bye bye, bye bye, bye bye!



Ain't no one special, special like you
Ain't no one special, special like you
Ain't no one special, special like you
Ain't no one special, special like you
I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life, baby
I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life, baby
I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life, baby
I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life, baby

I'm reminiscin' on your tenderness
And the snugglin' and teasin'
Missin' what I remember
Kissin' and huggin' and squeezin'
Buggin' and wheezin'
I'm havin' trouble when breathin'
It's even tougher when sleepin'
But there's a couple of reasons that I'm sufferin' and grievin'
For lovin' and leavin'
You're all I'm thinkin' of in the evenin'
You got my knees bucklin' and weakenin'
Thoughts of nothin' but freakin'
That I'm strugglin' to keep in
And interrupt when I'm speakin'
I got some game that I'm preparin' to run
The way your lips sparkle and they glare in the sun
You got your hair in a bun
No matter what you're wearin' you stun
'Cause you're comparin' to none
I want to share in the fun, I feel a passionate lust
When I imagine it just alone at last when it's us
I see you graspin' to trust
But my intentions are good, let's leave the past in the dust
I'm not askin' to rush
And answer me immediately
I just wanna be there for you and you to be there for me
If you agree to repeat after me
‘Cause I just need you to see
How much I'm eager to be your man legally wed
Your love's keepin' me fed
This is easily said, so you can lead or be led
If you care to be down
‘Cause ain't nobody like you nowhere to be found

I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life baby
I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life baby
I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life baby
I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life baby

Baby, it's all on you, it's you I call on, boo
Let's set a day up so you can fall on through
We'll take a spin in a Lexus
You can chill for dinner and breakfast
Long enough to see how this gentleman sexes
We'll start it off with caviar, Dom Pérignon
And then when it's a fact we are warm, carry on
We'll take it slow, see, nobody will hurry things
I got the Izze, the Bacardi and Hurricane
If Daiquiris are in debate and not your thang that day
It's still all right ‘cause I got Minute Maid and Tangeray
You're an incredible one that's rare
I bet in edible underwear
You'll look impeccable, none compare
I dream of freakin' you, the women that I'm speakin' to
It seems that there is not an end to things that we can do
So, now we all set to play, only thing left to say
Is when you step away, baby, look over in the négligée

I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life baby
I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life baby
I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life baby
I been searchin'
But you're the one I want in my life baby
Ain't no one special, special like you
Ain't no one special, special like you



Em, it's Paul
Listen, Joel just called me and
He said you're in the fucking back behind his studio
Shooting your gun off in the air like it's a shooting range
I told you not to fucking bring your gun around
Like an idiot, outside of your home
You're gonna get yourself in trouble
Don't bring your gun outside of your home you can't carry it on you
Leave your fuckin' gun at home



Roll down the window in the chevy and I listen to the critics but they really Wasn't saying shit
Buddy, I'm a gutter motherfucker from an Alabama creek, you don't know
Who you're playin' with, They talk so much that I bet one of these pebbles under me get
Laryngitis the wave is so contagious, so who gave it? Apparently I did
Put fish in the back of my boat, I'm a fisherman, I'm a reel 'em in, mackerel
I'm a give 'em ten minutes,Then put 'em back in the water there, just to see 'em all float
And kinda like mixtapes in the back on my trunk, buddy, yeah, I got 'em all sold
In Alabama with an arm and hammer, swimmin' in propaganda, I got 'em all, whoa
Promenade, country boy, get out of my way, gallon of sweet tea, a packet of lemonade
Smackin' a faggot, I crack a bat on the pen and page, no homo, anyway Any stage, rip it any
Way the independent way, look, have you seen his Js?
Footwork, send em' in a rage, feelin' like a millionaire on minimum wage don't need a Mercedes
To take your girl, my Chevy is sick, Earl
I let her play with my mullet, while she sip syrup
Hold up, Alabama funk make you lose your teeth like a Mountain Dew soda
Some saltines wanna live in the box, but guess what? I'm the cracker who showed up


Cause sometimes I feel like its so hard
For me to come up with shit to say. Aay!
I'm at a loss for words cause ya'll already said it all
I think I'm runnin' out of cliches
I'm gettin' writer's block. Psyche!

Left the crib with 10 grand bought a hundred pair
I'm the coach I can show you how to be a player
5 faces said the fitted bitches love my hair
Camo shorts go with anything I wanna wear
They let me in the club fuck the dress code
Me and all my niggas rollin' up the best smoke
OG kush from the west coast
Oh you down to fuck? well shorty lets go
Diamonds in my chain niggas tryna steal my lane
Chronic in my brain bitch I'm reppin' Taylor gang
Smoke till I'm insane drinkin' till I'm throwin' up
Only papers if you Taylor'd nigga throw it up
High socks low cuts smell that good weed then you know its us
That yellow car pullin up them niggas ain't hot so they ain't close to us
Down to fly get two fingers and throw em' up


Cause sometimes I feel like its so hard
For me to come up with shit to say. Aay!
I'm at a loss for words cause ya'll already said it all
I think I'm runnin' out of cliches
I'm gettin' writer's block. Psyche!
I'm gettin' writer's block. Psyche!
I'm gettin' writer's block. Psyche!
I'm gettin' writer's block. Psyche!



Yo, ayo, turn the heads up and the mics up
We got the Dreadknaughts, y'knahmsayin?
Super MC, y'knahmean?
Bugz, Dirty and all that
All that shit, y'knahmsayin?
Desperados with the cars — Eminem!

Chauvinist pig, drove in this big Lincoln
'Til it went over the bridge
Jumped out and dove in the ditch
Broke in a mobile home and stole a stove and a fridge
Kidnapped the parents and left the ransom note for the kids
I'ma go for your mids, here's a body blow for your ribs
While you're clutchin' your stomach
And bleedin' all over your bitch
I know where you live, your girl showed me your crib
Unless she told me a fib, then I'ma have both of you did
Burning incense, facin' a murder sentence
Under intense investigation for killin' infants
While I sit in padded rooms, doin' shrooms
Havin' visions of dead pregnant women
With brooms jabbed in they wombs
Slit your carpet and rugs and fuck your apartment up
Stickin' up arbor drugs, and jumpin' in garbage trucks
I'm from the shitty slums that look like the city dumps
Give you a kidney punch
And mug you to get me lunch
See me every summer layin' up against the dumpster
With a hundred dollar jumper
Smothered in Southern Comfort
Got my Slim Shady sticker on your mother's bumper
She came home screamin' a bunch of motherfuckers jumped her

Ayo, proceed to list 'em, there's no need to diss 'em
Down here we heat 'em, destroy your whole breathing system
Twist 'em, like beer caps, once they hear that
Rap murder rates, and I snap vertebrates
Collapse further states, my track preserve the great
I'll kill you slow like AIDS-infested nuts
I'm holdin' vendetta like seven great-molested sluts
Callin' me a bitch nigga, you need to stop
Reality, one on one, how many times you got dropped?
I'm cut-throat when any track runs
Conscious when I smack nuns
The rough neck that make Muslims run and pack guns
I'm volcanic, the sermon preacher
Burnin' emcees, most wanted by Herman Kiefer
You tried to get a squad, they was like, "Money, oh no."
Leave you brain-dead, hittin' trees with Sonny Bono
I kick without a dojo, D12 slow flow
Shoot down your mothership and pimp-smack mojo
No pro wanna go knuckle-blades with the renegade
Nigga tried to go pop, and plus they minute-made
My lieutenant sprayed your brigade and trampled your flow
Big P, the reason emcees cancelled they show
The truth will hurt, seein' Proof at work, no shame in it
The best part of your show is when you put my name in it
My squad be godly, fearin' shit hardly
So I hope when I'ma die dope like Chris Farley

Fuck that! Who run shit once these drums hit?
You dove headfirst into some old dumb shit
Here's a can of asswhip for you to come get
Your click made they trip, I make them hoes suck mint
I'll chop off her titty, have you suckin' one tit
Them pink belly niggas is who you run with
Makin' half-ass songs, shitty snares and one kick
I hate your damn sound, don't like it one bit
You could make a double album, won't have one hit
Your entire outfit is on some bullshit
And there's not a damn one that I can't outwit
I admit that my style is unfit
For Momma's baby boy, because I'm on some dumb shit
Like I commit larceny, give harm quick
You pull the alarm switch, I stab you in your armpit
Now, who the nitwit wanna come get with
This egotistic hip-hop fundamentalistic?
Don't risk it, you get your shit split
Now keep your distance and keep existence
I'm persistent when it comes to bent shit
I smoked a blunt with my judge right before my sentence
I'm relentless, to deny is senseless
Your bitch paid my bill, that's where the hell your rent went
Fuck that!

I kill competition, with no way out as an opposition
Execute the passengers on the flight, my executive decision
Then reminisce on how Shady the business
Terrorists asked by Israelis when they visit
Bombin' incentive, World War III in the makin'
Murdered the exhibition, team finish, beat the ref senseless
No time-out, extended play burns over your intermission
Then christen the battlefield with the blood of Christians
Cryin' for the Messiah, but he don't listen
I pop my wig when I top the stove frame, boil sizzlin'
A pyromaniac cook, I do damage to kitchens
Fuck Home Depot, I demolition
When I home improve, you need Bob here to fix it
Fuck school and supervision!
Bit off of financial aid and smoked up my tuition
Only hang around rappers with explicit lyrics
And pistol-grip punks for the beefin' — do you wanna get heated?

I got a mind full of troubles, everything's in doubles
I buy my guns in couples, no time for placement fumbles
‘Cause emcees come and emcees go, with broke flow
Injured from head to toe, no fitter model, we full-throttle
You stuck in low, incapable to master flow
Everything is tactical, livin' mathematical
I smash the flow, unleash and let go
I shit like lava, original designer
Married to marijuana since a minor
Makin' attempts to sink my battleship
Could get you bent like fibs, what?
Applying death-defying feats, maintain to keep my peace
Flow like the sea when I release these beats over concrete

My presidented transition has taken place
As I express vocally on the M-I-C-R-O
Power he cipher, not equality, I deal it
Lace the track and made it real, now I know my peoples feel it
Keep their heads bobbin' and the emotionals sobbin'
Plus a culture-cipher after shows, hoes slobbin'
Knobs love the fuckin' flavor of the icin'
Plus I'm precise and my double edge continue slicin'



Oh no what's happening to my brain
I can't believe this is happening again

Lava on my lips I flips, wake up think I have a cramp
I'm trying to shove the lava lamp up my father's ass
I think I'm out of gas, man, I think I need another mask
I'd ask my mother but I think she's laughing at the plants
A half a gram of graham crackers and some Van de Kamp's
I think I'll eat some Ambiens like they're candied yams
Cut a couple cadavers up and have a little snack
Abra-fucking-cadabra, motherfucker look who's back
Just like a pendulum, Satan's pentagram swings
I accidentally dented it and bent the damn thing
Shit I think I might have did it when I was dancing
While I was chopping one of my legs off and pulled a hamstring
First I Re-Up, then I Relapse
Go to rehab and I Detox after I see Doc
And I'll be back with the sequel, repeat the cycle
Cause I react like the She-Hulk when I see NyQuil

Oh no
Here we go again
Don't know
When it's going to end
Oh oh
Where did it begin
Don't know
Maybe way back when

Into the well, baby Jessica fell, she may have wetted herself
Quit playing, get her some help
Mary Kay Letourneau sending me letters from jail, every day in journals
Saying how, she wanted to smother me in lettuce and mayo
I'm the medicine man, my medical marijuana
Was prescribed by a doctor, shove a typewriter up
Perez Hilton's ass, shit, almost forgot that
He's always shoving something up his ass so why not that?
And fuck it while I'm venting let's shove a vending machine
Up his rear end when he's bending over pretending that he
Didn't say anything that would be offending to me
Stick his head in a blender, begin blending and gee
Where should I put the pink sissy with the fluffy hair?
Put him under the stairs? People are already under there
Hmm, I wonder where. Wait, I think the cubpoard's bare
Stuff him up in the Tupperware and shove him up in there


Vicodin's like a nitrogen hydrogen vitamin
I bite into five and then I get high as a kite again
I like it when I get in my zone on the mic again
Who am I kidding? I couldn't quit this shit if my life depends
I relapsed twice after I came outta Brighton then
Yeah, rehab's nice, I had my name up in lights again
You see that's why I can't decipher what life I'm in
I might pull a knife on your wife and slice her and dice her then
It sounds so enticing, isn't it nice when I'm hype again?
On nights when I'm like this, no time to write just type it in
If I could get my pen to slow down, what'd I write just then?
Man I'm 'bout to hyperventilate, I just have hypertension
I have the type of mental state you couldn't comprehend
Unusually stupid of you to think I'm your friend
I usually do what I do and suffer no consequence
I offer no mercy, the controversy is once again




Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!

Jealous?! What he mean "jealous"?
Know what I'm sayin'? He just mad ‘cause he all with them ugly hoes, know what I'm sayin'?
Girls don't buy him no clothes
He bought that ho some clothes!
He don't buy me no clothes
That nigga ain't got no money, no vibe, no dick
I mean, what do I got to be jealous fo'?
He ain't gonna make it nowhere
He ain't got no type of time
He has no career move, I mean…

I come home every single day from workin' double shifts
And stop along the way to pick you up a couple gifts
I come inside and you pretend you miss me
When you kiss me, then you diss me
And we strenuously fight continuously
Again you frisk me, for numbers, tryin' to bust me
It must be only just because you never learned to trust me
Plus we only squabble over irrelevant issues
Too many tissues for my feelings you misuse
I buy you jewelry, you make a fool of me
I bring you diamond rings, you say I'm bad at timin' things
So what's a man to do
When all I hand to you is handed back to me?
You act to be this gangsta bitch
That ain't what first attracted me
I used to love your company
Now you’re always pumpin' me for information
And you tell your friends you plan on dumpin' me
So I'ma wait for your evacuation
‘Cause every accusation
Makes me wanna smack your face in
See, I've never been so sure, and you're just insecure
So my solution to your jealousy presents a cure
I recommend you take your things and check 'em in
Look at the nervous wreck I'm in
I need my second wind—say what?!

Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!

Fuck you and what you going through! Fuck Eminem!
He just mad ‘cause I left that nigga for another man
Me and Eminem don't need nothin' but minus money
Immature, me? Nigga ain't got no dick
No swang in his thang, know what I'm sayin'?
He just mad ‘cause I'm gettin' it all night
Jealous of me, know what I'm sayin'?
That's what I'm talkin' about
Motherfucker just tryin' to get this pussy

I used to be a puppet and a sucker for your silent treatments
I used to be intoxicated with your sweet scents
Until the day I started followin' your feetprints
And tappin' in your phone conversations
Through the heat vents—it made complete sense
There's someone else you like
So I confronted you and asked you, "Who was Mike?"
And you was like, {I want a new nigga}
"Someone rich that I could follow
And you'll be over me by the time you see tomorrow."
Leavin' me in sorrow, Brandy never felt so brokenhearted
I fell apart when you departed, then the jokin' started
I was an open target, you play comedian
And I became the laughing stock
But now I'm on my feet again
And so we meet again, you're actin' like an ex-wife
All in my sex life, I got a message from Phife
It goes, "You didn't want me to see yo' hon
Don't want me now, take the towel, wipe your brow!"
Quit tryin' to hunt me down!
You run me down and now your tryin' to apologize
For all the lies and everytime you made me ball my eyes
Because I got a bigger wallet size, you wanna swing it
Jealousy is in the house, y'all—fellas, sing it!

Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!
Jealous!



Here we go again

Does it make you mad when I switch my flow
You can't understand how I get my dough
50 Cent, I'm on fire cause Shady said so
I'm on Fire

Everybody's in a rush try to get the throne
I just get on the track and try to set the tone
I ain't trying to use nobody as a steppin' stone
But don't compare me, I'm better off just left alone
And I ain't even trying to go there with record sales
I'm just trying to keep it humble and respect myself
Say what up, keep stepping, and just rep D12
Keep my nose clean, stay away from weapons, jail
And living reckless
But if you go check my belt
You may see something else I used to protect myself
A vest, to stop a Rueger and deflect the shells
And send 'em back at you faster than they left the barrel
And I don't even carry guns no more, I don't got to
Got undercover cops that'll legally pop you
And I done seen a lot of people cross the line
But this motherfucker Ja must have lost his mind
That X, got him thinkin' he was DMX
Then he switched to 'Pac now he's tryna be him next
So which one are you? X, Luther, Pac or Michael
Just keep singin' the same song, recycled
We'd all much rather get along than fight you
Me and Hailie danced to your songs, we liked you
And you don't really wanna step inside no mic booth
C'mon now, you know the white boy'll bite you
I hurt your pride dawg and you know I don't like to
But I will if I have to, with syllable after syllable I just slap you
Killin' you fasta than you poppin' pill after little pill of them tabs of that shit you on
But if you want it you got it you'd bump this shit too, if we ain't diss you on it
But if we lock horns we can charge harder than Busta
We bump heads wit any motherfucker that wants to
So whats the, deal where was all the tough talk?
When I walked up to you like, Ja what up dawg?
How come you didn't say you had a problem then?
When you was standin' there wit all your men, we coulda solved this then
I'mma grown man dawg come holla
All you did was slap hands, smile and swallow
Another one of them little X pills in front of me
And tell me 50 Cent was everything you wanna be come on

I know you don't want it with me, you know you don't want it with me
You, talk an', soon you gon' see, you don't wanna bump heads with me
I know you don't want it with me, tou, talk an' you soon you will see
You know you don't want it with me

You couldn't son me if my father helped you
My punchlines is hot, my bars will melt you
Ja you Stuart Little, shells'll lift you
Every other week I'm buyin' a new pistol
I clap at your ass with this chrome 38
And put six thru your hats, a seven and 3/8's
Irv you ain't Suge Knight, you should shook night
I put my knife in ya wind pipe and breeze through the turnpike
You know and I know who took ya chain
You got robbed two times so ya ass is lame
I'm down to die for this shit all I need is bail
You better stick to the movies with Steven Segal, bitch


Fuck that, I'm miles away
And these industry niggas startin' to get outta hand
Like I won't find your whereabouts by stompin' 'em out ya man
We killin' New York, even in Compton they understand
I'm on the block where you was raised doin' chocolate up out your van and
They see me pop a boy for icey cause I could
Cause when you paranoid it's hard to make a song
How you want it wit' us, half of your artists got make-up on
Every magazine I own your on your knees takin' prayer pictures
And you ain't even got shot yet, you scared bitches
You don't know nothin' about what pain is sucka
I'll put your ass underground like a train conductor, muh'fucker




Hey, what's going on?
This is Paul Rosenberg, your faithful attorney at law
Listen, I listened to the rough copy of your album
And uh... you know I've just got to be honest with you
Can you tone it down a little bit?
Because there's only so much I can explain
Give me a call



{*Low, Down, Dirty being scratched*}



Em, what’s going on?
It’s Paul. Uh…
Dre gave me a copy of the new album
And I just…*sigh*…Fuck it!



Yo, yo, y'all ready for death? Y'all ready for death?
Marv Won, the Fat Killer
The game done got ugly, let's go, yo, yo
I seen your type before, you think you're tough
Battle you? Bitch, you lucky I don't beat you up
In a game of fisticuffs, I'll push your face back
You can't fuck with me, man, really, just face facts
It's him versus me in a battle of ten rounds
It's like Muggsy Bogues tryin' to fuck with Jim Brown
Dumb fuck, I'm the type to run amok
Come in the club drunk as fuck
Slap your bitch so we can buck
One hook... type of a man the size of Dan Dierdorf
Tryin' to take his ear off, like Mike Tys
I'm quite nice on fight nights
And why he poppin' shit? Man, I thought he liked life
Apparently not, I'm incoherently hot
And if I miss you then your parents get shot
Yo, I'm a bad boy, bitch, it's on
I'll put 44's on your chest like you're Rick Mahorn

Hold on, faggot, let me turn this mic on
Don't think for a minute I'ma let you
Get away with that song
'Cause that shit was wack, you ain't spittin'
As a matter of fact, all of that shit was written
And I know it wasn't for me
Surely, you really must adore me
Now, look it… yo, you might as well move  to Italy
Look, this guy's ripped...*skkkrr* – literally
You don't wanna really fuck with this
On this microphone, I'm not Snuffleupagus
But I don't give a fuck, you can keep that dull rap
And turn your ass back around with your fuckin' skullcap
And your bandana or your motherfuckin' sweatband
Fuckin' with this style, you're a dead man
I ain't Redman, but on this mic, yo, I pick it up
Just like your face when I had to rip it up
You don't wanna see me, yo, uh



Here's the story, of a little boy
Growing up in a suburban home
Trying to cope with everyday life
Who lives in a little house
That was built, in the middle of the street

"Hey, Mom! 2Pac's on the jukebox"
"So what, he shot two cops
And raped a little girl while two dudes watched"
"Nuh-uh! They were tryin' to frame him"
"You and that Tupack Shaker..."
"No! That ain't how you say his name, mom!
You're so lame, don't you know anything?"
"Yeah! I know that you'll probably go and join in a gang,"
"Yeah, right. I'm out. Where's my fuckin' Walkman at?"
"Stop cussin' at me!"
"Shut up, bitch!"
"Quit talking Black!"
Well, slammed the door and I'm out
Now, what? It's probably warm in the house
Fuck, I forgot my jacket, forgot it was winter
I'm gettin' thinner, I'm hungry
Is Mom cookin' dinner?
"Mom! Let me back in! I forgot my coat
Mom, come on, I'm not playin', it's cold!
Alright, sorry, I need a jacket
Mom, look, my 2Pac tape, I just cracked it
Ma, please let me back in
It is Tupack Shaker, I just asked him"
I'm freezin', I'm sneezin'
I'm breathin' too much cold air, I'm wheezin'
"I ain't did nothin' I didn't say 'I'm leavin'"
I said "I'm goin' on the front porch to get somethin'"
"Fine, I'll le— Mom, you cut off the sleeves!"

Our house
In the middle of the street

One, two, three
My teacher's two-faced, went to lower all my school grades
Since last Tuesday I had a toothache from Kool-Aid
So Mom kicked me out, and all I had in my suitcase
Was one shoelace, a tube sock, and a tube of toothpaste
Sometimes it was cool cause I could go to Fred's
Crash there, fool around and just skip school
But other times I'd rather just be home
In my own room alone beat my shit and nobody would know
My little brother sucked on a bottle 'til he was six
So I'd hide it inside the couch and say
"I don't know where it is"
But as soon as Mom found it I would either be grounded
Or kicked out of the house a thousand weeks and still countin'
Even when I was underage
Mom was tellin' cops I was tryin' to run away
I told her "Someday, bitch, you're gonna pay"
Please, Mom, please, Mom, please, I wanna stay


My brother's incoherent, Mom's a single parent
Who ain't carin', starin' through me
Like I'm transparent, made it clear
That I was just there to run her errands
Told her friends I was a son from her last marriage
Sent me up to the corner store with a little note
"Please, sell my step-son some cigarettes so I can smoke"
One time I tried to fake sick to get attention
Back-fired, Mom sent me to school with a vengeance
My life's the worst thing that could ever happen to me
I go to class and every teacher's always laughin' at me
And Mom says white rappers are laughed at
Not only that, she heard me upstairs
I can't rap, and I'm stupid
I'll never make it averaging a D+
I need to sit on my ass and sue people like she does
One time, I got food poison from a hot dog
Mom sued and got $2,000 from Ballpark
"Hey, Ma. You got a dollar?"
"I don't think so, now keep an eye on your brother
I'm goin' to bingo."
"But, Mom, you said you were broke."
"Who said? You got your ears messed up
From that damn rap music."








Maxine!
Hello
Can I speak to Maxine?
Yeah, this is me, what's up?
What up?
Who dis?
Denaun
Yeah, what's up?
What are you doing?
Nothing, just laying in bed
Huh?
Nothing, just laying in bed
Why?
I don't know, thinking about something freaky to do

I know this crack fiend, Maxine, who needs a vaccine
She tests positive, but tells you that her act's clean
Plus she got a sugar daddy
Gassin' every hooker that he takes in to crook her badly
If you mistook her, sadly, on her reputation
You're in jeopardation, if you ain't got no preparation
When you stepped away, son, she got her face done
Lookin' provocative, she'll let you knock it if
You press the issue, and get undressed to kiss you
If you match the price, otherwise she won't look at you twice
But when you catch the lice, or get the urgency
To go to the emergency ‘cause it burns to pee
Don't bring your germs to me, ‘cause I ain't tryna hear it
While you're fightin' your fuckin' disease, tryna clear it

Sometimes I wonder, what's your purpose in life?
That is to get with every brother
And unveil one of his kids
Shit, you livin' trife
Got three kids at home, and club-hoppin' every night
You say it's gonna stop
But it just… slows… down…
And then speeds back to a regular pace
There is no end to this
Mystery, whatever your reason even is to be
You say you wanna be with me, but how can you say that
When you got niggas hidin' in your closet?
I refrain from gettin' angry
But you keep on actin' strangely

I met this girl last week
She was a freak, and she liked me
So I stepped on it and then asked my homies
And chilled on the side and then watched they niggas
Big game over there and take notes, while I get this number
I stepped to her, first I cleared my throat
Looked at my nigga, turned around and got slapped
She said she just broke up with her nigga and shit
She started cryin', and asked me to forgive her and shit
She said her name was Maxine
So I told her I wanted her number
She asked could I give her mine too
Got to the crib and called her up
We got into a good conversation
That's when she asked me could I fuck
Give me your address I'll be through and you'll find out."
Got to the crib, she let me in
She didn't waste time, she grabbed my hand
And proceeded to the bedroom
I said "Hold up, and stop proceedin', you rushin' things"
What the fuck are you doin'?
So I went for my protection
Took off my clothes and started flexin'
As she went for my midsection
I threw her down as I tore off her shirt
Pulled out my jimmy and I thought about puttin' in work
But there's somethin' that I gotta tell your ass."
I said "What is it? Another nigga? It's okay."
That I got AIDS, I got a problem."

Hey, Maxine
What?
You thinkin' about suckin' my dick?
Yeah, for a small price
For a small price? What you mean?
You know, money, nigga
You don't need no damn money; I can't give you no money anyways, I heard you got some shit
What you, what you hear I got?
AIDS
Who told you that bullshit?
My nigga Kyu, he wouldn't lie
Well, if that's the case, Kyu got it then
Oh for real, it's like that?
Well, I ain't got shit, so he ain't got shit
And if he do, he ain't get that shit from me
I ain't fuckin' around with no third nigga
Fuck that, I ain't fuckin' with you
No, see…
You got that shit, I ain't gotta fuck with you
Hold on, why it ain't even like that
I want y'all to get paid, fuckin'



Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange

Got a dick as big as a banana
I try to control it but I guess I can't
It shoots off like an AK-clip banana
You better watch out, Hannah Montana
Man what's the matter, have you no manners
No you know the girl from Juno's address
Yeah, I'mma probably go to jail for that
Now I got the cops on my tail for that
Run up on your car with a stale banana
In your tail pipe, can't believe you fell for that
It coulda' been a molotov cocktail for that
Wait a minute man, what the hell was that
I heard a noise, where you going
What are you, bananas
You can't go back there, stupid ass
I just seen a woman in a Freddy Kruger mask
Who the fuck are you, Superman
All you have is a little stupid can of whipped cream
What the hell you gonna do with that
I'mma put it on my wee-wee
Oh good answer
Super bonanza extravaganza
Man go ahead, what you waiting for
You better get them clothes off, baby boy
Come on let's go, we're gonna make a porn
Ready, set, go hit play, record

Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange

Are you ready
You better hold the camera steady
She's probably back there with a damn machete
She's probably gonna eat you like canned spaghetti
She's probably gonna kill you, still wanna check see
Have a little quick look, go on sick prick
She's probably six foot tall like Big Foot
The hell with that, we probably should run
Don't dare look back
We probably, probably, probably
There probably was a problem at the post office or something
But you probably didn't know that, did you
Now what you gonna do when she gets you
I ain't going with you, forget you
Quit tryna hold my hand, mista
Pretend she's your little sista, little sista
Might as well take the whipped cream with you
And when you see her, make sure you get a picture
We could try to make another Blair Witch movie
A beastiality porno with smoothies

Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange

It's eerie, but here comes Zack and Miri)
Beauty and the beast, his back is hairy
But she don't care, they're attractive, very
Very sexually active, very
No, Zack, don't go back in there
It's too late now, she's grabbing hair
He screams, bloody Mary, grabs a mirror
But stop just ain't in her vocabular
Get off me, please
Get off me, stop
Balling back at a coffee shop
They go non-stop
She says go
He says no
She says oh
Back and forth, they scream and shout
Yeah, boy, let them demons out
It's the kind of nightmare you dream about
Uh-oh, now the whipped cream is out
I get sick thoughts, sick, sick, thoughts
Things you could do with your lipstick gloss
Put it on my dick til the tip looks orange
Bitch, keep going
Bitch, keep going

Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange
Put it on my wee-wee
Banana, strawberry, pineapple, orange

Banana, banana, banana, banana, banana



*burps* Woo!
Hey, how you guys doin'?
You want more? Alright
Then SHUT UP!


Skibbidy bee bop
Hey yo, here's a song for the ladies...



You know it's devil's night
The way that I smash the face of a punk in
Mask of Jason is a fashion statement since Drunken
Master tapes been a basket case
And if that's the case, then I'm dunkin'
Fascination with masturbation and humpin'
Lacerations and masking tape
And I'm bumpin' some Masta Ace
Roll up posin' as pastor Mase at a lunchin'
See Andrea Yates, grab her face, then I'm punchin'
Crack her fuckin' skull with an antique vase, kill her husband
To the back of the station wagon
She's dragged and placed in the trunk and
Now I'm wanted for kidnappin', rape, and abduction
Spread her legs like Land O'Lakes that I'm cuttin'
'Til every fuckin' limb's either amputated or punctured
Decapitated Christina Applegate and I rap like I'm agitated
No chill, but I'm half sedated
A functioning addict — wait, I'm in London?
Brains underwear? A pantywaist, classic case of disfunction
Aggravated assault, it was rap related, you activated a gunman
This game's over-saturated with junk and
You punks couldn't get a hit from a database with a thumbprint
Razors and matches, path is laid for destruction
Put Jason Mraz's face in his ass
Then I'm snatchin' Anne Hathaway
She scratchin' like Jam Master Jay on the one's and
Two's, I slash away, then I'm dumpin'
Her ass in a Lake Placid for alligators
After I use the fuckin' tire thumper to bash her brains in for nothin'
The murder weapons, I stash 'em away on Runyon
Man, the kind of balls that it has to take and the gumption
Lack of class displayed, but such a vast array in abundance
Of sad disgraceful and bad distasteful redundance
And, bitch, I'm hung like candy canes if you're wonderin'
Balls come at you like batting cages
I'm raw like Big Daddy Kane is, I'm comin'
Like I'm ejaculatin' and nuttin'
Come catch the clap like you're patty-cakin', lil' dumplin'
Or brace yourself like a cast and be the last to make an assumption
I'm back like I'm in the bathroom takin' a dump and
It's back in the day or somethin'
I'll shit on you, Devil's Night — how's that for a introduction?



Shady, we're back!

Nothing can stop and nothing can change it
You better just make new livin' arrangements
If you think you the top and king of the castle
You about to be thrown off the throne and ripped a new asshole
All I hear is I'm the best at this and I'm best at that
But I don't hear my name, no ne'er brought up in rap
And I don't usually trip or dare get caught up in that
But when they say one of the best, I'm nowhere thought of as that
Not even the same league as Jay-Z, Nas, Pac, Biggie or maybe
They'll name me somewhere down at the bottom, right after AZ
Or say he ripped that Biggie verse, or that Jay-Z
Ayo his verses were crazy, on that "Renegade" beat
But I ain't never bought no whole CD of Shady
And all I hear is pop tunes come on the radi—
O, and they play 'em 20 times in a row daily
And that very well maybe the same reason they don't say me
When they speak on hip-hop legends, which has amazed me
Cause I thought the formula was to hit mainstream
And make it big—ba—big—big bay—ba—baby

So maybe the eighties made me crazy
I've been tryna get my weight up since the ace Slim Shady
Gave me the gate key, paved the way
So lately my stakes get better each day
Replay my relay race, when I was chasin the afee at eighteen
Eight years later his voice in Beijing
No choice I chase cream, so


This is what I eat, sleep and breath and feed
I treat the mic like the block
Fuck with my rocks, and squeeze
Critics expecting me to underachieve
I just deal with the hate I receive
By rolling back my sleeves
Sure was a breeze, I bring him right to his knees
And tell him "suck my dick"
I take a bow and leave
With a sack full of unmarked cheese
I find it hard to believe
Who to pull or proceed
To be G's and claim they runnin shit
Nigga I run me
As a kid, teacher said I had a mouth on me
The same mouth got me the deal with Dre and E
Folk in the hood be askin, where I be
Dogg, I'm out in Hawaii
Don't like it? drink my pee
Record song for the "Detox" LP
Feet don't fail me
Niggas got me bent like Cranberry and Belvee
I'mma die wealthy
Boss in the game, what the fuck they gon tell me?
A towns auntre, Aftermath, Shady!


Y'all market y'all block, they sent me to corner that
Rap game's an old flame, my nigga I want 'em back
Like mic check
Pimp for what it's worth I got the right net
Sittin' here excited by some shit that ain't right yet
No regret, live by a code you don't know bout
Y'all niggas won't be certified till I show I
Go out on a limb with Em cause I'm wid him
Put a barrel to the apparel of you and some of them
Stand a chance, at the dance, without a Bow tie
Shady Records re-introduce you niggas to Mow-ti
So high, of the light that they have given me
And the haters like a chauffeur  because it's driven me
To a view with a vendetta I am the epitome
I don't give a fuck about ya nigga I'm just livin me
We the reason for the season so I'm breezin through the track
Nigga


I can prove I'm here to do something you never do
From hand to hand coke sales, from my revenue
I ain't been to a function, where I ain't snuck a weapon through
Cause my background reveals a one eight seven too
To the block, I'm the truth
To the cops, I'm the proof of this
And niggas still out there, you just gotta shoot
I carry over my street ethics, to the booth
And the shady crime fam, Al Capone in his youth
The difference between me and you, I already done it
And lived the street life, niggas run away from if
You follow my life, in a midwest blunted
Pitchforks held high, four fifth by the stomach
You can find me right now, on the C.A. streets
I'm on the roof, of the building, shooting at police
Some of the homies feel opposition can't kill me
I'm a walking obituary, death live in me
I take life through the pen, by the way I'mma see
Or have you raped in the pen, like American meat
I'm connected gettin weight from MS 13
With S.K's, A.R's and Mini fourteens
I'm Cashis, the last of the real, with a strap
On Pro-sac, D's and E-Pills, it's a rap
Get the block on tip, two for tens of crack
I'm in a lifetime contract, Shady's back
Nigga

Whoaaaa!





Hahaha...Shady


The Conspiracy

Cause we ain't gonna never stop, you just keep wasting your energy
And quit fuckin' with us cause we ain't fuckin' with you
And E must be fuckin' with you so much you must be gone out your mind

They say I'm a day away from my entire empire crumbling
Speak up you're mumbling, what the fuck-a you's a
Bibi-bay okay big-bi-bi-baby
This is Shady I know you was bi-bi-hoping we be-be-would just go away
But weeble mable weeble wobble but we don't fall down like
Jam Master Jay's two turntables, our label is just too stable
Your magazine's so motherfucking thin you using staples
To hold it together it's turning back into a newspaper
And ya'll got somethin' for my ass every issue
Thank you, cause I keep runnin' out of fucking tissues
And I could diss you but God I was sick of looking at you
At least now I can see when Nike's got a new tennis shoe
But-but I guess no good news is always good good news
50's blowing up, this year just keeps going up
What the fuck is going on? Who the fuck is Norah Jones?
Shady, wait a minute, baby, leave the whore alone
Just go up there and be humble and take them awards home
Bush has just declared the world a fucking war zone
Meanwhile we got a war going on of our own at home
My fuckin' mind's blown, trying to figure out how to fight my own clone
Rhinestones are so nice, they shine so bright especially at night
After a hit of ecstasy, ain't that right Ro'oh?
Wait a minute I'm rambling, back to the matter at hand
It's Green Lantern with Elvis Presley the selfish MC
Back to the ruin rap and destroy the industry
Single handedly and oh man did we, yeah me and 50
Obie, me and Twizzy
And Nelly and Missy and Jigga god damn it's all a plan devised by the man
It's a conspiracy...against fake shit, and anybody who can't make hits
Or ain't dope lyrically, so fuck what you heard and what you read about
We ain't ruining rap baby we're just trying to weed it out

Shady in the place to be see, and I got what it takes to rock the mic, aiight!
Still keep talking shit to me punk
Cause your magazine's over in less than 6 months!
Haha...Shady Records, still Aftermath!
And don't think we can hear you motherfuckers talking, cause we can't
We don't hear y'all
So we just gonna sit back for the rest of our lives
While you ride our dicks



Whoa Nelly, Tell Angelina Jolie I’m ready
With petroleum jelly, to smear it all over me belly
And tell her she can hit me on me mobile, me celly
And meet in the salami section of the grocery deli
And maybe we can find us an appropriate telly
A motel 6 or 8 it think they both could be helly
I hit it, then I quit it and I told her email me
And don’t call me, I’ll call you, can you feel me? Ho do you smell me?
Animal instinct, cannibalistic, I just ran out of lipstick, man I’m a twisted, sick
Sadistic, son of a bitch, 666, Broke his crucifix made out of sticks then fixed it
Chick chick chick chick chick chick chick chick chick!
Now play it backwards muscle relaxers mixed with liquid
Dilaudid its diluted for a quick fix, your delusional illusions look realistic
..I Need Christopher Reeves to come and lay his verse
I think he can spit it better on Medicine Ball, first
Off I did not even realize the guy died
So I guess them Christopher Reeves jokes ain't gonna fly
Oh! I'm on a roll don't get me started
Anna got pissed at me and tried to push me into the garden
With such accuracy she aims and shoots the target
Cupid's arrow done forced it...
Now look sweetheart it's the, kissing bandit
On a mission to leave Ms. Degeneres Disenchanted
By men now just listen dammit
Mr. Rossi I need no posse I single handed-
-ly will steal your heart with a kiss where should I plant it
Moi! baby its Moi! and my repertoire
Is running around in pink panties and leopard bra's
And negligah, negligée you say tomato I say tomah-to
I'm Tommy Motola Mariah don't stop me I'm on a roll



*Door knocks*
Hold on a minute Em..
*Gun shoots*



Hey! Hey, stop, hey. Please stop, fuck, stop!
Thank God you stopped
Fuck, my fucking OnStar isn't working
I left my fucking phone at home!
God, I've been standing out here for like, an hour
I'm soaking wet, freezing
Thank you so much. Really, you're a life-saver, uh
What are you doing?
Fucking! Get away from me! What the fuck! Fucking asshole!
Get away from me, you motherfucker! Get away!
Get away, you fucking freak! Get away from me!
Goddammit, fuck! Help me!



Yeah, yeah, I get it
I run this rap shit, now guess who's back

They keep on sayin' the same rappers are the best
Jay-Z and Kanye West, maybe they're just tryna distract it
From the fact that I'm comin' back
Or maybe it's cause I ain't black, maybe it's because of that
Maybe it's because I'm the highest sellin' artist in rap
While I'm sittin' back in my office jackin' off to my plaques
I'm still sick, how can I be sick this long
And I'm still alive, Magic Johnson arise
I thrive on makin' my opponents think that I've died
That's when I just pop up outta nowhere, oh yeah, there we go there
Damn I forgot how much money he got
On the beach of St. Tropez, but your man don't lay
In the sun cause I don't tan, I burn, blood clot
When you gonna learn how much money we've earned
How does it feel to know I came in this game at 25
And coulda retired at 29 in my 20's still
And Fif' here to lick on that Coca-Cola shit
And he ain't even gotta look at coke to even hold a brick
No more, oh boy, goddamn did he score
To go from sellin' bags to bottles right out the store
And Shady hit the box office man, he knocked the socks off us
My ex-wife is set for life, you profitless cocksuckers
So stay the fuck off us, we make pay
I'm just a super easy modest MC, okay?
Til I hear the word has been, that's when I start spazzin'
Smart asses, kiss a smarter ass then
I'm the best thing that ever happened to rap, bastards
I'm a blonde Dre, now gimme Kanye's glasses!



* this song was a free download on his official website

Are we supposed to shut up or talk...I'll cut your butt up and walk
Around with my ass showing all over the fuckin town

....Then you get done up in chalk

We ready...we ready .. we ready.. we ready ?
Ready to hold it steady....Speakin of hold it steady
You can hold my nuts steady and then
I can stick my dick in you like a machette...If you're a girl
If you're a girl then you're my world...And I will kill anybody
That means... you, her or him
It doesnt matter cause I'm Eminem
And I'm Slim...I'm also slim and your future's Whim

Ha ha....don't stop
D-12 y'all...yea we bust it off the top
We get in that ass Preparation-H style
Everybody tryina tell us to wait now
Tryin to dance around
How the fuck it feel lock in hand set now
Sever your style .. Divide and Parish
Part ish...when my cart is bustin thru this
Wassup to Bizarre Kid
Targets get hit and liftoff
Here it is we bout to rip off
Lick shots...no time...we gettin dick snot
Emzy

Speakin of lift off
I'm blastin off...your ass is soft...so I'm startin to jack off
Cuz I'm so horny...and your lyrics are so corny
That they bore me and I woke up too late this morning
Or too early...wait a minute there goes Shirley
The girly I fucked last year when her hair was curly
Couldn't remember it cuz I was Infinite
And I met Ken Kaniff in Connecticut
He said his predicates and pronouns and wanted to throw down
And he said “I like you”...and then he walked up and said “Let me snake bite you”
And I said hell no...kicked him with my shell toe
Gave him a elbow...Ayo Proof ...go

Yo it's the D to the 1 - 2
What you wanna get done to
Your chest plate...eradicate
Get your flesh ate...easily done..Here it is
Freestyle...no need to write shit...cuz when we write shit
Y'all like to buy shit...that why street light up when we write stuff
It's time to be the champions at this...it's D-12
1-2 True crew...Slim Shady and Big Proof
Knockin over igloos in Alaska when we blast ya
A massacre creator, one time for data
Darker than Vader...go anybody hot as the Equator
It's time to get down one time for those that dont know us
Girls wanna blow us like Monica....Lewinsky
Come against me

Go and see I'm an invincible MC
If you dont believe it then you wanna try to convince me
That you're doper than me...which we'll hope
You would hope to be....but hopefully I will rock globaly
And nationwide...thats why my ass is wide
Thats why your ass just died on the passenger side
Like a fuckin ride...when it got shot up by a drive-by
When I drove by 5 times and gave it five tries
And still missed it
I got a fuckin' mental illness a gentle stillness
What I need is to do...what is need is smoke weed and brew
And......smoke brew ? You don't smoke brew
If you do I'll choke you and then I guarantee I'll out smoke you
You're crew's a joke too and I can stick my dick in a bitch and poke you

Stick it in there....rock with my cock on sky rock
We lunatics with mics and we dont stop we come to rock
The dirty dozen is non-stop
To the top from tree tops to ewoks that pop Reeboks
And men with pre-ops
Yo now there is 3-Pac's
Master P....Thug Life and now it's 2pac
Get back to that one...here goes the rhyme that you dropped

The rhyme that I dropped is stickin up IHOP
In high tops and walking around like a one-eyed Cyclops
And you can't see me....I only got one eye and I can still see you
You can even give it a dumb try...If you're a dumb guy then come try this
But I rock the microphone with my flyness
So get off my jock..get of my cock..when I sky rock ...it in sky
Rock..shit...bitch

Ayo...a lot of people always try to tell us...that we gonna be better or failures
But me or Slim yo you can't tell me
You try to freestyle son we gon' put these verses on your LP
Slow down with that old stuff....I heard the most of y'all is Mos Def

My LP...my whole LP...tha last one was screaming help me
You couldn't melt me if you was Vanilla Ice...Yo guess what
My Nuuuuuuuuutz!!
Here I go with the lyrical miracle...spiritual spirital...you dont wanna hear it though
I rickety rock the microphone
Don't do it dont do it cuz that shit is stupid...I knew it
I take a beat and loop it...I take a beat and troop it
What the fuck did that mean...I dont know but I got phat jeans on
And I already said that but I dont know where my head's at
All I wanna do is go back to the hotel and know where my bed's at

Yo wheres the beds at so we can relax and catch Ease
Y'all dont want none of tha dirty Deez
From the 3-1 its for the three of thirds
One third MC yo we smoke y'all like herbs
Under the curb early morn take it to born
Y'all get broke up...put back together ...re-enactment
Some times you see this...you just a faggot
No need to tag it...wit more loot that Jimmy Swagart

Faggot....uh oh...was that homophobic...?
But no one knows it...and I'm so homophobic
I won't even throw clothes in the closet
Fuck it...I've lost it....I'm holocausted...see my face it's written all
Acrossed it
This beer makes me wanna disappear this year
I'm so high I'm 'bout to die...and I'm so tired I'm 'bout to fry
You're so fired you're down

Hey....it's me...it's the hamster man
Coming all the way from Amsterdam
And I come to tell you all a little secret
So you can ........eat it ....you got to grab your crackers
{mumbling}

Quit spittin your writ shit bitch I'll kill you and kick you
In your motherfuckin' dick and your clit...you little pussy
Hermaphrodite with no appetite
And you ain't rappin' right but you was taking rapid bites
Of my dick when you was on it...my brain is haunted
I walk up in a place in a T-shirt wit my stains on it
But I dont give a damn...give a fuck...give a shit...give a hell
Give a piss give a dick give a lick

Yea....live and direct it's us
You better back up

You better back up before I jack off
Back off before I jack off

You better back off before I jack off

Colder than Jack Frost...smack you across your face
While I'm still jackin off
Sittin' in the closet beatin' my shit
Ain't got nuttin' else to do cuz I'm thinkin' of a bitch
Wait a minute ...oh shit she's here
Come here little girl

Gun clappin' ...and all I need is one napkin to wipe the cum off
When I come off with the drum off
Whatever the hell that meant...but I can still speak wit' a accent
A French accent
Excuse my French but
Suck my dick touche le le poo...uhh....bitch

Bonjour...I'm here with the cure...Oh yea lets rock it for the drawer
Hey Em...how you doin this is me...The Em jock...get off my
Damn cock

Yo while you're spraying verbs...you ain't even fuckin' saying words
And bounce your herbs tight
Yo put another beat on before you get peed on

Yo are we done or what? They want us to freestyle for 45 min—

Hi...Hi.... My name is ...my name is...my name is
Slim Shady...Slim Shady...Bitch you're little just like that Kim lady
And I'm in sky rock radio...the shadiest bro on the radio
But you dont hear me though



Yeah Soul Intent, checking in
#1 baby this week
You know what I'm sayin'?
This is M.C. Proof

And DJ Head!

Checkin' in on W.E.G.O
You know what I'm sayin'?
Ay yo we got the #1
Requested song, of the day
Coming up next
It's a local 313 talent
He goes by the name of Eminem
And it's called "It's OK"



Thanks it's been real
I love you but I just can't deal
With the stress this game is giving me...
But before I go
You know
I can't close the show
Without no closure
So before I leave...

Yeah
I just want to take the time out
To basically say
Rest In Peace
To Deshaun Holton
That's my heart man
Dr. Dre
For giving me the opportunity
Just to even listen to me
To get me to this point
I wanna thank Jimmy Iovine
Interscope, Aftermath
Everybody in the whole Shady staff
Everybody who’s basically supported me from day one
Paul Rosenberg, Tracy McNew
You know I love you guys
I couldn't do it all without you
Ca$his, your gonna be a beast when you get out there man
Trust me homie, my ears don't lie to me
Who else am I forgetting
Oh yeah, Obie Trice
Bobby Creekwater, and basically man
The whole city of Detroit
8 mile road for making what I am today
Which basically goes back to Proof and D12
I love you guys man
Runyon Ave for holding me down when shit got thick
Oh, it wouldn't be complete, If I didn't
Thank my mom, bitch




Obie the person that came up introverted
'Cause of nervousness, that was solely the only verdict
It was worth it 'cause he changed, became so observant
Servin' such of a purpose
If you knew him earlier in his days, it's like a different version
So much hurtin' and pain gave him game for certain
That's why it's curtains in this murder, if you get him worked up
I'm so assertive on these muthafuckas acting tougher
Had enough of isolatin' myself in a room
Writing poems and songs, doing the same in school
Now look what he became, a fool
'Cause he learned how to sustain his tool and obtain fame from you
Livin' hard but still Julliard
A god walks and ain't spend a day in the pew
Regardless of this I draw visual, pictures when a nigga vents
So welcome to the art department

I stimulate the brain, mimic, emulate the sane
Cynics keep on thinkin' it's a fuckin' gimmick when it ain't
Clinically insane, brain is on Venus, up Uranus
Label me a genius if you ever seen us you would say
"He may seem as though he's plain normal" if you ever meet him
Greet him with a shake, see he ain't as mean as what they say
See the thing is maybe he can't always think of things to say
So he's vague, so they mistake him for bein' crazed
You part ways, your impression of him changed
You don't think he's strange, you turn around and tell him; "Peace and thanks"
You catch him flippin' you off, with his pants down
Hands around his scrotum, tuckin' his fuckin' penis between his legs

Obie the person that came up introverted
'Cause of nervousness, that was solely the only verdict
It was worth it 'cause he changed, became so observant
Servin' such of a purpose
If you knew him earlier in his days, it's like a different version
So much hurtin' and pain gave him game for certain
That's why it's curtains in this murder, if you get him worked up
I'm so assertive on these muthafuckas acting tougher
Had enough of isolating myself in a room
Writing poems and songs, doing the same in school
Now look what he became, a fool
'Cause he learned how to sustain his tool and obtain fame from you
Livin' hard but still Julliard
A god walks and ain't spend a day in the pew
Regardless of this I draw visual, pictures when a nigga vents
So welcome to the art department

It's all psychologic, why am I so maniacal?
Am I a psycho or some kind of psychotic shtick?
Or am I truly psychotic? Or my molecules just diabolical?
'Cause biologically, I defy logic
By golly, haul me off on a trolly
Probably want a quack, or I'm back on that whacky tobacca
I'ma step away from crack, Obie smacked the shit out of me
I'm so slap happy, man, snap me back to reality
I'm a walkin' art gallery, a science museum
Elephantitis of the nuts, you'd probably die if you see them
I pull them out, they hit the ground and probably crack the cement







Met a retarded kid name Greg, with a wooden leg
Snatched it off and beat him over the fucking head with the peg
Go to bed with the keg, wake up with a 40
Mix it with Alka Seltzer and formula 44-D
Fuck an acid tab, I strap the whole sheet to my forehead
Waited till it absorbed in and fell to the floor dead
No more said, case closed, end of discussion
I’m blowin' up like spontaneous human combustion
Leavin' you in the aftermath of holocaust and traumas
Cross tha bombers
We blowin' up your house, killin' your parents, and comin' back to get your foster mommas
And I'm as good at keepin' a promise as Nostradamus
'Cause I ain't makin' no more threats
I'm doin' drive-bys in tinted Corvettes on Vietnam war vets
I'm more or less sick in the head, maybe more
'Cause I smoked crack today, yesterday, and the day before
Saboteur, walk the block with a labrador
Strapped with more corral for war than El Salvador
Foul style galore, verbal cow manure
Comin' together like an eyebrow on Al B. Sure!



Skylar Montgomery?

What do you want from me Roger?

I know it was you all along messing around with my dear Veronica!

Wait a minute, you hold it right there. Me and that woman love each other!

Love!? What do you know of love?

We were destined to be together. I met her on the beach!

Are you out to destroy me?

No Roger. That's not what I want to do
I love her! And we're going to be together

Never!







I have no idea what I'm doing
I have no idea what I'm doing, but

Everybody get up, sit up Christopher
They're miserable without you, Superman is a-
-live and he's flowing like the Mystic River
Girl dont act like you never been kissed before
One, two, three, four, five, six, this a
Rhyme is about to hit you right in the kisser
How did anybody ever find me, I disap-
-peared I was hiding in Freeway's beard, just a
Hop skip and a jump from my skin, gushing
Nails into my face that I been pushing
Hellraiser, my face is my pincushion
It's like when I'm on the mic, I can squish a
Sucker like a vice-grip, my pen put ya
In the slaughterhouse cause ya styles been butchered
I'll spin chainsaw, take off like the blades on
My brain's on hyperdrive someone put the brakes on

Here's a smidget admitted to get your digits, Bridget
Don't try to fidget with it, err ribbit, ribbit
I got ya slippin on my swag juice, my swag juice
I got ya slippin on my swag juice, my swag juice

I got it figure out now nigga
See, my minds on my money right here
And no one stopping how getting it
And Heinz should never left when I was Living
And probably wouldn't be getting pressed by all these women
And then again, I wouldn’t rap the ones I was diggin'
So annihilate the looking, and talking alot about the hood; Kim'n, Kim'n
Uh, So selena wheels, just like my dad talks about more John Dick'n
This girl talkin' how she pregrent, she crazy, so later I crushed that ho, and left baby
And never trust her, no shit! Even she specialize in massaging on my testicles
And I never trust her, a whole lot, even on the first date, she basically get her mouth rimmed
And turn around and ask me for a kiss, no bitch I’m straight
And I never really get concerned how my own dick tastes
I think I’m about to slip on my swag juice
I think I’m about to slip on your swag juice
Ye, ye! I think I’m about to slip on my swag juice


Slim is in the house, simmer down there sister
Bound to get you dizzy cause he gets as busy as a
Bee, baby you can throw a frizbee in a blizzard
He'll catch it in his teeth, what is he? He's a wizard
Standing in the disco with a disco biscuit
And I'm pretty sure it isn't Bisquick, is it?
Now baby don't forget to bring your lipstick with ya
I want a kiss 'fore I blow this bitch to smithe-
-reens, get the guillotines, this is a situ-
-ation that's critical as Dre spins his, uh
Turntables and he cuts a record like a scissor
Cheka chicka, checka chicka, cheka-cheka chicka
Who wreck it in a second tell me what the heck is sicker
Wait a minute, I just dropped my necklace in the liquor
Now baby just to make a little breakfast and it's six o-
-clock in the morning 'less you want to get some dessert




It's only fair to warn
I was born with a set of horns
And metaphors attached to my dang umbilical cord
Warlord of rap that'll bash you with a 2 by 4 board
And smash into your Honda Accord with a four door Ford
But I'm more toward droppin' an acapella
To chop a fella to Mozzarella worse than a helicopter propeller
Got you locked in a cellar
With your skeleton showing
Developing anorexia while I'm standing next to ya
Eating a full course meal watching you starve to death
With an IV in your vein feeding you liquid Darvocet
Pumping you full of drugs
Pull the plugs on the gunshot victims full of bullet slugs
Who were picked up in an ambulance and driven
To Receiving with the asses ripped out of they pants
And given a less than 20 percent chance of living
Have a possible placement as a hospital patient
Storing the dead bodies in Grandma's little basement
Doctor Kevorkian has arrived
To perform an autopsy on you
While you scream "I'M STILL ALIVE!"
Driving a rusty scalpel in through the top of your scalp
And pulling your Adam's apple out through your mouth
Better call the fire department
I've hired an arson to set fire to carpet
And burn up your entire apartment



You probably gonna think that I'm talking
About you and you goddamn right I am
Look at you, this is the minimal I could diss you
Subliminally, but I think criminal instinct
Has pushed me to the brink, my pussy does it stink
He still loves me 'cause he puts me in his ink
He does, doesn't he, still is, isn't he?
Nah, I'm just playing tug of war with his heart 'cause he misses me
I can still fuck him and leave him whenever I feel frisky
And is no risk of disease 'cause he ain't with anyone is he?
This bitch really thinks she can get me
If she still wants me, driving across country
Strapped up to the front seat, missing all her front teeth
Thinking to herself when's the next time he's gonna punch me?
I told this cunt she's gonna overdo it once
And once she does, she was stuffed up in a trunk
Crunch, he scrunched her up in a ball
Bunched up nice and comfy
Fuck around get dumped up in a lake 'fore you dump me
You cunning little cunt, deceitful witch
You thought you had me, 'till my shrink told me this

The problem is all inside your head she said to me
The answer is easy if you take it logically
I'd like to help you in your struggle to be free
There must be 50 ways to leave your lover

I feel like a serial killer, I keep dumping bodies in the lake
I'mma get caught and send up the river
I shiver when I think of the company I keep
How do I know she ain't gonna kill me when I sleep
I shriek, every time she hands me something to drink
Sex kept us together, when we slept together every-thing
Was all better, she made me feel like a king
Slowly she began lowering my self-esteem
She go to the club and not answer the phone when I call her
And I just bought her a truck for 50,000 dollars
Accused me of doing drugs and scream n' holla
Then I find a bag of coke on her, some marijuana
And all I know is every time I go
To them hiding spots, wherever she hides her blow
The little bags of dope, there was a pile of coke
That's growing smaller, and that was just a while ago
And I wouldn't even let on like I know
What was I supposed to do? Call her out on it, we just argue
Say she put it there on purpose and flipped the whole script
Ooh she's a manipulative evil bitch
A cunning little cunt, little deceitful witch
She thought she had me, 'till my shrink told me this

The problem is all inside your head she said to me
The answer is easy if you take it logically
I'd like to help you in your struggle to be free
There must be 50 ways to leave your lover






Is this thing on?
Where'd everybody go?
Guess who's back?
Back again…
Ken is back, tell some…men
Rub my back, Rub my back, Rub my back, Rub my back…
Eh….Wait…..Hello?
Eh…..Goodnight



I'm keepin' it raw, illegal like Malik and Jamal
Cause I don't believe in the law, like I'm Steven Seagal
Flippin' off the police while I'm leapin' a wall
Take some Tylenol, then fall asleep in a mall
I got ya little son, you'll be receivin' a call
You lucky this little punks still breathin' at all
Fuck the world, this how I get even at y'all
Pop shit, get rolled up and leave in a ball
I hit you in your mouth and sink ya teeth in ya jaws
You won't be able to eat shit, not even a malt
This lethal assault, is givin' you a reason to stall
I'm cockin' this deuce deuce and I'm squeezin' it off
At the first burp, fart sniffle a sneeze and a cough
Get your arm chewed off like you was teasin' a dog
I'm cold enough and hot enough to freeze and unthaw
I'll kick my girl out, in 10 degrees in her bra
You faggots turn yellow like the trees in the fall
All that's left of your niece is a piece of her doll
And all that's left of her puppy is a leash and a paw









Dear Afeni


Love

Marshall



Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!

Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!

I guess that makes me the captain, hit the mattress
Pistol packing, sick assassin
Hit the gas and, get to mashing
D12 broke up, who you bitches asking?
Our clique's relaxing in the hills of Aspen
Popping pills and Aspirin
And I'm the machine that brought Marshall back to life
Told him that my rhymes just have to be tight
So I figured that I would grab the mic
Like a nigga bout to rhyme right after Christ
Sometimes we get mad and fight, right back to the lab tonight
Grab an o and I have to light
That's only right, living like a rock star is the only life!
And we are, six grown men, who are old friends
To my nigga Bugz, DeShaun Holton

Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!

Alot of niggas try to underestimate me
Till I come back with vengeance and slice their trachea
Yall been placed on a contract for hating
I'mma waste them, one by one, for tainting
My ability to kill a facility, I'mma send them to Satan
Fast as a child rapist facing
Life or trifle, Henny has made me in waiting
They gon' lock me up under the basement
I'm a one man army, marine and navy
You done made me angry, I'm crazy, insane
And maybe I bite the face off your baby
For anyone who try to diss Proof or Hailie
I'mma break their Halo
Put them on the reaper's payroll, erase them and hang their soul
It ain't no hoes here, McVay got a scroll
With names on it, dipped in blood, man I'm cold

Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!

I know you thought we were done, we rose up
Got a gun to make your whole inside fold up
They hit us with the best shot and we're still standing
So tell the world it can lick our scrotum
Straight soldiers, who wanna stunt?
Who wanna be the fall guy? Who want the pump?
Who wanna get slumped just for looking at me sideways
Every time I roll up I'mma keep it blunt
Where did y'all run when we almost lost Marshall?
Y'all did it big like Costco
And we back in this bitch like a tampon
Still talk dirty, Em's clean like a bar of soap
And you will soon slip, on some buffoon shit
My hand's on a sweeper, yours on a broomstick
So stop looking all stupid, I'm rude and abusive
And strapped, don't make me use it

Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!

Aight, here's where I come in at
I came in this game with, bad intentions
And I ain't budged, not even an inch since then
I'm stubborn, evil, and insensitive
I'm like nothing you ever seen, pencil in
Hand, it's like I'm holding the insulin
So you might wanna button it like Benjamin
I ain't frightened of nothing, I injure men
Step right in this mark with my henchmen and
Walk, straight to the stage
I ain't here to cause trouble, get the fuck out my face
Fall back, little cocksucker
I ain't A&W, don't get your cold mugs in my way
Get 'em? Shattered, fucking A
Been this way since B.C., what can I say?
I'm stuck in my ways like double stick tape
Don't get turned to a vegetable dick face
You ain't Superman, stay in your lane, Lois
D12 spitting flames like flamethrowers
Spit 'til we get sprained jaws with metaphors
That cut with the same force as chainsaws
Hope you're coming with your A game
Cause things have changed in this game, isn't the same game, boys
The stakes have been raised, better make lemonade
When they give you lemons, if they want us, let 'em aim for us

Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Hit me with your best shot!
Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!
Come on! Put me in my place!



Mr. Mathers?
Mr. Mathers!
Mr. Mathers...
Mr. Mathers, can you hear my voice?
Okay, he's not responding
I'm gonna need an 18 gauge, left AC, right away

Uh, BP is 90 over palp, respiration's at 8
Okay, I'm tubing him

DMC, this is medic 41

Medic 41, this is DMC base, MIC. I'm Betty, go ahead

He's cold, spike a bag and grab the backboard

Let's move






I never meant to give you mushrooms, girl
I never meant to bring you to my world
And now you're lying in the corner crying...



Kick a hypest lyric every time I run upon a track
You know I'm not wack
You have to step back
Cause if you don't I'll prove that I'm the mac
Every time I kick a lyric tune it to 2 95
Yo do you find me live?
If you don't then that's alright cause I'll just grab the microphone
And I just got to get so hype when I speak in a hyper tone
There's so many styles I might get thrown
And here's a place where I like to roam
And all the girls that I like to bone
Have the big butts, no they don't
Cause I don't like that nigga shit
I'm just here to make a bigga hit
When I be kickin' the hypest dopest rhymes
Just say that M&M is the best MC in of all times



Artwork
Alternate Artwork



I wasn't born mean I was pushed to treachery
I walked the streets looking for some puss to fetch me
I like a veggie brain, turn to mush, I'm edgy
Edgy enough to give Reggie Bush a wedgie
If he don't give me Kim things could get messy
So pass that ass to me, let me squish the left cheek
And pressed against the right one till it's smushed against me
And leave a dead body in the woods the MC
With the Christopher Reeves beef, we started off on the wrong foot
Or should I say fake leg, made outta wood? I shouldn't, yes I should
Riding through the hood, I'm chilling with Westwood
I'm quite mellow, a white fellow
My pee is bright yellow, I like jello, I'm like hello
To a cute little dike on the mic, I'm kinda like
Iron Mike cos I bite earlobes

Me and Westwood blasting off
Jacking off in a pair of Acid Wash, bumping Asher Roth
Crusin Gratiot till I damn near﻿ crash the car
Tryna smash a moth on the dash, hit the overpass-went off
Over the bridge, into on coming traffic
Caused a massive 42 car pile up, not a scratch at all
Hocked up holding a axe and saw
Jason mask is off but my face is plastered in Tabasco sauce
Spitting flames, kicking fire out ya ass
Ya little bastard, you can pass it on, I'm battery acid dog
You don't wanna get my ass ticked off
I'm harder than playing basketball when I'm going through crack withdraw
Dick's so big it's like elastic
I tie it in a knot and it looks like Mr. Fantastic
Crossed the path of plastic man, with a drastic force and went spastic
Put my penis on Classic Sports



Yo, B-Rabbit? Ha
This silly rabbit don’t like lettuce I heard he likes dicks
Faggot niggas
With ponytails and lipstick
I’m for real
Don’t give a fuck
What, what, hoho
It’s like this
Eastside’s where I’m from
You got beef?
Hit me on the street with a badge and a gun
Fuck a badge
I’m comin through with black mags
Bout to
Do this B-Rabbit nigga cause he’s a fag
Like I said earlier in the claw...

Alright look
I can see that I'm put to the test
Battling this chick…
With no breast
And why I gotta battle a chick
Especially one that’s wack…
With a dick
So you a dope MC?
Don’t get mad and start taking your period out on me
Cause I ain’t done shit to you
What’s your name confusion
Well then I guess I gotta confuse you
This ain’t something I’m used to
Why the fuck did Future even introduce you
I really don’t understand
Why this chick is up her right now who wants to be a man
On this mic is rat-a-tat-tat
Why the fuck am I up here battling Da Brat
You don’t even really wanna see this
On this microphone I will eat your fuckin fetus. Yo!






Have a history of confusion or poor judgment
Are allergic to tympanic stimulators
Are pregnant or nursing

Fleem's syndrome
Mild to disfiguring acne
Brain problems
Male pattern baldness, most commonly in women
Rage
Decreased appetite
Increased appetite
Seasonal affective disorder
Loose gums
Gluten sensitivity
Toothpain
Tight glutes
General feeling of head trauma
Softening of fingernails
Dramatically increased hair growth
Sudden nut allergies
Ringing in your mouth
and Light-leggedness

Fever, sweats or chills
Muscle ache
Cough
Shortness of breath
Blood and phlegm
Weight loss
Warm, red, or painful skin or sores on your body
Diarrhea or stomach pain
Burning when you urinate
Chills when you urinate
Urinating more often than normal
Feeling very tired or night sleeping
Revival does not cause you side effects but if you have them you should definitely seek medical attention.



WAAAAHHHHHHHOOOOOOOOOOO!!! {*laughs*}
Guess who's back?!?!
Mommy! We're home!!
Say hello to my little friends
DJ Muggs, Soul Assassins, Cypress Hill
Everybody! Put your hands where my eyes can see!!!

Everywhere we go people know that we roll deep as fuck
Fourty fifty Samoans, they knowing when D-Bo was
50, Tweezy, Obie there won't be no ho in us
They pop shit like they gon do shit but no one does
From New York down to Texas, back up to Los Angeles
We've changed the way we move so man up if you can't adjust
You may end up getting rushed by too many to handle us
It's funny, I guess money does have its advantages
And it isn't that we just think that we can't be touched
It's not like we're just feeling ourselves that much
It's just, that if someone ever does put us in the clutch
We just know that y'all ain't gon be the one who's gon do it
Cause first of all you're pussy and everybody can see that
You fuck around, get caught in a spot that you shouldn't be at
That you got no business being in, we ain't even gon be in it
No one's gunna hear nothing, no one's gunna see this shit
And they'll be in and up out of it, them boys is bout it, bout it
The noise from clips and rounds be drowned out by the crowd
And you'll be laying on the ground getting trampled by people dancing
Till the club closes, and clears out
And that's when they see you flatened
Nobody saw it happen, all cause your jaws are flapping
And you couldn't stop yapping and took it past rapping
It ain't about the music no more, it's bout trying to show off
And it feels like any minute the bomb is bout to go off

About to change, cause we ain't playing no games
We ain't budging neither are they, we ain't saying no names
Shit just ain't the same, when the Aks gettin' sprayed cause
Hip-hop is in a state of 911
It ain't about hip-hop, cause those days are gone
It ain't about trying rip shots, to get props no more
It's about trying not to get popped, and get dropped to the floor
Cause hip-hop is in a state of 911

Step off my holster cause shit it's getting serious
All theses drugs you be fucking with make you delirious
Thinking you coming with heat, yo son, I'm curious
How long are you gunna hate us and judge us and jury us?
Some people can never fade us, that make us so furious
Mistake us for fakers, homie we greater and glorious
We living for real and others just making the stories up
Illusions are broken, so live it up, you corny fucks
If you take a fucking minute to think about what you've done
When you stood against a gangsta who live and die by the gun
Got a hot one, spraying you bitches til there is none
I'm like a rolling stone homie, I got you under my thumb
Silly little bitches can end up right up in ditches
We cut you and give you stitches, for envy and all my riches
Your game's just like a midget, you're clocking a small digit
Dealing with the Giant Goliath, people that's how we live it, c'mon


Uh, gangsta Ganxsta who come to pay you a visit
On this shit you call hip-hop, this function is where did it
When I - put it in motion, my focus is getting branded
My appetite for destruction is blasted because I said it
Got you - stumbling for cover, this music dying in numbers
But you wouldn't pause and wonder, admitting it's all glamour
When you - enter the business you thinking you running shit
You witness that funny shit, your bitches they ain't shit!
We gangstas we blast first, ask questions later
All these - imitators parading like they some playas
Trying to - save hip-hop the task is something greater
Cause we old fashioned coded with loyalty motivaters
Get caught, I'm not telling, or more like killing not caring
I'm riding a - gangsta feeling, no fearing when gangstas dying
I'm in a - full circle with homies that's supposed to bleed
On an 8 Mile mission with Cypress and O.G.'s




Oh Dr Dre. Or should I say Dr Gay
You are very bad man, you diss the wrong motherfucker. You think Osama won't diss you back biaaatch

Things just ain't the same for Osama
So much drama since the World Trade Bombings
And the Pentagon got the whole world calling
The Strangest things can happen to an Afghan
When people get wrapped up in Islam and Allah
Then some shiteaters fly planes and wreak havoc
Then go drop the blame on Bin Laden
Now I got a faggot-ass rapper attacking me
With this gangsta rap, like I'm not gonna battle
Dr Dre? The man wasn't done shit since NWA
And gave Eazy-E AIDS
Don't make me go Suge Knight on your fat ass
You homofuck, you ain't the only one goin' platinum
Osama Bin Laden, keeping it gangsta
Fuck Dr Dre, I'm the Aftermath

Everywhere that I go ain't the same as before
People I used to know just don't know me no more
And everywhere that I go, I got people I know
Who've got people they know, so I suggest you lay low

Oh Dr Dre look at you, you fool
I use your own rap against you, and I'm better
Lick my balls, until they are dry
Sorry... come again *gunshot*
Things just ain't the same for Bin Laden
This planet hates me more than Michael Jackson
Hating on the Taliban for keeping me captive
Threatening to find my little cave and blast it
Now I've got to worry about this wannabe gansta
Who pays other rappers to write his wack shit
Everyone knows that your beats are helped man
And you'll never blow by yourself man
Sorry, you'd blow... blow cocks
Use the hole as a straw and blow sperm out your nostrils
I don't give a hurried fuck, call Slim Shady
Snoop Dogg, D.O.C, Wren and Jay-Z
To write a verse, fuck I'll do it for ya
You still lick dick, this is Booshu Babara
Do you know who, do you know what, do you know who?
Let's keep this between me and you


Osama...
Osama...
Oooosama...
O-o-o-osama...
Biatch



Uh, uh, uh, play that shit
What the fuck you doing Stretch
Gotta stretch your neck
You better protect it
I’mma Inspectah Deck
Ha, ha, ha, ha, ha, ha, ho, ho

Paul Where’s my words at
Yo see Slim Shady yo, where the birds at
Me and Flip the middle ones
Rappers get these little ones in they mouth
These little nuts, yeah
Shit, I don’t care I ain’t afraid to admit it
I got a little dick yeah, but so do you
You scared to admit it
You won’t spit it on this mother friggen mic
Cause I will strike and smack your ass like a friggen fag
And I don’t care if you get offended
I never pretended to rock this microphone beef
You wanna start it now we’ll end it
Cause when I slip in the zone up on this microphone
People want me to do a written rap but fuck that go home
I don’t really give a damn I’ll kick right off of the top
And everything that I drop always gonna remain hot
Let on the spot, Slim, I mean woops, Grim it’s when im dim
Yo, I’m in affect mode
Rappers get they neck sewed
Get they whole threshold fucked up
Get they damn fleshed sewed
Ha, ha
I busted, I kill it, I crush it, I do it, the fluid, I spill it, I’m ill wit
These motherfucking rhymes that I be coming with there running with me
Kick you in the motherfucking stomach shit
Cause you don’t want none of it
Rappers always try but they always die
And rappers always stuck to me and tried to lie
Yo, where my dogs at
In the house, It really doesn’t matter cause I still turn it out
When I step on this mic, smacking your spouse
Ha, Ha
The illest MC to come off the top
When I get this drum off
Yo Strech give me a break, let me catch my friggen breath
And till` the death, bust rhymes till` there’s none left
I’m wanted for theft and robbery
And probably smack a bitch up in the lobby G
Cause she don’t want none of me
I’m the illest MC to ever hold a cordless on the planet earth and you’ll see
That I’m from the friggen D
Ya’ll don’t get my point I’m from Detroit
Smoking fake grass like a joint
That’s the first simplest rhyme I ever said in my life
But, at the end of the night I’ll still be fucking your wife
Shit, I really don’t care your style needs to switch
Cause you ain’t rich, that’s why you ain’t rich
Remain underground, can’t come off the top
You can’t drop rhymes nonstop like this
I might twist my friggen dick up in your ear
Rappers always wanna stand clear
I’m a motherfucking landmine
Ya’ll don’t understand mine
I’m Slim Shady showing out like my tan line
Ha, ha
The illest MC to rhyme
Every time the illest MC of our time
I rhyme time and time twice but I’m nice
With this mic device I slice right through your Adams apple
I had a Snapple and a motherfriggen syringe
Up in the bathroom I shouldn’t have but yo I boinked
To any MC up in this shit who want some
To any MC who wanna step up and get some
Get done, fuck competition
Let me catch my breath one more time
Yo, I’m on a mission
To stomp any MC comp I just trunked
And swamp is this truamp a word?, no its not
Yo, but here I go with this lyrical, lyricols, spiritual flows, that I slow
Driving MC’s crazy, Slim Shady, up in your motherfucking radio baby



Hey Em, its Paul, uh, listen, I just got a call from the label
And you're probably not gonna be surprised but, um
Michael Jackson is extremely upset about the Just Lose It video
And, um, I mean he's pissed, so I don't know what he's gonna do
But we gotta talk about how we're gonna handle this
Um, oh yeah, anyway, somebody told me that, um
They heard a rumor that you got a new gun
Um, I know it's probably not true
But I just need to talk to you about that
So, um, gimme a call



I'll spit a racial slur, honky sue me
This shit is a horror flick, but the black guy doesn't die in this movie
Fucking with Lotto? Dawg, you gotta be kiddin'
That makes me believe you really don't have an interest in livin'
You think these niggas gonna feel the shit you say?
I've got a better chance joining the KKK
On some real shit though, I like you
That's why I didn't wanna have to be the one you commit suicide to
Fuck "Lotto," call me your leader
I feel bad that I gotta murder that dude from "Leave it to Beaver"
I used to like that show, but now you got me in fight-back mode
But oh well, if you gotta go then you gotta go
I hate to do this, I would love for this shit to last
So I'll take pictures of my rear end so you won't forget my ass
And all's well that ends okay
So I'll end this shit with a "Fuck you" and "Have a nice day!"

Ward, I think you were a little hard on the Beaver
So was Eddie Haskell, Wally, and Ms. Cleaver
This guy keeps screaming, he's paranoid
Quick, someone get his ass another steroid
"Blah-badi-boo-blah, bah-badi-bloo-blah!"
Is that a tank-top or a new bra?
Look, Snoop Dogg just got a fuckin' boobjob
Didn't you listen to the last round, meat-head?
Pay attention, you're sayin the same shit that he said
Matter of fact dawg, here's a pencil
Go home, write some shit, make it suspensful
And don't come back until something dope hits you
Fuck it, you can take the mic home with you
Looking like a cyclone hit you
Tank-top screaming, "Lotto, I don't fit you!"
We'll see how far them white jokes get you
Boys like, "How Vanilla Ice gon' diss you?"
My motto? "Fuck Lotto"
I'll get the seven digits from your mother for a dollar tomorrow



Alright, let's go
Yeah! Welcome to the official
Brought to you by none other than the mother fuckin'
Notorious, infamous, DJ Clinton Sparks!
Whoo!

Once again it's the kid, yeah, eat a dick up
Pick up them nuts boy, lick up 'til you hiccup
Sick mo'fucka, yeah, same sick mug, it's the stick up
His middle finger and go chica-chica-chica
Hi! My name is Chica-chica-chica
Chica-chica-chica-chica-chica-chica-chica
Till this shit was stuck in your head
So much you were sick of I'mma teach love
In these boys say fuck a bitch say your daughter
And so we took this shit more
Choke a slut, smack a bitch whore
Beat a bitch up
Look at these kids they eat this shit up
And this was before I even knew what this shit was
It's affecting what it does
Parents come picking at us
Meanwhile ticket sales have just skyrocketed up
So shit fuck, shit fuck, shit fuck
Fuck you suck a dick slut
But I gotta go, it's time for me to go and pick up
Jessica, it's official I just broke her and Nick up




Die Bitches, Check it out bitches
All you bitch ass rappers
Need to get your clit repierced, Look at me, hip, I'm Britney Spears
Look at the way I wear my mascara
How you doing
I'm Pristina Gaguilera, And I sing songs about a genie in a bottle
And I'm Britney Spears
I got big tits, I'm a role model
To all little kids
But I got breast implants
That was the only way to get my chest enhanced
And here I go with the lyrical, miracle, spiritual everytime im incredible
With freestyles from the top that I drop
And my instinct
Is to kill N'Sync
And the Backstreet Boys
It really doesn't matter coz' I got a scratchy voice
Yo, check it out
But you ask me I ain't gonna be happy til' I see every member of the Backstreet Boys
Getting their ass beat
In the back seat of a taxi, And dropped of on the real backstreet
And somebody black sees five little rich white boys
Looking like faggots
With the N painted on the back of their jackets


Ohhhhh
And god damn it
Can't stop there
What's up?
It's over
And this just Some Bacardi and Mountain Dew


And wonder how we tune is
Ten million




Ésto está a punto de empezar, esta fiesta tiene pinta de coñazo
Vamos a volver al hip-hop puro y empezar desde cero
Voy a dejarle sangriento a este tema, echáos para atrás
Por eso mi boli necesita un cuaderno porque mi rap tiene la regla
Al igual que hice con la adicción, voy a rapear
Como un mago, a los críticos los convierto en grillos
Todavía no saben si protestarlo o comprarlo
Pero no tardan nada en ser ensartados cuando los mando a tomar por culo
Soy tan crack que se me ve pálido, pues bueno, así es mi pigmentación
Voy a darlo todo, ya bish, qué pasa Kendrick
Vamos a volver al Slim original, puta
El arte del MC mezclado con da Vinci y MC Ren
Y no me refiero al amigo de Stimpy, puta
He sido enemigo público desde que pensabas que PE era la educación física


Quítate los zapatos, suéltate el pelo y vuélvete loco toda la noche
Déjate crecer la barba, sé un bicho raro y vuélvete loco toda la noche


Vamos a darlo todo hasta derrumbar la casa
Así que sube el volumen, porque va a ser un caos hasta la madrugada
Así que nena, haz como K-Fed y pierde control, pierde control
Di que te la pela todo, antes de que la diñemos
La vida es demasiado corta como para no echarle toda la carne al asador
Así que todo el mundo, todo el mundo, volvéos locos, bailad



Será por cómo me visto, verdad?
Pantalón planchado, Nikes sin estrenar
Así que supongo que no ha sido
La colonia o la loción aftershave que les ha hecho desmayarse
Además, acabo de aparecer con un abrigo más guay que la pintura fresca
Así que, si el amor es una partida de ajedrez, jaque mate
Pero tu chica tiene cuerpazo, quiero unirme, gang - bang-bang
Si señor, estaba pensando lo mismo
P-p-p pow-pow chicka-chicka wow-wow
Coger un taxi, quiero bajar b-b-bow, bow
Ir más despacio, tirar la toalla, t-t-towel toww
Por lo menos sé que no lo sé
La pregunta es si vosotros payasos son suficientemente listos como para sentiros estúpidos
Espero que sí, y ahora perra...



Se dice que el amor es tan fuerte como el jarabe de tos y el poliestireno
Pero lo que está claro es que me quedé dormido y me desperté en aquel Monte Carlo
Con la Kardashian fea
Lamar, ah, lo siento, hemos puesto el listón muy bajo los dos
Rimas duras, drogas duras, aunque eso es el pasado
Pero he tomado codeína suficiente como para lanzar Future al día siguiente
Nena, no tengo dinero que prestarte
Pero estoy buscando una manera de estar contigo sola, financiación!
Oh, Marshall Mathers, todos deberían saberlo ya
Haced espuma con el jabón de barra, Kangols y Carhartt-less Cargos
Nena vas a acabar con el corazón roto, no digas tonterías
Niña lerda, no le he dicho "baby" a nadie desde Birdman
A no ser que eres una golondrina
Eso es lo que hay, pero no te desanimes nena
Este es tu tema, a menos que tengas mugre entre los dedos del pie...

_________________________________________________________

Traducción ofrecida por el equipo de Rap Genius España.
Lee la versión original de esta canción aquí.



Yea, yea, we back again, we doin' our shit, yo
Word up, I wanna hear some fly shit
You know what I'm sayin', some get high shit
Word up, I wanna hear some white boy shit, man
Yo, I wanna hear some Eminem, man
Talkin' about all that shit he be doin'

You ain't into fuckin' drugs, fuck you
You don't do ecstasy, fuck you
You don't pop mushrooms, fuck you
If you don't wanna tab of acid, fuck you

I'm nauseous in this place, I need some office space
The boss is late, I wanna slap the mustache right off his face
I'm ready to go postal, I'm so close
I can almost feel his throat with no pulse when I choke him
In ten seconds I'mma turn into Hulk Hogan
With a cigarette in his mouth
He tells me there's no smokin'
I'm sick of this shit, it's ridiculous
All I picture is kickin' his ass
When he's taking his ashes and flickin' 'em
I'm sick of these stamps
I'm sick of lickin' 'em, sick of stickin' 'em
I'm sick of lookin' at 'em, I'm sick of 'em
"Alright, Mr. Mathers, pick 'em up!"
No you pick 'em up! Bitch, stick 'em up
Get against the wall, senior citizens and all
I can't take this shit no more, everybody hit the floor
Get the door, close it and lock it
Put your wallets back in your pocket, I don't want dollars
Ain't none of us walkin' out of this office

Faggot, fuck you, work at the post office, fuck you
Talkin' shit to me, tellin' me to take out
The goddamn garbage, fuck you
If you're a fuckin' dick, fuck you
If you're a white rapper, fuck you
Talk shit about Stretch? You're cool
But if you don't talk shit about Stretch, fuck you
If you're a fuckin' punk, fuck you
Talk shit about me, fuck you
You wanna battle me, fuck you
I ain't got to say shit to you but fuck you



Duh, duh, duh, duh, duh, we still on?
Yo, is the mic on?
Check, check, check, a'ight, it's good, let's go on
Let's go, come on



A body map of Eminem's tattoos, starting from the top-right, working down to bottom-left
Hailie Jade
Slit Me
Proof
Tribal band




May I have your attention please
May I have your attention please
Will the real Slim Shady please stand up
I repeat, will the real Slim Shady please stand up
We're gonna have a problem here

Y'all act like you never seen a White person before
Jaws all on the floor like Pam, like Tommy just burst in the door
And started whoopin' her butt worse than before
They first were divorced, throwin' her over furniture
It's the return of the... "ah wait, no way, you're kidding
He didn't just say what I think he did, did he"
And Dr. Dre said...nothin' you idiots
All of these women love Eminem
"Chigga chigga chigga Slim Shady, I'm sick of him
Look at him, walking around grabbing his you-know-what
Flipping the you-know-who," "yeah, but he's so cute though"
Yeah, I probably got a couple of screws up in my head loose
But no worse than what's going on when you don't let loose
Sometimes I wanna get on TV and just let loose, but can't
But it's cool for your mom to cook me a dead moose
"Kim never gave me a kiss, Kim never gave me a kiss"
And if I'm lucky, you might just give Kim a little flip

We ain't nothing but mammals -- well, some of us, cannibals
Who cut other rappers open like antelopes
But if we can kill animals and antelopes
Then there's no reason that a man and another man can't elope
But if you feel like I feel, I got the antidote
Women wave your pantyhose, sing the chorus and it goes

I'm Slim Shady, yes I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up

Will Smith don't gotta cuss in his raps to sell records
Well, I do; so he sucks and so do you
You think I give a damn about a Grammy
Half of you critics can't even stomach me, let alone stand me
But Slim, what if you win, wouldn't it be weird
Why, so you guys could just lie to get me here
So you can sit me here next to Britney Spears
This woman put me on blast on MTV
"Yeah he's cute, but I think he's married to Kim, hee-hee"
I should download an audio on MP3
And show the whole world how you made the whole world garbage to me
So I have been sent here to destroy you
And there's a million of us just like me
Who cuss like me; who just don't give a stuck like me
Who dress like me; walk, talk and act like me
And just might be the next best thing but not quite me


I'm like a head trip to listen to, cause I'm only giving you
Things you joke about with your friends inside your living room
In front of y'all and I don't gotta be false or sugarcoat it at all
I just get on the mic and spit it
And whether you like to admit it, I just crap it
Better than 90% of you rappers out can
Then you wonder how can kids eat up these albums like his name is Caleb
It's funny; cause at the rate I'm going, when I'm 30
Every single person is a Slim Shady lurking
He could be working at Burger King, spittin' on your onion rings
Or in the parking lot, circling
With his windows down and his system up
So, will the real Shady please stand up
And put one of those fingers on each hand up
And be proud to be outta your mind and outta control
And one more time, loud as you can, how does it go


Ha ha, I guess there’s a Slim Shady in all of us
Damn it, let’s all stand up




But folks, I wanna take you to the World Premiere of one of his new videos, called Berzerk. Take a listen, it's headed to the top of the charts.


























Marshall, again, it was a pleasure having you with us here tonight.















Broke the rubber
Busted a nut up in your mother
So how you feel about having another little brother
Nasty motherfucker
Talking like a trucker
Snatch your bitch up out of your track
I Smack her up and fuck her
Always talk shit high
Smoking chocolate Thai
So y'all can die
Just by walking by giving an awkward eye
I've lost my motherfreaking marbles
Smelling like a brewery
Jewelling at the way your jewellery sparkles
Head full of charcoals
Smoked out brain particles
Burning holes in clothes articles
A retarded fool since I started school
Burned the weed before I learned to read
Disregarded rules
Skip the classes to blaze the blunt ashes
Kissing front dashes and smashing up cars like stunt crashes
Hall passes for restrooms
Chewing mushrooms
Doing rush fumes in the lunch room
Looking nervous
Liquor in my thermos
Hung with hermits who carry guns without permits
Staring at the bitch with firm tits
Jacking off
Aiming straight for both lips when my sperm spits



I know this girl
Her name is Lily
And it's past her bed
T-I-M-E
She goes to sleep
And she can just dream
And not have to be
In a stinky trailer with me
So when I feel blue
Don't know what to do
I look at you
And I just say *Raspberry Noise*



First Word, Excrement

Exclimate, is that what you said?
My next defense, against these extra men
Who try to step to me and wanna have sex again


You little sickass, I'll spray em with gasoline
They try to jack me off with Vaseline
My ass is mean, I smash your spleen
When I crash the scene


With a cell phone, now who the hell is home?
Y'all can't tell Paul how to throw me words


Cause animal crackers is what I do when I eat MC's like a cannibal backwards
Ha ha, I got it, that's not it
Fake rappers been spotted


Like broken headphones, you head home, you sped home
You get your head blown, rappers try to step, they speak in the dead tones
So I ain't trying to hear them, give me another, word for your mother


Stretch Armstrong, my brother, coming with rhymes every time that I be drumming
Running with this shit when I kick a bitch in the stomach
And star wars, this car's a Taurus
Yo, how many bars we hit tonight, cause I'm drunk off


Off peanut butter, you see my dick and you start to stutter
Start to utter, words that you shouldn't utter


Cause Mark Whalberg is a small turd, and I'mma step on him like dogshit
A fore fist, so rappers just get off it, I come across with


With pulp fiction, yo I'll eat you like a big gulp addiction
Got brain damage, I'm dumber than rain man is
There's mayonnaise on this, I need a plain sandwich
Hurry up, give me one, rappers try to step to this static they wanna give me none


With fresh vegetables, my testicles are hanging off to the left of you
You're bisexual, and there's a guy next to you, standing, rappers know that I


Preparation H, you didn't even let me finish my rhyme
Just shut up for one more time, while I just shine, on this
Microphone, cause I'mma be honest, any MC who tries to step to this
I'm making you a promise, that what? Give me a word


That Nostradamus is blowing up your house, killing your foster mammas
And coming back to get your parents, well I have it
These rhymes are fourteen karat, solid gold
Rappers step to me, you get your wallet stole


In Times Square, I got blonde hair, I'm higher than con air
Rappers don't want to see me, I'll butt fuck Goldie Hawn bare
In a lawn chair, cause I'm there


With Kurt Russell, saying "come here Goldie, you want my love muscle?"
I know you want it, I get blunted, then I
Kick these, freestyles just like whipped knees


With a taxicab, I'll smack a bitch with a maxi pad
Where we going? Don't ask me dad
Leave me alone, I'm not trying, to even hear you
Dad, I hope you're fucking dying, off this porno mag
Yo, did you see my ad? Yo, wait a minute, did you see my ass?
Is what I meant to say, I meant to say a rhyme that goes this way is elementary
For the century, Slim Shady's is gonna be the illest


What? Flamingos? My mother goes out and plays bingo
Every single day, at the bingo hall, that's why my dick is single, small
Didn't blow up, just don't give a what? A cuff?
Didn't blow up, just don't give a what? A cuff?


But DT's fired, he's retired, he's not hired, yo plus I'm tired
Of busting and spitting this rhyme nonstop, I'm on top
Taking records to the pawnshop, stretch
Damn, see my big ick? Catch
Put a D in front of it, rappers don't want none of it
Coming with a ton of shit to spill, Slim Shady out, I get ill with the skill
Baby, aight baby, Slim Shady
Kick eighty million rhymes, till I'm older than Grady
Spilled gravy, all over my damn navy blue avi
Bye bye



Woooo! It's Shady aka the Army Shady Records
Break it down

I do a lotta spittin' and I don't gotta try
But I ain't got rhymes to waste so let's make it
I don't say I'm a gangsta, I ain't gotta start fronting
I just call Banks up when I need to pop something

I got a friend of mine, named 50 Cent I signed
This shit's official now, the deals is finished and it's time
To get down to this business, let's get these nicks and dimes
So hurry up and cop, G-Unit shit before it's gone
Its like a gold mine for my man to take nine
And bounce right back, he gotta be like Michael Myers
This shit must be a sign, these labels must be blind
Columbia, I know this must be fucking with they mind
They know they 'bout to cry cause they missed out
But I know how to get the dough cause Dre gave me a business mind
I said in my line, I hit 'em with a nine
I had a empty clip but they ain't check the chamber

I ain't no gangsta, I ain't gotta start fronting
I just call Banks up when I need to pop something
But you gon' feel my shit, you gonna hit the stop button
We fuck you up a long time, you gon' get stomped stunting

Damn 50, this shit's about to hit the fan 50
Fuck happened to Ja?
He got the sickest vendetta, he must think that you betta
He bought to play with his paper, you gonna fuck with this chedda
Now homie think we gon' sweat 'em but we just gon' forget 'em
If he don't shut up we'll dead'em, let Yayo stomp his head in
It's all good cause we'd rather rap then to let a
Pussy play us outta pocket homie, so tell 'em
He better be easy
Start some bullshit, he'll get his whole crew wet
D-Twizzy, Obie, 50 Cent and G-Unit
Yo, he don't want it cause he's always drugged out
You won't see one picture where his pupils ain't bugged out




"So let's get down to business
I don't got no time to play around, what is this?"

{*scratching*} What is this? what is this?


I got 50 Cent, I got G-Unit
D-Tweezy in this bitch, wit Obie Trice!
So watch what you say, 'fore you call our name
Cause you say one more thing and it won't be nice!

Whoa, here we go, I shoulda' known
I was bound to get pulled into some bullshit
Sooner or later you little haters
Are too jealous of us to love us
You hate it G-Unit made it and Obie's coming
D-Tweezy's coming you're sick to your stomach
50 percent of it's 50 cent
The other 50 percent of it's who's color of skin it is
But if you even considerin' taking our label down
You better find our building and fly a fucking plane into it
But I ain't trying to get too intricate into it
I'm just trying to you give you a little hint for your own benefit
Cause then it's gonna get to the point
Where it escalates to some other shit
Then I'm a flip, then I'm a get to
"Stomping in my Air Force Ones"
But you won't be able to tell
If it's two pairs or it's one
It's just gonna feel like so many feet kicking you
You'd think Nike just made these into cleats in this shoe
I don't know what it is or what it could be
But I get a woody when these pussies try to push me
Thinking they gonna put me in a position to pickle me
Y'all tickle me pink
I think I'd just rather have Pink tickle me
Hickory dickory dock, tickety tock tickety
A little bit of the diggedy doc diggedy
Mixed with a little bit of the {*Eminem vocal scratch*}
Wit a small pinch of Biggie
Look at me, I'm just the bomb diggedy

We the realest label
Don't try to act like you don't feel our label
Cause we gon' fuck around and kill your label
Obie, D-Tweezy, G-Unit, 50, Shady records
We the label fa' sho!

We the realest label
Don’t try to act like you don’t feel our label
Cause we gon' fuck around and steal your paper
Obie, D-Tweezy, G-Unit, 50
We gon' kill your fuckin' label fa' sho!

Shady in the place to be see
And I got what it takes to +Roc The Mic+ right!
Still watch what you say to me punk
Cause I'm off probation in less than six months {*gun cocked*}

Haha, Shady Records
Still Aftermath, and don't think we don't
Hear you motherfuckers talkin'!
Cause we do. We see y'all
But we just gon' sit back for a minute
While I see what the FUCK y'all do

































Meeting your maker almost really, is that the inspiration behind it?













Comin' to you live at Shade 45 Invasion
The only radio station that plays in rotation
The Shady the slash with the Aftermath with the little Jay on the...

Comin' to you live at Shade 45 Invasion
The only radio station that plays in rotation
The Shady the slash with the Aftermath with the little Jay on occasion
Maybe you may hear some Jada mixed with a plate of some D Block
Splash of 2Pac
One being that we don't cater cause we gonna play the fuck
Outta whatever we want this is Shady
And we gonna pump, pump the fuck out our own shit
From 50, Obie, Twizzy, Stat Quo
And we won't quit fuckin' you up
And we can keep sayin' fuckin' you up
Even till the FCC sayin' shut this dude up
Duck tape a his mouth a do somethin'
Quick fucka do fuck poppa do pop
Skippy dippy pop shit bitch asshole you son of a bitch! Chinga tu madre!
I start drama all day hemm delala
Comin' across your scanners it's the brand new station
Shade 45, motherfuckin' Slim Shady bitch and Green Lantern
Shady in the place to be, see
And it takes what I got to rock the mic right
And that was a freestyle too bitch so suck my dick if you do not like



Shook Ones, Pt II
Time's Up
Insane In the Brain
8 Mile
Sweet Home Alabama
Juicy
Gotta Get Mine
Gang Stories
This is How we Do It
Feel Me Flow
Players Ball
Get Money
I'll Be There for You
Shimmy Shimmy Ya
Bring the Pain
C.R.E.A.M.
Temptations
Player's Anthem
Lose Yourself



I wasn't born mean I was pushed to trechary
I walked the streets looking for some puss to fetch me
I like a veggie brain, turn to mush, I'm edgy
Edgy enough to give Reggie Bush a wedgie
If he don't give me Kim things could get messy
So pass that ass to me, let me squish the left cheek
And pressed against the right one till it's smushed against me
And leave a dead body in the woods the mc
With the Christopher Reeves beef, we started off on the wrong foot
Or should I say fake leg, made outta wood? I shouldn't, yes I should
Riding through the hood, I'm chilling with Westwood
I'm quite mellow, a white fellow
My pee is bright yellow, I like jello, I'm like hello
To a cute little dyke on the mic, I'm kinda like...
Iron Mike cos I bite earlobes

Well, I must must say well uh
I'm just not gay well I
I'm must must say um well
See I'm the first to class and the last to leave
I mean I'm the first one to leave out of class, believe
That I'm a mailbox pimp in my heart til' I die
Even after I'm all gone and my ashes fry
Went from ashy guy, class clown this high
To a grown ass man
Runyons ave's the click, D12's the gang
We been spitting; this shit since we was little baby's
Gaga googoo nana, nanny booboo? never
Word to my homie Em, I'm just too too clever
A 45 shot'll leave a motherfuckers face lop-sided
The kick from the barrel make you think I'm cock eyed-ed
When I bust it off in the crow, you start diving
Greg Louganis in over the bar, I ain't lyin'
Hot I ain't equal, it's not defying a soldier
Runyons Ave soldier equals death when it's over
There's nothing colder than niggas than understranded struggle
Fly the street muscle, We been had the hussle
We been had the hussle, We been had the hussle
Fly the street muscle, We been had the hussle

Me and Westwood blasting off
Jacking off in a pair of Acid Wash, bumping Asher Roth
Crusin Gratiot till I damn near﻿ crash the car
Tryna smash a moth on the dash, hit the overpass-went off
Over the bridge, into on coming traffic
Caused a massive 42 car pile up, not a scratch at all
Hocked up holding a axe and saw
Jason mask is off but my face is plastered in Tabasco sauce
Spitting flames, kicking fire out ya ass
Ya little bastard, you can pass it on, I'm battery acid dog
You don't wanna get my ass ticked off
I'm harder than playing basketball when I'm going through crack withdraw
Dick's so big it's like estlastic
I tie it in a knot and it looks like Mr. Fantastic
Crossed the path of plastic man, with a drastic force and went spastic
Put my penis on Classic Sports




I told the world one day I would pay it back
Say it on tape, and lay it, record it so that one day I could play it back

They ask me am I okay, they ask me if I'm happy
Are they asking me that because of the shit that's been thrown at me

This is a beat with no words at first, it’s a blank painting
Exercising the mind, it’s brain strength training

My motto is live by the bottle
So why is my supply low? Bring in a truckload with a high-low

My name is Chauncey Billups, I'm kind of like a raunchy Phillips
Screwdriver, my crew's live when you can't sleep and you're still up

I came in this game with, bad intentions
And I ain't budged, not even an inch since then

Lava on my lips I flips, wake up think I have a cramp
I'm trying to shove the lava lamp up my father's ass

Got my self esteem back, got my confidence up
I'm gonna step up on this stage now, I'm gonna strut

Shady man, I done told you once homie to easy up
But you just won’t listen will ya? Nah, I guess not



Cause Baby I'm Lonely
Can Somebody Hold Me
It Feel Like I'm Fallin Now, I Can't Hold My Ground
It Feels Like I'm Only
Trying But Slowly
It Feels Like I'm Fallin Now, I Can't Hold My Ground
No More

Probably one of my realest loves ever, four page letters
In time it’s all better, ‘cause time heal whatever
I'mma need a moment cause moments last forever
Cars with cream leather, females are on regular
What’s the point in titles, we liking it how they tell us
I’d rather stay friends with benefits 'til we ready
Now ready, Sean Don got me feeling heavy
She like one more chance, more problems, no Biggie, ah
It’s all good, don’t take it the wrong way
Ain’t nothing personal, but who this nigga in your face?
We can leave together or you can take your space
The night young, we should head over to my place
Ha, now we laughing and all that
Tell your friend they can fall back
Ain’t even gotta ask twice
She said what you feeling like?
I'm like...


Jimmy can crack corn but I don't care
My enemies crack corn but I don't care

You can be black white or albino yeah
You can have cornrows inside your hair
I give a fuck if I don't like your stare
This bottle of wine goes upside your head

A little bit psycho but I know that
Think you just don't say it and I won't say it
See if you don't brag then I don't brag
I know I'm bad as long as I know I'm bad
I don't need ya'll to co-sign no shit
You can just keept making them tired old threats
Little bit like the boy who cried wolf did
See me but don't dare to try no shit
Cuz you know that somewhere inside those layers
The rattlesnakes right there to bite your ass
And I can be so quite and strike so fast
Like lightening bolts right out the sky go blast


Cause Baby I'm Lonely
Can Somebody Hold Me
It Feel Like I'm Fallin Now, I Can't Hold My Ground
It Feels Like I'm Only



My name is Chauncey Billups, I'm kind of like a raunchy Phillips
Screwdriver, my crew's liver when you can't sleep and you're still up
I get the ball and I'm like Rip, you can't get a grip
You probably got stripped, you wanna rumble, no reason to trip
I grab her like Gnarls Barkley holds the mic, your snarls spark me
I smile like Charles Barkley come on I'm hard, guard me
Ain’t booin’, ain’t pursuin’, no lawsuits, I ain’t suin’
I know what I’m doin’, give me the ball and your life is ruined
I'm like Rasheed, I remind me the spirit of Proof
I'm happy and lucky, ballin' and groovin', I'm on the move
I'm smooth with it, give me the ball, you don't know what to do with it
Shoot it in the basket, you other teams need a casket
LeBron sayin' don't respond, there's no back and forth
This game is mental, man, I play aloud and walk away just to hush the crowd
You trying to touch? Sit down

Man I don't think you ready for the

I get the crowd rolled up Like a U-Haul truck
Just call me 2 Ball Chuck, ain't too tall what
I'll leave Utah stuffed
Man I love this game, who the hell you called up?
You need points on the paint, I'm the joints when they stained
All my coins in the bank and I'm...
Yeah baby it's true, I'm talking to you
You already know what to do
Just pass to me, it just so happens to be
That I adapt with this heat so strap in your seat
I got a grasp on this beat, you ain't convinced?
Give it to Tayshaun Prince, we haven't stayed calm since
Leave the ball with delayed palm prints


We get everybody involved homie, we get everybody involved
I said we get everybody involved homie,we get everybody involved
Yeah
I said ahh
Give me the ball
You gotta walk before you crawl
Tell me you ain't listenin
This is Detroit basketball Homie, hey yo
Beam me up Scottie
Hahahahahahahahahahahaaaaaaaa




Nunca he sido gran parte de la iglesia
Pero creo que en los ultimos dias

Camino por el inferno casi todas las noches
Pero creo que solo es un camino

Dime muchacho lo que estas haciendo con tu vida
Con esos tatuajes en la cara?

Dime muchacho sabes que tendras que pagar el precio
Bueno supongo que tendre que hacerle frente cuando me vaya


El padre el hijo y el espiritu santo
Te tengo mas cerca

Dejen que las trompetas soplen con su apariencia
Casi puedo orilo

Cuando deseas el infierno sobre mi alma y espiritu
He aqui estas letras


Yehhhh

Yo no mucho sobre la santa biblia

Pero creci en el cinturon de la bibla

Puse mi amor por una mujer en ralenti
Porque tuve problemas con las pildoras de mi mama

Pero he aprendido mis errores
Trato de respetar a las personas creyentes

Pero si escupes sobre mi puta tumba
Y me deseas el infierno yo te deseare lo mejor

Y te enviare a mi mejor amigo

El padre el hijo y el espiritu santo
Te tengo mas cerca

Dejen que las trompetas soplen con su apariencia
Casi puedo orilo


Cuando deseas el infierno sobre mi alma y espiritu
He aqui estas letras


Yehhhh


Dios por favor me protegerias
Con la armadura?
Me llaman cuando hay drama como a ghandi
Podria heberme ido por otro lado varias veces
Podria haberme vuelto dalai con la lama
Pero aplasto
Mis beefs cuando las cosas parecen decentes
Pero no lo arruino
Es como clint eastwood
Buscando la paz aunque tal vez no para el interior
El sacerdote se levanto pero al menos deberia
Hacer un intento de mostrar remordimiento
Y luego parecer arrepentido
Para la gente he sido un ministro
No un predicador pero si un iniciador y finalizador
En la mente de una piel gruesa
Pero con mal genio
Esta paciencia mia
Es fina
Que la de un hilo
Cuando me ataca
Asi que podria respondereta algo que te ofenda
Entonces si no te gusta cuando rapeo
Lo que tenga que decir el microfono luego tu
Podrias querer actuar justo com los maricales de campo
Y tomar una puta caminata chasqueo porque
Soy un pecador
Yo tengo un mejor amigo
Mi culo bolas e intestinos
Munca han estado a sus ordenes
Pero ellos me van a decir cuando estoy jodiendo
Al minuto cuando estoy dando menos
Estoy a punto de vomitar y puedo sentirlo venir
Porque el fracaso es algo que apenas puedo soportar
Y solamente eschucho a mis entranas
A no ser que seas mi puto
Mi puto ombligo
No me digas nada no eres
Mejor amigo mejor amigo
Sobre quien crees que estoy hablando
El me levanta cuando estoy abajo y fuera
Aun lo busco sin duda alguna aun tengo a un
Mejor amigo
Mejor amigo
Gritarlo
Como si nunca hubiese habido una boca que grite tan fuerte
Nunca jamas debi de estar permitido para grotar estoy fuera
Ahora que tengo un poder muy alto
Ahora con el poder negro fuera fuera esta fuera
Como un impotente perp la multitud lo rodeaba
Ellos tienden a reunirse como pastores
De las ovejas negras
Pero puedo ser la peor cosa estos hijos de puta hayan

Escuchado
Cuando soy excluido

Confirman tu murete cuando lo sondean
Asi que preparate para un rival tu archienemigo te rodea ahora
El esta por todo tu alrededor
Ni siquiera hay un doctor en el hospital
Podria tener descargas electricas shigy regreso a la vida
Es la palabra el doctor digy
Te estas deteniendo y eso no es una opinion
Y eso es algo que no voy a hacer
Soy el iggy pop del hip hop cuando entro en la cabina
Hombre soy la verdad
Como biggie divirtiendose con 2pac en la habitacion
Hablandole a proof cagando
Llene un clip de silabas como una tira recargable
Cargo y disparo
Cual crees que es la arma que uso?
Que me esfuerze a conseguir mis fuerzas contra estos

Enemigos
Y estaran esperando en la puerta
Cuando eres rociado tus putas se sientan derecho para hacer

Tratos con
Mi mejor amigo
El padre el hijo y el espiritu santo
Te tengo mas cerca
Dejen que las trompetas soplen con su apariencia
Casi puedo orilo


Cuando deseas el infierno sobre mi alma y espiritu
He aqui estas letras


Yehhhh







Ryan’s a homocidal misfit
I write the solution of biophysics
On the side of a cliff and some hieroglyphics
This my admission to having violence psychotic
With the vile polish politics by the way I’m higher than the Eiffel tower tip
I like writing but I will stick this pencil in your ass before I write ya shit
Pause, inhale hell n kush, us and Yelawolf like a heavy foot gas pedal push
Felon’s, crooks, going door to door like he’s selling books, Dolly Parton style, melons mush
Now my bitch dancer, I’m bout as sick as cancer
If you could swallow my style, you probably rip ya pants off
If you could bottle my style and sell it to somebody
It’d probably smell like cologne made out of bits of panther
They call me anchor man, I’ll hold down the ship
Leave you niggas floating in water and go and drown a fish
Fuck I’m fucking heinous, I’ll make you fucking famous
Them lead showers is coming, fuck is you sayin’

Fuck, it’s fucking raining, shit, it’s lightening
Bitch, its thundering, cause I’m hushing up I’m a storm if you wonderin’
Shit, shit you could muster up a thought, to take a toter? and a brain fart
Want urine in your face, all you had to do was say it
You wish you woulda just stayed pissed off in the first place
We came to monopolise the game
Illuminati is here, yeah, human oddities
At odds with us, just whats gotta be
Cause we started out cold and it snowballed
We froze, soon as we rolled up on these hoes
All’s we know is you over the bar like Limbo/ Limbaugh
You know who you are
So quit fucking the dark before we start callin’ you bizaare
Shit screw the boots, ya’ll dun raped a pitbull
Fell in love with Shih-tzu
This is directed directly at you
And as for these hoes who don’t know me from a can of paint
You must be huffin’, fuck a ballsack if the taints can’t take you on a date
You mistake me for a gentleman, your 2000 and late man, Will-I-ain't
I’m the bad guy, type of guy that will drag 5 girls up on stage
Pour ice in their pants and the first one who pee’s gets a black eye

You must be outta ya mind
You think you fucking with us
Suck on these nuts
Bitch hang it up, this game is over

Puffing loosies, watching I Love Lucy with Gary Busey
Crazy, how the fuck could you son me? I’m Shady
Will there ever come a day when they could slay me?
I don’t know, fifth month, black and yellow insect, maybe
Til then I kill the bad man tryna slay me
Everything you kick weak, your speak kung fu yazy
Nickle, I just picked up a Phantom, look how it rolls, Royce!
Even if I wanted to quit, I ain’t got no choice
Verses keep coming, I should invoice my own voice
You should see the kind of asses that my pole hoist
Hoes be like diamonds in your chain, man, so moist
Bang bang bang bang, house gang, chainsaw
Here to kill you pussy’s, don’t ask what we came for
I write til my right arm vein’s sore
Forearm feel like Thor’s arm in a gang war
You hear that Yaowa, you know who finna file out
Definitively finish you, my fist stick out that eyeball
Piranha mentality with a jaws bite all night
Coming up, never saw light, but never lost sight

Jets and movers, cess-poolers, meth abusers
You step to us, text rugers to respect the shooters
My men think in sync, roll with the best crew
Move to the beat of the same drum without Lex Luger
Welcome to nay hood, bigger than jects, G
Cheated death multiple times without riggin the deck
So I’m well prepped if you just want war
There’ll be blood everywhere, you be laying on the Louboutin floor
It’s raw, you keep acting like you don’t know Mouse, nigga
And you gon’ need the best doctors, house nigga
Guard your jewels and avoid large tools
Cause after I spill you at the light, you be in a car pool
Keep your distance from idiots, cause the truth told
They food for thought’s rotten, they gems are fool’s gold
Need results from my actions, mistakes I’ll exonerate
I’m Martin King staring at a picture of Obama’s face
Talking funds, niggas ain’t never seen stock
I don’t need the key to the game, I pick a mean lock

You must be outta ya mind
You think you fucking with us
Suck on these nuts
Bitch hang it up, this game is over

Takeoff, you invited inside of the mind of a psychotic rhymer
I’m kind of a Dahmer, I’m grinding
Now rappers are lining up jackers, I’m climbing up ladders
I buy enough clappers to retire you factors, fire at drama
You liars and actors, I’m the genuine article
But read me wrong, get my gun and split you to particles, particles
Tell me when and I’m there
Not only heir to the throne, but my chair is suspended in air
Stay fly like a limited fare
You got us pegged wrong, my circle don’t fit in with squares
I smell shit and piss, know where it’s coming from
You stepped on number two just to be number one
Now I’ma step on you, bring it to yo yard
Bogart for arts, we go hard
You frauds just blow hard like broads, I coast guard the west
I’m Mozart, I compose dark shit with no heart

I got no Jim Beam in the liver
Getting head like clean clippers, with haters on my dick like a jeans zipper
When I throw up 16′s like I drink liquor
You think you seen sick? Well, bitch, you ain’t seen sicker
Then I’ll crack, and then I’ll hop around in a hospital gown
Popping the trunk, my pumper stay cocking the round
I shit logs and I piss river brown
Cause I drink creek water and spit the river Nile
And that’s as close as I get to a pyramid
Shit, they think I’m Illuminati, so f-ckin’ ignorant
Sick with a grin, here with this pen, so innocent
But when you win, they say you a sin, but in the end
They jump on the bandwagon and dance to the band playing
Skinny-ass pants sagging, it’s only yourself you playing
Call me a clown, but you love where the clown’s hanging
And the freakshow’s at the county carnival then you pay
Bitch, I’m on a trapeze with no legs in the dark
Yelling “Go Shady” driving slower than an old lady
In an old ’89, no piece if you pay me
Gimme peace sign on my grill, no Mercedes
I’m getting paid for these shows that I throw lately
Same shows a year ago woulda broken most of you crazies
They call me crazy cause I made it
Bitch, you crazy cause you quit, look at my clique lately
You ain’t fucking wit’ Budden, you ain’t got no choice with Royce
You don’t wanna see the Crooked I, well, listen to Ortiz voice
That dirt road hit the 8 Mile, the porno boys
And if Marshall want me to clap, then homie, I deploy
Game over

Yo, I don’t think they heard you, tell ‘em again
Game Over



Yo, I'm tryin' to be the man of the day
Three six five a year
See the bullshit you sayin', Skam ain't
Bustin' lyrics in the air
Keepin' some up in the chamber

Yo Skam, what the fuck you doin'?

Man, I'm releasin anger!

I'm tryin' to be the illest of the day
Three six five a year
See that bullshit you sayin', Shady ain't tryin' to hear
Spittin' lyrics in your ear
Keepin' some up in the chamber

Aiyyo Shady what the fuck you doin'?

I'm releasin' anger!

Man I'm tired of bein' tired, everytime I wake up
Tired of these fake ducks, tired of bein' late for the bus
Tired of all be blendin', and endin' up datin sluts
So my facial expression stay stuck up, and shut the fuck up!
To the pity ass rappers, that ain't
Shit with out make-up, wake up
Gold diggin' bitches, the buck stops here
The road to riches is closed for repair
So if the shoe ain't fittin, girl leave that shit alone
You ain't Erykah Badu, what I look like Tyrone?
I rip your tissue out your ear
Spittin' like I don't care
My hair look like I ain't comb it, shit a damn near year
So I burn, zig-zag, I leave the next man with his heels up
Brain dead, and be reincarnated at a speed bump
When we done we stay hard, so you don't land shit
Suck Skam's dick, off of what a dead man spit
Yo that's it, I don't plan shit, you know how we go down
They need to slow down, and take a look who the ho now
At every industry party, gettin' so damn drunk
Can't remember the last ass you kissed, or dick you sucked
Remind me of my ex, in the street got me veck
Tryin' to roll up on Miami, leavin' with a broke neck
Oh shit, lethal lyric equal land mind
I be stackin' up white rappers like I'm throwin' gang signs
And I'm, buck wild exposin' the plain truth
You couldn't mess with me, fuckin' shit up in the same room
Hey you, I don't know you but fuck it, let me get a dollar
For this bad car, that go along with the breath
Some show the mad bomb, and steal the show like a theft
Cause in Miami, the baby jammin' like three up in the chamber


I've been trying to figure something out in my head
And maybe you can help me out here?
When a person is insane, as you clearly are, do you know that you're insane?
Maybe you're just sitting around, reading "Guns and Ammo", Masturbating in your own feces, do you just stop and go
"Wow! It is amazing how fucking crazy I really am!"?

Some people say I'm strange, I tell them ain't shit changed
I'm still the same lame asshole with a different name
Became late to the last show with a different dame
Brain ate from the last "O" that I snifed off 'caine
You know you're spaced the fuck out like George Lucas
When your puke is turnin' to yellowish-orange mucus
So when I grab a pencil and squeeze it between fingers
I'm not a rapper, I'm a demon who speaks English
Freak genius, too extreme for the weak and squeamish
Burn you alive till you screamin' to be extinguished
Cause when I drop the science
Motherfuckers tell me to stop the violence
Start a fire and block the hydrants
I'm just a mean person, you never seen worse than
So when Slim gets this M-16 burstin'
You gettin' spun backwards like every word of obscene cursin'
On the B-side of my first single with the clean version
Stoppin' your short life while you're still a teen virgin
Unless you get a kidney specialist and a spleen surgeon
In the best hospital possible for emergency surgery
To try to stop the blood from your ruptured sternum internally
I'll take it back before we knew each other's name
Run in a ultrasound and snatch you out your mother's frame
I'll take it further back than that
Back to Lovers' lane, to the night you were thought of, and
Cock-block your father's game
I'll plead the fifth like my jaws were muzzled
So suck my dick while I take a shit and do this crossword puzzle
And when I'm down with ten seconds left in the whole bout
I'mma throw a head-butt so hard, I'll knock us both out




Get up this morning, I'm feeling sleepy as hell
Went to use the bathroom when I tripped and I fell
All the way downstairs onto the couch
And I pissed my pants on the way down south
So I went back upstairs to change my underwear
Took a while to get em unstuck from my pubic hair
Finally got unzipped I went to put em down the street
But then I threw em in the garbage cause it all said pew
Hopped in the shower put shampoo in my hair
Went to rinse it out but then the water wasn't there
That damn toilet it must of went foul
Got another bath to wipe the stuff up with the towel
Went to get my clothes but I couldn't wear the wash
So I sat and played some Mario on my Nintendo
I was gonna see my girl but I forget that stuff man today
I just feel like a pooh butt...

Sometimes things just never go my way
You know I'm just feeling like a pooh butt today

Now every single day I make habits to get up
But today I just feel like a pooh butt so ill stay in bed
I dont know whats wrong with me, I'm just taking everything nonchalantly
I just feel like I can't move one muscle
My girlfriend calls me up and tells me now we gotta hustle
My plane leaves to roll about quarter to 8
Aww forget that baby said I just can't make it
I know you're disappointed but your gonna have to take it
Comes next day I got a call from M&M he said

Sometimes things just never go my way you know i, im just feelin like a pooh butt today


Gotta get to the recording studio
I gotta get a take done
Put all my rhymes together so I can make one
Get outta bed, fall on my head
Slipped on the rug, I thought I was dead
Cussin', I think my head is busted but it's really nothing
Only a concussion, shake it off, get off the ground
Look around couldn't find my rhyme sheets; Where'd I put em down?
They were just there last night on the chair
Had to look everywhere but couldn't find em anywhere
Go to the basement might of misplaced em
Gotta find em in hurry but my visions still blurry
Goin' down the stairs what could happen next
But, when its this early you can't skip steps;
Fallin head first -- As I fall, I curse
Things are lookin' bad, I'mma only get worse;
Aching I shake and I hurt I stand up slowly
Wiped all the dirt off memory lapse
I can't remember nothing, think I'll collapse
If you forget the whole thing pause for a second
What was I looking for? Oh yeah, my rhyme sheets
They might be on the floor or on the chair
Wait a minute where am I? I'm in a basement
Damn, how does time fly? Think for a second
Record my memory if I were a rhyme sheet where would I be??
Now I remember I put em in the closet next to my jacket
So I woulda never lost em
Already seven, I've only got an hour to eat breakfast
Get dressed, plus take a shower got undressed
Got the zest off the rack
Turn the water on and I almost had a heart attack;
Cold as hell, started to yell jumped out the shower
And said fuck it, I'll smell
Grabbed the towel off the rack, dried off got dressed
Still had to eat but my hair was a mess
I was in a rush, grabbed the brush
And ran into the door on the floor I land
Always to fate now; I know I'm cursed
I think it might help if I open the door first
Tried to turn the handle but I sprained my wrist
But that's what happens on a day like this...

Sometimes things just never go my way
You know I'm just feelin' like a pooh butt today



Now, a pooh butt day is something everybody's had
No particular depression neither mad or sad
You couldn't see your butt because your butt is what it is
Cause when your feeling like a pooh butt
Then you're feeling like shit



Yo, speed racer, 97' burgundy Blazer
Wanted for burglary, had to ditch the mercury tracer
I'm on some low ish
I'm fed up wit the being broke ish
I'm not to joke wit
Bitch, I don't sell crack, I smoke it
My brains dusted; I'm disgusted at all my habits
Too many asprin tablets and empty medicine cabinets
Losing battles to wack rappers cause I'm always too blunted
Walking up in the cypher smoking, talking like, "Who want it?"
Thug and crook; every drug in the book I've done it
My 9's at your frame,is that your chain? Run it
Who wants to die of an overdose of excessive flavor?
Aggressive nature got me sticking you for your Progressive pager
Spectacular, battle rap manufacturer
Stole your mom's Acura, wrecked it, then sold it back to her
The doctors you'll need after our battle are known as psychiatrists
I'll tell the nurses to hold a bed for you
And I'ma make sure you come back for it
So barricade your infants, put up some extra fences
..Take em' on long vacation trips
Kidnappin' em' and trappin' em' in abusive relationships
Mess up your face and lips
Slit your stomach and watch your gut split
Mama don't you cry, your son's too far gone
I'm so high, I don't even know what label I'm on
I'm messed up, feeling like an over worked plumber



Things just ain't the same for psychos
Guns and rifles, sharp knifes, I like those
I might just O.D. by the end of tonight's show
With the right dose I might wipe out this life pole
But, the strangest things can happen from jabbin'
Pregnant women in the abdomen so they can't have children
Bitches get slapped up and drastic ass kicks
Gay-bashin' fags with tire irons and ratchets
I seen 'em come, I've watched 'em go
I might have bashed of somebody you probably know
Buncha' faggots in your clique screamin' "It's not me! No!"
Drag 'em out the closet and across the floor
Went you paid 'em a visit in the hospital
Stab 'em in the fuckin' tonsils with a popsicle
Stick, and sit back and watch 'em choke

Cause every chair that I throw
People sue me for dough
They press charges on me
Till I can’t fight anymore
But every girl that I choke
I got lawyers I know
Who got judges they know
So I suggest you stay home

Ha ha
Son of a bitch "what, what, what, what, what, what"
Slim Shady, album May 23rd
Dr. Dre

Damn bitches, I just took some ecstasy
I'm an extraterrestrial lesbian with a...
Ha ha

Cut that shit off, I'm outta here, peace



I stay higher than racial tension, with a facial expression
Tensed up like I'm suffering from a case of nasal congestion
Eyes hazel, complexion beige, age still in question
Critics hate my tape, kids can't wait for the next one
As long as there's rejects, my tape never ejects the deck
That's the level of respect each CD gets
While ya'll graspin at straws like me snorting crushed Aspirin
And gasping at air and collapsing in malls
I'm just a realistic impression of artistic expression
Whose tape was in the deck when kids shot up the delicatessen
So when I launch a verse full of controverse
I'm sorry kids I dismissed this class
I'm going back in the broom closet to sniff this gas
Um, Mr. Mathers just missed the bathroom
Pissed his pants and the world still kissed his ass
This is my last album cause this is my last Valium
Just pick my ass up when I pass out in the bathroom
If ya'll don't like the shit that you're hearing
Then blow me til you lipstick is smearing
And I can see my dick disappearing

May 23rd
Yo, May 23rd



{Freestyle over Jay-Z's 'So Ghetto'}


That's it, that's it, gotta hit than pass it
I'm blasted off a tab of acid
Flabbergasted
Hopped in a cab and blasted the cab driver
I said...haha
Hold on a minute
Give me infinite beats that I can kick for a minute
Y'all don't understand
The way that I got this mic in my hand
Killing any MC who stands or sits or walks
Or is handicapped
It doesn't Mr. Handicap, hand me that
Haha
I clap hands with the rap fans
Jump in their wheelchairs and give 'em a lap dance
I'm the illest MC who will kill this
And what?
And Die Hard like who?
Thank you very much that's a fucking cliche
But I will rock the microphone and don't care about what he say
Or they say or I say or we say or them say
Eminem say shit that only Slim say
Or Slim says
Fuck a les
-bian in her ass
Korean or a...
Haha

Ayo, let me try something. Uh uh uh uh uh uh. I'm not free in here, check it out

I rap if there was no rap within a soul clap
Expose wack rappers and smack 'em with my bozack
Flatten 'em like inner tubes
Punch my fist through the torso of thinner dudes
And when I'm in the mood make a serious winner lose
Get high of gin and booze

Hahahaha
In an inner tube
While I'm in the nude
With a centerfold
In the winter cold

Ayo we give it though
Give me an envelope
I get with Tim Westwood show
And Cypher Sounds I strike you down
Don't like the way you sound, you wack now
You got my style packed down or should I say down pack
Any MC's will tell you right now that you sound wack
Call us up and then we make noise then see shells
We shall prevail you faker than Lee Nails
And we tell D-12 to all those that don't know
Flow for flow we rocking your radio
How you feel right now?
C'mon Shady flow
Yo, yo, yo


{beat switches to LL Cool J's 'Ill Bomb'}


Trapped in a cinema, in a material world
Criminal, cops scour the rural area thorough
Cause I kissed a girl, married a girl
Carried a girl to the cemetery, buried a girl
And I'm desperate, no one to mess with
Always get arrested for something domestic
And I kill the way you met me
You'll never catch me, cops can't sketch me
You can't upset me, no matter how bad
How mad you get me
Problem with y'all, I'm letting the Tec speak
Went from sweet to hard
Beat the odds
From no hoes to show, quit the pizza job
No more fools to rob, no more geeks to rob
No more stolen cars, no more Visa cards
Slim Shady



I'm the illest rapper to hold the cordless
Patrollin' corners, lookin' for hookers to punch in the mouth
With a roll of quarters
I'm meaner in action than Roscoe beatin' James Todd Sr
And smackin' his back with vacuum cleaner attachments
I grew up in a wild hood, as a hazardous youth
With a fucked up childhood that I used as an excuse
And ain't shit changed, I kept the same mindstate
Since the third time that I failed 9th grade
You probably think that I'm a negative person
Don't be so sure of it
I don't promote violence, I just encourage it
I laugh at the sight of death
As I fall down a cement flight of steps
And land inside a bed of spider webs
So throw caution to the wind; you and a friend
Can jump off of a bridge, and if you live, do it again
Shit, why not? Blow your brain out, I'm blowin' mine out
Fuck it, you only live once, you might as well die now




Hi, my name is, what?
My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh?
My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, what?
My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh?
My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady

Excuse me!
Can I have the attention of the class for one second?

Hi, kids! Do you like violence? Wanna see me stick nine inch nails through each one of my eyelids?
Wanna copy me and do exactly like I did?
Try 'cid and get fucked up worse than my life is?
My brain's dead weight, I'm trying to get my head straight
But I can't figure out which Spice Girl I want to impregnate
And Dr. Dre said "Slim Shady, you a basehead!"
Uh-uhhh! "So why's your face red? Man, you wasted!"
Well, since age twelve I felt like I'm someone else
‘Cause I hung my original self from the top bunk with a belt
Got pissed off and ripped Pamela Lee's tits off, and smacked her so hard I knocked her clothes backwards like Kris Kross
I smoke a fat pound of grass, and fall on my ass
Faster than a fat bitch who sat down too fast
Come here, slut! "Shady, wait a minute, that's my girl, dog!"
I don't give a fuck, God sent me to piss the world off


My English teacher wanted to have sex in junior high
The only problem was, my English teacher was a guy
I smacked him in his face with an eraser
Chased him with a stapler
Stapled his nuts to a stack of papers
Walked in the strip club, had my jacket zipped up
Flashed the bartender, then stuck my dick in the tip cup
Extraterrestrial, killin' pedestrians, rapin' lesbians
While they're screaming, "Let's just be friends!"
99 percent of my life I was lied to
I just found out my mom does more dope than I do
I told her I'd grow up to be a famous rapper
Make a record about doing drugs and name it after her
You know you blew up when the women rush your stands
And try to touch your hands like some screaming Usher fans
This guy at White Castle asked for my autograph


Stop the tape! This kid needs to be locked away!
Dr. Dre, don't just stand there, operate!
I'm not ready to leave, it's too scary to die
I'll have to be carried inside the cemetery and buried alive
Am I coming or going? I can barely decide
I just drank a fifth of vodka, dare me to drive?
All my life I was very deprived
I ain't had a woman in years, my palms too hairy to hide
Clothes ripped like the Incredible Hulk
I spit when I talk, I'll fuck anything that walks
When I was little I used to get so hungry I would throw fits
How you gonna breastfeed me, Mom? You ain't got no tits!
I lay awake and strap myself in the bed
Put a bulletproof vest on and shoot myself in the head
I'm steaming mad and by the way, when you see my dad
Tell him that I slit his throat in this dream I had




So, Just call me Richard, cause I'm a dick
It's also Richard cause I feel like you should
Pry your fucking mouth up off of it
I said just call me Richard, cause I'm a dick
You ain't gotta be no detective to figure out I'm a dick
When I hold my privates to your first clue, Sherlock, prick!

And I would like to introduce myse-self, surprise! Hi, it's Ike
'bout to get my Ike on I come with a life supply of wife beaters
And my Nikes on and a white tee over that iron mic
Lookin' fly tonight, feel like I might die from a spider bite
Come back as Spider-Man, park my Peter inside a dyke
Bitch actin' like she got fuckin' higher standards than Meijer's, right
Had to pry her fingers off the mothafuckin' Breyer's ice cream
With the pliers, like "Ahh!" only a ruthless bastard would do this
Take a toothless bitch with no taste buds to Ruth's Chris
Give her toothpicks, stop on the way home, pick up two Big Bufords
Scrupulous, girl, you got a nice pair, but you're plumb stupid!
So when I pull up in that Benz, don't try to pretend you ain't interested
To impress your stupid ass friends and refuse to get in woman
And get slammed on the ground and snap like a pool stick against cement
If you sick of dick, pretend it's a musical instrument
You get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
I can tell at first glance you're a ho cause your pants are so tight
When you dance with O. Trice, your implants explode
So cold to dykes, the chance is snow in San Francisco
Boy I'm from Detroit city, you live in animosity
That's a fucked up state to be in, such an atrocity
Look where these random thoughts get me in senseless mind babble
"What me? Apologize?" That's just the way the rhyme unravels
And I wouldn't fucking take it back if I time traveled!

So, Just call me Richard, cause I'm a dick
It's also Richard cause I feel like you should
Pry your fucking mouth up off of it
I said just call me Richard, cause I'm a dick
You ain't gotta be no detective to figure out I'm a dick
When I hold my privates to your first clue, Sherlock, prick!
Just call me Richard



Here I go, lyrical
I have no Idea what I'm doing but I'm spiritual
On the microphone I tear you up in stereo
I'm like the grand wizard, yes, I'm the imperial
I have no fucking clue what the fuck I'm doing
But "Freifick, Muschi", your whole life is ruined
If you try to step to me your life's a jeopardy
'Cause I will seek you out wit'

"Now it's my part!"

Zucker im Kaffee
Und Zitrone oder Sahne in den Tee
Und dazu den ganzen Tag lang nur Amor
Das ist wunderbar, Señor

"Now it's your part again, it's your part again, it's your part again!"

Yes, here we go – break it down
I got the crown, I'm 'bout to take it now
Yo, I got my man and he's on the guitar
And when it comes to lyrics I go so far
Like a car that I'm drivin', survivin' of Vivarin
I'm alive, I'm like eye of the tiger
And I kick it so, so, fuckin' hard
Now "Freifick, Muschi", don't diss me – regard it, come on!

"And now it's my part again, here we go!"

Zucker im Kaffee
Und Zitrone oder Sahne in den Tee
Und dazu den ganzen Tag lang nur Amor
Das ist wunderbar, Señor
Nochmal!
Zucker, Zucker, Zucker, Zucker ...
Zucker im Kaffee
Und Zitrone oder Sahne in den Tee, aha!
Und dazu den ganzen Tag lang nur Amor
Das ist wunderbar, Señor

Give me some noise! Make some noise!



Now this shit's about to kick off, this party looks wack
Let's take it back to straight hip-hop and start it from scratch
I'm 'bout to bloody this track up, everybody get back
That's why my pen needs a pad cause my rhymes on the ra-hag
Just like I did with addiction I'm 'bout to kick it
Like a magician, critics I turn to crickets
Got 'em still on the fence whether to pick it
But quick to get it impaled when I tell 'em stick it
So sick I'm looking pale, well that's my pigment
'Bout to go ham, ya bish, shout out to Kendrick
Let's bring it back to that vintage Slim, bitch!
The art of MCing mixed with da Vinci and MC Ren
And I don't mean Stimpy's friend, bitch
Been public enemy since you thought PE was gym, bitch


We're gonna rock this house until we knock it down
So turn the volume loud, cause it's mayhem 'til the a.m
So baby make just like K-Fed and let yourself go, let yourself go
Say fuck it before we kick the bucket
Life's too short to not go for broke

Guess it's just the way that I'm dressed, ain't it?
Khakis pressed, Nike shoes crispy and fresh laced
So I guess it ain't
That aftershave or cologne that made them just faint
Plus I showed up with a coat fresher than wet paint
So if love is a chess game, check mate
But girl your body's banging, jump me in, gang – bang-bang
Yessiree Bob I was thinking the same thing
So come get on this Kid’s rock, baw-wit-da-baw dang-dang
P-p-p pow-pow chicka bow chicka wow-wow
Catch a cab, I wanna go down b-b-bow, bow
Slow it down, throw in the towel, t-t-towel toww
At least I know that I don't know
Question is are you bozos smart enough to feel stupid
Hope so, now ho...




They say that love is powerful as cough syrup and Styrofoam
All I know is I fell asleep and woke up in that Monte Carlo
With the ugly Kardashian
Lamar, oh sorry yo, we done both set the bar low
Bars hard, drugs hard, though that's the past
But I done did enough codeine to knock Future into tomorrow
And girl I ain't got no money to borrow
But I am tryin' to find a way to get you alone, car note!
Oh, Marshall Mathers shouldn’t everybody know
Get the bar soap lathered, Kangols and Carhartt-less Cargos
Girl you’re fixing to get your heart broke, don’t be absurd man
You bird brained baby I ain’t called anybody baby since Birdman
Unless you’re a swallow
Word, w-word man you heard, but don’t be discouraged girl
This is your jam, unless you got toe jam

______________________________________________________
Traducción ofrecida por el equipo de Rap Genius España.
Lee la versión original de esta canción aquí.






You can't let nobody stand in your way
You've just got to get back up yeah, you've just gotta get back up, ho-oh
And take down everything that you cannot change now
You've just got to get back up yeah, you've just gotta get back up, ho-oh

Hey, what it is, world? Yeah, it's me again
Back before you, at your mercy, on bended knee again
No runnin' from the truth, as much as we pretend
That it ain't what it is, then it hits CNN
Most of you now sayin' "Whatever, here we go again"
Blogs, radio and television all goin' in
How dare you sit right there and act as if you holier than thou?
Same clown that was twitpicking at my wedding
On the same Twitter page disrespecting, wait a second
Never mind my imperfections, this a fact, remember that
No mistake's too great to recover and bounce back


If I could capture the rage of today's youth and bottle it
Crush the glass with my bare hands and swallow it
Then spit it back in the faces of you racists
And hypocrites who think the same shit but don't say shit
You Liberaces, Versaces and you Nazis
Watch me cause you thinkin' you got me in this hot seat
You motherfuckers wanna judge me cause you're not me
You'll never stop me, I'm top speed as you pop me
I came to save these new generations of babies
From parents who failed to raise 'em cause they're lazy
To grow to praise me, I'm makin' 'em go crazy
That's how I got this whole nation to embrace me
And you fugazi if you think I'ma admit wrong
I cripple any hypocritic critic I'm sic'd on
And this song is for any kid who gets picked on
A sick song to retaliate to and it's called
This kind of music, use it and you get amped to do shit


Now we can say it ain't our fault if we never heard it
But if we know better, then we probably deserve it
Jihad is not a holy war, where's that in the worship?
Murdering is not Islam, and you are not observant
And you are not a Muslim
Israel don't take my side cause look how far you've pushed them
Walk with me into the ghetto, this where all the kush went
Complain about the liquor store, but what you drinking liquor for?
Complain about the gloom, but when'd you pick a broom up?
Just listening to Pac ain't gon' make it stop
A rebel in your thoughts ain't gon' make it halt
If you don't become an actor, you'll never be a factor
Pills with million side effects, take 'em when the pain's felt
Wash them down with diet soda, killing off your brain cells
Crooked banks around the world would gladly give a loan today
So if you ever miss a payment, they can take your home away




"Other man!"

I stand in slapped by the wind as I begin
Do you know who I am? And many reply with a grin
Yes, I'm tired of being obtruded
Why should I be secluded? I've got a brand new horn to be tooted
To sum it up in a nutshell, "Eminem will you kick it for me?"
So I find myself in a certain obligatory
A place that I dwell in, fell into some wonderful productions
To make up for lost time, and then it brings obstruction
Finally let loose, unloading the stockpile
A mental projectile, I aim at the reptile
I look to the one handed juggler and ask him this
"Why is it you insist upon stepping to an octopus?"
Is there a reason for this? The hindrance is aggravating
How many times will it take you before you realize you're fading?
Fading from existence, cause simulations are dead
There's so much more to learn and pages left to be read
So put up the front while you jam for the grammar that's poor
While I hold the scrapbook that's heavier than the hammer of the mighty Thor
Words can weigh a ton
Therefore it's never to fall into the hands of the wrong one


Very few have made an attempt to put in a foot on the other side
But I see no borderline, from under this colorblind
And some will probably never hold pieces of the sacred
But then I'm finally about to put an end to the hatred
Wrong, the world would never endure to arguing
Awaking to the absence of unity is startling
"Oh foolish pride, what the hell are you trying to do?
You cannot beat someone that's better than you so quit trying to"
Your echoing words that mean nothing are despicable
So how do you think you can manage to kick the unkickable
You're graceless, bland, you're tasteless and you're faceless faceless
Damn, you're dull it's time you faced this, here taste this
Straight from off of the pile, one of the numerous styles
The date of my birth on the Earth, the deliverance of a starchild
Blessed with formidable talent and versatility
But with such a power, there comes a responsibilty
To infringe on the boundaries, so now the defiance is clear
To form an alliance is something even the giants fear
So instead of being oblivious to the color of skin
Refusal of usin' is accepted now it's a trend



You know I don't understand why we all just can't get along
You hate me but you know me and what I stand for
No. so then why do you speak for me
And every other white man when you that we're your enemy?

On the floor lies a broken door, cause I'm not to be spoken for
Stereotypes and superstitions and fictional folklore
Rarely do you see the lighter side of me
I try to be persuasive but also invasive and try to end the rivalry
But ? is isolated, apologies are exhausted
Feelings are turning glacial never to be defrosted
Who can I trust after repeatedly being shafted
Switch to the opposite, now scenes are being re-enacted
Pull up that boy by his roots, destroy him quick
His fracture's obviating, we hate him, his patterns past us, huh
Always fighting for the position of top dog
That spot's already occupied, and I don't play leapfrog
Cause I do not wish to fight over territory that's already mine
But I'm always having to prove myself, time after time
Oh how I never understand how a man could be outcast
Judged from the past and he's put last
And others with nothing to say
Stutterin' and slurrin' and mutterin' words with no meaning attack be signin' like Danny Kaye
Here I go again hammerin stammerin grammerin
And eat it like cheese, pass me the crackers please
I've got a craving




Hi, my name is, what?
My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh?
My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady

Excuse me!
Can I have the attention of the class for one second?

Wanna see me stick 9 inch nails through each one of my eyelids?
Wanna copy me and do exactly like I did?
Try 'cid and get messed up worse than my life is?
My brain's dead weight
I'm trying to get my head straight
But I can't figure out which Spice Girl I want to impregnate
And Dr. Dre said
"Slim Shady, you's a basehead!"
Uh-uhhh!
"So why's your face red? Man, you wasted!"
Well, since age twelve I felt like a caged elf
Got ticked off and ripped Pamela Lee's lips off, kissed them and said, "I didn't know silicone was supposed to be this soft!"
I'm bout to pass out and crash, and fall in the grass
Faster than a fat man who sat down too fast
Come here, lady
"Shady wait a minute, that's my girl, dawg!"
I don't give a damn
Dre sent me to tick the world off!


Thanks a lot, next year I'll be thirty-five
I smacked him in his face with an eraser
Chased him with a stapler
Walked in the club and I had my jacket zipped up
Served the bartender, and walked out with the tipcup
Extraterrestrial running over pedestrians
In a spaceship while they're screaming at me
"Let's just be friends!"
99 percent of my life I was lied to
I just found out my mom does more dope than I do
I told her I'd grow up to be a famous rapper
You know you blew up when the women rush your stands
And try to touch your hands like some screaming Usher fans
This guy at White Castle asked for my autograph
"Dear Dave, thanks for the support, elohssa!"


Stop the tape!
Dr. Dre, don't just stand there, operate!
I'm not ready to leave, it's too scary to die
Am I coming or going? I can barely decide
All my life I was very deprived
I ain't had a woman in years
I spit when I talk, I'll **** anything that walks
When I was little I used to get so hungry I would throw fits
I lay awake and strap myself in the bed
I'm steaming mad
And by the way, when you see my dad
Ask him if he bought the porno mag to see my ad




This is Eminem, baby, back up in that motherfucking ass
We represent the 313, you know what I’m saying?
Yo, they don’t know shit about this, for the '96

Ayo, my pen and paper cause a chain reaction
To get your brain relaxin', the zany actin' maniac in action
A brainiac in fact, son, you mainly lack attraction
You look insanely wack when just a fraction of my tracks run
My rhymin' skills got you climbin' hills
I travel through your mind, and chill your spine like siren drills
I'm slimin' grills of roaches, with spray that disinfects
And twistin' necks of rappers
'Til their spinal column disconnects
Put this in decks and check the monologue
Turn your system up, twist 'em up
And indulge in the marijuana smog
This is the season for noise pollution contamination
Examination of more car-tunes than animation
My lamination of narration
Hits a snare and bass on a track for duck rapper interrogation
When I declare invasion
There ain't no time to be starin', gazin'
I turn the stage into a barren wasteland

I'm Infinite; you heard of Hell
Well, I was sent from it
I went to it, serving a sentence
For murdering instruments
Now I'm trying to repent from it
But when I hear the beat, I'm tempted
To make another attempt at it; I'm Infinite

Bust it! I let the beat commence
So I can beat the sense in your elite defense
I got some meat to mince
A crew to stomp, and then two feet to rinse
I greet the gents and ladies, I spoil loyal fans
I foil plans and leave fluids leaking like oil pans
My coiled hands around this microphone are lethal
One thought in my cerebral is deeper than a jeep-full of people
MC's are feeble, I came to cause some pandemonium
Battle a band of phony MC's, and stand the lonely one
Imitator, intimidator, stimulator
Simulator of data eliminator
There's never been a greater since the burial of Jesus
Fuck around and catch all the venereal diseases
My thesis'll smash a stereo to pieces
My a cappella releases classic masterpieces
Through telekinesis, it eases you mentally
Gently, sentimentally, instrumentally
With entity, dementedly meant to be Infinite

I'm Infinite; you heard of Hell
Well, I was sent from it
I went to it, serving a sentence
For murdering instruments
Now I'm trying to repent from it
But when I hear the beat, I'm tempted
To make another attempt at it; I'm Infinite

Man, I got evidence, I'm never dense
And I've been clever ever since my residence was hesitant
To do some shit that represents the MO
So I'm assuming all responsibility
‘Cause there's a monster will in me
That always wants to kill MCs
Mic nestler, slammin' like a wrestler
Here to make a mess of a lyric smuggling embezzler
No one else is specialer, my skill is intergalactical
I get cynical, act a fool, then I send a crew back to school
I never packed a tool or acted cool, it wasn't practical
I'd rather let a tactical, tactful track tickle your fancy
In fact, I can't see, or can't imagine
A man who ain't a lover of beats or a fan of scratchin'
So this is for my family, the kid who had a cameo
On my last jam, plus the man who never had a plan B
Be all you can be, ‘cause once you make an instant hit
I'm tensed a bit, and tempted
When I see the sins my friends commit

I'm Infinite; you heard of Hell
Well, I was sent from it
I went to it, serving a sentence
For murdering instruments
Now I'm trying to repent from it
But when I hear the beat, I'm tempted
To make another attempt at it; I'm Infinite




Yeah!
God damn!
Feels like a long time don't it?
Did you miss us?
We missed you!
Shady Narcotics
It's the Re-Up
Pussies!
And we're back
Myself
50 Cent
Obie Trice
Stat Quo
And I would also like to introduce
The two newest members of the family
One goes by the name of Bobby Creek
The other goes by the name of Ca$his, from Orange County
And I think it's about time we cut the bullshit



Yeah
Relationship gonna crazy man after u break up
One minute you love’em and the next uh, you fucking hate’em
Ha ha ha haaaa...

I don’t even know who to trust no more
My hearts turned cold like an icicle
One second I love you, the next I don’t
So whats the point of fighting for?
Baby listen I know your motives
I know you hate me I know you love him
I know you want to go back to him so go then
He's your old friend 'til the road ends
Soul mates? Yeah I wish we were
So my face bit the curb when we split for sure
It's like the shit done curved, to twist my nerves
Cause karma's a bitch and it gripped me first
But you're gonna get what you deserve
Cause karma don't let nobody through
I don’t wanna get all negative
But I'm saying is nothing less but true

Problems are getting in my shoes
That laces alone can't take so we might lose
Are you only passing through
Or are you gonna love me...
Problems are getting in my shoes
That laces alone can't take so we might lose
Are you only passing through
Or are you gonna love me...

You don’t see you meant the world to me
But you used me to boost your courtesy
I see the truth now and it's hurting me
You wanted him all along certainly
You couldn’t have loved me, you deserted me
You cut me up just like surgery
I'm sick of it, I'm sick of you
I feel nauseous when I picture of you
You got to go, you got shit to do?
What? Cheat on me with a senseless dude?
I'll teach you never to fuck with me
I'll haunt you wherever you otta be
Bitch I'm a problem that's hard to beat
You think it's easy to up and leave?
Ima show you that it’s not so easy
Baby I'm a psycho freak...


I love you, I hate you
I've done a lot but you're ungrateful
I know that one day you'll realize
That I'm nothing like them other guys
It'll be too late then
So don’t come back like "I'm mistaken"
Cause by then I'll be taken
And my love for you will be vacant
I don’t wanna sound like a pig bitch
But I hope karma shits on your wish list
And makes you cook and do the dishes
And tells you to stay out of his business
I don’t think you know who you fucking with
But I got videos of you sucking dick
I should release them, fucking bitch
But I won't cause I love your fucking kid


Are you only passing through?
Or are you going to love me?
Huh?
You fucking bitch
Words can't describe how I feel about you right now
It’s all good though, it’s all good
I wish you the worst
Baby, I love you
Ha ha



Bust it
The final problem is solved by throwin' sulfuric acid all over your back to see your spinal column dissolve
Droppin' bodies like it was domino season
My phenomenal legion will shoot out
Your fuckin' abdominal region
Slim Shady, responsible for your permanent stillness
Just escaped from the hospital with terminal illness
Itchin' to rip your fuckin' frame out
Cuz I ain't got nothing to lose
Like that movie that just came out
Callin' your name out, first, last and your middle initial
Your mom, your dad, and your pregnant widow will miss you
And anybody else poppin' some shit'll go witchu
Cuz I ain't tryna hear it like a political issue
So until I can leave with enough funds
I'mma shove guns up in the mouths of your loved ones
Drown 'em face down in the bath while the tub runs
Got a rap sheet that's longer than Tubby's sub buns


And I'mma kill it, just so y'all think
That I can't come of the top
And I be forced to rock unorthodox styles
From off the top of the dome
With a popular poem, forget a damn team
I can stop you alone
Rapper's thinking they putting out
They records cause they sell
But that can't fuck with what me, we doing here with AL
Y'all don't wanna do it, when we kick it
When we kick the fluid
Rappers don't wanna get into it, Y'all knew it
Cause the feds want me, they headhunt me, I'm Ted Bundy
I ain't dead, I just fled country
Said bluntly, a cannibal, animal, fed monthly
Eating bread crunchy, cement bed's comfy
Head's lumpy, funky like a dead skunk be
Med flunkie, jump off cliffs with thread bungee
Wearing red undees and a black cape
Rollin' through the hood cracked out
Bumpin' your whack tape
I'm coming through dumpin'
Change your rap name to Richard Jewell
Cause you ain't blowing up nothing
I'm showing up puffin', throwing up drinkin'
Killing brain cells till I'm slowing up thinking
Growing up stinkin', born with bad odor
Gimme Hennessey but please don't add soda
Now who's doper? You couldn't beat me when I'm sober
I'm off my fuckin' rocker like your Grandma tipping over
Slim Shady


"Son, where you from son?"
"Yo, I'm from Detroit city"
"Uh huh"
"I'm bout to do a little something like this
A little something like this."
"Ok, drop that shit."
"Bust it, bust it"

Yo, I hang with a bunch of hippies
And wacky tobacco planters
Who swallow lit roaches and light up like jack-o-lanterns
Outsidaz baby, and we suin' the courts
Cause we dope as fuck and only get a two in the Source
Yo, they never shoulda booted me outta reform school
Deformed fool, taking a shit in a warm pool
Till they threw me out the Ramada Inn
I said it wasn't me, I got a twin
It all started when my mother took my bike away
Cause I murdered my guinea pig
And stuck him in the microwave
After that, it was straight to the forty ouncers
Slappin' teachers and jackin' off in front of my counselors
Class clown freshman, dressed like Les Nessman
Forget the next lesson, I'll pass the test guessin'
And all the other kids said "Eminem is a thizz head
He'll never last, the only class he'll ever pass is phys-ed"
Maybe true, 'til I told this girl in gym class
That she was too fat to swim laps she need a Slim Fast
You stepped, walked into Vic Tanny's
And stepped on Jenny Craig
She picked me up to snap me like a skinny twig
Put me in a headlock, then I thought of my guinea pig
I felt the evilness and started transformin'
It began stormin', I heard a bunch of cheerin' fans swarmin'
Picked that bitch by her hair, drug her across the ground
And threw her up to the highest
Diving board to toss her down
Sorry coach, it's too late to tell me stop
While I drop this girl face down and watch her belly flop, cause it's like that
And I come in and I start wildin' and shit
Then I be busting a lyric
And rappers don't believe I'm freestyling it
Well here it goes when I'm kicking lyrical flows
From your head to your toes
So that every rapper in this place knows
Cause when it comes to the freestyle
Coming off of the top of the dome
I'm knocking your mouth and ya off, so who you copying off?
Stop being soft, I'm standing on top of your loft
Killing you off slowly, like Roberta Flack
I've never heard of wack
MCs that try to step to me, I'll break your verta-back
Or vertebrae, increase the murder rates
In 79 states... Yo, check it
I'm bout to pass the mic to the next
MC who wanna step up and flex
With the techs, but make sure your shit is fresh
Come on, wreck it, who wanna be next?


Broke the rubber, busted a nut up in your mother
So how do you feel about having another little brother
Nasty motherfucker, talking trash like a trucker
Snatch your bitch up out your track
I'll smack her up and fucked her
Always talk shit high, smoking chocolate Thai
So y'all can die, just for walking by giving an awkward eye
I've lost my motherfucking marbles
Smelling like a brewery
Droolin' at the way your jewelery sparkles
Head full of charcoal, smoked out brain particles
Burning holes in clothes articles
A retarded fool since I started school
Burned the weed before I learned to read, disregarded rules
Skip the classes to blaze the blunt ashes
Kissing front dashes from smashing up
Cars like stunt crashes
Hall passes for restrooms, chewing mushrooms
Doing rush fumes in the lunch room
Looking nervous, liquor in my thermos
Hung with hermits that carry guns without permits
Staring at the bitch with firm tits
Jacking off, aiming straight for both lips when my sperm spits


Set it off
Rappers get beheaded if they soft
Yo they get they wires crossed
Rappers try to step to me but I'm so ill I'll fire your boss
And this is all freestyle, killing it
While I'm filling it with adrenaline, rappers be feeling it
Like it was braille, so y'all can touch me anywhere
Cause I want you to feel me,
Rappers wanna kill me, but they don't thrill me
So check it, I'm bout to wreck when I make the record
Cause I'm, skinny like an anorexic girl headed for the exit
Running butt naked away from just being date raped
Rappers? I twist 'em into a great shape
And throw 'em in the Great Lakes
'Cause I'm from the Michigan state
For fishermans' sake, I throw 'em and toss 'em in
Rappers try to step to me
But this is the Holocaust and you'll never win
Cause I've forever been bent, forever demented
Rappers try to step to me but their shit is sweet-scented
And I'm demented, and if I said it I meant it
Killin' any MC cause I'm Infinite, and when it
Comes to the way that I'm spittin' lyrical infinite ammunition
And putting a clip in this lyrical track that I just be rippin'
Crushing it, killing it, taking your best line and hushing it
Taking your shit and flushing it down the toilet
Taking your biggest plot and foil it
Rappers can't uncoil it, I'll take my shit and aluminum foil it
Then throw it in the microwave and watch burn up
'Cause I'mma blow up
Rappers? I make 'em ill enough to throw up
Don't show up if you come to the battle


"Can I speed it up? Just a little bit?
Alright that's cool. Alright
Bust it, bust it, bust it, bust it, bust it
This one for Quest."

Some people say I'm strange, I tell them ain't shit changed
I'm still the same lame asshole with a different name
Came late to the last show with a different dame
Brain ate from the last O' that I sniffed of 'caine
You know you're spaced the fuck out like George Lucas
When your puke is turning to yellowish-orange mucus
So when I grab a pencil and squeeze it between fingers
I'm not a rapper, I'm a demon who speaks English
Freak genius, too extreme for the weak and squeamish
Burn you alive till you screaming to be extinguished
Cause when I drop the science
Motherfuckers tell me to stop the violence
Start a fire and block the hydrants
I'm just a mean person, you never seen worse than
So when Slim gets this M-16 bursting
You getting spun backwards
Like every word of obscene cursing
On the B-side of my first single with the clean version
Stopping your short life while you're still a teen virgin
Unless you get a kidney specialist and a spleen surgeon
In the best hospital possible for emergency surgery
To try to stop the blood from your
Ruptured sternum internally
I'll take it back before we knew each other's name
Run in the hospital and snatch you out your mother's frame
I'll take it further back than that
Back to Lovers' lane, to the night you were thought of, and
Cock block your father's game
I'll plead the fifth like my jaws were muzzled
So suck my dick while I take a shit
And do this crossword puzzle
And when I'm down with ten seconds left in the whole bout
I'mma no a head-butt so hard, I knock us both out
No doubt



I need Christopher Reeves to come and lay his verse
I think he can spit it better on Medicine Ball
First off, I did not even realize the guy died
So I guess them Christopher Reeves jokes ain't gonna fly
Whoa, I'm on a roll, don't get me started
Ellen got pissed at me tried to push me and pussy farted
With such accuracy he aims and he shoots the target
Cupid's arrow and Portia ??? now look, sweetheart it's
The kissin' bandit on a mission to leave, Miss Degeneres
Disenchanted by men now just listen damn it
Miss De Rossi, I need no posse, now single-Hand-ed-ly
Will steal your heart with a kiss
Where should I plant it? Mm-wha! Baby, it's *moi*
And my repertoire's runnin' around in pink panties and leopard bra
And negligar, negligee, you say tomayto I say TOMato
I’m Tommy Mottola Mariah don`t stop me I`m on a roll, ohh
Y'all know what it is



One two, one two
One two, one two, one two
Y'all done started something that you can't undo
Yo, yo

I'm up in the spot with Tim Westwood
You wanna step to this? You better use your best foot
Flawless freestyles I drop right off the top
Take a bottle of beer and bite off the top
Right of the block, straight to your neighbourhood
The flavor's good in London and I'ma stay for good
Yo, check it out, it's Slim Shady
I rip the radio right off of the S baby
Y'all can't see me 'cause y'all don't wanna even be it
Y'all don't understand these freestyles when I MC it
Original bad boy on the case, cover your face
Came in the place, blowed and sprayed Puffy with mace
I lace the weed with insect repellent, better check the smelly
Eminem starts with E, better check to spellin'
With a capital, somebody grab me a Snapple
I got an aspirin capsule trapped on my Adam's apple
Somebody dropped me on my head and I'm for sure
That my mother did it, but the bitch won't admit it was her
I slit her stomach open with a scalpel when she was 6 months
And said I'm ready now bitch, ain't you feeling these kicks, cunt?
The world ain't ready for me yet, I can tell
I'll probably have a cell next to the furnace in hell
I'm sicker than sperm cells with syphilis germs
And I'm hotter than my dick is, when I piss and it burns
I kick you in the tummy until you're sick to your stomach
And vomit so much blood that your clothes stick to you from it
Hit you in the head with a brick till you plummet
If y'all don't like me you can suck my dick till you numb it
And all the gibberish you were spittin', you need to kill it
'Cause your style is like dying in my sleep, I don't feel it
And any MC that try to step to this I'll throw you right off of the roof
Ayo, bust it Proof!

One of a kind and I come with the time
Having fun with the rhyme until I'm done with your mind
Listen, now every MC got a story
Ayo since Big Daddy Kane fell off they don't know how to be smooth
With a gat in holding, talking 'bout he DeShaun Holton
It's the same thing, we bust when it come through
With Tim Westwood, your best foot forward
Can't do that, here it is, put your good foot
We mack y'all, like y'all was some hoes on Wood wood
No time for that, flatbacks when you rap, counterattack
With a battle axe, you collapse from them whack raps
You try to spit to me, I make you all know I'm a genius
Yo we can't say that keep it the cleanest, the meanest
Slim Shady, next thing it was my fault
Y'all caught outlined in chalk, incredible as the Hulk
Sex is hetero, cash more checks than federal, you better know
How you feel about they got a dope cheddar flow
And my man Dee Teezy, straight from Stress magazine
Bag a scene, we drag your queen
Like she's a man dressed up, how you feel you get pressed up
Left up, it's time for that P-R-O-O, you get F'd up
Yeah it's time for that mind combat
Next up my man Slim Shade when we rhyme at

Last night I OD'd on rush, mushrooms and dust
And rushed to the hospital to get my system flushed
Shucks, I'm an alcoholic and that's all I can say
I've called in to work cause all I do is frolic and play
I swallow grenades and take about a bottle a day
Of Tylenol 3 and talk about how violent I'll be
Give me 11 Excedrin and my head will spin
Medicine will get me reving like a 747 jet engine
Scratched my balls till I shred the skin
Doctor check this rash, look how red it's been
It's probablly AIDS, forget it then
I'll strike a still pose and hit you with some ill flows
That don't even make sense like dykes using dildos
So reach in your bill folds for 10 duckets
And pick up the Slim Shady stuff that's on Rawkus
Some'n some'n some'n some'n, I can't read it
My daughter scribbled over that rhyme, I couldn't read it

Ayo, the truth hurt when Proof hurt
Move the whole Earth beneath your feet just like loose dirt
So F your politics if you frolic, feel the hollow tips rip
Through your collar disc, learn your knowledges
Then burn your colleges, I touch your grill
With the skill of a dermatologist, your turn to follow this
Acknowledge this head cracker, ho smacker
Whack rapper attacker, internet hacker
No slacker, best factor, Midwest bracket
Yeah you know about it, it's us on your jacket
DJ Headscratcher like a hatchet, who can match it?
Make you go-go like Gadget, perform magic
Without a wand, I drop bombs without Saddam
A vet' without 'Nam, I make sense without common ground
I'm still down y'all with my first crew
You got a fly style, I down that just like curfew
Yo I'm worth two ears and a mind full of attention
Plus I'm CEO of the whack MC prevention
Listen to the real gift over ill riffs
Cause you on the mic, me and Em aren't tryna hear like Will Smith
Your career's not over with, come here to cope a spit
We heat the sub y'all before the supernova hit
I know the truth, so now I’m baring all
I make R. Kelly confess he stole his first style from Aaron Hall
A whack MC with a gun I'm not one
And when see Kurt Cobain tell him "bring back my shotgun"
I got one style for all y'all bazooka
Ayo if I was 2Pac I'd come back from Cuba
Rhyme with me when I push on her tooters
Me and my man Slim Shady, we pen great-y
Take our 80 MC's, West you know what, what
What, what, what, what
What

Yo yo yo
One more time I come back
Slinging the wack, yo
I'm the illest rapper to hold a cordless, patrolling corners
Looking for hookers to punch in the mouth with a roll of quarters
I'm meaner in action than Rosco beating James Tar Senior
And smackin his back with vacuum cleaner attachments
I grew up in the wild hood, as a hazardous youth
With a messed up childhood, that I use as an excuse
And ain't nothing changed, I kept the same mindstate
Since the third time that I failed 9th grade
You probably think that I'm a negative person, don't be so sure of it
I don't promote violence, I just encourage it
I laugh at the sight of death as I fall down a cement flight of steps
And land inside a bed of spider webs
So throw caution to the wind, you and a friend
Can jump off of a bridge and if you live, do it again
Pfft, why not? Blow your brain out, I'm blowing mine out
Forget it, you only live once you might as well die now

Yeah, best do like it is
Roll your tape recorders, we came to the London borders
Blast your four, then I trash your store
Your woman start to scream so I stab your whore
Jet out your door faster than a Labrador
Yeah, yeah

Smoking herb and still we spit
On this microphone they say I'm allowed to say 'shit'
So I'ma say it as much as I can
Cause it don't matter cause I'm the man
With a fricking beer in my hand
I said frick cause I was respect to Tim Westwood
Y'all wanna step to this, yo I come from the best hood
Detroit, the Motown, where it goes down
Kick the flow sound, rappers they know now
But kick a pro now

Back and forth, me and Em don't need to practice
Y'all lack this, we stick you like a cactus
You scream like a actress, the fact is
Y'all can't see us in '99, 2000
3000, 4000 arousing styles

And 3 plus, y'all wanna be us
But none of y'all can see us
Even if y'all had some new bifocals, I try locals
Plus I provoke you and then I bust
Freestyles y'all can't trust, I'm like Canibus
I bust, can I bust? No you can't
Well yes I can cause I'm slim shady and I'm the man

We flex styles like a bicep
I found out where Canibus money went
I borrowed a dollar from Wyclef
Rhyme deaf MC's need to try this
You can't get with this, make you one of my
Plus that, we bust back, yo F that
Rap that, step up and get flat
And it's time for y'all to hear what this year's around
Detroit been quiet long enough
Yo Slim, I need you to back me up
My freestyles ain't connecting
They better start respecting

Well I'ma check then with dirty needles
It's two of us but we're not the Beatles
Cause there was three of them, and I am seeing them
But yall ain't seeing Em even if I was driving in the BM in the PM
With the top up and the top down, don't matter cause I rock now
Yo y'all can hear the Glock sound, 2Pac now
Yo that's what I am when I bust, this lyrical image
Y'all can't just betray the skrimmage
That I be killing when I be busting and I'm crushing
Any MC leave em with no freaking discussion

Run up in your house then I shot your wife
Ayo Em, hold these Tylenol 3's while I rock the mic

Weed lacer, ninty-seven burgundy blazer
Wanted for burgulary, had to ditch the mercury Tracer
I'm on some loc shit, some fed up with this being broke shit
I'm not to joke with, yo I don't sell crack, I smoke it


Hand me an .8, beam me up and land me in space
I'ma sit on top of the world and spit on Brandy and Ma$e
I'm more than ill, scarier than a white person
Trapped in a room with Lauryn Hill, human horror film
But with a lot funnier plot, and people that feel me
Cause I'ma still be Madd Rapper, whether I got money or not
As long as I'm on pills, and I got plenty of pot
I'll be in a canoe paddling, makin fun of your yacht
But I would like an award
For the best rapper to get one mic in The Source
And a wardrobe I can afford
Otherwise I might just end up back-striking a Ford
And you wonder what the hell I need more Vicodin for
Everybody's pissing me off; even the No Limit Tank
Looks like a middle finger sideways flipping me off
No duh I'm a great danger to my health
Why else would I kill you then jump in the grave and bury myself?
You can hate me now

Need to run for cover
Eminem is white but he still my brother
Slim Shady, known to go and smoke crack
But you and Charli Baltimore got something in common, you both whack
How you feel about that? No need to jock 'em
You so whack you make Master P sound like Rakim
When it's time to bust y'all, when we trust y'all, we dust y'all
Who y'all? Break your balls like cue balls
I know who you are, you RuPaul
Do stall, for those try to fall and try to brawl
All y'all get bust up and banged up, framed up
How many MC's bring my name up?
The same slut said the same thing, it's freestyle
No need to rehearse, my verse is universal
Curse a flow, crush you like Hershel Walker
Allie Sparker, three day sparker highland Parker chalker
You MCs can't get darker than the Midwest bracket
It's us, me and Emzee
Come right there, we feeling flimsy
Tipsed up, one time lifetime we ripped up
It's bad to the evil, met that, now it's all to say
Death rap, fuck hoes, don't even say get blast away, passed away
Blasted ass, hey yo, they say we're Aftermath
Slim Shady, you heard that, my words black
But bust you up because you preferred that
To hear me now, preferred that, the surgical snipe
Preserved you with life, I'll make you allergic to life
You die for this, don't even battle us
See us at the―what's that?―Subterreanean
We knock your brain in



It’s not about lyrics anymore, it’s about a hot beat and a catchy hook

If we gotta dumb down our style and ABC it
Then so be it
Cause nowadays these kids, jeez
Don’t give a shit bout lyrics
All they wanna hear is a beat and thats it
Long as they can go to the club and get blitzed
Pick up some chicks and get some digits
And the DJ’s playing them hits
Oh this my jam, this my shit
We dont know a word to a verse
All we know is the chorus
Cause the chorus repeats the same four words for us
And the songs ginormous, the whole formula’s switched
Cause we don’t know anymore, what are hits
Is it the beat, is it the rap
Is it a finger snap or the same 808 clap
And how do we adapt and get TRL votes
When 13 year olds control the remote
And Ashley’s got a brand new nose
We gotta put some new em-phasis on our syllables

If the emphasis on the compact disc isn’t the beat
Than I’m gon feature EM and get rich
And let Dre mix the shit and drive off in the Range Rove
Cause everywhere I go they love the bling bling flow
Bang bang look at the way my chain glow
The ring on my fing’ cost ya man lot of dough, oh
The fuck am I busting my brain for?
Its just the way the game go, oh, it takes two to tango
You call this a lame flow
You bought the shit
I guess you to blame too
I just found the angle
No more reality flow
I’m tryna time my album dropping with a reality show
Cock the Mac 11 in front of Hot 97
And call my publicist tell her “we in press heaven”
No one gives a shit except some kids who just got into sex on the internet
So you want the chat room or the house of Malibu Em?
Your emphasis is on the wrong Syllable

They said 30′s the new 20
Funny, must mean 40′s the new 30
Interesting cause ever since then it’s been in a sense
An extension for veteran rappers that are better than half
Of the shit coming out right now
Its all trash
The torch is gonna burn out before it gets passed
Jay said it’s his last and 50 and Em
Then what? Detox drops what we got then
So now our whole camps is running around scrambling over what to do
Gambling everytime we put a record out
Just looking for that hook

Shorty I love you
And you love me too
We were meant to be cause shorty
You love me
And I love you too
And I promise I’ll be true to you

Go shorty, its your birthday
You made it just in time to hear my wordplay
Its the kid that flip flows who used to flip O’s
And run G for days used to see how I get hoes
I’m international, I get my dick licked round the globe
I’m sick right into show, riding on lolo’s
Puffing on coco, my bitch in Manolo’s
Don’t fuck with the dodo’s, I sling for dumb hoes
I playing, I ain't got time to joke, joke
You fuck around, you could get your ass smoked
Look, its not a game, me B, I ain't playing
Beep behind me player, so you here anyway
You don’t hear what I’m saying
Me fin-nini-na
Fee-fi-dididee-yay
Just give me my check and I’ll be on my way
Sunny bunny money and funny
You ain't even listening and I just took your money

This ain't top 40 or hit list shit
Not for TRL, no Rick Dees' picks
This is straight GRL ski mix bitch
Call me Strasburg when I pitch this shit
I leave these other rappers so tongue-tied
They just local, GR's worldwide
You sound like cabbage, ya wilted outside
I spit tomatoes straight from the vine
Leave these other artists lookin all sundried
A bunch of little stains, to them I'm Tide
Keep a stain stick in my Subaru ride
Glass all black can't see us igniting
Paint white out like you fucked up writing
Mount baker bout to get a boost in style
In the parking lot they can't help but smile
Ma'am please cover the eyes of your child
Gunz come out you know bumpin 50
Subie 2 shes covered with bitties
Snowpants blue like the sign for thrifty
So baggy what are those a fuckin size 60?
Burrito legs bitch, call me big shitty

















So let's get down to business

I don't got no time to play around
What is this, what is this?
The invasion
Green Lantern
The infiltration
We comin’
I got 50 Cent
I got G-UNIT
D-Twizzy in this bitch, with Obie Trice
So watch what you say
'Fore you call our name
Cause you say one more thing
And it won't be nice

Here we go I shoulda known
I was bound to get pulled into some bullshit
Sooner or later you little haters
Are too jealous of us to love us
You hate it
G-UNIT made it
And Obie’s comin’, D-Twizzy’s comin’
You’re sick to your stomach
50 percent of it is 50 Cent
The other 50 percent of it's whose color of skin it is
But if you even considerin’

Takin our label down
You better find our building
And fly a fuckin’ plane into it
But I ain't tryna get to intricate into it
I’m just tryna give you a little hint for your own benefit
Cause then it's just gonna get to the point
Where it escalates into some other shit
Then I'mma flip
Them I'mma get to stompin' in my Air Force Ones
Won’t be able to tell if it's 2 pairs or it's one
Cause it's gonna feel like so many feet kickin’ you
You'll think Nike just made this inner-cleat tennis shoe

I donât know what it is or what it could be
But I get a woody when these pussies try to push me
Thinkin’ they gon’ put me in a position to pickle me
Ya’ll tickle me pink; I think I'd just rather have Pink-Tickle-Me

Hickory dickory dock tickity tock tickity
A little bit of da diggidy dock diggidy
Mixed wit a little bit of the jigga ji jigga
With a small pinch of Biggie look at me I’m just the bomb diggity


We the realest label

Donât try to act like you donât feel our label
Cause we gon' fuck around and kill your label
Obie, D-Twizzy, G-unit, 50, Shady Records we the label for sure

We the realest label

Donât try to act like you donât feel our label
Cause we gon' fuck around and steal your paper
Obie, D-Twizzy, G-unit, 50 we gon’ kill your fuckin' label for sure
Yeah!
Shady in a place to be, see
And I got what it takes to rock the mic right?
Still watch what you say to me punk
Cause I'm off probation in less than 6 months

HAHA --- WOO

Shady Records
Still Aftermath

And donât think we donât hear you motherfuckers talkinâ

Cause we do, we see yâall
But we just gonâ sit back for a minute and watch what the fuck yâall do



Come in spittin', with not writtin', non-fiction
Rappers try to step to this, with no prediction
It doesn't matter cause I'm smashin' and bashin' and crashin'
I hate rappers with a passion when I'm chilling with DJ Fashion
Yo, I need a frickin' kleenex, so I die like River Phoenix
When I'm chillin with Phoneix, with two Coronas
I'm on the microphone and I'm a own this
Yo, and I'm a bone this in Arizona
Yo, rappers that ain't able
That can't stay stable, I'm on two turn tables
With my man, but he doesn't matter cause he kicks lyrics galore
And he's only five foot four
Yo check it out I bust rhymes and get, groovy
My man got carded at a rated R movie
But it really didn't matter, he wasn't insulted
He said I'm 27 years old, yo, I'm an adult, kid
But, yo still, Slim Shady gets ill with the skill
And I'm a always bill and kill, my baby's mama
Just to piss the world off, just to piss the girls off
Yo I earl off
The top of the building, kill women and children
And then it hit me
Suddenly my wrists tried to slit me
Couldn't believe it, yo, ya'll can't conceive it
It's Slim Shady, I'll fuck a girl in her cleavage
Bleep that out, and you can keep it, just bleep it
Yo, y'all keep it a secret
I'm top secret, like pop secret
Rappers they don't wanna see
Slim Shady, I'm from the motherfucking, D
Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-haha-ha-ha
Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-haha-ha-ha
Yo, yo Slim Shady



Slim motherfuckin' Shady... alright!
Missy Elliott, Timbo, c'mon, yo!

I'm homicidal, and suicidal, with no friends
Holding a gun with no handles, just a barrel at both ends
Sprayin' tecs at you
Until you see your fuckin' legs
With the bullet holes and the exit wounds layin' next to you
Fuckin' mad dog, foamin' out the mouth
Fuck mouth, my whole house is foamin' out the couch
Jumped out of the 93rd floor of a buildin'
Woke up to a hospital staff
Got up and laughed
Chopped 'em in half
And suffocated your oxygen mask
Shit, if I get any higher
I'm a get the East and West beefin' again
Fly back to Detroit and stand in the crossfire


Yo, yo, I'm only smilin' when I'm violent
Got on the plane wildin'
Told the pilot to fly me to Tylenol Island
Stewardess like, "You restless?"
"Nah, bitch, I'm restful, so hold this fuckin' jet still so I can eat these pretzels"
Forget school
The other kids are disrespectful
They hold me down and play connect-the-dots with my freckles
I can't take it
I'm tryin' to gain weight
So I eat steak
And swallow the whole plate
And weigh myself, naked
Put out albums
To teach kids family values
'Cause every mom and dad should allow you to pop valiums
And never hit someone unless you got a reason
And if there ain't a reason
Make one up, then start swingin'



I don't wanna say goodbye
But sometimes things just don't go as we'd like
All I wanna do is cry
Say my farewells, pack up and leave tonight

Farewell miss I know that you can care less
But I'm sorry for everything I was careless
But I need you to know that I love you so much
And I've been drinking myself to sleep my soul's crushed
A couple more shots I know I'm gonna go nuts
I can't deal with the fact you left me with no crutch
I was in love with you how could you do this to me
Actually I did this to myself, what a tragedy!
And now what do I do?
Where do I go?
Cause everywhere I go I see your face
It's hard starting over
Trying to find another shoulder
To lean on
I feel like my whole life just got peed on
They say time heals but dammit I wanna stop time and feel this pain
As crazy as it sounds to me it's sane
And I like it, why? cause I feel like we're still united
In some weird way I don't wanna fight it

I don't wanna say goodbye
But sometimes things just don't go as we'd like
All I wanna do is cry
Say my farewells, pack up and leave tonight

I wrote you the other day and you didn't write back!
It's like that!? after all the crap we been through!?
I can't believe you! I know I fucked up!
But look within you and find some love and stop being stuck up!
You keep sending me to voicemail!
I'm annoyed, hell!, shit you could at least sent a text
But you're probably busy kissing someone else's lips
While I'm sitting here cleaning my shoes from this shit!
You're hard headed a sharp headache
I need help call a medic
I just cut myself, yeah, I did it
Without you I'm nothing don't you get it!?
Every time that I said I loved you I meant it!
You turn and tell me you hate me and regret that
We ever met, I can't believe you just said that
You're so cold you just hit me so low
I can't take this no more, so hit the road

I don't wanna say goodbye
But sometimes things just don't go as we'd like
All I wanna do is cry
Say my farewells, pack up and leave tonight

Some things just don't seem the way they do
One day you tell me I love you and only you
I wake up to find out it was a dream
You're telling me you hate me, you're leaving me
People change everything changes
We go from best friends then become strangers
We go from seeing each other everyday then
Farewell to never seeing your face again

I can't get you outta of my head
So I'm out of bed at 4 in the morning
Wishing I was dead
But for some odd reason I can't do it
For some reason I needed to write
What's on my mind and what's going through it
Cause if I don't I'll probably suffocate
Why do you have so much hate
Towards me you need some loving babe
God I fucking love you I hate myself
For falling in love with you
Just to find out all I did was trouble you
My heart is aching I'm medicated
I tried meditating
But nothing works I don't even feel sedated
I wish you could feel what I feel for one second
I reckon you would jump out your window bare naked
Fuck humiliation, you do anything to get me back
Opinions wouldn't matter what they thought in fact
You would tell everyone to fuck themselves good
And do everything to have me if you could

I don't wanna say goodbye
But sometimes things just don't go as we'd like
All I wanna do is cry
Say my farewells, pack up and leave tonight




Sample from Batman
To the Batmobile, let's go

Yo', Manix man, I'mma take this one kinda slow, alright?

Welcome to the flipside
Hope he can swim, cause if he can't, he gonna drown on a rip tide
It's pourin', plus the old man ain't snoring
Cause he gotta get up pretty damn early in the morning
Cause I'm slammin' like Basketball Jones
Slippin' out chrome and messin' with the break bone
You suckers disgust me like low fat
Gimme' a bat and I'll show you where your head's at
Tryna' hit the row with the paddles you little boce?
I think you better stay home and eat your broccoli
Cause you still got a long ways to go
So you better step off cause you picked the wrong Joe
You ain't ready to throw with the mighty man
And don't forget about the rest of the band
So you better get used to the shrine
Cause I'll be rappin' as long as I can write rhymes
These palms'll make a cup like pottery
To make you see so many stars, you'd think you studyin' astrology
You wanted to live so tell about what you went through
You couldn't cut the mustard if I gave you a Ginsu


Quickly, step to the side cause I'm coming through
You think you was looking to call me W or double-you?
So how could you think you outdid me
While I'm still gettin' getaways quicker than a kidney
Steppin' to a rabbit is stupid when you're a turtle
Did you know you couldn't even blow a rhyme in a circle
You little kiddies are getting a bit too frolicky
Throwing me rhymes more sorry than an apology
Let me give it the proper operation that it needs
To allow me to put a end to weak melody
Need it for suckers like peanut butter and celery
Friends in the zone with the words that I kick with ease
And you with the face that feel like a Pekinese
My ma ha' more tooth than a sharp pair of shears
And given that, I could love to chop to it
You remember the day you rhymes with the fools
Then you'll know what it's like to take a nosedive
Beat by the fattest skinny kid alive!

A'ight, we're gonna break it down for a second, and I'mma catch my breath
And I'mma let Buttafingaz go off on a scratch for a minute
Dude, Buttafingaz, when I give you the cue; come up with that funkyassdiculous-dope scratch
Go for it

Yeah, let me show you how the big boys play
Thinking 'bout us bustin' out into the fat girl on a Wednesday
While I grab the steel and put you through an ordeal
So kneel before me or fear who's more real
Imma the best mom, I'm gonna get a plat
Start flowin' so much, I'll be in need of a maxipad
It went so fast, my pen'll yell at me
Did so many drugs, my song will be a felony
How'd he ever get the nerve to confront me
Well shit, that's what you get for being clumsy
Get more steppin' up, figure the competition
I got more jerks in my basement than you have twitches
Hope you all get played out like Batman
Work like pay dirt and bust by the Fatman
Blowin' em out so fast, I swear they make me report this
Smooth as whipped cream and rough as a callous
With a soul intent for destruction
One more hit for the Downstairs Productions

The fattest skinny kid alive! x4



I'm a pacifist, unless there's ass to kick
It'll be tragic miss, If I don't fuck you bitch
You can take the dick you little cunt
Lick it than pass it like a blunt
But I'm sober now I'm done with drugs
That was the last chapter this is the next one
My place in the game is big, son
I'm somewhere between God, Godzilla, and King Kong
A Monster, yeah like his dick is
They say I'm hung like a bear, so run, run bitches
The chainsaw can give you staple stitches
If your unfaithful, just kill your wife than rape your mistress
And if that don't work your a fucking retard
I'm sick of playing games, I'm here for revenge, Dee Barnes
Slapping up Dre for what he start-
Ed, long time ago and it left him scarred

Everybody knows I'm crazy
This game isn't gonna change me
There's nothing else to say, see
You already know I'm Shady

I'm assuming you don't want to battle
That will be your dying day
Into your house bullets will rattle
You just cannot win this fray
Holdin' pullin' moldin' chrome
Oldest, dopest, grossest flow
Killer, father, loving home
Family jealous of all this gold
Everybody wants a million from Shady
Even the goddamn motherfuckers who hate me
But I stays crazy, and sprayz AKs at babys



Relapse 2 mothafuckas
Fuck you and your mothas
Dre grab the gat *gunshots*



I'm like a white Michael, Vick
Psycho enough to stick Michael J Fox in a microwave with a rock

I might like a little Alize with a side of NyQuil and ride a motorcycle bike right through the side of my high school

Satan's disciple with a sniper rifle and a knife in a white diaper liable the shit on you while I snipe you

So dope begits of opiates, what an appropriate way to start off his day, he may just smart off to Dre

He may be hard to contain cause his rages so hard to gauge. See Hannibal ate his face and made Jason gnaw off his leg

Amazing hard-on for razors and blades and anything sharp, even poisonous darts it all plays a major part of his game

It's some crazy shit going on in Shady's apartment again

News flash I'm still trash, them pills should have killed my ass but they didn't they just made me stronger
It's like they rebuilt my ass, like the six-million dollar man after the crash, it's Aftermath, bitch in my milk glass it's still half empty
Shit, I done laid a verse, says some foul shit trying to go back fix it fucked around and just made it worse
Yeah I'm back, lookin no worse for wear, got these faggots mad enough to rip out their hair and start punching the air
Panties so in a bunch that they can't function, it's Shady and Royce yeah, fuck what a dysfunctional pair
So stop acting like a punk get a pair, take a pill and fall the fuck out spill your lunch in the chair

I'll do a hundred yard dash
Just to slash Kim Kardash
In the ass with a shard of glass from nick hogans car crash
You'll end up like the passenger of that, don't be a smartass
Yeah laugh when you sit there thinkin that the hard part passed




Everybody, duck down, all you hear is the sound
Of Slim Shady spittin' rounds at the Lyricist Lounge
What year is this now? I don't know, I forgot
All I know is that I'd die for pot, make the cypher hot
Smoke weed and fuck up my life a lot
Give me the money now, bitch
Did you want to see your wife or not?
'Fore I stab her wit' this knife I got
I got a sci-fi plot like a science fiction flick that I'm a hit you wit'
I got the Outsidaz up in this bitch
Peace to Thirstin' Howl, A.L. and Wordsworth
My mother smoked crack, I had a premature birth
I'm just a nerd cursed wit' badly disturbed nerves
Who wanna step to this and get served first?
Ninety-nine percent of aliens prefer Earth
So I'm here to rule the planet, startin' wit' your turf
I hid a secret message inside of a word search
Wit' smeared letters, runnin' together in blurred spurts
Rappers can't fuck wit' me, it hurts worth
When they get abolished, polyps'll murk worse
Wrote a secret message inside of a word search
Wit' smeared letters, runnin' together in blurred spurts
Rappers can't fuck wit' me, hollerin', 'Nurse, nurse'
You said this shot would numb it, bitch, it just hurts worse
Rappers can't fuck wit' the way that I spit it, lyrical lit it
Now you did it when I committed, get his rhymes out here
Off the top of the dome wit' a popular poem
Fuck a team, I can stop you alone
Rappers don't understand it



Verse 1 2Pac

Got some static for some niggas on the other side of town
Let my little cousin K roll, he's a rider now
What they want from us motherfuckin' thug niggas?
Used to love niggas, now I plug niggas, and slug niggas
Am I wrong? Niggas makin' songs, tryin' to get with us
Must be gone on stress weed, in the West we trust
To the chest I bust, then we ride 'til the sun come
Shinin' back to brighten up the sky; how many die?
Heard the Fugees was tryin' to do me
Then, we watch the other two die slow
Castrated entertainin' at my motherfuckin' sideshow
Bam! Set my plan in mo'
Time to exterminate my foes; I can't stand you hoes
Uh, now label this my fuckin' trick shot
My lyrics runnin' all you cowards out of hip-hop
When we ride on our enemies

Hook

Why I cry, when I be thuggin' 'til I die
Picture a nigga in heaven, high off weed I fly
Got me missin' dead homies wishin' phonies would die
Hit the weed and hope it get me high; dear God
Tell me why I cry, when I be thuggin' 'til I die
Picture a nigga in heaven, high off weed I fly
Got me missin' dead homies wishin' phonies would die
Hit the weed and hope it get me high
Blessed with a thug's heart

Verse 2 Eminem

I'm a lit fuse, anything I do, bitch, it's news
Pistol whippin' motherfuckin' bouncer 6'2"
Who needs bullets, soon as I pull it you sweat bullets
An excellent method to get rid of the next bully
It's actually better 'cause instead you murderin'
You can hurt 'em and come back again and kick dirt at 'em
It's like pourin' salt in the wounds, assault and get sued
You can smell the lawsuits soon as I waltz in the room
Don't let me lose you, I'm not tryna confuse you
When I let loose with this Uzi
And just shoot through your Isuzu
You get the message? Am I gettin' through to you?
You know what's comin'?
You motherfuckers don't even know, do you?
It's like a fight to the top just to see who'd die for the spot
You put your life in this, nothin' like survivin' a shot
Y'all know what time it is, soon as Pac signs on this dot
Shit, what you know about death threats, ‘cause I get a lot

Hook

Why I cry, when I be thuggin' 'til I die
Picture a nigga in heaven, high off weed I fly
Got me missin' dead homies wishin' phonies would die
Hit the weed and hope it get me high; dear God
Tell me why I cry, when I be thuggin' 'til I die
Picture a nigga in heaven, high off weed I fly
Got me missin' dead homies wishin' phonies would die
Hit the weed and hope it get me high
Blessed with a thug's heart

Verse 3 2Pac

Come take a journey through my mind's eye
You crossed the game, don't explain
Nigga, time to die; say goodbye
Watch my eyes when I pull the trigger
So right before you die, you bow before a bigger nigga
Now dry your eyes, you was heartless on your hits
Niggas love to scream "Peace!" after they start some shit
Pay attention, here's a word to those that robbed me
I murder you, then I run a train on Mobb Deep
Don't fuck with me!
Nigga, you're barely livin', don't you got sickle cell?
See me have a seizure on stage, you ain't feelin' well
Hell, how many niggas wanna be involved?
See, I was only talkin' to Biggie, but I'll kill all of y'all, then ball
Then tell Da Brat to keep her mouth closed
Fuck around and get tossed up by the fuckin' Outlawz
Before I leave, make sure everybody heard
Know I meant every motherfuckin' word
When we ride on our enemies

Hook

Why I cry, when I be thuggin' 'til I die
Picture a nigga in heaven, high off weed I fly
Got me missin' dead homies wishin' phonies would die
Hit the weed and hope it get me high; dear God
Tell me why I cry, when I be thuggin' 'til I die
Picture a nigga in heaven, high off weed I fly
Got me missin' dead homies wishin' phonies would die
Hit the weed and hope it get me high




Hi, my name is, what?
My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh?
My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, what?
My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh?
My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady

Excuse me!
Can I have the attention of the class,for one second?

Wanna copy me and do exactly like I did?
Try 'cid and get fucked up worse than my life is?
My brain's dead weight, I'm trying to get my head straight
But I can't figure out which Spice Girl I want to impregnate
And Dr. Dre said "Slim Shady, you a basehead!"
Uh-uhhh! "So why's your face red? Man, you wasted!"
Well, since age twelve I felt like I'm someone else
‘Cause I hung my original self from the top bunk with a belt
Got pissed off and ripped Pamela Lee's tits off, and smacked her so hard I knocked her clothes backwards like Kris Kross
Faster than a fat bitch who sat down too fast
C`mere, slut! "Shady, wait a minute, that's my girl, dog!"
I don't give a fuck, God sent me to piss the world off


My English teacher wanted to have sex in junior high
The only problem was, my English teacher was a guy
I smacked him in his face with an eraser
Chased him with a stapler
Stapled his nuts to a stack of papers
Walked in the strip club, had my jacket zipped up
Flashed the bartender, then stuck my dick in the tip cup
Extraterrestrial, killin' pedestrians, rapin' lesbians
While they're screaming, "Let's just be friends!"
99 percent of my life I was lied to
I just found out my mom does more dope than I do
I told her I'd grow up to be a famous rapper
You know you blew up when the women rush your stands
And try to touch your hands like some screaming Usher fans


Dr. Dre, don't just stand there, operate!
I'm not ready to leave, it's too scary to die
I'll have to be carried inside the cemetery and buried alive
Am I coming or going? I can barely decide
All my life I was very deprived
Clothes ripped like the Incredible Hulk
When I was little I used to get so hungry I would throw fits
I lay awake and strap myself in the bed
Put a bulletproof vest on and shoot myself in the head
I'm steaming mad,and by the way, when you see my dad
Tell him that I slit his throat in this dream I had








It's the mothafuckin' Farm Club
This little girl 'bout to get a arm rub
Who wanna see me on this mothafuckin' fiction board
Who wanna see me on a mothafuckin' diction lore
And I'll be kicking source to mothafuckin' camera looking right in it
I can kick twenty dope rhymes in one minute
And y'all don't understand cause my rhymes are Infinite

What's the Farm Club?
It's the mothafuckin' *chika-chika* Farm Club
It's the mothafuckin' *chika-chika* Farm Club

Is this shit there wasn't be bleeped out?
I don't know but I feel it is and it's like *eeh-eh*
And I will kicking rhyme until it stops to *eeh-eh*

What? Wha-what? It's the Farm Club?
What? Wha-what? Wha-what? It's the Farm Club?



*People chanting Eminem*

*Eminem tears up a paper*

*Footsteps*

*Door open and slam shut*

*More footsteps*

I almost forgot
You're comin' with me


Last one baby, let's go
Last one baby, let's go
Last one baby, let's go

*Eminem sighs*



Due to a massive amount of bootlegging
And constant downloading
People are no longer buying CDs so that we can get paid for our fucking work
They are just continuing to get songs for free
See, what they do is buy computers, strictly pick songs that they like
And burn them on CDs or put them on iPods
Causing major decrease in sound scan, putting music retail in a tremendous slump
Causing artists such as myself to make no money for record sales
Being forced to tour, causing more stress, more arguments with my wife
Not being able to see my kids, drink more, take more pills
Punch more people in the face, hate the world, and end up in rehab!
Not that I wouldn't have done the same thing if I could get music for free when I was a kid
But now that I rap for a living, buy my goddamn CDs!
But in the meantime, buy this Obie Trice bootleg from DJ Whoo Kid
And put more money in his pocket
Thanks!







I boss how I live
Fuck 'em hoe
God meant me
To push Bentleys
The Stat Quo
Still slammin' 'lac doors
This squad 'ill blow your brain out
Half-crazy
Bustin' out the window
Aight cut it, cook it, bag it
Distribute it through the city
Home get that cabbage
Take it, flip it
Turn illegal to legal
Launder, stay grindin'
Keepin' ya business on the under
Humble moves come up
Cops run up
But most of them corrupt
So what?
They want they cut
So pay 'em
All those who oppose the squad
Spray 'em
Got goons with MACs
Who kill for scratch
Okay I'm
One quick trip 'ill
And get you filled with gas
Broad day and niggas 'ill kill you
Without the mask
I'm getting bank
Like I'm shooting it from off the glass
Signed with Shady-Aftermath
Cause I'm after cash
Biatch

The way it go
Just heard my dog
Stat Quo flow
Ha, ya heard what he had to say
Use the words Swifty McVay
I'm ill enough to shoot a nigga through his pager
And if I missed
The shit's going exactly through his neighbor
My behavior's
Fatal enough to faint niggas
Old age and cradle
I shoot from unexpected angles
I changed ya facials
I could have you niggas hugging an angel
Literally
Niggas be crazy
I'm misery, breaking both of ya ankles
I diminish mentally
I turn you into a mimic of Kennedy
I don't go to sleep 'till I murder motherfuckers in trilogies
I recruit enemies
Friends ain't shit
They take yo ends and split
Willingly
What kind of shit got a nigga faking the funk
Dressed like George Clinton
But you hoes ain't making a buck
You out and about
With yo face frostbit
With a hustlin' mouth
But you really full of brussels sprouts
Husband or spouse
Your generation's running out
Because my gun's in ya mouth
We won, you lost
You got a witness program
Move out cold then John Walsh
Wild
And this the way we do
Emzy, Imma pass it to you
So what ya wanna do?

What I wanna do? What I wanna do?
Let me see right here, yo

Not many people that I label would be able
To display table manners, but our plan is
To make this beat rock like scanners and make the fans just
Go bananas, yo, get our planners
That means our nuts for the sluts who don't under-
Stand this, yo, my plan is, yeah right
And y'all gon' stand there and act like you don't understand it
Like my name is Janet, my titty fell out and I ain't plan it
Yo, check this—check this out
And if you rocking with ya necklace out, that's my breakfast now
I'mma snatch it, yo, my style is wretched
You can't fetch it, no you can't stretch it
And yo, it doesn't really matter
Cause ya name I can't even pronunciate, you the—
Same type of mo'fucker to go and sucker
Punch Dre at the Vibe Awards, but he right behind the boards
The next day, so kiss an ass
Or kiss a dick, lick a dick, eat my ass
Whatever you won' do it's on you
Big Proof coming through with the mo—

Y'all niggas sing
Y'all done came to the Nina Ross war
Ya homie's a killa
But my killas they cost more
It's all inherited
I was boss born
Put eighteen in ya flesh
And make ya chest a golf course
Niggas know that we ain't even
You know why
Yeah I got that real heathen
With them steel beams on 'em
Through ya dreams on 'em
Like I'm still a fiend
Noted for mics
It's only right
You see my real team, brody
I do it live
I was sippin' on some cream soda
Heave phony
Fuck this back and forth
This ain't a tennis meet
I spray you industry gangstas
Cause they ain't in the streets
It's cool to beef
But why?
'Till you truce with or you trust me
I told you Puffy
I'm Proof
Who you could do big things with us
Spit dope
They call me Rick James bitch
Clip-clack
Bang-hit
Bang-drip
Drip fang of blood
Drip, drip, drank when sirens cop came
Body bag thick
Body bag, zip-zip
That's it
Fuck you bitch

Down a dark street
It's the dirty Stat Quo
Lord have mercy
Breathe, hello I'm 'bout my cheese
The steez, mellow
Cash in the bank
On my grind in the paint
Oh, look how I do live with my boy Westwood
Up to no good
Smoking that good shit
See how I ball
Handle, handle my business
Eminem, Swift, P, Stat Quo that's it
Back on the track
Green Lantern done switched the beat
I'm guaranteed to my thang and drop the heat
My man Zeke is in the corner with him
Boss Hog, A-town, yes I be them
Do what I do freestyle, top of the dome
Don't fuck with my click
Leave Doc Dre alone
If I see you out the wars
Imma stab yo' ass
Whoop yo' ass
Ya fuck with me
I make ya handicap
And I pass the mic to my man Swifty
McVay he don't play

I'm Swifty McVay
Ya bastard out the blue
I'm hazard
I even haunt spirits that's after you
I'm cancerous with no answer
Pharmaceutic, I turn you allergic to being human
It ain't new
It's what I do when I'm feudin'
A sick nuisance
I have ya had
Until motherfuckers lookin' like Rick Rubin
What do you do to fools that think that they can take laughs?
Their face get sliced
And that's what's up
I inherit the power of all the rappers
I gotta be like Kruger
All them niggas bodies are coming out of me
I usually pack a Ruger
Now I see that I can be successful
By bruisin' yo chest
Without a thing
A professional
I'm a king that slaughtered kings
Exceptional, genetically raised by wolverines nigga
I give a fuck on what niggas seen
I'll send a fiend to pitifully raise you
And then convene bitch
That's what we do
Our crew D12
Rapping nigga
In take the Nina off the shelf
And I'm hazard for ya health
Like I said before
The type to walk the streets
And the five-o ignore
Me when they see me
Dog, I'll burn you like VD
And that's the way we be
Fuck you!

Easy, easy
I'm trying to hold a job down here
Yeah, yeah
I apologize if anyone's offended
You know tune out go to something else
Come back later
It's going down
It's real hip-hop
There's gonna be some swear words
Be prepared
Change the station if you ain't built

Aftermath in the house now
Get yo' fricking mouth stabbed out
Y'all get so mad
Get so livid
Looking for dap from anyone who would give it
Now how you gon' value
Someone else's opinion
Cause you selfish
I'm rap's Elvis
Everybody try to grab the helm-ets and they hardhats
Run and duck for cover
Yo, fuck ya mother
What the fuck are ya?
Yo, I'm sprayin'
While I'm playin'
I ain't playin'
I'm sprayin' at your feet
Like hey Imma cock the hand
Imma pull my cock out
Outta my pajamas
And cock back the cock
Like it's chicken
Yo, check it out
The clock is ticking
It's countdown to Armageddon
And there's nothing you can do to stop it
Put your arm or head in
Or put a pen in it
But once the grenade pin is pulled
It's nothing you could do
But end up in the hospital
Yeah, yeah
Hospital, pital, 'spitals
End up in the 'spital
And y'all can eat my tender vittles
I don't really give a fudge
Fudge, fudge-packers
Is what y'all are
And y'all get smacked up
At the awards show
However you want it to go
We can make it go either way
Biatch
That's itch-bay backwards
F around and smack turds
They told us not to use no cuss words
So we gon' not use cuss words
And say busters instead
Have you all bleeding red
Damn, right out of yo' head
That's what I said
And my name ain't Fred
My name ain't special ed
And it ain't my birthday
But Proof can get on the mic in the worst way
And I don't even have to curse to say

Proof's a wolf
Grab ya pooper-scooper
Follow me
I fight to the death
Like Apollo Creed
I only hang with bitches that swallow seeds
Air Force Ones not Wallabees
Hollow tease
I be, rushin' colonies
I'm known by all blacks in hoods
Like collard greens
Last of a dyin' breed
Old school like Model Ts
When I ride on my rivalries
Like 2Pac writ
Put you in the I.C.U
With no eye sockets
More than five shots spit
So you can die hot bitch
It's only one topic
I need profit
Fuck the gossip
Harry the hype-writer
The night lighter
The only thing higher than Proof
Nigga is my lighter
I'm watchin' you fly niggas crash
Like Al-Qaeda
Crime fighter
Guess I rhyme by the mind tighter
Than the World Trade
Bit the jaws
Like Jay Dee
I put my fucking dick to broads
Broads, dog that's down on all fours
Of course I'm down to get yours
How come my niggas stop cold
When they heard capsule?
The rap flow is good
And they say that we fatsos
They gotta be this way
And we catch 'em with lassos
And how they feel about that?
Cause we breaking they cash flow
My niggas tell me right there
I ain't got no time
So know why fool
Dropped outta high school
Cause Slim said so
Now I'm back in this bitch
And I'm 'bout to ride this bitch
And this motherfucker rockin'
For Tim, asshole
I gotta do this shit right
Now Swift is on my left
So it's the way it is
Cause Shady in here
I'm 'bout to tell you niggas right now
Green is on the turntable
Why not do this shit daily, all year

Hey doll, cheer
It's a grown man record
You don't want the pressure
This a grown man lecture
Sittin' on the dresser
Be a grown man bitch to her
Underneath my seat's a grown weather here
Peepin' my packer
He got grown man cheddar
Wheels, ransom notes, and checks
Are all grown letters
Hey doll, chill
Sit back relax, as I handle by biz
Green Lantern on the scratch
Attack the track wrong
Stat Quo doing his thing
The European awards was yesterday
Em won
Took the award home
D12, ya know what I mean
Shawty, be grown
Handle my business home
Doing my thing
Home alone
But not Macaulay Culkin
Stat Quo be the champion
Icon winner
Eat niggas like dinner
Me and Westwood, handlin' our beeswax
Green Lantern on the track
Doc Dre did it long time ago
Like this and like that
And uh
I'm motherfucking beast
Man uh
Pass it to Swifty Mc-V
And ain't no flick
To hear what my be sayin'

One-two, three to the four
Swifty with the four-four
Process of elimination is always complete
When I hit the streets
I wanna see who the biggest G
Hennessy don't do nothing but give you lumps
When you speakin' on us
Disrespect you be eatin' a bottle drunk
Turning you niggas all to monks
Red dots amongst ya foreheads
You get punctured once
Slump cowards with Ninas bitch
I mean it, how ya leanin'
Like the Tower of Pisa
Faces lookin' like pizzas
An animal instinct
I eat ya with cannibalistic procedures
Adam's apple some womens' fetuses
Me is just like special nature
I messed up, slurring my words off the liquor
And yes I hate to
See ya wack emcees
Step inside my face
Ya runnin', I'm gunnin'
I'm stunnin' and it's fun when it happens
Especially when I'm rapping
I give dap to brothers I'm cool with
But yo know
You can't mess around with Swift
Ya just cool whip
Ya soft and ya sweeter than sugar
Dog, I'm just that type of nigga
That 'ill walk up on ya
Leave ya in a bed of blood
Huh, if ya tryna fuck with us
He said don't cuss
But I couldn't help it
I take my belt off whip ya wit'  it
Because I'm selfish
So I, just do the things I do
I freestyle for you
Then I pass it to my crew
Then they pass it back
And if ya wack
Then get slapped
For that type of

Acid rap
Yeah and that's a fact
Slim Shady's back
Got eighty ladies layin' on they back
Yo, but I'm a mack
I'm a little nuts for Brittany
Little to sane for Whitney
Tell you the truth
Yo, Bobby would prolly get me
Catch me in the lobby
After he just hit me
After he sniffed three lines
He'd prolly knock out Fifty
He could prolly lift up both of us
And spin us both on both fingers like donuts
Yo, I party hard
But for real, I want Bobby Brown as my bodyguard
And that's for real
And that's the deal
Cause we got mass appeal
And I don't think that they can really take it
Cause I always let my nuts hang
Like I was doing push-ups naked
That's what I do
Is drink the Alizé and
Then I pass it to my man Proof and
Then we start goofin' around
And start spoofin'
Everybody, yo we in the party
And we could rock the party
And we could get it started
Somebody farted
Or we can
We can do the Mardi Gardy
We could party harder
We could get started
What you wanna do
Proof, it's on you

It's on me
Might take it to the hip, homie

It's like Shady and Aftermath
We after cash
You want it
We gon' blast ya ass

And listen, ya need to quit it dog
Cause Proof is low to the ground
Like midget balls
With them bridges falls
I lock ya ass up on the game
And I visit all
And it's like they signed
They said they did it all
Because they breeches small
But Imma tell you
In the likeness of the great 2Pac
I'm hot
And I'm fatter then Biggie Smalls
All y'all, need to recognize
Cause where I come from
It's still the East side
Over there by Dresden
Where we make their heads spin
Back then the back, ten
Make his ass backspin
This action of crack-skin
Nigga, I eat more Vicodin
Than the dots that's on the Pac-Man, board
Oh Lord
Give me my sword
On top of that
The freestyles I got you can't afford
But they free
Yo, they only cost attention
And did I mention
I'm a boss with henchmen
I send niggas to get ya
Yo, it's easy to do
How ya feel about this
Yo, the piece of the Proof
The piece of the clue
The pieces ya need
The pieces I got
On top of that my freestyle
Never stutter
My words are butter-rock
Like the niggas feel about us
I say precise
Nigga feel fucked up like D-Nice, did
For getting Scott La Rock slain
I rock 'caine and rock brains
Back in the day, when ya block came
Get ya block slain
Ya hood aborted
How I feel when they all get shortened
Haha
And I tell ya like this
Ya missing the ending
I lift ya whole hood
Like I'm fixing ya engine
Nigga, come on

I keep my brim tilted
And tracked, I killed it
Atlanta, my city
I built it
Watch this
Young beast bob and weave
Please believe
I ball for cheese
Survival of the fittest
One of the trillest ever
Bow down, he severe
Finna lock the market
Marshall and Dre don' linked up
With the boy from the A
I am chillaxin'
Fine linen in my fashion
Bump yo' questions
Why you askin', anythang?
Niggas wanna know what I'm on
Riding on my enemies
Getting them gon' huh
A crime businesses
And you need homes
Something I can flip to increase my grip
Yo, why they on my dick?
Ride ya own lane
I gotta handle
Trust me lil' man
Ya need a little change
Here's for starters
I show ya how to come up
Work on martyr
Launder ya cheese
Do cash and beauty parlors
Hustle smarter
Green got me, haha
Green got me
Imma kill you Green

To me it's like second nature
I treat murders like a recreation
And these niggas steadily changing
They laughs like Mason
T.D. Jakes and all of these fake gangstas
They all be awaking
Because McVay can put a date on you homes
I'll engrave in ya tombstone
With urination
Now your whole funeral soon blown
Communication are for fools who be wasting time
Contemplating on making up
I ain't that guy
A grudge holder
I used to shove boulder in the counsel of my Aurora
Get caught and tell 'em it's yours
I can leave each one of ya body parts
Stranded in the middle of different forests
Having police ignore the shit
Niggas get hung like ornaments
While they hanging they trees
They get bombed like Vietnamese
In '46 or whatever year it was
I gotta buzz
And murdering you is all I love
This is Swifty McVay
I ain't by myself
I got Em, Proof, and Stat that be hot
And D12 is over, D12 is over here
And yo' death is near
And that's what's up

That's what's up
Pass this cup
And then we blast you up
Freestyle right off the massive truck
We got truckloads
And uff, no
Cuff no and spin it backwards
And play it back later
Cause all y'all haters rockin' gators
Alligators, we see ya later
We ain't player haters
But yo check it out
We rockin' in our Navigators
And we can sit back
And we can stretch, we can check
Trek, I mean catch, anything
And we can fetch
I'm slurring a little bit
But during the part that I was doing
The urination, upon that girl and
Wait a minute, I ain't goin'
There with my rap
I ain't tryin' to be starting no crap
But yo, I be flowin'
With the stuff and I be knowin'
That when I start raking out them leaves
I be hoein'
And that's six in the mornin'
And we can do it
We can get it on until the crack of dawn and
We can get it on with Tim Westwood
We can do whatever you want
Bring ya best cause
We do what we want to do
On this microphone
Cause we ought to know
Or ought to inform you
That we get warm too warm
Sometimes we too hot to
Not to spit this ish
Spit it backwards and that said shit
Whoops, I didn't mean to curse
But yo Proof, come back
And lay one verse

I don't bite
But I spit the killin' venom
When I'm older
My pockets gon' blow up like Brazilian women
You can fight me here
Breaking laws off him dog
And hypnotic, he got it
Although he sound sober
I ain't gay nowhere near gay
I even hate a brown-noser
It's over, he killa
Got no skills
When these twenty-two spins
Ain't got nothing to do with Diablo wheels
Even the bible kills
I burn moral themes
Y'all pop like MTV
And talk more than Coral Jeanne
The poor foreseen that there is a God
I hope you guys slack
Cause when I lean back
Without the Terror Squad
I gotta two bigger
Then pistol move niggas whip
I leave fool ass lit
Like a cool cigarette
I'm 'bout the peace dude
In fact the peaceful
Since these niggas know my piece full
And since they watchin' Beef too
They watchin' niggas out here
They see how we go
Back in the day
With what, my people
The desert eagle
Leaving people living in deceased holes
How they feel about that?
My truck is all diesel
Freeze hoes
These people know it
G.L. in detail
They break like Lee nail
Crew is D12
More noise than a seashell
Cause we shall prevail
Without the Martin Luther King drill

How you know the main side, so attraction
Psycho action
The man 'ill throw up on Michael Jackson
Sick enough to do anything
In any video
I could even pull out my whole titty yo
Wouldn't mean a damn thing
Wouldn't mean nothing
Like if you went and pulled hamstring
Cause you a fake 'iatch
I took the b off
Cause Imma be off with the switch
Just like you
Cause you walk with a switch too
That's what I meant
Cause I represent, every single day
Pass it off to Stat

I'm so slum
I pull up in a double-quad deuce with no roof
On them big ass boots
White tee, no suit
Just me and my troop
Jam and be some hustlers
We are not a group
Grizzles, love me cause my smile is priceless
My advice, my life
I have them wetter than diapers
She want me to buy big jewels and wife her
Fuck the bitch tonight
But tomorrow won't like her
Go back to the club
And get a new one like her
And that's what I call completing a cypher
Wrassle with the bitches so they call me Roddy Piper
When a Stat come through
Your girlfriend get hyper

You be in the ocean with the worms and maggots
I'm what overdoses do for an addict
And after static with me
Holy ghosts will be given a homes
Automatically, it's either that or be rolled in a hole
I target ya dome
Watch that shit get blown
Like a head gasket
See I'm rabid
And known to foam acid
I accurately mastered battering bastards
I don't get charged for assault and battery
They be after me
Cause I smashed 'em
Happily answering
Any nigga that asks me would happen
I tell 'em the truth laughin'
That's just me
A five-star general
With aura that's horrible
I be smackin' ya captain
Turn a corpse into ya corporal
They won't know who did it
Tell your lieutenant
When an arsenal is set
For all of those threats of coming close
No you won't
With a Stephen King mentality
Ya don't believe me?
I can bring the casualty to ya family
And that's what's up
I got D12 in the house
Ya know what we about
Are you a man, a mouse?
And it seems like you a mouse
Running in that hole
Just cause you hoe
And everybody know
McVay yeah

See I'm going out
Blow 'em up
They wanna see me, what I'm all about
Pull 'em out
I'm in the club
Got the snub
'Bout to bust it out
Boy hear me, 'bout to hear me
'Bout to cuss a dog
I can't take it

Can't cuss it dog
Take it dog
Ayo, get with the
With the girl
Better take it off
She got the bra better shake it y'all
Ayo, check it out
I'm about to bull
And wreck it out

Smack 'em with shovels
Smack 'em with shovels
Smack 'em with shovels
Smack 'em with shovels

You gon' make us freestyle for all
Make us freestyle for all
Make us freestyle for all
Make us freestyle for all
Tim you gon' make us freestyle for all

Freestyle forever
Freestyle forever
Freestyle forever

Tim gon' make us freestyle forever








So let's get down to business
I don't got no time to play around
What is this, what is this
The invasion
Green lantern
The infiltration
We comin
I got 50 Cent
I got G-UNIT
D twizzy in this bitch, wit Obie Trice
So watch what you say
'fore you call our name
Cuz you say one more thing
And it won't be nice

Here we go I shoulda known
I was bound to get pulled into some bullshit
Sooner or later you little haters
Are too jealous of us to love us
You hate it
G-UNIT made it
And Obies comin, D twizzis comin
Ya sick to ya stomach
50 percent of it is 50 Cent
The other 50 percent of it's whose color of skin it is
But if you even considerin
Takin our label down
You better find our building
And fly a fuckin plane into it
But I ain't tryin to get to intriquite into it
I'm just tryin to give you a little hint for ya own benefit
Cuz then it's just gonna get to the point
Where it escalates into some otha shit
Then I'mma flip
Then I'mma get to stompin' in my Air Force Ones
Won't be able to tell if it's 2 pairs or it's one
Cuz it's gonna feel like so many feet kickin you
You'll think nike just made these innercleet tennis shoe
I dont know what it is or what it could be
But I get a woody when these pussies try to push me
Thinkin they gonna put me in a position to pickle me
Yall tickle me pink ,I think I'd just rather have Pink tickle me
Hickory dickory dock tickity tock tickity
A little bit of da diggidy dock diggidy
Mixed wit a lil bit of the jigga ji jigga
Wit a small pinch of biggie look at me im just the bomb diggity

We the realest label
Don't try to act like u dont feel our label
Cuz we gon' fuck around and kill your label
Obie, d twizzy, G-unit, 50, Shady Records we the label fa sho

We the realest label
Don't try to act like u dont feel our label
Cuz we gon' fuck around and steal ur paper
Obie, d twizzy, G-unit, 50 we gon kill your fuckin' label fa sho

Yeah!
Shady in a place to be seen
And I got what it takes to rock da mic right
Still watch what you say to me punk
Cuz I'm off probation in less than 6 months

HAHA --- WOO

Shady Records
Still Aftermath
And dont think we dont hear you mothafuckas talkin
Cuz we do, we see yall
But we just gon sit back for a minute and watch what the fuck yall do



Role Model?
I'll roll a model down a hill over broke bottles and coke products if she don't suck
And ? To the bumper hit the throttle while im tryna hit the pothose
I'll freakin take Madonna to McDonalds
Any ho in the porizontal getting fondeled
I don't cuddle I don't caddal
Only models that I follows
Everything I drive, whether it's a navo-ho or tatho
It's got a ho in it
Nah ho I don't got no freakin Bronco
You're looking for a buck? Get a horse ? tano
I got a rusty Honda with some bonda and a box of condoms
Little blonde Bitch Fuck me? Fuck you too
Like a Mcbanaro-boo-abano
And I ain't from this planet so nano - nano nano
I'm intolerable, too vilatle, screw it
I don't gotta make the Honor roll to be On a roll
I don't know much, But what I do know I do it pronto though
So knock it off all these knock-off me's
The last thing the world needs is another me
But if you think, this is part 2 to recovery
Or Love the way you lie part 12
Or something Heartfelt you're about to make a Discovery
Like you failed Christopher Columbus's compass
Aint dumbing shit down for you dumb motherfuckers so suck it
I took your best punchline like a punch in the stomach that punctured a lung punk but I'm still functioning from it
Chump, this is nothing now watch, while i fuck one up it and toot my horn
Once i think of something to trumpet
And i don't need a fucking In-strument to sound off like a trunk of a elephant the triumphent
Return of the ether spittin' retard, reborn, but chances of you having another rebirth, slim to none
Like a skinny Mother Theresa, Give a fuck it's easter! So kiss my keester! Because that's the only thing i turn the other cheek for !





















Weed lacer
'97 burgundy Blazer
Wanted for burglary
Had to ditch the Mercury Tracer
I'm on some Loc shit
Some fed up wit the 'being broke' shit
I'm not to joke with
Bitch, I don't sell crack
I smoke it
Having a coke fit and going through withdrawals daily
Shoot up with mescaline in front of my baby daughter Hailey
My brains dusted
I'm disgusted at all my habits
Too many aspirin tablets
Empty medicine cabinets
Losing battles to wack rappers because I'm always too blunted
Walking up in the cypher smoking
Talking about, "Who want it"
Thug and a crook
Every drug in the book
I've done it
My 9's at your brain
Is that your chain
Run it
Crews die from an overdosage of excessive flavour
Aggressive nature's got me sticking you for your progressive pager
Spectacular
Battle rap manufacturer
Stole your mama's Acura
Wrecked it and sold it back to her
Cruise in Nike jackets
Escaped from psychiatrics
Told the nurse to save my bed for me
"I might be back quick"
So barricade your entrance
Put up some extra fences
A woman beater
Wanted for repeated sex offences
Chasing dips
Take them on long vacation trips
Kidnapping them and trapping them in abusive relationships
Mess up your face and lips
Slit your stomach and watch your gut split
Got you with that razor that I use to shave my nuts with
Mama don't you cry
Your son's too far gone
I'm so high
I don't even know what label I'm on
I'm messed up
I feel just like an overworked plumber
I'm sick of the crap
What's Jack Kevorkian's phone number



Well Jimmy moved in with his mother
Cuz he ain't got no place to go

And now I'm right back in the gutter
With a garbage bag that's full of clothes

Cuz you live at home in a trailer
What the hell you gonna do?

Cuz I live at home in a trailer
Mom I'm coming home to you

Well my names Jimmy, and his name's Greg Buel
And me him and you went to the same school
This ain't cool, I'm in a rage
He tapping my mom, we're almost the same age!
On the microphone I drop bombs
Look at this car, thanks a lot mom!
"Here happy birthday Rabbit
Here's a brand new car, you can have it"
A 1928 delta, this shit won't even get me to the shelter!
And I can't even say I'm from Motown
Cause I'm back in the 8-1-0 now

Cuz I live at home in a trailer
Mom I'm coming home to you



Fuck that shit, I've got shit I'm doing
Fuck that shit, I've got shit I'm doing
Fuck that shit, I've got shit I'm doing
Fuck that shit, I've got shit I'm doing
I'm busy
I'm busy
I'm busy
I'm busy
Don't bother me, not me
Mr Porter, I'm busy
I'm busy




"Who can say for sure? Perhaps a frontal lobotomy would be the answer
If science could operate on this distorted brain and put it to good use
Society will reap a great benefit."


Oh, thank you.



It just sounds like your being inspired by rap, in a big big way, I mean...

Absolutely






You know, just a lot of rap.

A lot of rapping on there, a lot of words?

Yeah

What is it about it that you love, if you can put it into words?




Yeah, if you want it.

Thanks man, appreciate it. Urm...

And then boom, you did! And it didn't stop for years!


Oh that's the struggle!

And doing what I feel like I need to do.



So when did the penny drop and you realized the more you say "fuck you", the more people are gonna say, you know, "hi, we love you"?

Urm, I don't know, I mean...

Probably around the Marshall Mathers LP right, cause that's when it really started to, to blow up again?





Urm, I don't know, I mean I'm definitely thankful, you know what I mean, I know that could have certainly took another path...

And gone that way, yeah.


Probably a good thing?




The Shelter
Let me get up in this nigga like smashin'
With a red beam Johny blastin'
Evil is the rhyme assassin
Get a guy runnin', like haulin' ass
Bury you pink rabbits for askin'
Closed caption nigga don't say a word
When these flames get to burnin' up
Burnin' you down
Leavin' you ground tore up
From the pressure
Wanna frown
Don't want the nigga known pullin' triggers
Hoist this fool on my neck back-break this nigga

Check it out
Look, look
Yo, I gotta flow
I'm from the Mo, you ain't Detroit, hoe
Talkin' about seven mile, change your style
I read your bio, you're really from Ohio
I'm vile
This guy's so fuckin' fat I can't even see his eyes when he smiles
Yo, listen to this
Motherfuckin' rhyme, yo chicken, we can do this
As a matter of fact have another beer
I'll be right back, dawg, I'ma set the mic right here



God is a girl!

Yo, yo, yo, yo
Have you ever been hated or discriminated against?
I've been protested and demonstrated against
Picket signs for my wicked rhymes, look at the times
Sick as the mind of the mother****** kid that's behind
All this commotion, emotions run deep as ocean's explodin'
Tempers flaring from parents, just blow 'em off and keep goin'
Not taking nothing from no one, give 'em hell long as I'm breathin'
Keep kicking ass in the morning and taking names in the evenin'
Leave 'em with a taste as sour as vinegar in they mouth
See, they can trigger me, but they'll never figure me out
Look at me now! I bet you're probably sick of me now
Ain't you, Momma? I'ma make you look so ridiculous now
Look so ridiculous now
Look so ridiculous now
Look so ridiculous now
Make you look so ridiculous now
Now, now, now...

Remembering me, discover and see
All over the world, she's known as a girl
To those who are free, their minds shall be keep
Forgotten as the past, 'cause history will last

God is a girl, wherever you are
Do you believe it, can you receive it
God is a girl, whatever you say
Do you believe it, can you receive it
God is a girl, however you live
Do you believe it, can you receive it
God is a girl, she's only a girl
Do you believe it, can you receive it?

His palms are sweaty, knees weak, arms are heavy
He's nervous, but on the surface he looks calm and ready
To drop bombs, but he keeps on forgetting
What he wrote down, the whole crowd goes so loud
He opens his mouth, but the words won't come out
He's choking, how? Everybody's joking now
The clock's run out, time's up, over—blaow!
Snap back to reality, there goes gravity
There goes Rabbit, he choked, he's so mad, but he won't
Give up that easy, no, he won't have it, he knows
His whole back's to these ropes, it don't matter, he's dope
He knows that, but he's broke, he's so stagnant, he knows
When he goes back to this mobile home, that's when it's
Back to the lab again, yo!

One shot, or one opportunity
To seize everything you ever wanted, in one moment

I got some skeletons in my closet
And I don't know if no one knows it
So before they throw me inside my coffin and close it
I'ma expose it; I'll take you back to '73
Before I ever had a multi-platinum selling CD
I was a baby, maybe I was just a couple of months
My f***** father must have had his panties up in a bunch
‘Cause he split, I wonder if he even kissed me goodbye
No, I don't, on second thought
I just f****** wished he would die
I look at Hailie, and I couldn't picture leaving her side
Even if I hated Kim, I'd grit my teeth and I'd try
To make it work with her at least for Hailie's sake
I maybe made some mistakes
But I'm only human, but I'm man enough to face 'em today
What I did was stupid, no doubt it was dumb
But the smartest s*** I did was take the bullets outta that gun
S***, I would've shot Kim and him both
It's my life, I'd like to welcome y'all to The Eminem Show

God is a girl, wherever you are
Do you believe it, can you receive it
God is a girl, whatever you say
Do you believe it, can you receive it
God is a girl, however you live
Do you believe it, can you receive it
God is a girl, she's only a girl
Do you believe it, can you receive it?

No more games, I'ma change what you call rage
Tear this motherfuckin' roof off like two dogs caged
I was playing in the beginning, the mood all changed
I've been chewed up and spit out and booed off stage
But I kept rhymin' and stepped right in the next cypher
Best believe somebody's paying the Pied Piper
All the pain inside amplified by the
Fact that I can't get by with my nine-to-
Five, and I can't provide the right type of
Life for my family ‘cause, man, these goddamn
Food stamps don't buy diapers, and there's no movie
There's no Mekhi Phifer, this is my life
And these times are so hard, and it's getting even harder
Tryna feed and water my seed; plus, teeter-totter
Caught up between being a father and a prima donna
Baby mama drama, screaming on her
Too much for me to wanna stay in one spot
Another day of monotony's gotten me to the point
I'm like a snail, I've got to formulate a plot
Or end up in jail or shot
Success is my only motherfuckin' option—failure's not
Mom, I love you, but this trailer's got to go
I cannot grow old in Salem's Lot
This may be the only opportunity that I got

God is a girl!



Wanna see me stick her fucking eyeballs right in to my anus?

I got a fucking time traveling machine to go back all to this
And see all the piss that she gave me, bitch
She made me fall on my ass
The walls are caving in and I gotta go ham on this bitch
Like, woah, so we never fell in love so I didn't have to
Go through that shit no more
It's like a nugget, I'm hugging these sluts
That are bothering this fucking chick when I murder
And spit on the beat like the drugs I was taking
Just a bit of it
Blue eyes, red eyes, green eyes, bloody eyes
Hi Mom, you're back again, rock climbing my dick to see how famous my fucking life is?

1980, still feeling shady, 1983, bitch never leave me
1987, met this bitch in heaven, 1999, my life was very deprived
I said hey, do you want me? I'm still feeling kinda shady
1999, we got 3 babies, 1999, will you ever leave me?
Because back then, I was kind of shady

Ring around the rosie, pocket full of posie
Kim, Kim, be shady like me, I'm trying for the 4th
Stop being a bitch, please, walking across the highway
Playing Chicken, while brains splatter all over the road like
"ricken, ricken", my phone's dead, now how can I call the bitch?
I'll use the payphone, this bitch is calling my dead phone, she won't leave me alone
Spent 75 cents on her, and she didn't answer
Boo! I'm a ghost, you happy to see me? I'm taking your soul
Well shit, you don't believe me? Boom, I did it, do you believe me now? Shit whatever, I'm the king so hand me the crown


1999, the slut's pussy is so dry, I said 1999, the slut's pussy is so dry, no other faggot can control my life



I'm ice grilling you, staring you down with a gremlin grin
I'm Eminem, you're a fag in a women's gym
I'm Slim, cause Shady is really a fake alias
To save me with in case I get chased by space aliens
A brainiac with a cranium packed full of more uranium
Than a maniac Saudi Arabian
A highly combustible head, spasmodic
Strapped to a Craftmatic adjustable bed
Laid up in a hospital in critical condition
I flat lined, jumped up and ran from the mortician
High speed, IV full of Thai-weed
Looking Chinese with my knee's, stuck together like Siamese
Twins, joined at the groin like lesbians
Pins and needles, hypodermic needles and pins
I hope god forgives me for my sins
It probably all depends on if I keep on killing my girlfriends



IN PROGRESS



Well, Jimmy moved in with his mother
'Cause he ain't got no place to go

And now I'm right back in the gutter
With a garbage bag that's full of clothes

Buss it, buss it, 'cause
You live at home in a trailer
What the hell you gonna do?

'Cause I live at home in a trailer
Mom, I'm comin' home to you

Uh, break it down, uh

Well, my name is Jimmy, his name's Greg Buehl
Me, him and you we went to the same school
This ain't cool, I'm in a rage
He's tappin' my mom we're almost the same age
On the microphone I drop bombs
Look at this car, thanks a lot, mom
Here, happy birthday, Rabbit
Here's a brand new car, you can have it
A nineteen-twenty-eight Delta
This shit won't even get me to The Shelter
And I can't even say I'm from Motown
'Cause I'm back in the eight-one-oh now

'Cause I live at home in a trailer
Mom, I'm comin' home to you



Step right up, I'm about to light up the skyline
So bright, I'mma fuck your whole night up
Light up your glow sticks and go stick a stick in your ass
This is the ghost of Christmas past
This is your host, you're supposed to kiss his ass
This is gross but listen close, if you don't
You can go stick your whole frickin' nose against his crack
'til he lets one go and blows your whiskers back
And get a great big old whiff cause if you last without passing out
You'll be on the next episode of Fear Factor, yeah, I'm back to, back to what?
I don't know, smack a little child actor's butt, Mike Jackson, what?
What the fuck you want? I got a blunt and some Jesus juice
Who needs an excuse these days
The way they rally around pedophiles, you lucky I don't pee in your face
I can do anything and apologize for it later as long
As it ain't a racist tape from '88, than I'm straight of that cannot be forgave
If I drank pee for, 18 years straight and ate shit every day
On a porcelain plate that was shaped like a toilet with a fork and steak, knife
For the rest of my life and had to watch my ex-wife get fucked by Vanilla Ice
Twice a day, cause I said N-I-G-G-A, when I was a teenager
Blaow-blaow, Shade uh 45, shorty, let me get your number, baby
Maybe I can hump your leg or something?
But it's time for me to go, so I stopped, jumped in the vehicle
It's like this, because of that boob, right?



Eat 'em
Every time I come back, I’m putting the mask on my head
Beat the sons of a bitches so hard that they forget where they’re at
I ain’t saying the same thing every time I attack
Damn, I just got whooped by a new jack
A new jack, may be new, let me jack
Of an experience lack
I just ignore 'em
Take my energy and store it
Who want decided to get brave
Then I pour it, pour it
On his ass
Like milk over a wilted plant
Constantly tromping in and around
To get paid again
I drink beer
So, you better steer clear
’Cause I steer and smear
Ripping a bastard up in less than a minute
Let’s get hunked by a truck
Suck a straw with answers in it
Suckers are dropping in the back that I stood
I can rhyme while I’m puking and it would still sound good
Even when out of gas
I’m pulling rhymes from my ass
You won't be think as fast enough to talk through the glass
Rain rhymes, you performed a song that you regret
While my money is due, so I can let through the exit
Part of me’s so bad
’Cause I prefer to leave a blur
When I stirred your ass

Runyon Ave, stepping up on to the scene
Chaos Kid, stepping up on to the scene
Manix, stepping up on to the scene
Buttafingaz, stepping up on to the scene
Vitamin C, stepping up on to the scene
Delirious D, stepping up on to the scene
Checkmate, stepping up on to the scene
Reese The Piece, stepping up on to the scene















Hand me an eighth, beam me up and land me in space
I'mma' sit on top of the world and spit on Brandy and Ma$e
I'm more than ill
Scarier than a white person trapped in a room with Lauryn Hill
Human horror film
But with a lot funnier plot, and people that feel me
Cause I'mma' still be the Madd Rapper
Whether I got money or not
As long as I'm on pills, and I got plenty of pot
I'll be in a canoe paddlin', makin' fun of your yacht
But I would like an award
For the best rapper to get one mic in The Source
And a wardrobe I can afford
Otherwise I might just end up back striking at Ford
And you wonder what the hell I need more Vicodin for?
Everybody's pissin' me off; even the No Limit Tank
Looks like a middle finger sideways flippin' me off
No wonder I'm a great danger to my health
Why else would I kill you then jump in a grave and bury myself?

Are you afraid of a blade made of a razor with AIDS
Blood dripping from it
Ripping your stomach up from the waist up?
You talk a lotta' junk but you was never ill though
I'm strong enough to beat you to death with a feather pillow
Tipped over some cows, just for a joke and a laugh
Jumped up, choked a giraffe
Snapped his neck and broke it in half
Waging wars, went on stage
And sprayed Cage with Agent Orange
And wiped my ass with his page in Source
The demon is here, I'm steaming this year
I rip Mystikal's voice box out and scream in his ear
It's not a gimmick trick; it's an image, I live it
Give a damn, I don't know what a damn is to give it
Man I don't think this guy is well, I'm high as hell
I'll beat you with a live cat when I'm swinging him by his tail
I'll friggin', I'll friggin', lay your nuts on the dresser
Just your nutsack by itself
And bang them stuffs with a spiked bat
Cut your neck off and glue your head right back
And leave you like that
You just triggered a prick who just mixed liquor
Who's itching to leave you disfigured
And stiffer than Chris-stiff-er Reeves
I was teething with strep throat
While your mother was breastfeeding
And gave her the flesh-eating disease
I'm iller than takin' a hammer and beating your knees
And walking through South Central L.A., bleeding in jeans
Flashing back to being shot and repeating the scenes
On how you just got smoked
And if you do live, you'll be too scared to tell it like a Biggie and Pac joke

The one man on the planet that'll drive off of the Grand Canyon, hop out of a Grand Am and land in it hand-standing
Any man planning to battle will get snatched outta his clothes
So fast it'll look like an invisible man standing
I'm headed for Hell, I'd rather be dead or in jail
Bill Clinton, hit this, and you better inhale
Cause any MC that chooses to go against me
Is getting taking advantage of like Monica Lewinsky
Came home in a frenzy, pushing a ten speed
Screaming to Aunt Peg with three spokes
Sticking outta my pant leg
Forget a headache, give me a migraine, dammit I like pain
And you should be anywhere that a mic ain't
You rap knowing you wack, you act up and I'm throwing you
Down a flight of steps then I'm throwing you back up them
If they don't like the track, f- them, the rap struck 'em harder
Than getting hit by a Mack truck and then backed up on
And any half-assed known rapper to trespass
Better be ready for the second Celebrity Deathmatch
So tell the medic to bring the medication and quickly
I'm sicker than a 2Pac dedication to Biggie
I'm free-falling feet first out of a damn tree
To stampede your chest 'til you can't breathe
And when I'm down to my last breath
I'mma' climb the Empire State Building
And get to the last step and still have half left



Lights, action, cameras flashing
Managers, sponsors, concerts, monster mashing
Flashing type of mic
That was unaware of trash like Marilyn Manson
Updated Axle Rose
White version of shaft pimp slappin' hoes
Pull up like a Mac, jet black limo
Strecth so far back you can't see the back windows
Stepping out pink hats, furs and minks
Chicks on each arm, what the fuck you think?
Right arm go that kid from N'Sync's chick on it
Left arm got that little pink chick on it
Me and Dre at the VMA's again
Pissin' off all these lesbians and gays again

Let me show you what the clip does
Cause D12 are harder than virgins inside strip clubs
Yo, we bust thugs
You beatin us is like 20 inch doves on glove buzz
It won't happen don't take the satisfaction
With funk flex you got your back spittin'
Actin' like you harder than life
Peace to Obie Trice
Rock a mic is on the right
Obie Trice has been around the globe twice
How it feel with the shine show was
Peace to Mark Labelle, Flex and Paul Rosenburg
Yo Em Diddy save me
Ayo, I think my dad's going crazy















I went to John's rave with Ron and Dave
And met a new wave blonde babe with half of her head shaved
A nurse aid who came to get laid and *tied* up
With first aid tape and *raped* on the first date
Susan -- an ex-manic depressive who just moved from Houston
I got a coupon for this pizza with everything on it
We can double the mushrooms and minus the sausage
Come on Sue, that's nonsense
Who's at the door? Pizza man!
Who ordered pizza? Susan, it's yours
If you got it with double mushrooms on it then I don't want it
Shutup Susan I'll pick em off it
Oh hell, I might as well try it, I'll be alright
Susan you just swallowed the wrong slice!!

2nd repeat same as original Chorus

"Yo Sue!"
Oh shoot, she's tripping..
I wasn't tryin to turn this into somethin major
I just wanted to make you appreciate flavor
Susan, stop cryin, I don't hate ya
I'm sorry your father used to chase ya and spank ya with hangers
So what they locked you in the attic in your dad's house?
That ain't no reason to start wiggin and spaz out
She said
I said, "You're breaking out in hives, let go of the pizza!"
"Would you put it down you're startin to scare me"
She said
I don't even have any kids and I can't cook
We need to get to a hospital 'fore it's too late
Cause I never seen no-one eat as many *shrooms* as you ate

And "It was an accident!" at the end
2nd repeat same as original Chorus

I'm not your dad, quit tryin to swallow your tongue
Want some gum? Put down the scissors, 'fore you do somethin dumb
I'll be right back just chill baby please?
I gotta go find Dave he majored in allergies
"John, where's Dave at before I bash you?"
"Dave! Pull up your pants, we need an ambulance
There's a girl upstairs talkin to plants
Choppin her hair off, and there's only two days left
Of Spring Break, how long do these things take to wear off?"
Just one, with double mushrooms by mistake
Now she's upstairs cryin out her eyeballs, breaking out in hives"
"I know and it's my fault!"

And "What do I do?" at the end
2nd repeat same as original Chorus

My God, I'm so sorry!
I'm so sorry! Susan please wake up!
Please! Please wake up!! What are you doing?!
You're not dead!! You're NOT dead!
I know you're not dead!



What's up with everybody beefin'
Everybody seem like they wanna beef
You know what I'm saying?
Everybody beefin' with everybody
This shit is crazy

This is a bomb scare, fires on your hair
Terrorists live here, but I don't care
I'm making pot holes when I stomp, so don't stare
I stop to stomp competiton, with both fair
How dare, little soldier at ease
We shake down these streets, like Parkinson's Disease
We parking the road trees, plus load the weapons
Everything to six shooters, to high tech ones
If a green beans things, to my suggestion
Burn a big whole in your belly, like indigestion
With one question, who the fuck is Dogmatic
An underground nigga but this nigga's above average
It's serious! who can understand what I'm saying?
It's like you open a can of worms or smoked yams
I got bloody hands and burners that make you dance!

This shit is serious! Do you really want beef
Do you really wanna end up, missing yo front teeth
And see yo family, getting smoked like a blunt leaf
And wrapped up in a zip-lock bag, like lunch meat
This shit is serious! Do you really want beef
Do you really wanna end up, missing yo front teeth
And see yo family, getting smoked like a blunt leaf
And wrapped up in a zip-lock bag, like lunch meat
This shit is serious!

I'm the only one your bitch let touch her
Type a brother that'll, fuck yo mother, wit a fishnet rubber
I'mma misfit slash, nitwit
I love to put up biscuts, straight to a niggas lips, it'll fit
A biligerent and rowdy fellow
I'll dump yo body, and still fly away to Maui, on a teller
When it comes to beefin', it ain't no explain'
I'll change ya lauguage, wit a stainless
I'll contain, wit a name which to make you famous
I'mma deranged pit, I'll bend you till ya back touch ya anus
Don't ever take me to court, I'll whack the plantiff
Then beat the fuck out the baliff
A heinous, miscellaneous, nigga never miss, when the AK lift
I paint ya face wit, any weapon, just like "The Matrix"
They ain't steppin', don't even say shit
You heard about the bodies in my basement, you joinin' them, face it


Laugh indictive, like Kim lipstick, and get a nose bleed
My blow speed, is like my hands working ten stick shifts
And snatching the driver out the black Benz
Smashing his contact lens, my life start when his contract ends
"Go kiss-and-tell, and contact Kim!"
Let's be factually, actually, y'all ain't after me
Told y'all my battlery, and go to war happily
How you gon' call my bluff, when you scared to send a fax to me
My factulty guns drawn, one wrong move dudey
And it's too heads on ya body, into a gangster movie
For lot being real, scared to pop wit the steel
It got skeletons in my house, every closet is filled
Now how does it feel, with this Baretta to ya dome
And to know that ya mom's know, that you was never coming home


You know what I'm sayin'
You want beef, we taking it to yo face
Fuck it, Dirty Dozen, Slim Shady
D-12, this shit is serious!




Left the keys in the van, with a gat in each hand
Went up in Eastland and shot a policeman
Fuck a peace plan, if a citizen bystands
The shit is in my hands, here's yo' lifespan
And for what yo' life's worth, this money is twice than
Grab a couple grand and lamp in Iceland
See I'm a nice man but money turned me to Satan
I'm thirsty for this green so bad I'm dehydratin
Hurry up with the cash bitch, I got a ride waitin
Shot a man twice in the back when he tried skatin
I want the whole pie, I won't be denied nathan
Maybe I need my head inside straightened
Brain contemplatin, clean out the register
Dip before somebody catches ya
Or gets your description and sketches ya
The connection was the prime suspect
But I ain't set to flee the scene of the crime just yet
Cause I got a daughter to feed
And $200 ain't enough to water the seed
The best thing would be for me to leave Taco Bell and hit up Chess King
And have the lady at the desk bring
Money from the safe in the back, stepped in wavin the Mac
Cooperate, and we can operate, and save an attack
This bitch tried escapin the jack
Grabbed her by the throat, it's murder she wrote
You barely heard a word as she choked
It wasn't nuttin for her to be smoked
But I slammed her on her back til her vertebrae broke
Just then the pigs bust in yellin "Freeze"
But I'm already wanted for sellin ki's
And bunch of other felonies from A to Z like spellin bees
So before I dropped to the ground and fell on knees
I bust shots, they bust back
Hit be square in the chest, wasn't wearin a vest
Left the house, pullin out the drive backin out
Blew the back end out this lady's Jag, started blackin out
Pulled the Mac-10 out, stuck it in her face
Shut your yackin mouth, 'fore I blow the brain from out the back ya scalp
Drug her by her hair, smacked her up
Thinkin fuck it, mug her while you're there, jacked her up
Stole her car, made a profit
Grabbed the tape from out the deck and offed it out the window
Like the girl in "Set It Off" did
Jetted off kid, stole the whip, now I'm a criminal
Drove it through somebody's yard, dove into they swimmin pool
Climbed out and collapsed on the patio
I made it out alive but I'm injured badly though
Tell em there's a crazy man disturbing all of the peace!"
Tried to stall him at least long enough to let me leap up
Run in they crib and at least leave with some little cheap stuff
Actin like they never seen nobody hit a lick before
Smashed the window, grabbed the Nintendo 64
When they sell out in stores the price triples
I ran up the block jumpin kids on tricycles
And collided with an 80-year old lady with groceries
There goes cheese, eggs, milk and Post Toasties
Stood up and started to see stars
Too many siren sounds, it seemed like a thousand police cars
Barely escaped, must-a been some dumb luck
Jumped up and climbed the back of a movin dump truck
But I think somebody seen me maybe
Plus I lost the damn Nintendo and I musta dropped the Beanie Baby
Fuck it I give up, I'm surrounded in blue suits
Came out with a white flag hollerin "TRUCE TRUCE"
And surrendered my weapon to cops
Wasn't me! It was the gangster rap and the peppermint Schnapps




…Man, whatever
Dre, just let it run
Ayo, turn the beat up a little bit
Ayo, this song is for anyone…
Fuck it, just shut up and listen, ayo

I sit back with this pack of Zig-Zags and this bag
Of this weed, it gives me the shit needed to be
The most meanest MC on this on this Earth
And since birth I've been cursed with this curse to just curse
And just blurt this berserk and bizarre shit that works
And it sells and it helps in itself to relieve all this tension
Dispensing these sentences, getting this stress
That's been eating me recently off of this chest
And I rest again peacefully
But at least have the decency in you
To leave me alone, when you freaks see me out
In the streets when I'm eating or feeding my daughter
To not come and speak to me
I don't know you, and no, I don't owe you a mothafuckin' thing
I'm not Mr. N'Sync, I'm not what your friends think
I'm not Mr. Friendly, I can be a prick if you tempt me
My tank is on empty, no patience is in me
And if you offend me, I'm lifting you ten feet in the air
I don't care who was there and who saw me just jaw you
Go call you a lawyer, file you a lawsuit
I'll smile in the courtroom and buy you a wardrobe
I'm tired of all you, I don't mean to be mean
But that's all I can be, it's just me

And I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
‘Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
I don't know, it's just the way I am

Sometimes I just feel like my father
I hate to be bothered with all of this nonsense, it's constant
And, "Oh, it's his lyrical content, the song 'Guilty Conscience' has gotten such rotten responses"
And all of this controversy circles me
And it seems like the media immediately points a finger at me
So I point one back at 'em, but not the index or pinkie
Or the ring or the thumb, it's the one you put up
When you don't give a fuck, when you won't just put up
With the bullshit they pull, ‘cause they full of shit too
When a dude's getting bullied and shoots up his school
And they blame it on Marilyn and the heroin
Where were the parents at? And look where it's at!
Middle America, now it's a tragedy
Now it's so sad to see, an upper-class city
Havin' this happening
Then attack Eminem ‘cause I rap this way
But I'm glad, ‘cause they feed me the fuel that I need for the fire to burn and it's burning, and I have returned

And I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
‘Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
I don't know, it's just the way I am

I'm so sick and tired of being admired
That I wish that I would just die or get fired
And dropped from my label, let's stop with the fables
I'm not gonna be able to top on "My Name Is"
And pigeon-holed into some poppy sensation
To cop me rotation at rock-n-roll stations
And I just do not got the patience
To deal with these cocky Caucasians
Who think I'm some wigger who just tries to be black
‘Cause I talk with an accent, and grab on my balls
So they always keep asking the same fucking questions
What school did I go to, what hood I grew up in
The why, the who, what, when, the where and the how
Till I'm grabbing my hair and I'm tearin' it out
‘Cause they driving me crazy, I can't take it
I'm racin', I'm pacin', I stand and I sit
And I'm thankful for every fan that I get
But I can't take a shit in the bathroom
Without someone standing by it
No, I won't sign you an autograph
You can call me an asshole, I'm glad, ‘cause…

And I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
‘Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
I don't know, it's just the way I am

‘Cause I am whatever you say I am...



Alright, look! Any rapper saying those kind of rhymes
In this day and age, in this period of time
Tryin' to battle Eminem is worse than David Starr
Tryin' to battle Proof, Eye-Kyu, B-Fat and Bizarre
You ain't got no style, plus you lack delivery
Not to brag, I don't mean to boast
Look, my face is pale, but you look like you seen a ghost
You're that bitch, you couldn't slip into the zone
If I put banana peels around this fuckin' microphone
Go get a bull dozer, start from bottom to top
And tear this building down
‘Cause that's the only way you're wrecking shop



Oooh! Ladies and gentlemen, the moment you've all been waiting for
In this corner, weighing 175 pounds, with a record of 17 rapes, 400
Assaults, and 4 murders
The undisputed, most diabolical villain in the world, Slim Shady!

So crack a bottle, let your body waddle
Don't act like a snobby model
You just hit the lotto
Uh oh uh oh, bitches hopping in my Tahoe
Got one riding shotgun and no not one of them got gloves
Now where's the rubbers? Whose got the rubbers?
I noticed there's so many of them and there's really not that many of us
And ladies love us and my posse's kicking up dust
It's on till the break of dawn and we're starting this party from dusk

Ladies and gentlemen, Dr Dre

They see that low rider go by there, like "Oh my!"
You ain't got to tell me why you're sick cuz I know why
I dip through in that six trey like sick 'em Dre
I'm an itch that they can't scratch, they're sick of me
But hey, what else can I say? I love LA
Cuz over and above all, it's just another day
And this one begins where the last one ends
Pick up where we left off and get smashed again
I'll be damned, just fucked around and crashed my Benz
Driving around with a smashed front end
Let's cash that one in
Grab another one from out the stable
The Monte Carlo, El Camino or the El Derado
The hell if I know
Do I want leather seats or vinyl
Decisions, decisions garage looks like precision collision
Or maico beats quake like Waco
Just keep the bass low speakers away from your face though

So crack a bottle, let your body waddle
Don't act like a snobby model
You just hit the lotto
Uh oh uh oh, bitches hopping in my Tahoe
Got one riding shotgun and no not one of them got gloves
Now where's the rubbers? Whose got the rubbers?
I noticed there's so many of them and there's really not that many of us
And ladies love us and my posse's kicking up dust
It's on till the break of dawn and we're starting this party from dusk

Back when Andre, the giant, mister elephant tusk
Picture us, you'll just be another one bit the dust
Just one of my mother's son who got thrown under the bus
Kiss my butt lick my wonder cheese from under my nuts
They disgust, me to see the game the way that it looks
It's a must, I redeem my name n haters get murked
Bitches lust man they love me when I lay in the cut
Missed the cut the lady give a raidy some paper cut
Now picture us It's ridiculous you curse at the thought
Cuz when I spit the verse the shit gets worse and worse cause your soft
If I could fit the words as picture perfect, works every time
Every verse, every line, as simple as nursery rhymes
It's elementary the elephants have entered the room
I venture to say with the same repetition is true
Not to mention back with a vengeance, so here's the signal
Of the bat symbol The platinum dude is back on you hoes

So crack a bottle, let your body waddle
Don't act like a snobby model
You just hit the lotto
Uh oh uh oh, bitches hopping in my Tahoe
Got one riding shotgun and no not one of them got gloves
Now where's the rubbers? Whose got the rubbers?
I noticed there's so many of them and there's really not that many of us
And ladies love us and my posse's kicking up dust
It's on till the break of dawn and we're starting this party from dusk

It's sorta like pourin' Draino down a live volcano
You never know what'll happen next, it may blow
Same thing happens to the beats when Dre blows
I talk shit, but my dick's long as my payroll
I get ass like a ball player, but I'm a boss player
Pimpin' hoes from here to Australia
Till I get heart failure
Look at ya half of ya'll, all scared
Other half, hands up in the air, like "Awww yeah"
This is our year, this is what you call sheer talent
But I think at this point it's just obvious
Fierce, they say my music's good for all queers
Cuz I make your ear ring, get it?, piercin' all ears
Call us the Mafia, we got the fucking mob here
Gimme the hate and I'll feed off of ya's all year
Shit, I'm just doing my job here
You don't want no problem, do ya?
Fuck it, I'll even crack a bottle for ya

So crack a bottle, let your body waddle
Don't act like a snobby model
You just hit the lotto
Uh oh uh oh, bitches hopping in my Tahoe
Got one riding shotgun and no not one of them got gloves
Now where's the rubbers? Whose got the rubbers?
I noticed there's so many of them and there's really not that many of us
And ladies love us and my posse's kicking up dust
It's on till the break of dawn and we're starting this party from dusk



"No...you hear me! You go to hell" -] Mr. Garrison

At birth I was born with the biggest middle finger on earth
The first time I went to stick it up the shit hurt
Mom wouldn't take me
The bitch still hates me
Shit, one day she said, "Go rake leaves,"
I said, "Make me!"
I'm proud to announce I was probably the first kid
Who was kicked out of his house
For making fart sounds with his mouth
Arguing with me and mom was on-going
She called law enforcement when I broke the law mower
The slut gave me a truck when I turned sixteen
I went to start it and it screamed, "Please fix me!"
Back then, when Will Smith was still the Fresh Prince
And him and Jeff were still best friends, I guess then
I decided to cut class to rap full time
And get the fuck outta this fake ass school and rhyme
Anybody who thinks this fuckin attitude is a gimmick
Come and see me, see if I don't live up to this image
You fuckin' pricks!


"No...you hear me! You go to hell" -] Mr. Garrison

How the fuck you gonna fuck with O Trice with a staff full of hoes
With one gat and a wack stack of flows?
A whole lot of lip
Thicker than Obie's shit
Oh shit they found your ass floatin' in the ocean
Body part corroded
Cast away
You stretched in a cast today
That's how a real bastard play
Do shit the bachelor way
Creek niggas will blast away
Y'all niggas ain't tough
Y'all niggas funny
Y'all need to roll on WB 20
Niggas think they 2Pacalypse Now
Until they catch a buckshot
Chicken pop a nigga's style
Niggas scared of the firm
Slim, Dirty Dozen and Trice
Come back like thieves in the night
Niggas jump, that's reason to fight
That's reason to rearrange your teeth with the right
Motherfucker



Performed by Jeff Bass for F.B.T. Productions and Eminem



Performed by Paul "Bunyan" Rosenberg


Performed by Eminem and Steve Berman
















Mastered by Brian "Big Bass" Gardner at Bernie Grundman Mastering



This album is dedicated to Hailie Jade and the memory of Ronald Dean Polkinghorn & Cornell Pitts a/k/a Bugz from D-12

Eminem would like to thank everyone that knows they deserve it. And fuck you to everyone that deserves it, too


℗© 2000 Aftermath Ent./Interscope Records. All rights reserved



Cheddar, I can rip you to a shred a
Cheddar cheese, there's not a better MC than me
I'm B-Rabbit, bitch, sting like a bee
Float like a butterfly, what am I, so what if I
Cut a guy, did I s-s-stutter guy
Leave you punch drunk from lunch truck to Shelter
You never felt the wrath or felt the skelter, melt ya
Got the belt for the welterweight champ
You got in with a fake stamp
Garbage bag full of clothes, still pullin' hoes
Rip you from head to toe, from leg to bullet hole
Next gun pull it slow
And aim at the Free World 'fore you let it go
Instead of "Oh, I just shot my dick head"
And yes, you do got a big head
I can't call it, Cheddar where's your wallet?
You're so drunk, you can outdrink the alcoholics
Make 'em say "Damn, Cheddar's the man
He needs a can surgically removed from his hand"




Part, by Slim Shady





Kissed his ass!








Any rapper saying those kind of rhymes
In this day and age in this period of time
Tryna battle Eminem is worse than
David Starr tryna battle Proof,Eye-Ku,BFlat and Bizarre
That's why you beg to differ me,you ain't got no style
Plus you lack delivery,not to brag
I don't need to boast
Look,my face is pale,but you look like you seen a ghost
You couldn't slip up in the zone,if I put banana peels
Around this fucking microphone
So get a bulldozer,start from bottom to top
And tear this building down
'cause that's the only way you 'recking shop



Dre, just let it run
Ayo turn the beat up a little bit
Ayo, this song is for anyone...fuck it
Just shut up and listen, ayo

I sit back with this pack of Zig-Zags and this bag
Of this weed it gives me the shit needed to be
The most meanest MC on this, on this Earth
And since birth I've been cursed with this curse to just curse
And just blurt this berserk and bizarre shit that works
And it sells and it helps in itself to relieve
All this tension dispensing these sentences
Getting this stress that's been eating me recently off of this chest And I rest again peacefully
But at least have the decency in you
To leave me alone, when you freaks see me out In the streets when I'm eating or feeding my daughter
To not come and speak to me, I don't know you and no
I don't owe you a mothafuckin' thing
I'm not Mr. N'Sync, I'm not what your friends think
I'm not Mr. Friendly, I can be a prick
If you tempt me my tank is on empty
No patience is in me and if you offend me
I'm lifting you 10 feet in the air
I don't care who was there and who saw me just jaw you
Go call you a lawyer, file you a lawsuit
I'll smile in the courtroom and buy you a wardrobe
I'm tired of all you, I don't mean to be mean
But that's all I can be is just me

And I am, whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am
In the paper, the news every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
Cause I am, whatever you say I am If I wasn't, then why would I say I am
In the paper, the news every day I am
I don't know it's just the way I am

Sometimes I just feel like my father
I hate to be bothered with all of this nonsense it's constant
And, "oh, it's his lyrical content
The song "Guilty Conscience" has gotten such rotten responses" And all of this controversy circles me
And it seems like the media immediately points a finger at me
So I point one back at 'em, but not the index or pinkie
Or the ring or the thumb, it's the one you put up
When you don't give a fuck, when you won't just put up
With the bullshit they pull, cause they full of shit too
When a dude's getting bullied and shoots up his school
Where were the parents at and look where it's at
Middle America, now it's a tragedy
Now it's so sad to see, an upper-class city
Havin' this happening
Then attack Eminem cause I rap this way
But I'm glad cause they feed me the fuel that I need for the fire
To burn and it's burning and I have returned


I'm so sick and tired of being admired
That I wish that I would just die or get fired
And dropped from my label, let's stop with the fables
I'm not gonna be able to top on "My Name Is"
And pigeon-holed into some poppy sensation
To cop me rotation at rock-n-roll stations
And I just do not got the patience
To deal with these cocky Caucasians who think
I'm some wigger who just tries to be Black
Cause I talk with an accent, and grab on my balls
So they always keep asking the same fucking questions
What school did I go to, what hood I grew up in
The why, the who, what, when, the where and the how 'til I'm
Grabbing my hair and I'm tearin' it out
Cause they drivin' me crazy, I can't take it
I'm racing, I'm pacing, I stand and I sit
And I'm thankful for every fan that I get
But I can't take a shit in the bathroom without someone standing by it
No I won't sign you an autograph
You can call me an asshole I'm glad cause

And I am, whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am
In the paper, the news every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
Cause I am, whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am
In the paper, the news every day I am I don't know it's just the way I am

Cos I am whatever you say I am
Cos I am whatever you say I am
Cos I am whatever you say I am
Radio Won't Even Play My jam
Cos I am whatever you say I am
Cos I am whatever you say I am




Arsonist, blocking a fire hose where the nozzle is
Go to hospitals, steal the blood that tests positive
Take it home, pour it in a cup and drink lots of it
Trying on your mother's clothes, trying to get these bras to fit
When she comes home, I'm waiting in the closet, with
A﻿ knife, hiding so quiet she'll probably hear the faucet drip
All my life I've been a foster kid
So if I die an early death suicide's gon' be the cause of it

Who hard? yo I done heard worse
We can get in two cars and accelerate at each other
To see which one'll swerve first
Two blind bandits panic, whose mental capacity holds
That of a globe on top of nine other planets
Kissed the cheek of the devil
Intelligence level is hell-ier than treble peakin on speakers in the ghetto
Dismissal, I'm not a fair man, disgraced the race of a atheist
Intercepting missles wit my bare hands like a patriot
One track sliced without swords, I buried the Christ corpse
In my past life when the Black Knight mounted the white horse
Then one get at you, dash you in the back of a Chevrolet
Spittin shit at you faster than your eardrum could ever play

Cuz this is what happens when Bad Meets Evil
We hit the trees till we look like Vietnamese people
He's Evil, and I'm Bad like Steve Seagal

We ain't eager to be legal
So please leave me wit the keys to your Jeep Eagle
I breathe ether in three lethal amounts
When I stab myself in the knee with a diseased needle
Releasin rage on anybody in squeezing range
Cold enough to make the seasons change into freezing rain
Cuz I can't find a decent vein

The disaster wit dreds
I'm bad enough to commit suicide and survive long enough
To kill my soul after I'm dead
When in danger it's funny actually my flavor's similar to a waiter
Cuz I serve any stranger wit money
I spray a hundred, man until they joint chains
While slippin bullets at point blank range like they was punches
I got a lot of evil; I got knowledge peeking out of my cerebral now that I got people locked and rock evil
While still on the beat, I hit you in your ribs so hard to think its just a touch to the floor, while your still on your feet
I'm blazin MC's, at the same time amazin MC's Somehow MC's ain't that eye-brow raisin to me
Destroying the track, un-employing the whack, exploring the facts while my man Eminem is withdrawing from crack

I just love him..
I just love him..

Who hard? yo I done heard worse
We can get in two cars and accelerate at each other
To see which one'll swerve first
Two blind bandits panic, whose mental capacity holds
That of a globe on top of nine other planets
Kissed the cheek of the devil
Intelligence level is hell-ier than treble peakin on speakers in the ghetto
Dismissal, I'm not a fair man, disgraced the race of a atheist
Intercepting missles wit my bare hands like a patriot
One track sliced without swords, I buried the Christ corpse
In my past life when the Black Knight mounted the white horse
Then one get at you, dash you in the back of a Chevrolet
Spittin shit at you faster than your eardrum could ever play

Cuz this is what happens when Bad Meets Evil
We hit the trees till we look like Vietnamese people
He's Evil, and I'm Bad like Steve Seagal

We ain't eager to be legal
So please leave me wit the keys to your Jeep Eagle
I breathe ether in three lethal amounts
When I stab myself in the knee with a diseased needle
Releasin rage on anybody in squeezing range
Cold enough to make the seasons change into freezing rain
Cuz I can't find a decent vain

The disaster wit dreds
I'm bad enough to commit suicide and survive long enough
To kill my soul after I'm dead
When in danger it's funny actually my flavor's similar to a waiter
Cuz I serve any stranger wit money
I spray a hundred, man until they joint chains
While slippin bullets at point blank range like they was punches



Still on?
Yo, is the mic on?
Check, check, check
Alright, let's do it
Let's go, come on



Yo yo yo

My mom sent me up to the store with a food stamp
Two dudes ran up, jumped out of a blue van
I looked down at the ground and picked up a huge branch
I swung it at the first dude, the other one with him
Seen it snap so fast it looked like it broke before it hit him
So he tried to rush, I swept his legs, pinned him and bit him
He came back with six or seven dudes screaming "Get him!"
I grabbed one, lit him on fire, pinned and bit him
The next faggot gave me his shoes like they didn't fit him
One by one I just kept droppin' 'em in a rhythm
Then I woke up swingin' in the middle of the kitchen




Ladies and gentlemen, Eminem

Walk On Water

I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
I walk on water
But only when it freezes

Why are expectations so high? Is it the bar I set?
My arms, I stretch, but I can't reach
A far cry from it, or it's in my grasp, but as
Soon as I grab, squeeze
I lose my grip like the flyin' trapeze
Into the dark I plummet, now the sky's blackening
I know the mark's high, butter–
Flies rip apart my stomach
Knowin' that no matter what bars I come with
You're gonna harp, gripe, and
That's a hard Vicodin to swallow, so I scrap these
As pressure increases like khakis
I feel the ice cracking, because—

I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
I walk on water
But only when it freezes

It's the curse of the standard
That the first of the Mathers discs set
Always in search of the verse that I haven't spit yet
Will this step just be another misstep
To tarnish whatever the legacy, love or respect
I've garnered? The rhyme has to be perfect, the delivery flawless
And it always feels like I'm hittin' the mark
'Til I go sit in the car, listen and pick it apart
Like, "This shit is garbage!"
God's given me all this, still, I feel no different regardless
Kids look to me as a god, this is retarded
If only they knew, it's a facade and it's exhaustive
And I try not to listen to nonsense
But if you bitches are tryin' to strip me of my confidence
Mission accomplished
I'm not God-sent, Nas, Rakim, 'Pac, B.I.G., James Todd Smith
And I'm not Prince, so…

I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
I walk on water
But only when it freezes

'Cause I'm only human, just like you
Making my mistakes, oh if you only knew
I don't think you should believe in me the way that you do
'Cause I'm terrified to let you down, oh

It's true, I'm a Rubik's — a beautiful mess
At times juvenile, yes, I goof and I jest
A flawed human, I guess
But I'm doin' my best to not ruin your ex–
Pectations and meet 'em, but first
The "Speedom" verse, now Big Sean
He's goin' too fast, is he gonna shout or curse out his mom?
There was a time I had the world by the balls, eatin' out my palm
Every album song I was spazzin' the fuck out on
And now I'm gettin' clowned and frowned on
But the only one who's looking down on
Me that matters now's DeShaun
Am I lucky to be around this long?
Begs the question though
Especially after the methadone
As yesterday fades and the Dresden home
Is burnt to the ground, and all that's left of my house is lawn
The crowds are gone
And it's time to wash out the blonde
Sales decline, the curtain's drawn
They're closin' the set, I'm still pokin' my head from out behind
And everyone who has doubt, remind
Now take your best rhyme, outdo it, now do it a thousand times
Now let 'em tell ya the world no longer cares or gives a fuck about your rhymes
And as I grow outta sight, outta mind, I might go outta mine
'Cause how do I ever let this mic go without a fight
When I made a fuckin' tightrope outta twine?
But when I do fall from these heights though, I'll be fine
I won't pout or cry or spiral down or whine
But I'll decide if it's my final bow this time around, 'cause—

I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
I walk on water
But only when it freezes

'Cause I'm only human, just like you
I've been making my mistakes, oh if you only knew
I don't think you should believe in me the way that you do
'Cause I'm terrified to let you down, oh
If I walked on water, I would drown

'Cause I'm just a man
But as long as I got a mic, I'm godlike
So me and you are not alike
Bitch, I wrote "Stan"

Stan

My tea's gone cold
I'm wondering why I got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad

Dear Slim, I wrote you, but you still ain't callin'
I left my cell, my pager and my home phone at the bottom
I sent two letters back in autumn, you must not've got 'em
There probably was a problem at the post office or somethin'
Sometimes I scribble addresses too sloppy when I jot 'em
But anyways, fuck it, what's been up, man? How's your daughter?
My girlfriend's pregnant too, I'm 'bout to be a father
If I have a daughter, guess what I'ma call her?
I'ma name her Bonnie
I read about your Uncle Ronnie too, I'm sorry
I had a friend kill himself over some bitch who didn't want him
I know you probably hear this every day, but I'm your biggest fan
I even got the underground shit that you did with Skam
I got a room full of your posters and your pictures, man
I like the shit you did with Rawkus too, that shit was phat
Anyways, I hope you get this, man, hit me back
Just to chat, truly yours, your biggest fan, this is Stan

My tea's gone cold
I'm wondering why I got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad

Love the Way You Lie

Just gonna stand there and watch me burn
Well, that's all right
Because I like the way it hurts
Just gonna stand there and hear me cry
Well, that's all right
Because I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie

I can't tell you what it really is
I can only tell you what it feels like
And right now there's a steel knife in my windpipe
I can't breathe, but I still fight while I can fight
As long as the wrong feels right, it's like I'm in flight
High off her love, drunk from her hate
It's like I'm huffin' paint
And I love her the more I suffer, I suffocate
And right before I'm about to drown she resuscitates me
She fuckin' hates me, and I love it, “Wait!
Where you going?”, “I'm leaving you.” “No, you ain't
Come back!” We're runnin' right back, here we go again
It's so insane, 'cause when it's goin' good it's goin' great
I'm Superman with the wind at his back, she's Lois Lane
But when it's bad it's awful, I feel so ashamed
I snap, “Who's that dude?”, I don't even know his name
I laid hands on her, I'll never stoop so low again
I guess I don't know my own strength

Just gonna stand there and watch me burn
Well, that's all right
Because I like the way it hurts
Just gonna stand there and hear me cry
Well, that's all right
Because I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie



Oh, answer the phone you fucking slut transvestite
With a cock, you're a man, aren't you?
You're a fucking man
Um, is this, uh, I'm looking for a sensual, I don't know
Listen, what type of bodyrubs, like
I'm looking for like, um, I don't know, like
Like something like, I'm kind of, like
I don't know, I'm sure you do this everyday
Um... I'm just- I don't know, I'm looking for something like
My wife, my wi- I'm married, um
My wife does not satisfy me the way that you could




Paul, you're obviously not going to help me with this. I can see that. So...
Nah it's cool, don't worry about it

I'm Sorry, I'm just trying to organize it

Okay, well I'm just trying to do some fucking drops that got fucked up that... Sorry

Really?

Yeah

Alright, well, maybe... maybe... uh... you wanna start over? What do you wanna do?

I don't know. Are. You probably haven't been listening. I think that this one is okay


Good Morning! Welcome to the Shady Classics Mixtape with DJ Whoo Kid



Dear Slim, I wrote you, but you still ain't callin'
I left my cell, my pager and my home phone at the bottom
I sent two letters back in autumn
You must not've got 'em
There probably was a problem at the post office or somethin'
Sometimes I scribble addresses too sloppy when I jot 'em
But anyways, f— it, what's been up, man?
How's your daughter?
My girlfriend's pregnant too, I'm 'bout to be a father
If I have a daughter, guess what I'ma call her?
I'ma name her Bonnie
I read about your Uncle Ronnie too, I'm sorry
I know you probably hear this every day
But I'm your biggest fan
I even got the underground stuff that you did with Skam
I got a room full of your posters and your pictures, man
Anyways, I hope you get this, man, hit me back
Just to chat, truly yours, your biggest fan, this is Stan

My tea's gone cold
I'm wondering why I got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad

Dear Slim, you still ain't called or wrote
I hope you have a chance
I ain't mad, I just think it's messed up you don't answer fans
If you didn't want to talk to me outside the concert
You didn't have to
But you could've signed an autograph for Matthew
That's my little brother, man, he's only six years old
We waited in the blisterin' cold for you
For four hours, and you just said no
That's pretty crummy, man, you're like his favorite idol
He wants to be just like you, man, he likes you more than I do
I ain't that mad though, I just don't like being lied to
Remember when we met in Denver?
You said if I'd write you, you would write back
See, I'm just like you in a way; I never knew my father neither
He used to always cheat on my mom and beat her
I can relate to what you're sayin' in your songs
So when I have a crumby day, I drift away and put 'em on
I even got a tattoo of your name across the chest
Sometimes I even cut myself to see how much it bleeds
It's like adrenaline, the pain is such a sudden rush for me
See, everything you say is real
And I respect you ‘cause you tell it
My girlfriend's jealous ‘cause I talk about you 24/7
But she don't know you like I know you, Slim, no one does
She don't know what it was like for people like us growin' up
You gotta call me, man
I'll be the biggest fan you'll ever lose, sincerely yours, Stan
P.S. We should be together too

My tea's gone cold
I'm wondering why I got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad

Dear Mr. I'm-Too-Good-to-Call-or-Write-My-Fans
This'll be the last package I ever send your ass
It's been six months, and still no word—I don't deserve it?
I know you got my last two letters
I wrote the addresses on 'em perfect
So this is my cassette I'm sendin' you, I hope you hear it
I'm in the car right now, I'm doin' 90 on the freeway
Hey, Slim, I drank a fifth of vodka, you dare me to drive?
You know the song by Phil Collins
"In the Air of the Night," about that guy who could've saved that other guy from drownin'
But didn't, then Phil saw it all, then at a show he found him?
That's kinda how this is
You could've rescued me from drownin'
Now it's too late, I'm on a thousand downers now, I'm drowsy
And all I wanted was a lousy letter or a call
I hope you know I ripped all of your pictures off the wall
I loved you, Slim, we could've been together
Think about it! You ruined it now
I hope go to sleep and you dream about it
And when you dream I hope you can't sleep
And you scream about it; I hope your conscience eats at you
And you can't breathe without me
Hey, Slim, that's my girlfriend screamin' in the trunk
But I didn't slit her throat, I just tied her up, see, I ain't like you
‘Cause if she suffocates she'll suffer more
And then she'll die too
Well, gotta go, I'm almost at the bridge now
Oh shoot, I forgot, how am I supposed to send this tape out?!

My tea's gone cold
I'm wondering why I got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad

Dear Stan, I meant to write you sooner, but I just been busy
You said your girlfriend's pregnant now—how far along is she?
Look, I'm really flattered you would call your daughter that
And here's an autograph
For your brother, I wrote it on a Starter cap
I'm sorry I didn't see you at the show, I must've missed you
But what's this stuff you said about you like to cut your wrists too? I say that stuff just clownin'
Dawg, come on, how messed up is you?
You got some issues, Stan, I think you need some counselin'
To help your ass from bouncin'
Off the walls when you get down some
And what's this junk about us meant to be together?
That type of crap'll make me not want us to meet each other
I really think you and your girlfriend need each other
Or maybe you just need to treat her better
I hope you get to read this letter
I just hope it reaches you in time
Before you hurt yourself, I think that you'll be doin' just fine
If you relax a little, I'm glad I inspire you
But Stan, why are you so mad?
Try to understand that I do want you as a fan
A couple weeks ago that made me sick
Some dude was drunk and drove his car over a bridge
And had his girlfriend in the trunk
And she was pregnant with his kid
And in the car they found a tape
But they didn't say who it was to
Come to think about it, his name was… it was you, damn



Yo, B-Rabbit
This silly rabbit don’t like lettuce I heard he like dicks
Faggot niggas, with ponytails and lipstick
I'm for real; don’t give a fuck, what
What, ohh
It’s like this; east side is where I'm from
You got beef hit me on the streets with a badge and a gun
Fuck the badge; I'm coming through with black mags
'Bout to do this B-Rabbit nigga 'cause he's a fag
Like I said earlier in the clause
I stated that in my, oh shit

A'ight look
I can see that I’m put to the test
Battling this chick, with no breasts
And why I gotta battle a chick
Especially one that’s wack, wit' a dick?
So you a dope MC
Don’t get mad and start taking your period out on me
‘Cause I ain’t done shit to you
What’s your name, Diffusion? Well then I guess I gotta diffuse you
This ain’t something I’m used to
Why the fuck did Future even introduce you?
I really don’t understand
Why this chick is up here right now and wants to be a man
On this mic it’s rat-a-tat-tat
Why the fuck am I standing here battling Da Brat
You don’t really even wanna see this
On this microphone I will eat your fucking fetus



Yo yo, back again
Turn it up a little bit, pick it up pick it up
Yo pick it up, pick it up
Yo pick it up
If you find a phone call in a Tim Westwood line, what the hell you gonna do?
Pick it up! Pick it up!


While I'm smacking up girls to keep the hoes in check
The double S-Slim Shady wreck the London set
Sit back and relax while my squad smokes crack
Ah yes, coming from the mother freaking Midwest
Lift your shirt up and let me see them big breasts
We molest girls three times a day, three times a night
I got G-fulls of criminal peoples
Jumping out when we ten deep
Beat you down and speed off in a Benz Jeep
Shut the hell up, I'm still seven miles slut!
It's '97 so get with it
Peep that back in the day stuff when that Infinite tape was hitting
Listen, must we forget
I originated all that rough shit, that talk drug shit
Detroit city is where I grew up bitch
Peace to all my Outsidaz in Jers
Forget what you heard, this is three and one third

If you see a Slim Shady tape on the fucking rack

I get deaf MCees stepped to the left
I bust MCees and my name is Wyclef
How you doing? I play the banjo, piano whatever it is I rock like Barry Manilow
Yo it's Slim Shady on the freaking deck
Y'all don't check it out I wreck the Frim Shady set
The Frim Shady is what I said because I'm freaking drunk
I pick it up, pick it up, I sound like a punk

Ayo they wish that they could ban me black
Yo, you standing back
Def methods, ayo got my hand in that
Who ever running it, ayo you get a jammed knee cap
Make the healthiest in your fam, handicap
You a fan of rap, my clan will tap your school, home, ya bitch house
Pull my nine millie, you gonna die with your fist out
Enemas is over with
Venomous is cobra spit
Aggressive dialect with aggressive sober pitch
My bionic phonics, demolish your logic, demonic can't stand the chronic impossible to hold on like vomit
Mics I palm it, cause they the bomb-it
Like terrorist is Islamic, I enter your atmosphere like a comet
The new god of rap, call me bigger Thor
Snap your back when I slap your ass in a figure four
From miles around they can feel us lethal
Be no sequel, of the energize, finish style, bust 'em down right now, the winner is... me
Then my man Mr. Paul we gonna star
Make your heart beat for your trying get down with us
We ball to the end, it's time to pretend
My friend to the left of me, the death of me
Me recipe to be with this don't even test MCees
Y'all can't get with us it's the dress, dress on ya



Music.












The doctors told me I'd done the equivalent of four bags of heroin,



So I would say to anybody, it does get better, you know. It just does.



Lyrics will be available when/if the song is released. Stay tuned!


Tell me what time, what time, what time
What time you sucking it?
What time you sucking it?
What time, what time
What time you sucking it?
What time you sucking it?



How the fuck he got an Oscar?
Passed out in his red Mazda
With his fucking head in his pasta
In the parking lot of K-Mart plaza
Across from the red lobster
Looking like the Lochness monster
Dressed like a cross-dressed mobster
Talk is cheap it costs less to gossip
I’d probably be a lot less
Hostile if you snots kept your shnozzes out the airholes
Or get fucked in all seven holes
Ass, mouth, pussy, yeah both ears and hah! yes nostrils
At the ozzfest with nas bumping das efx in wrecked up Datsun
And dropped two extra strength Watson vicodin out my pocket
They cost less I'm a hot mess cause I tripped and got my head stuck
In a wasp’s nest in the process awesome

Drunk as fuck
One sock pulling my boxers up with boxing gloves
But I keep dropping my fucking binoculars
Got two fucking hydroxycuts and four oxy's stuck in my esophagus
These three lesbian little stocky sluts
Thought I swallowed two hockey pucks
Started screamin' "Serves you right you cocky fuck!
That's what you get for mockin' us
Ain't as cool as you thought you was."
Bitch all I did when I walked up was have my dick in a sock
And it's a sock puppet so no strings attached you can all suck it
Shits about to get hairy as motherfucking Chewbacca's nuts
Cocksuckers





"Intro" produced by Eminem
"Murder, Murder" produced by DJ Rec
"Just The Two Of Us" produced by DJ Head
"Just Don't Give A F*ck" produced by Denaun Porter
"No One's Iller" produced by DJ Head
"If I Had" produced by DJ Rec w/ add'l drum programming by DJ Head

Cuts on "Low Down Dirty" by DJ Head
Cuts on "Murder, Murder" and "Just The Two Of Us" by DJ Len Swann






I'm not scared of your stolen power
See right through you any hour
I won’t ease your strain
You'll be taking it slow, feeding my flame
Shuffling the cards of your game
And just in time
In the right place
Suddenly I will play my ace

Ha ha
Treat women like property, possessive like a noun with an apostrophe S's, I'd probably stalk broccoli, yes it's
Socrates with a block of cheese and a dollar stuck in this soda pop machine
Got emcees dropping to knees, copping a plea bargain they keep sobbing, like, "please stop it"
Aftermath, bitch, still Detoxing
Looking for us? We over here like we're eavesdropping
Apparently still mad over what I said last year
On that Vegas track, I just look stupid and stand there
And try to act like I can't hear
What? Sorry dear, but I think Pam Grier just stuck a tampon in my damn ear
Just then Foxy Brown, walks up and knocks me down
Kicks me and socks me, ow

I'm not scared of your stolen power
See right through you any hour
I won’t ease your strain

I'm not scared, I'm just a white kid in a black neighborhood
Side terror
Wipe off this fear, to not thinking clear
I need to get my head straight
I do feel like a Nazi in a Jewish camp
Concentration
A foolish act to puzzle you fools with the coolest raps like Rubik's cube that I stole just to solve then give it back
Stupid face your making bitch
Loose the mask
Oh wait
I'm sorry that's my bad
Looks like shit
Might be obvious and a waste of my time to say you look like the crap from a sewage plant
But as you were saying
Back to your rant
Lex Luther just got circles ran round his puny ass so fast his neck snapped and it dropped his pants
You've just been schooled by Clark Kent
Shopping at the market
In the parking lot next to your apartment and part from it
You tried to look hard as shit but you pooed your pants
And I didn't even get to use superman yet
And he's my strong suit
Fall soon back on, to attack these villains, and kill em just passing em back and forth, feeling em then put an axe in their nads
That's what I call a hacky sack bitch
Cut cut and pass
You think your lucky
It's Chucky the mother fucking assassin
Castrating stuck in the cabinet sucking a bottle of Aspirin
Preparing a statement while he sharpens his blade
Carves it across his face as he coughs
Testing his voice is it raspy
Nope, just naturally nasty
Get ready for the ass whooping he's bout to serve up like a double cheese burger from Arby's

I'm not scared of your stolen power
See right through you any hour
I won’t ease your strain

Dearest resident
Don't flip past this channel and skip it
A paramedic is in your living room slitting scissors through your flannel get up
So get up, feel better, and add up what I said on that chalk board of yours boarded up inside your head
You're almost dead
I'm your guardian
Here we are
Reminiscing this shit as we walk down the hall of wits
Shelve these thoughts
Highlight reel of selfish tall feminist broads
Everyone that's screwed you over when they sad they'd call
Seminar, phantom here I am sent to ward these demons off

Off misogyny
Sodomy, how many chocolaty jell-o pops can he possibly lace, walking atrocity
No wonder you scoff at me, it’s still obvious I invented prick

Rest in heaven, I'm evidently milking this game like
Her breasts are dripping
Guess I'm busy, but unless you bitches are seven teen and eleven months I don't want to hear the pessimism
Tell the rest I'm on readers digest while I'm on the toilet
Pizza sky rocket
Gossip isn't
Close to the shit
I must be fast, lickity split
There's no exaggeration, I mean it Brittany
A fan of Trina
Get's me like I wanna jam my weener in Christina

And Serena and Selena
Scarlett Johansson, Tiffani Amber Thiessen
Give me a damn good reason to not wanna slip an Ambien in a Cappuccino
And try to have a 3-sum with Janet Reno

Stuff her with cream like a spicy popper of jalapeno
Appetizer, my main meal's Destiny
Now, If I die I'll come back to haunt your back side grizzly
Capitalize the "Ass" in fucking Caspar and Wendy
As Detroit looking like a power outage, just a black out city
Crack house just down the street of McDonalds, where you lost your virginity
Oh dity, I'm out
Explosive, you're left with the call
You might want to

Head for the fire exits, I'm coming through like a wrecking-ball

Test us, we're scared of nothing at all

I'm not scared of your stolen power
See right through you any hour
I won’t ease your strain
You'll be taking it slow, feeding my flame
Shuffling the cards of your game
And just in time
In the right place
Suddenly I will play my ace



I'm cancerous, so when I diss, you wouldn't want to answer this
If you responded back with a battle rap you wrote for Canibus
A hellspawn droppin' a stealth bomb
Six mics in The Source, they borrowed one from LL's arm
You beef with me, I'm a even the score equally
Take you on Jerry Springer and beat your ass legally
I get too funny off of twenty Nō-Dōz
Hop on a snowboard and hit a tree harder than 'Sonny' Bono
So if I said I never get buzzed
That would mean I lie and get butt more than the president does
Hilary Clinton tried to slap me and call me a pervert
I took her freakin' tonsils out and fed her sherbet
My nerves hurt and lately I'm on edge
Grabbed Vanilla Ice and ripped out his blond dreads
Every girl I ever went out wit' has gone les'
Follow me and do exactly what the song says
Talk back, fake sick, get out of school, steal from people
And don't think before you do somethin' that's illegal
I'm dumb enough to walk in a store and steal
So I'm dumb enough to ask for a date with Lauryn Hill
Some people only see that I'm white, ignorin' skill
Cause I stand out like a green hat with a orange bill
But I don't get pissed, y'all don't even see through the mist
How the fuck can I be white? I don't even exist
I get a clean shave, bathe, go to a rave
Fry from an overload and dig myself up out of my grave
My middle finger won't go down, how do I wave?
And this is how I'm 'posed to teach kids how to behave?

Now follow me and do exactly what you see
Don't you want to grow up to be just like me?
I slap women and eat 'shrooms, then O.D
Now don't you want to grow up to be just like me?

Me and Marcus Allen went over to see Nicole
When we heard a knock at the door, must have been 'Ron' Gold
Jumped behind the door, put the session on hold
Did 'em both and smeared blood on a white Bronco
My mind won't work if my spine don't jerk
I slapped Garth Brooks out of his rhinestone shirt
I'm not a player, just a ill rhyme-sayer
That'll spray a Aerosol can up at the ozone layer
My rap style's warped, I'm runnin' out the morgue
With your dead grandmother's corpse to throw it on your porch
Jumped in a Chickenhawk cartoon with a cape on
And beat up Foghorn Leghorn with an acorn
I'm about as normal as Norman Bates with deformative traits
A premature birth that was four minutes late
Mother, are you there? I love you
I never meant to hit you over the head with that shovel
Will someone please explain to my brain
That I just severed a main vein
With a chainsaw and I'm in pain?
I take a breather and sigh, either I'm fried or I'm nuts
Cause if you ain't tiltin' this room, neither am I
So when you see your mom with a thermometer shoved in her ass
Then it probably is obvious I got it on with her
Cause when I drop this solo hit, it's over with
I bought Cage's tape, opened it and dubbed over it

I came to the club drunk with a fake I.D
Don't you want to grow up to be just like me?
I've been with ten women who got HIV
Now don't you want to grow up to be just like me?
I've got genital warts and it burns when I pee
Don't you want to grow up to be just like me?
I tie a rope around my penis and jump from a tree
You probably want to grow up to be just like me



Yow supa dupes, yuh nuh see a vybz
Kartel ah represent eminem...doah
Gyal ah spin dem waist like rims
When dem see the kartel
*So er'body come on get up on the floor now*
*And grab someone*


Di club ago tun up dem put the gaza pon the adz
The thugs inna the white toyota strap up wid di mags
Six pack unda mi sweater but mi nah talk bout nuh abs
Mi nuh play like likle Ze inna the City of Gods
Pull up inna di club mi sharper dan a scissors
Gyal ah offer menage a trois an three sums and blow jobs
In condom fi safety like pistols in holsters
Corey ah our building so the club can turn off
Street vybz and champaign and redbull and smirnoff
High grade popcaan roll out and light and burn off
Notnice frass a seh teecha gi mi one of your laugh Aha-ah
Pimpin seh me is di world boss every liqour inna di buildin
We drink an flass off till di thugz dem eye purple like bb broadcast



Now you can do this on your own but everyone knows
That no one likes to be alone


Street vybz a raise high grade a blaze
Drop di bomb gyal al qaeda ways
Weh di yaad gyal weh di yaad man deh


Pull a fifth of Bacardi from outta my underwear
And walk around the party without a care
An tomorrow probably still be too high to get outta bed
So quit tryin' ta play the wall like you pawlin'
They call me the Stephon Marbury of rap, darlin'
But I'm not throwin' ones, fives, tens, or even twenties
Man I do this for them bunnies up at Denny's
It comes to them trailers in them South Parks
So ladies if your belly button's not an innie then I'm outie
C'mon)

Now you can do this on your own but everyone knows
That no one likes to be alone
So get on the floor and grab somebody

Street vybz a raise high grade a blaze
Drop di bomb gyal al qaeda ways
Weh di yaad gyal weh di yaad man deh



Now whether you're black, white or purple
If you're misunderstood
But you don't give a fuck
You weren't doin' shit that you should
Long as you know you're up to evil
And you're no damn good



Now you can do this on your own but everyone knows
That no one likes to be alone
So get on the floor and grab somebody

Street vybz a raise high grade a blaze
Drop di bomb gyal al qaeda ways
Weh di yaad gyal weh di yaad man deh
Party party party



Yo.. Slim Shady!
Yo.. I'll fucking.. I'll...

Battle? I'm too weedy to speak to
The only key that I see to defeat you
Would be for me to remove these two Adidas and beat you
And force feed you 'em both, and on each feet is a cleat shoe
I'll lift you off your feet so fast with a roundhouse
You'll think I pulled the fucking ground out from underneath you
I ain't tryin to shoot you
I'm tryin to chop you into pieces and eat you
Wrap you in rope and plastic, stab you with broken glass
And have you with open gashes strapped to a soaking mattress
Fuck the planet, until it spins on a broken axis
I'm so bananas I'm showing up to your open casket
To fill it full of explosive gasses
And close it back with a lit match in it
While I sit back and just hope it catches
Blow you to fragments
Laugh, roll you and smoke the ashes

I see the light at the end
But every time I take a step, it gets dim
Tell me is this hell we're livin in?
If so, heaven's got to be better
But if we're hellbound, whatever, let's go down

I run a red light then sideswipe a hearse
I'mma drink 'til my liver rot, see the doc
Leave the E.R., then hit a bar for a liquor shot, 'til the liver spot
One day we all gon' die
But when I die, I'mma be so high
That I'mma get up and walk, leaving the concrete bare
With the chalk outline still there
I smoke until I choke and I sex a lot
I got a cross on my chain but it's just a rock
Do I still have to hold my tray very tight?
You feel me God? I done did so much shit while on Earth
I smoke, I drink, I curse, and to make matters worse
I bust my gun first, and then I chat with your corpse
Since way back, I was one to never like back-talk
See me at the pearly gates in line, wearing a Nordface
Nickle nine at my waist, Father lost faith
Angels greet me but I don't reply back
Just show me to my quarters, and oh yeah, where's Thai at?


Maxie was seriously wounded but the soul still burns
Final battle, fight!

Analyze the strength of my game, like Lee Corso
Call me a lost soul, with a vest on my torso
And of course, yo, y'all know I'm no stranger to danger
Like Christ in a manger, feel a whole range of my anger
I breathe down shit so hard you can see sound
And beat down these rap clowns in like three rounds
My pen about as sharp as a dagger, walk with a swagger
Tie your wife to the back of a blackjack and I drag her
Ten blocks, untie the bitch and I still bag her
Give her a smack in the ass and a six pack of lager
My shit go as deep and as dark as a train tunnel
My flows spill like using the wrong end of a funnel
Everyday I grow more older, and more colder
Fly you to Colorado, roll you over with a boulder
I know you want to retaliate but you won't dare
Cause you fucking with some niggas like this who just don't care


But every time I take a step, it gets dim..
Tell me is this hell we're livin in?
Haha..

Time's up!
You lose!



Somebody Outside This Shit
People Laughing At Me
All Ways Laughing
Bout To Go Crazy
So I Started To Set It On Niggas
Yall Know What I Mean
Pacewon
I'm Calm Like Bread Men
Triple With My Acid In My Head Bang
Bout To Lose My Mind
Gonna Take The Whole World With Me



Detroit

There is a resilience that rises from somewhere deep within your streets

You can't define it, but you can feel it

You can feel it overflowing from the people who call you home

From people who are always proud to declare, 'I'm from Detroit'

You took our country from it's infancy, into industry

And your name still carries with it the idea of a nation built on steel, muscle and sweat

You became the city that carried the country

The city, like the sport, is built on dreams

People who arrived here, driven to excel

Who know nothing is accomplished without hardwork, without sacrifice

When you hurt, we hurt

Your streets witness our struggle

Your bricks are our rage through the emptiness of each house shuttered, of each factory closed

We've lived through the ups and the downs

But we remain, Detroit

We can never turn our backs on you Detroit, because we are you

My home

The home of Motown, Cadillac and Joe Louis

Through all this, we cannot be defeated, because we have never been defeated

You've built us, you've moved us, you've shaped us

Sometimes down, but never out

Take strength in us, your people

Stay up Detroit



Good morning children!
My name is Dirty Steve, I'll be your substitute teacher for today

Come with me, don't be so mad, angry little man
Dirty Steve will be here soon, he will hold your hand
Walking through the forest, he will show you porno mags
You can beat his dick while he sucks yours, cuz he's a fag



Hi, baby, thanks for calling 9-7-0-SLUT
The hottest live one-on-one line in the city

Yeah, I need to speak to Brenda, like, immediately
Yo, this bitch is about to catch, bitch about to catch it
Fuckin' slut
You know what? You didn't think I knew, did you?
This Brenda, right? Don't play games with me, girl!
This Brenda, right? You said you didn't do it, bitch!
Yo, don't-don't-don't call me a motherfucker, bitch
I swear to God, I come up there and pop all you fucking sluts
I told you Brenda, don't be fuckin' round on me
You fuckin' bitch! I told you!
"Aw, I don't do it, I don't do it!"
You motherfucking slut, I'll kill you, bitch!
I break your motherfucking neck
Yo, don't play games with me, girl!
Don't play ga- When you come home tonight
I swear to God, yo, all of your shit will be outside!
You hear me girl?! I ain't playing with you no more!
I bought you everythi- "I saw yoooou, walking in the way"
You know what I'm saying, girl?!
I ain't in no crack, bitch, this Slim motherfucking Shady
You understand me? Slim *chka-chka* Hi, my name is!
Bitch, you don't play with me, when yo-
When you come home tonight, girl
Your shit is all out on the motherfucking lawn
That's my word, is bond, yo!
My word is bond, when you come home, girl
You last now, girl, you motherfucking slut
I know you fucking him, girl, I know you fucking him
You know what I'm saying?

I know you fucking him
I know you fucking him
I know you-



You know what you're doing when you do it for the ladies
So won't you please step up to the mic baby?

It's been a little boring lately
I've been playing in poison ivy and pee
I've been itching to get in some S-H-I-T
You heard what I S-A-I-D
This club? I guess they I.D
But they just let me in without it so I guess they like me
I put on my best dang white tee




If I'm elected for ten terms
I'm renewing the staff after the inagural
And hiring all girls as interns
If I don't like you, I'll snatch you outta your mic booth
While you're rappin and pull your right through the window and fight you
I'll take you straight to the pavement
Uppercut you, and scrape your face wit a bracelet
Like a razor that shaved it
Three drinks and I'm ready to flash
It's probably all cuz I ain't awkward at all
I just like to walk through the mall, stop, and talk to the wall
And have a relapse after I just fought through withdrawal
The Bad and Evil movement is comin
Plus the music is pumpin like a pill freak wit a tube in his stomach
I write a rhyme a day
So it's no wonder how come your whole album
Is soundin like a bunch of shit that I would say
Whether it's one verse or one letter
I'll probably be the cleverest one that never gets spun ever
It's Slim Shady and Tony Touch, it's only us
The rest of y'all are just stuck in the middle wit Monie Love



Detroit

There is a resilience that rises from somewhere deep within your streets
You can't define it, but you can feel it
You can feel it overflowing from the people who call you home
From people who are always proud to declare, 'I'm from Detroit'
You took our country from it's infancy, into industry
And your name still carries with it the idea of a nation built on steel, muscle and sweat
You became the city that carried the country
The city, like the sport, is built on dreams
People who would drive to you, driven to excel
Who know nothing is accomplished without hardwork, without sacrifice
When you hurt, we hurt
Your streets witness our struggle
Your bricks are our rage through the emptiness of each house shuttered, of each factory closed
We've lived through the ups and the downs
But we remain, Detroit
We can never turn our backs on you Detroit, because we are you
My home
The home of Motown, Cadillac and Joe Louis
Through all this, we cannot be defeated, because we have never been defeated
You've built us, you've moved us, you've shaped us
Sometimes down, but never out
Take strength in us, your people

Stay up Detroit




Alright stop, now before you walk in the door
Of this liquor store and try to get money out the drawer
I'm your mothafuckin' conscience!

That's nonsense
Go in, gaffle the money and run to one of your Aunt's cribs
And borrow a damn dress and one of her blond wigs
Tell her you need a place to stay, you'll be safe for days
If you shave your legs with Renee's razor blades

Yeah but if it all goes through like it's supposed to
The whole neighborhood knows you and they'll expose you
Think about it before you walk in the door first
Look at the store clerk, she's older than George Burns!

Fuck that, do that shit, shoot that bitch
Can you afford to blow this shit, are you that rich?
Why you give a fuck if she dies? Are you that bitch?
Do you really think she gives a fuck if you have kids?

Don't even listen to Slim yo, he's bad for you

These voices, these voices, I hear them
And when they talk, I follow, I follow
I follow, I follow all these voices


Now listen to me, while you're kissing her cheek
And smearing her lipstick, slip this in her drink
Now all you gotta do is nibble on this little bitch's earlobe
You shouldn't take advantage of her, it's not fair)
Yo, look at her bush, does it got hair?
Fuck this bitch right here on the spot, bare
'til she passes out and she forgot how she got there
No but I seen the porno with Sun Doobiest!
Man, fuck that, hit that shit raw dog and bail



Alright, calm down, relax, start breathing
While you at work she's with some dude trying to get off
Fuck slitting her throat, cut this bitch's head off!)
Wait, what if there's an explanation for this shit?
Alright, Shady, maybe he's right Grady
But think about the baby before you get all crazy

Okay, thought about it? Still wanna stab her?
Grab her by the throat, get your daughter and kidnap her?
That's what I did, be smart don't be a retard
You gonna take advice from somebody who slapped Dee Barnes?
Mr. Dre, Mr. N.W.A, Mr. AK
Coming straight outta Compton, y'all better make way
How in the fuck you gonna tell this man not to be violent?

Cause he don't need to go the same route that I went
Been there, done that, aw fuck it, what am I saying?
Shoot 'em both Grady, where's your gun at?



Shady records, ain’t nobody better than us
Shady records, more cheddar than us
Shady records, ain’t nobody better than us
Shady records…

I done figured this rap shit out, I map shit out strategically
Timing is everything, and it seems to be the key
To my success, I merked for me repeatedly
We done be, to beat MC’s
Timing is everything, and it seems to be the key
Let 'em diss you first and respond immediately
In order to master, the art of war, don't start a war
Shit, not no more; we done scared 'em off, there are no more
Victims to sick; I'm fixin' to pick some and start shit
Ain’t got no pictures to rip and shit to throw darts at
Ain't got no more targets, shit, Irv and Jeff
We done beat 'em to death, Benzino in debt
There seems to just be no one left to bully; Bush is pussy
Why the fuck you think his name's Bush? Puss is bushy!
Ain't shit going on, shit, I've been getting so bored lately
I'm thinking of doing some shit to get you to go and hate me again
Tell the truth, I liked the shit better then, shit, I could spit better
The game just ain't the same, it's changing
Shit, Dre is quitting, Jay is quitting, now it's just wankstas
Just saying the same shit, it's fake and it's ancient
And It's making me so bored I'mma just make a new language
Fubba-u-cubba-kubba yubba obubba ubba
You-ba can subbabick my dadibbadick through a tuba!
Summa dumma lamma I'm not a human, I'm a suicidal supersonic
Suicidal Unabomber
You think I'm the new Osama, press thinks I'm the new Madonna
Jeffrey Dahmer left me with this legacy to carry on
A lot of talk and rumors on us, who's the hottest? To be honest
Hip hop ain't been the same since 2Pac moved to Cuba on us
Shaddy records, they ain’t making more cheddar than us
Shaddy records, they ain’t better than us
Shaddy records, muthafuckas more cheddar than us



Another motherfucking exclusive!

I kissed a boy
And I liked it
The taste of his hairy fat dick

Shade 45

I kissed a boy
And I liked it
The taste of his hairy fat dick

Peace!
I am the man
But I'm not the one with the can in his hand
I'm down with a different kind of street band
And I appear from place to place as the Music Man aka Masta Ace








"I can't see it all. Even if I could, it'll all be grey. But your picture on my wall, it reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad".




So, anyway. Call me back after you listen to this. Um, I sent the treatment over, read through it and get ready for some really long days. Later.


And goodnight. Give it up for him, folks. Thank you very much.




Hi, this is Ariel?
This is Marshall
Don't hang up!
God... Are you gonna leave me too?
I'm sorry, uh-I'm a-I'm a white male
Single now,sorry, what should I do, Ariel?
Are you gonna leave me too?
I'm sorry, I-I, you know?
She comes in, from work late
She comes in at late last night, okay?
I don't know where she's at
All I know is that she's got these little, like
Red marks on her neck
I'm like "Are those hickeys?"
"No, these aren't hickeys" I'm like
"You've been fooling around, I can't have it you"
She's done this to me before
I wish you could just, help me, like
I don't know, I'm-I'm kinda horny
The music playing, like a-- Can you hear it?
I don't know, I'm just horny
I need it-I don't know
I don't know if I need to just, like, jack off
Or like have sex with my girlfriend when she comes
I don't know anymore, you know? I'm just
You want me to kill myself, right here, on national TV?!
I-I'm what? I don't understand, is that spanish or something?
I don't understand, what are you-
You know, I'm just an english regular guy, I'm a white kid, okay?
I grow up, you know
I don't know, oh my god... You know what?
If you're not gonna jack me off, you fucking slut
You can suck my dick, you fucking whore



Mon thé a refroidi, je me demande vraiment pourquoi
Je suis sorti du lit
La pluie du matin ennuage ma fenêtre
Et je ne peux plus rien voir
Et même si je pouvais, tout resterait gris
Mais ta photo sur le mur
Me rappelle que les choses ne vont pas si mal, pas si mal

J'ai mis mon numéro de téléphone portable, de bippeur, et
J'ai envoyé deux lettres en retour en automne, tu n'as pas
Dû les recevoir
Il y a probablement eu un problème à la Poste ou
Quelquechose
Parfois je griffonne les adresses avec une telle négligence
Quand je prends des notes
Mais de toute façon, on s'en fiche, quoi de neuf ? Mec
Comment va ta fille ?
Ma petite amie est enceinte aussi, je suis sur le point
D'être père
Si j'ai une fille, devine comment je l'appelerai ?
Je l'appelerai Bonnie
J'ai lu à propos de ton oncle Ronnie aussi, je suis
J'avais un copain qui s'est suicidé à cause d'une salope
Qui ne voulait pas de lui
Je sais que tu entends probablement ça chaque jour, mais je
Suis ton plus grand fan
J'ai une salle pleine de tes posters et photos mec
J'aime le son que tu as fait avec Rawkus aussi, ce son
était bon
Peu importe, j'espère que tu recevras ça mec
Réponds-moi
Juste pour discuter, ton serviteur, ton plus grand fan
C'est Stan


Cher Slim, tu n'as encore ni appelé ni écrit, j'espère
Que tu as de la chance
Je ne suis pas fou - je trouve ça simplement TROP NUL que
Tu ne répondes pas à tes fans
Si tu ne voulais pas me parler en dehors de ton concert
Tu n'étais pas obligé, mais tu aurais pu signer un
Autographe pour Matthieu
C'est mon petit frère mec, il n'a que six ans
Nous t'attendions dans le froid glacial
Pendant quatre heures et tu as simplement dit Non
C'est vraiment dégueulasse mec - tu es comme sa putain
D'idole
Il veut être simplement comme toi mec, il t'aime plus que
Moi je ne t'aime
Je ne suis pas un malade cependant je n'aime pas qu'on me
Mente
Rappelle-toi quand nous nous sommes rencontrés à Denver -
Tu m'as dit que si je t'écrivais
Tu me répondrais - regarde je suis simplement comme toi en
Un sens
Je n'ai jamais connu mon père non plus
Il avait l'habitude de toujours tromper ma mère et de la
Frapper
Je me retrouve dans tes chansons
Alors quand j'ai un jour pourri, je dérive et je mets tes
Chansons
Des fois cette merde m'aide quand je déprime
J'ai même un tatouage de ton nom sur mon torse
Parfois même je me coupe pour voir combien ça saigne
C'est comme de l'adrénaline, la douleur est tellement une
Ruée soudaine pour moi
Regarde tout ce que tu dis est vrai, et je te respecte car
Tu l'as dit
Ma petite amie est jalouse parce que je parle de toi 24h/24
Et 7 jours/7
Mais elle ne te connaît pas autant que je te connais Slim
Personne ne le peut
Elle ne sait pas ce que c'était pour des gens comme nous de
Grandir
Tu dois m'appeler mec, je serai le plus grand fan que jamais
Plus tu ne perdras
Avec mes amitiés, Stan


Cher
Mr-Je-Suis-Trop-Sympa-Pour-Appeler-Ou-Ecrire-A-Mes-Fans
Ce sera le dernier colis que j'enverrai à ton cul
Ca fait six mois et toujours aucun mot - je ne le mérite pas ?
Je sais que tu as reçu mes deux dernières lettres
J'ai écrit parfaitement l'adresse dessus
Donc c'est ma cassette que je t'envoie, j'espère que tu
L'écouteras
Je suis dans la voiture actuellement, je fais du 90 sur
Hé Slim, j'ai bu un cinquième d'une bouteille de Vodka, tu
Me défies de rouler ?
Tu connais la chanson de Phil Collins, Dans l'Air de la
Nuit
A propos de ce gars qui pouvait sauver cet autre gars de la
Noyade
Mais qui ne l'a pas fait, et bien Phil a tout vu, et alors
à un spectacle il l'a trouvé ?
C'est un peu comme ça ici, tu pouvais me sauver de la
Noyade
Maintenant c'est trop tard - j'ai pris plein de
Médicaments, je somnole
Et tout ce que je voulais était une lettre pourrie ou un
Appel
J'espère que tu sais que j'ai enlevé TOUTES tes photos du
Je t'aime Slim, nous aurions pu être ensemble, pense à
Tu as tout cassé maintenant, j'espère que tu ne peux pas
Dormir et que tu rêves de ça
Et quand tu rêves j'espère que tu ne peux pas dormir et
Que tu CRIES à propos de ça
J'espère que ta conscience TE RONGE et que tu ne peux pas
RESPIRER sans moi
Regarde Slim, {*en hurlant*} ta gueule salope ! J'essaye de
Parler !
Hé Slim, c'est ma petite amie qui crie dans le coffre
Mais je ne lui ai pas fendu la gorge, je l'ai simplement
Attachée, regarde je ne suis pas comme toi
Car si elle suffoque elle souffrira encore plus, et alors
Elle mourra aussi
Bon, je dois y aller, je suis presque au pont maintenant
Oh merde, j'ai oublié, comment suis-je supposé te faire
Parvenir cette merde ?
{*dérapage de pneus*} {*CRASH*}
. . {*bref silence*}. . {*GROS plouf*}


Cher Stan, je voulais t'écrire plus tôt mais j'étais tout
Simplement débordé
Tu as dit que ta petite amie était enceinte maintenant, où
En est-elle ?
Regarde, je suis vraiment flatté que tu appelles ta fille
Comme ça
Et voilà un autographe pour ton frère
Je suis déçu de ne pas t'avoir vu au spectacle, j'ai dû
Te rater
Ne pense pas que j'ai fait cette merde uniquement dans
L'intention de te manquer de respect
Mais quelle est cette merde dont tu parlais à ton propos
Comme de te couper les veines ?
Je dis que cette merde n'est qu'un gars qui fait le clown
Allez - comment ça c'est trop nul ?
Tu as des problèmes Stan, je pense que tu as besoin de te
Pour aider ton cul, ne pas péter un plomb quand tu
Déprimes un peu
Et qu'est-ce que cette merde à propos de nous deux ?
Ce genre de merde va faire que je n'aurai pas envie de te
Rencontrer
Je pense vraiment que toi et ta petite amie avez besoin l'un
De l'autre
Ou peut-être tu as simplement besoin de mieux la traiter
J'espère que tu liras cette lettre, j'espère seulement
Qu'elle te parviendra à temps
Avant que tu ne te fasses du mal, je pense que tu iras tout
Simplement bien
Si tu te relaxes un peu, je suis heureux de t'inspirer mais
Stan
Pourquoi es-tu si fou ? Essaye de comprendre, que je te veux
En tant que fan
Je ne veux tout simplement pas que tu fasses une grosse
Connerie
J'ai vu cette merde aux informations quelques semaines plus
Tôt ça m'a rendu malade
Un gars était ivre et a conduit sa voiture par-dessus le
Pont
Et avec sa petite amie dans le coffre, et elle était
Enceinte de son enfant
Et dans la voiture ils ont trouvé une cassette, mais ils
N'ont pas dit à qui elle était destinée
Pense un peu à ça, son nom était... c'était toi
Merde !

De son côté démon
La mort a bouleversé Eminem. Il s'est d'ailleurs fait un
En paix)



Coming Soon

Premiered on Shade 45 10/14/2017



{Dieu du Rap}

Ecoute, j’voulais y aller mollo avec toi
Et ne pas te faire de la peine
Mais je ne vais avoir que cette opportunité
6 minutes)
Je ressens que quelque chose, comme si quelque chose allait
Arriver mais je ne sais pas quoi
Si c’est bien ce que je pense on va avoir des problèmes
S’il est aussi fou que vous le prétendez alors il n’y a
Plus à discuter

Je commence à me sentir comme un Dieu du Rap, Dieu du Rap
Tout mon public est d’accord
Qui pense avoir les bras assez longs pour me gifler ?
Ils disent que je rap comme un robot, appelle-moi Rapbot

Rapper est dans mes gênes
J’ai un ordi dans ma poche arrière
Mon stylo s’affole dès que je mets la main dessus
Je me fais de l’argent depuis l’époque où Bill Clinton
Avait Monica Lewinsky sous son bureau
Je suis un MC honnête mais insolent comme l’enfer
Je débite des toners de syllabes
Tu ne veux pas t’embrouiller avec moi
Je débite et garde un flingue dans le coffre
Personne ne peut jouer avec les mots comme je le fais
Je suis toujours capable de briser une putain de table sur
Le dos de quelques idiots
J’ai toujours trouvé ça ironique d »avoir été signé
Chez Aftermath car qu’arrivera t’il après Math-ers ?
Comment ne pas exploser ? Tout ce que je fais c’est jeter
Des bombes
Je fais régulièrement passer un mauvais moment à ces
Rappeurs, tiens prends un tampax
Je suis en train de peindre un chef-d’œuvre

Je commence à me sentir comme un Dieu du Rap
Tout mon public est d’accord
Qui pense avoir les bras assez longs pour me gifler ?
Laisse-moi te montrer que ce n’est pas dur de rester au
Niveau

Tout le monde veut la clé de l’immoralité dans le Rap
Comme si je l’avais
Pour être honnête mon couplet sur ‘The Blueprint’
N’est que rage et immaturité
Je frappe la terre comme un astéroïde et je ne fais que
Viser la lune depuis
Les Mc vont se sentir à l’école avec cette musique
Car elle est remplie de rimes
Maintenant je dirige une nouvelle école
Je suis un mélange entre Rakim, Lakim Shabazz, 2Pac et NWA
J’ai été assez inspiré pour pouvoir exploser et avoir
La chance de rencontrer Run DMC
Et les accueillir dans ce putain de panthéon
Moi j’ai seulement été invité dans panthéon des
Alcooliques célèbres, placardé aujourd’hui sur le mur
De la honte car je suis sobre
Vous pensez que ce n’est qu’un jeu jusqu’à ce que je
Vous dégage des planches
Dis-moi à quoi tu pensais ?
Petit PD tellement gay que je peux à peine le dire
Sérieusement
Tu es témoin d’un massacre, prends place comme si tu
Assistais à une messe
‘Hé c’est le petit gay’, c’est tout ce qu’ils
Disent petit
T’aura droit à un pouce levé et une tape sur
L’épaule
Hé petit, qu’est-ce que tu dis ?
J’ai eu droit à un ‘Hell Yeah’ de la part de Dre
Je vais continuer de bosser sans rien demander à personne
Tu ne seras jamais capable de te tenir à al même place que
Moi petit

Je commence à me sentir comme un Dieu du Rap
Tout mon public est d’accord
A ma manière de tracer sur la piste tu peux m’appeler
Nascar
Je suis le Dale Earnhardt de l’air de jeu
Agenouille-toi devant le General Zod, planète Krypton, pas
De Asgard

Donc tu seras Thor, je serai Odin
T’es un petit rongeur, je suis le tout puissant
Je perds pas de temps pour recharger
Ne réveillez pas la bête, je suis un Zombie décapité qui
Continue de marcher
Et j’ai ta mère sous le bureau, ma tête va exploser
On n’a rien en commun petit caniche, je suis un doberman
Réveille-toi et sois attentif
Je suis honnêtement sévère
Mais tout ça reste futile si je n’utilise pas mon
Potentiel une fois de temps en temps
Donc je veux être sûr de noter assez de rimes pour
Peut-être aider certains quand c’est dur
Mais je dois garder quelques punchlines car tous les
Rappeurs ont faims comme si c’était l’heure du
Déjeuner
Je me rappelle quand j’étais le roi de l’underground
Mais je continue de rapper comme à l’époque Pharoahe
Monch
Mais parfois quand tu combine le succès à la couleur de
Peau tu deviens trop grand
Et c’est là qu’ils arrivent pour te censurer comme
Cette rime sur « I’m Back » de Marshall Mathers LP
Elle disait « j’ai pris 7 gosses de Columbine pour les
Mettre en ligne et leur donner un AK, un revolver et un 9mm
Si je ne me fais plus censurer ce n’est pas parce que je
N’est plus autant de succès
Mais parce que je suis devenu immortel
J’arrive à travers un portail mais toi tu restes coincé
En 2004
T’se aussi inutile que Raiponce avec de tresses
T’es normal mais j’emmerde la normalité, je viens
D’acheter un Raygun du futur pour te tirer dessus
Comme lorsque Fabolous a rendu Ray J fou en lui disant
Qu’il ressemblait à un gay
Ça passait aux infos donc Ray J est allé droit à la
Station radio le jour d’après, « Hey Fab je vais te tuer
Je vais lancer quelques rimes en vitesse supersonique
Tu penses que je suis humain mais je suis un super humain
Je suis fait de caoutchouc donc tout ce que tu diras
Ricochera sur moi
Je fais une démonstration pour vous donner une impression
De lévitation
Ces rageux continuent d’attendre ma chute pour célébrer
Je sais comment les exciter, je fais de la musique pour vous
élever et toi tu fais de la musique d’ascenseur
« Il est trop mainstream » ces jaloux sont confus
« C’est pas du Hip Hop, c’est de la Pop » juste parce
Que j’ai trouvé un moyen de mélanger tout ça
« Je ne sais pas comment faire de tels chansons ou quels
Mots utiliser »
Faites-moi savoir quand vous y arriverez pendant que
J’aurai déjà fait mieux
Combiens de versets je vais devoir sacrifier pour prouver
Que si tu es la moitié de moi tu peux sacrifier des vierges
Aussi
Un raté à l’école, un drogué, mais regarde où m’ont
Mené mes compétences
J’ai déjà la totale mais je reste affamé
Je me martyrise tout seul pour me pousser à faire ce que
J’ai à l’esprit
Je suis à un million de kilomètres au-dessus de toi
Malade quand je parle en étant possédé mais ça reste
Ironique
Je suis bourré alors Satan a pris le volant
Je dors en écoutant « Heavy D and the Boy »
Mais il y a quelque chose qui me prends la tête
Les anges et les démons se battent, ils me demandent
D’éliminer cette haine envers les femmes
Mais si tu prendrais en considération la haine que
J’avais alors tu seras un peu plus compréhensif
Et tu comprendrais cette discrimination mais on s’en fout
Saisis les bonnes opportunités
Mais si je ne peux pas battre les femmes comment suis-je
Censé leur faire un gâteau ?
N’imaginez pas que c’est Satan
Tu fais une grosse erreur si tu penses que j’ai besoin de
Traverser des océans pour insulter une femme
Mais réfléchis un peu sur ce que je dis
Moi un roi ? Je crois pas
Pourquoi être un roi quand on peut être Dieu ?










YO! I'm Back, to bust another fresh track
You say, that I have the ability to fly
Fly right pass ya ass, when I blast
Ya everytime I grab the mic, I crash a-
Nother rhyme it's a crash landin'
Everytime I grab the mic, I'm kinda outstandin'
Cuz no-one can step to, a single a rhyme
And I say " Yo, what kept you?
Holmes, you going too slow
You're too slow for the flow " and I know
That Eminem is returning
To bust the rhyme and suckers are learning
That when I kinda go offbeat a little bit
I step back to the rhyme and say
That I bust a rhyme all day
Make a sucka say "Hey!
I cannot step to you Eminem
Cuz you are so bad, Damn
You're the baddest motherfucker in the whole damn land"
And you're right, cuz I am
And I don't go offbeat, not once
Cuz I grab the mic and bust for months
And I don't give nobody another turn
Cuz everytime I grab the mic, I don't let a brother burn
Because he can't step to a single rhyme that I do
Cuz you knew you're through


Yeah, yeah, oh yeah
Now I grab the microphone, you know I am imperial
Is a production that rocking your stereo
Don't front with me, cuz I am the boy
I get on the microphone and I destroy
Now you can take a body, that's not from Oakland
Hammer, Hammer, Hammer keeps on choking, yeah
I can do it right and nobody will know
For I am the Hammer and I'm running the show
They come from West Indies south of California
I wake you motherfuckers up, early in the morning, yo front!


Yo Hammer, that was pretty good man
I don't think I can step to you man, I don't know
I'll just try but it seems like you outdo me, no matter what I do
Here I go anyway


Here I am, back to attack the whole damn land
You know that Vanilla Ice is hype
I grab this mic and I rhyme all night
MC Hammer cannot step to me
Because I got the rhymes and I'm truly
So damn hype and the place to be
I'm rhyming on the mic on the M-I-C
M-I-C is the abbreviation
I grab the mic and rock the whole nation
You know that Vanilla Ice, is so precise and I get so nice
Get so nice, I start developing manners
And I whoop you brain like scanners
Because Vanilla Ice is bad
Now what you got to say about that dad?


You can't step to me boy
I sell more records!
Yo. I know here I go.  Yo Manny gimme something yeah!


Now everytime I go, you know I like to start
My name is MC Hammer
I rule hip hop charts
Seven million seven million seven million sold
And Dumbshit barely even touch gold!
Now everywhere I go, they know that I'm a star
I'm the  H -A-M,  the M -E -R
Cuz every time I rock it they know I rock the mic
I am MC Hammer
And you know what I am like, ROAR!




Fallin' on the concrete real fast
Jumped in the car, slammed on the gas
Bumper to bumper the avenue's packed
I try to get away because the jacker attacked
So I step to the rhyme and I just say I'm
Gonna bust a rhyme for the whole damn mind
Then you say that I cannot bust a rhyme
But you gonna get got MC Hammer
Because you know you get on the mic
And drop poor grammar
And you can't slam a jam because I know that I am the man
And all the teenagers they like ME
You know why? It's a scheme agents
Have developed to sell me
Because I bust a rhyme so cleverly
And you know that I got knowledge
Cuz I'm in show biz
And I bust a rhyme all the time
So MC Hammer you cannot step to
A single rhyme that I do cuz I knew
That you are through, you are washed up
Oh, so step to the back room
And I told you that I have to scold you
Because I am Vanilla Ice
I grab this mic and I get so precise
And you cannot step
So why don't you get swept?


Now you makin' me mad boy
Now I'm gonna get your ass
Now you gonna know who's on this motherfuckin' mic! Yo!


It's about time that I turned out your lights
Now I see the Vanilla Ice tryin' a chill in my freezer
You just don't know that your mama is a geezer
She say Hammer, yo Hammer, yo Hammer Hammer Hammer
But she jump on me because I'm a bad mamma jamma
I did your bitch, Hammer don't play
I got the funky shit and it goes this way
I wish your whole ass try to step, you can't touch this
You fuck with the Hammer you'll be walking on crutches
Yeah that's what I'm sayin', I ain't playin'
I'm Hammer, I'm Hammer, yes it's the Hammer Man
My lips may be big but I can rap better
Than looking at your ass, you look like a piece of cheddar!
Yo though you steppin' to me, you know it's no dream
I dig Vanilla Ice and turn his ass into whipped cream
So you know who's the best by far
It's the muthafuckin' HammeR with a capital R, roar!




When I'm through with you
You'll be goin' to heaven
Cuz I smash the glasses and fuck 3-5-7
24/7 they was bangin' my cock
I said "yo fuck Hammer
Get a piece of the rock, yeah"
I said yeah. My name is Vanilla Ice, you can't
Step to me, you thought that you was a champ
But I stepped on your ass like a piece of carpet
And rented you for sale like an upstairs apartment
Yo, that's my clever metaphor
And every time I grab the mic you know
Kids like me cuz I'm better for
Their ears, because their mothers and parents
Like to hear the way I rhyme and I make an appearance
And say hey, I got a blond streak
And that's why people like me cuz I'm hard as concrete
I'm always on beat when I do this show
You know that Vanilla Ice has to go cuz I'm so damn fresh!


Now you steppin' to me punk
There is no maybes
You steppin' to me wrong and I'm gonna ICE ya baby!
So you say what's the matter, why Hammer loves to rap
Cuz all that shit you talkin' to Hammer is bullcrap
Now I know a rhyme every day I'm ready
I'm down with Dougie Fresh, Van-L is not ready
Now everywhere I go, on MTV Rap
They know I'm the best cuz now I don't take no crap
Now Vanilla Vanilla he's beaming out Hammer
They say yo Hammer don't put me on the slammer
I said yo sucka, stupid muthafucka
You messin with me but I'm no sucka
I already pumped it up, and already got it started
So steppin to me white muthafucka you'll feel broken-hearted
So I'm gonna pass the mic and you know about me
Hammer get off the fuckin' mic!!! I'm outie!


You blew me out, man, you beat me



{moqueur}

Ouais
Je sais que parfois les choses peuvent sembler ne pas avoir
De sens pour toi en ce moment
Mais hé, qu'est-ce que papa te dit toujours
Tiens-toi droit petit soldat
Ne laisse pas trembler ta lèvre supérieure
Pourquoi pleures-tu?
Tu m'as moi

Hailie je sais que ta maman te manque et je sais que ton
Père aussi
Quand je pars, mais j'essaye de te donner la vie que je n'ai
Jamais eu
Je peux voir que tu es triste, même quand tu souris, même
Quand tu ris
Je peux voir ça dans tes yeux, au plus profond de toi tu a
Envie de pleurer
Car tu as peur, n'est-ce pas?
Papa est avec toi dans tes prières
Plus de pleurs, essuie ces larmes
Papa est là, plus de cauchemars
Nous allons surmonter tout cela ensemble, nous allons
Réussir
Laney, ton oncle est fou, n'est-ce pas?
Ouais mais il t'aime et il faut que tu le saches
Nous sommes tout ce que nous avons dans ce monde
Quand ça tourne, quand ça tourbillonne
Quand ça tournoie, quand ça vrille
Deux magnifiques petites filles
Ayant l'air confuses, hébétées
Je sais que ça t'embrouilles
Papa est toujours en mouvement, maman est toujours aux
Infos
J'essaye de te protéger de ça, mais en fait il semble
Que plus j'essaye de le faire, plus ça se retourne contre
Toutes les choses qui prennent de l'ampleur que ton père a
Dû voir
Papa ne voulait pas que tu les vois, mais tu les vois autant
Qu'il les a vus
Nous n'avions pas prévu cela, ta mère et moi
Mais les choses se sont si mal passées entre nous
Que j'imagine mal qu'un jour nous nous réunissions à
Nouveau
Comme nous l'étions durant notre adolescence
Mais aussi bien sûr, tout se passeit toujours pour une
Raison
Je crois que ça n'aurait jamais dû avoir lieu
Mais c'est juste une une chose qu'on ne peut contrôler et
C'est comment est le destin
Mais plus d'inquiétudes, repose ta tête et va dormir
Peut-être qu'un jour nous nous réveillerons et tout cela
Aura été juste un rêve

Maintenant calme-toi petite fille, ne pleure pas
Tout ira pour le mieux
Ne laisse pas ta lèvre supérieure trembler petite dame, je
T'ai dit
Papa est là pour te porter à travers la nuit
Je sais que maman n'est pas là en ce moment et nous ne
Savons pas pourquoi
Nous ressentons comment nous nous sentons à l'intérieur
Ca doit sembler un peu fou, joli bébé
Mais je te promets que maman se remettra

C'est drôle
Je me souviens il y a un an, papa n'avait pas d'argent
Maman avait emballé les cadeaux de Noël
Et les avait mis sous le sapin et dit que quelques uns
étaient de ma part
Car papa ne pouvait pas les acheter
Je n'oublierai jamais ce Noël, j'étais assis toute la nuit
à pleurer
Car papa s'est senti tel un clochard, vois-tu papa avait un
Travail
Mais son travail consistait à garder la nourriture sur la
Table pour toi et maman
Et à l'époque toutes les maisons dans lesquelles nous
Habitions
Etaient soit cambriolées
Soit endommagées par les balles du ghetto et ta maman
économisait de l'argent pour toi dans un vase
Elle essayait de faire une tirelire pour toi pour que tu
Puisses aller à l'université
Elle a économisé presque mille dollars Jusqu'à ce que
Quelqu'un nous cambriole et les vole
Et je sais que ça blesse si profondément que ça a brisé
Le coeur de ta maman
Et il semble que tout a commencé à s'écrouler à partir
De là
Maman et papa se disputaient beaucoup, alors maman est
Partie
Dans le Chalmers dans un appartement à une pièce
Et papa s'est installé de l'autre côté de 8 Mile sur
Novara
Et c'est quand papa est allé en Californie avec son CD et a
Rencontré Dr. Dre
Et vous fis venir, maman et toi, pour me voir
Mais papa devait travailler, toi et maman avez dû me
Laisser
Puis vous avez commencé à voir papa à la télé et maman
N'a pas aimé
Et toi et Laney étiez trop jeunes pour comprendre
Papa était une pierre qui roule, maman a pris cette
Habitude
Et tout cela est arrivé trop vite pour que l'un d'entre
Nous puisse se ressaisir
Je regrette seulement que tu es été là aux premières
Loges pour y assister
Parce que tout ce que je voulais faire, c'était juste te
Rendre fière
Maintenant, je suis assis dans cette maison vide, me
Remémorant des souvenirs
En regardant des photos de toi bébé, ça m'a Votre
Ressemblance m'a ébahie, c'est presque comme si vous étiez
Soeurs désormais
Wow, imaginez à quel point vous êtes belles et papa est
Toujours là
Laney je parle à toi aussi, papa est toujours là
J'aime ce son, ouais
Ca sonne, n'est-ce-pas?
Chut, maman est seulement parti pour le moment

Maintenant calme-toi petite fille, ne pleure pas
Tout ira pour le mieux
Ne laisse pas ta lèvre supérieure trembler petite dame, je
T'ai dit
Papa est là pour te porter à travers la nuit
Je sais que maman n'est pas là en ce moment et nous ne
Savons pas pourquoi
Nous ressentons comment nous nous sentons à l'intérieur
Ca doit sembler un peu fou, joli bébé
Mais je te promets que maman se remettra

Et si tu le me demandes
Papa t'achètera un moqueur
Je te donnerai le monde
J'achèterai une bague en diamant rien que pour toi
Je chanterai pour toi
Je ferais n'importe quoi pour te voir sourire
Et si le moqueur ne chante pas et que la bague ne brille
Je briserai la nuque de cet oiseau
Je retournerai chez le bijoutier qui te l'avait vendu
Et lui ferai manger chaque carat jusqu'au dernier




Hey yo, What up, trailer trash!

Yo Future, how'd you get whitey to battle the Savior
That's like Darth Vader battling Obey Taylor
You can't mess around with the horror
I grab the mic and Ima murder you, now you'll die tomorrow!
You can't kick with the lyrics I spit
I blow your head off and leave you dying in your blood, you bitch!
You still a trick and a hoe and Ima roll
I fucked your mama; she's a prostitute bro!
You thinking you white, but you ain't light
Ima murder you in the gang again, and blast you in de night!
Im still ill, I'm still for real with Ken Loraine;
I got a gun on your boy, Ima blow out his brain!
You run with a bunch of whack faggots
Ima eat out your meat like I'm in your body; I'm a maggot!
And yo matter of fact, you gettin' played
You ain't nothing but a white-boy dying of fucking aids!



A lotta people ask me stupid fucking questions
A lotta people think that what I say on record
Or what I talk about on a record
That I actually do in real life or that I believe in it
Or if I say that I wanna kill somebody, that
I'm actually gonna do it or that I believe in it
Well shit, if you believe that, then I'll kill you
You know why? Cause I'm a criminal

I'm a criminal! Cause every time I write a rhyme
These people think it's a crime to tell 'em what's on my mind
I guess I'm a criminal! But I don't got to say a word
I just flip 'em the bird and keep going, I don't take shit from no one

My words are like a dagger with a jagged edge
That'll stab you in the head, whether you're a fag or lez
Or the homosex, hermaph or a trans-a-vest
Pants or dress, hate fags? the answer's "yes"
Homophobic? Nah, you're just heterophobic
Staring at my jeans, watching my genitals bulging
That's my motherfuckin' balls, you'd better let go of 'em
They belong in my scrotum, you'll never get hold of 'em!
"Hey, it's me, Versace! Whoops, somebody shot me!
And I was just checking the mail, get it? Checking the 'male'?"
How many records you expecting to sell
After your second LP sends you directly to jail?
Come on, relax guy, I like gay men
"Please Lord, this boy needs Jesus
Heal this child, help us destroy these demons
Oh, and please send me a brand new car
And a prostitute while my wife's sick in the hospital"
Preacher preacher! Fifth grade teacher!
You can't reach me, my mom can't neither
You can't teach me a goddamn thing cause
I watch TV and Comcast cable
And you ain't able to stop these thoughts
You can't stop me from topping these charts
And you can't stop me from dropping each March
With a brand new CD for these fuckin' retards
And to think, it's just little old me
Mr. Don't Give a Fuck still won't leave


Mother did drugs, hard liquor, cigarettes, and speed
The baby came out, disfigured ligaments indeed
It was a seed who would grow up just as crazy as-



{Pas peur}

Je n’ai pas peur de prendre position
Vous tous, venez prendre ma main
Nous parcourrons cette route ensemble, à travers la
Tempête
Peu importe le temps, froid ou chaud
Juste vous faire savoir que vous n’êtes pas seuls
Criez si vous sentez que vous avez été sur la même route

Ouais, ça été un parcours
Je suppose que je devais passer par là pour arriver là où
Je suis
Maintenant certains d'entre vous pourraient toujours être
En cet endroit
Si vous essayez de sortir, suivez moi
Je vous en sortirai


Vous pouvez essayer de lire mes paroles sur ce papier avant
Que je ne les y dépose
Mais vous ne comprendrez pas la force de ces mots avant que
Je ne les exprime
Car en aucune façon je ne vous laisserai m'empêcher de
Mettre la pagaille
Quand je dis que je pourrais faire quelque chose je le fais
J'en ai rien à faire
De ce que tu penses, je le fais pour moi, alors "fuck the
World."
Il est gonflé à bloc, si il croit que ça va m'arrêter
Je serais ce que j'ai voulu être sans le moindre doute
Indubitablement
Et tous ceux qui me regardent de haut, je vais vous faire
Tomber de votre balcon

Pas de mais ou de ou qui tiennent, n'essaye pas de lui
Depuis Infinite jusqu'au dernier album Relapse il fait de la
Merde
Qu'il soit salarié, payé à l’heure
Jusqu'à ce qu'il explose ou qu'il vomisse ses intestins
Peu importe ce qui arrivera en premier, pour le meilleur et
Pour le pire
Il s’est marié avec le Jeu, comme un "fuck you" pour
Noël
Son cadeau est une malédiction, oublier la terre il a le
Désir
De se sortir de la merde et baiser l'univers tout entier


Ok, arrête de jouer avec les ciseaux, baisse le ton et
Arrête tes conneries
Je ne devrais pas avoir à faire rimer ces mots en rythme
Pour que tu comprennes que c’est du rap
Tu te dis Roi ? Tu te mens à toi-même
Pour cette raison, je crache sur tes sentiments, au lieu
Et pour les fans, je ne vous laisserai plus jamais tomber
Je suis de retour
Je promets de ne jamais revenir sur ma promesse, et
D'ailleurs
Soyons honnête, Relapse n'était pas à la hauteur
Peut-être que je roulais trop les accents jusqu'à
Saturation
Relax, je ne referai plus jamais ça
Tout ce que j'essaie de dire c'est qu'on ne joue plus
Il y a un jeu que l'on appelle cercle et je ne peux y
Désormais je suis bien trop haut pour pouvoir redescendre
Mais j'ai l'impression que je dois encore me libérer
Ces nuages noirs me suivent toujours partout
Il est temps d'exorciser ces démons


Et je ne peux continuer à vivre de cette façon
Ainsi à partir d'aujourd'hui je vais sortir de cette cage
Je m'élève donc face à mes démons
Je m'accroche tellement, je repousse mes limites
J'en ai eu assez, maintenant j'en ai tellement marre
Il est temps de mettre ma vie en ordre dorénavant

C’était ma décision d’être sobre, je l’ai fait pour
J'admets que je l'ai probablement fait inconsciemment pour
Ainsi j'ai pu revenir en un homme nouveau, vous m'avez aidé
à y voir clair
Et croyez-moi vous ne réalisez pas tout ce que votre
Confiance m'a apportée...
J'ai la larme à l'œil, je me sens comme le roi de mon
Monde
Et dans mon monde mes détracteurs sont tels des abeilles
Sans dard, tombant raide mort par la suite
Finies les rivalités, à partir de maintenant plus de
Drames
Je promets de me livrer corps et âme à ma responsabilité
De père
Donc je jure solennellement de toujours agir en tant que tel
Sens = toit, maître)
Grâce à la façon dont je me sens
Je suis assez fort pour aller en boîte ou au bar du coin
Et résister à tout l'alcool
Car je place la barre si haute, je pourrai finir par viser
Mais je suis trop occupé à contempler les étoiles, je me
Sens intouchable et...



Qui signifie malédiction mais en vue de la rime qui suit
Je n'ai pas pu reproduit l'effet en français
Threw your teeth ". Pas d'équivalent en français chez
Nous
Américaine
Traitent comme des individus à part entière. Il y a un jeu
De mot en V.O
Marié, on peut pas vraiment l'adoucir - quand il dit qu'on
Sens "problèmes/tuile de toit" pour la métaphore
Raising the bar". Pas vraiment d'équivalent en français
J'ai donc pas vraiment pu traduire
Explique qu'a force d'aller de l'avant et de toujours aller
Plus haut, il se sent en position de faire l'impossible
étoiles), il montre ici de la suffisance, une certaine
Lassitude par rapport au chemin accompli



Sometimes its hard, to wake up in the morning
Mind full of demons, I don't wanna hear 'em anymore
Got me heartbroken, fine, So many babies screamin
Cuz they seeing destruction before they see a human being
So they start smokin weed, we'll never get our day
Until we learn to pray, keep our families safe
Cuz they all broken, why? Two ghetto birds die
Before we learn to fly
Somebody else can say I'm pokin guns, smokin weed
Can all make the change so I'm told but I haven't seen a change unfold
I keep hopin, please! If you prefer to breath
Communities in need, of people that we lead
Keep your eyes open now, then only say I try
Until the day I die, I promised to be wise
With my heart open, greed, brings only misery
A weight of tragedy, so I stay sucker free
Only a few chosen rise, my ghetto queens rise
Don't be afraid to try, too many of us die
For the thought of hopen wise, my brothers speak wise
They focus on the prize, till everybody dies

We could only learn to take, our anger and our hate
Control our mental state, settle down and just set it straight
Maybe we could learn to take, a second to pump the brakes
But we said it, regret it later, and let it escalade
Cuz by then its just too late, theres so much we can take
Theres only so much someone can swallow and tolerate
Till the point that he just breaks, snaps and that's all it takes
You think that we was learnin from other rappers mistakes
But we ain't, his brain will go against
With every artist comes an image he portrays
And a picture that he paints
But in the midst of all this anger and this gangs
Never once did you hear me say I'm a gangsta
And I ain't hear no complaints
But I know, that I will always continue to grow
As long as I lead, and never follow noone else's shadow
There will never be another me, and that I will guarantee
Its that why I remain sucker free, to this day
The game, will never be the same
No matter how much fame or success they attain
There will never be another me
And no matter what they do, there will never be another you
You can search but you'll never find
You can try to rewind time, but in your hearts and your minds
We will never die, we are forever alive
When we continue going, one day at a time

Don't get caught in the publicity, and caught in the hype
Rappers are, regular people minus money and lights
Searchin for, fortune and fame and super stardom
All the jewelry, all the cars, who screws the hardest
Now the Hip Hop Police's surveillance is watchin
And the kids think beef is their only option
Outlawz, poor and filthy, guilty as charged
My memories they can die, my -Makaveli- lives on
You think the industry is fun, and no pity with guns
And when your money is up, that's when your enemies come
So if he died and came back, would he try to save rap
We needin a change, the drama remains

That, I can't win, so I'm invitin some help
And every now and then, I take rights on the left
I'm still just like a kid, lookin for stripes on my belt
That day is a fight in itself
So I just pray and hope God take a light to myself
No matter how much I try to stay alive, I'mma die, mad
Still standin and in love with my pride

My hard frivilous beef, we passed that
I'm tryna keep some in c-comin and then collect on my ass cap
But rappers in the game ain't changed
And I finally realized that we not in the same game
The hatin will never end, so I guess I'll deal with it
Them 4-5 a cop, chillers just I'm still with it
Them streets is military, you gotta be a soldier
Gotta stay lirry and keep your eyes on the Rollers
They do what they gotta do to shackle and hold us
So we gotta do it, we gotta do to keep growin
One way at a time, keep the faith in your mind



Come here spittin' with non written
Non fiction
Rappers try to step to this with no prediction
It doesn't matter cause I'm smashing and bashing and crashing
I hate rappers with a passion when I'm chilling with DJ Fashion
Yo, I need a frickin' Kleenex or I die like River Phoenix
When I'm chilling with Phoenix
With two Coronas I'm on the microphone and I'mma own this
Yo and I'mma bone this
In Arizona
Yo, rappers that ain't able
That can't stay stable
I'm on two turntables
With my man
But he doesn't matter cause he kicks lyrics galore
And he's only 5'4"
Yo check it out, I bust rhymes and get groovy
My man got carded at a rated R movie
But it really didn't matter he wasn't insulted
He said "I'm 27 years old. Yo, I'm an adult kid."
But yo, still
Slim Shady gets ill with the skill
And I'mma always gonna build and kill
My baby's mama just to piss the world off
Just to piss the girl's off
Yo, I hurl off
The top of the building
Kill women and children
And then it hit me
Suddenly my wrist's tried to slit me
Couldn't believe it
Yo, y'all couldn't conceive it
It's Slim Shady
I'll fuck a girl in her cleavage
Bleep that out and you can keep it
Just bleep it
Yo, y'all keep it a secret
I'm top secret
Like Pop Secret
Rappers, they don't wanna see
Slim Shady, I'm from the motherfuckin' D



Check my vocals, cause you know what I'm about
It's best to play like O.J. Simpson and I just stab out
Why did you enter? You didn't comprehend
See this is a battle for MCs who think they might win
But fuck the battle, let's take it to the streets
Cause you a pussy, oh well, if you are what you eat
Now you can go get your crew ? you now
? me wrong ? and all this shit gon be blew out
Claiming you jumped ?
Nigga you come in this bitch, you talk more shit than Reggie Miller
Never spent nothing more, nothing less
The first single that you drop is "I wanna be fresh"

Any rapper sayin' those kind of rhymes
In this day and age, in this period of time
Trying to battle Eminem is worse than David Starr
Trying to battle Proof, Eye-Kyu, B-Flat, Bizarre
? that's why you beg to differ me
You ain't got no style plus you lack delivery
Not to brag, I don't mean to boast
Look, my face is pale, but you look like you seen a ghost
You're that bitch, you couldn't slip up in the zone
If I put banana peels around this fucking microphone
So get a bull dozer, start from bottom to top
And take this building down cause that's the only way you're wrecking shop



Eminem
Slim Shady

Distorted, ordered by the court to be aborted
Snorted, right before these vocals were recorded
Morbid, too perverted
Stay alerted
Went to the club, murdered the first slut that flirted
Deserted, abandoned by my mama and it hurted
The worst nut my daddy ever squirted
Screamin, cussin, buzzin when I'm bustin, open sores pussin
I need another dose of Robitussin
Fussin over nothing
An army couldn't calm me
Bitching like a lady
Shady like a palm tree
What the fuck you call me, who you calling soft?
I'm still fresher than you and bitch I'm fallin off
I'm horny, and corny girls won't even cross my path
I'm so dirty, I don't even wash my ass
Never took a shower, cower from a scower
Prowler, clean your house out in half an hour
What's your flavor, how you want it, ripe or sour?
Rifle power
Snipe you from the Eiffel Tower
Too much weed, I'm bout to malfunction
Style's drunken, carjacking Al Duncan
Slim Shady, peace



Uh, uh, uh, uh, alright, alright
Uh, Slim Shady, yo, yo, yo

It's only fair to warn I was born with a set of horns
And metaphors attached to my damn umbilical cord
Warlord of rap that'll bash you with a 2 by 4 board
And smash into your Honda Accord with a 4-door Ford
But I'm more toward droppin' an acapella
To chop a fella to mozzarella worse than a helicopter propeller
Got you locked in a cellar, with your skeleton showing
Developin' anorexia, while I'm standin' next to ya
Eating a full course meal watching you starve to death
With an IV in your vein feeding you liquid Darvocet
Pumping you full of drugs, pull the plugs on the gunshot victims full of bullet slugs
Who were picked up in an ambulance and driven
To receiving with the asses ripped out of they pants
And given a less than 20-percent chance of livin'
Have a possible placement as a hospital patient
Storing the dead bodies in grandma's little basement
Doctor Kevorkian has arrived to perform an autopsy on you while you scream "I'm still alive!"
Driving a rusty scalpel in through the top of your scalp
And pulling your Adam's apple out through your mouth
Better call the fire department
I've hired a arson to set fire to carpet
And burn up your entire apartment
I'm a liar to start shit
Got your bitch wrapped around my dick so tight you need a crowbar to pry her apart with

Motherfucker! Slim Shady, bitch!
Recognize, for the '99! Album February 23rd!




You know I just don't get it
Last year I was nobody, this year I'm selling records
Now everybody wants to come around like I owe em something
The fuck you want from me, ten million dollars? Get the fuck outta here

You see I'm just Marshall Mathers
I'm just a regular guy, I don't know why all the fuss about me
Nobody ever gave a fuck before, all they did was doubt me
Now everybody wanna run their mouth and try to take shots at me

You might see me jogging, you might see me walking
You might see me walking a dead rottweiler dog
With its head chopped off in the park with a spiked collar
Hollering at him cause the son of a bitch won't quit barking
Or leaning out a window with a cocked shotgun
Driving up the block in the car that they shot Pac in
Looking for Big's killers, dressing ridiculous
Blue-and-red, like I don't see what the big deal is
Double barrel 12-gauge bigger than Chris Wallace
Pissed off cause Biggie and Pac just missed all this
Watching all these cheap imitations get rich off 'em
And get dollars that should've been theirs like they switched wallets
And amidst all this Crist' popping and wrist watches
I just sit back and just watch and just get nauseous
And walk around with an empty bottle of Remy Martin
An anti-Backstreet and Ricky Martin
With instinct's to kill N'Sync, don't get me started
These fucking brats can't sing and Britney's garbage
What is this bitch, retarded? Give me back my sixteen dollars
All I see is sissies in magazines smiling
Whatever happened to wiling out and being violent?
Whatever happened to catching a good old-fashioned
Passionate ass-whooping and getting your shoes coat and your hat tooken

New Kids on the Block sucked a lot of dick, boy/girl groups make me sick
And I can't wait 'til I catch all you faggots in public, I'mma love it

Vanilla Ice don't like me, said some shit in Vibe to spite me
Then went and dyed his hair just like me
A bunch of little kids wanna swear just...



Se, om du hade en chans, en möjlighet
Att ta vara på allt du någonsin velat, ett ögonblick
Skulle du fånga det, eller bara låta det gå förbi?

Hans händer är svettiga, knän svaga, armar tunga
Det är spyor på hans tröja redan, mammas spaghetti
Han är nervös, men på ytan ser han lugn ut och redo att
Släppa bomber
Men han fortsätter glömma vad han skrev
Folkmassan är så högljudd
Han öppnar sin mun, men orden vill inte komma ut
Han tappar andan nu, alla skrattar nu
Klockan har räknat ner, tiden har gått ut, bloah!
Kom tillbaka till verkligheten, åh där försvinner gravitationen
Oh, där går Rabbit*, han sätter tungan i halsen
Han är så arg, men han ger inte upp så
Lätt, nej
Han kommer inte lämna, han vet att hela hans liv hänger på det
Det spelar ingen roll, han är cool
Han vet det, men han är trasig
Han är så fast att han vet
Nr han går tillbaka till sin trailer, det är när
Det är tillbaka till labbet igen, yo
Hela hans liv är en rapsodi
Bäst att han fångar det här ögonblicket och hoppas att det inte passerar honom

Bäst att du förlorar dig själv i musiken, ögonblicket
Du äger det, bäst du aldrig släpper det
Du får bara ett försök, missa inte din chans
Den här möjligheten kommer en gång i ett liv, yo

Själen flyr, genom det här hålet som gapar
Den här världen är min att ta
Krön mig till kung, som vi rör oss mot, en ny världsordning
Ett normalt liv är tråkigt, men stjärnlivet nära döden
Det blir bara svårare, växer varmare
Han blåser oss alla på hororna som är helt för honom
Kust till kust visar, han är känd som globetrotter
Ensamma väger, Gud bara vet
Han växer långt från trädet, han är ingen far
Han kommer hem och känner knappt igen sin egen dotter
Men håll för näsan för det kommer kallvatten
Hans horor vill inte ha honom mer, han är gamla nyheter
De går vidare till nästan snubbe med flyt
Han gjorde magplask och sålde inget
Så såpoperan är sagd och väcklas ut
Jag antar att det är sen gammal, men pulsen fortsätter
Da da dum da dum da da


Inga fler spel, jag ska ändra vad du kallar raseri
Riva ner det här jävla haket som två hundar i bur
Jag lekte i början, humöret har ändrats
Jag har tuggats och spottats ut och buats av scenen
Men jag har fortsatts rhymea och skriva nästa gåta
Måste tro att någon betalar råttfångaren**
All smärta inuti förstärks av faktumet
Att jag inte kan leva på nio till fem
Och jag inte tillhandahålla rätt typ av liv för min familj
För herregud, de här matkupongerna betalar inte blöjor
Och det är ingen film, det finns ingen Mekhi Phifer, det är mitt liv
Och dessa tider är så hårda och det blir bara svårare
Försöker göra och vattna mitt frö, plus
En teeter totter fast mellan att vara en pappa och en prima donna
Bebisens mamma, drama, skriker vidare och
För mycket för att jag ska vilja
Stanna på en plats, en till dag av enformighet
Has tagit mig till punkten, jag är som en snigel
Jag måste formulera en handling eller så hamnar jar i fängelse eller skjuts
Mamma, jag älskar dig, men den här trailern måste ut
Jag kan inte växa i Salems Lot***
Så här går jag, det är min chans
Fötter tappa mig ej för kanske den enda chansen jag har


Du kan göra vad än du bestämmer dig för



"SLIM!"
HI MY NAME IS...
...Bitch you make me hurl

They call me superman, leap tall hoes in a single bound
I'm single now, got no ring on this finger now
I'd never let another chick bring me down, in a relationship
Save it bitch, babysit, you make me sick
Superman ain't savin' shit, girl you can jump on Shady's dick
Straight from the hip, cut to the chase, I tell a muthafuckin' slut, to her face
Play no games, say no names, ever since I broke up with what's her face
I'm a different man, kiss my ass, kiss my lips, bitch why ask
Kiss my dick, get my cash, I'd rather have you whip my ass
Don't put out, I'll put you out, won't get out, I'll push you out
Puss blew out, poppin' shit, wouldn't piss on fire to put you out
Am I too nice, buy you ice, bitch if you died, I wouldn't buy you life
What you tryin' to be my new wife, what you Mariah, fly through twice...

But I do know one thing though, bitches, they come they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday, Monday through Sunday yo'
Maybe I'll love you one day, maybe we'll someday grow
Till then just sit your drunk ass on that fuckin' runway ho'...

Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman

Don't get me wrong, I love these ho's
It's no secret, everybody knows
Yeah we fucked, bitch so what, that's about as far as your buddy goes
We'll be friends, I'll call you again, I'll chase you around every bar you attend
Never know what kind of car I'll be in, we'll see how much you'll be partying then
You don't want that, neither do I, I don't want to flip when I see you with guys
Too much pride, between you and I
Not a jealous man, but females lie
But I guess that's just what sluts do, how could it ever be just us two
I'd never love you enough to trust you, we just met and I just fucked you...

But I do know one thing though, bitches, they come they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday, Monday through Sunday yo'
Maybe I'll love you one day, maybe we'll someday grow
Till then just sit your drunk ass on that fuckin' runway ho'...

I want to grow together, let's let our love unfurl

First thing you say, "I'm not fazed, I hang around big stars all day
I don't see what the big deal is anyways
You're just plain old Marshall to me"
Ooh ya' girl run that game
"Hallie Jade, I love that name, love that tattoo, what's that say?"
"Rot in pieces, uh, that's great."
First off you don't know Marshall, at all so don't grow partial
That's ammo for my arsenal, I'll slap you off that barstool
There goes another lawsuit, leave handprints all across you
Good Lordy whoadie, you must be gone off that water bottle
You want what you can't have, ooh girl that's too damn bad
Don't touch what you can't grab, end up with two backhands
Put anthrax on a tampax, and slap you till you can't stand
Girl you just blew your chance, don't mean to ruin your plans...

But I do know one thing though, bitches, they come they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday, Monday through Sunday yo'
Maybe I'll love you one day, maybe we'll someday grow
Till then just sit your drunk ass on that fuckin' runway ho'...

I want to grow together, let's let our love unfurl

Can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman





Heard two people screaming outside in the street
It was a guy and his girl, they were having a fight
Still half asleep, middle of the night
Screaming and cussing, that's all you could hear
See the girl's face and it's filled with fear
The screaming gets louder, this has gotta be solved
But I'm saying to myself not to get involved
But it's gotta be done, someone might get hurt
So I grabbed a pair of pants and I threw on a shirt
Heard a shot outside, put my Nike's on
Seen the girl lying half dead on the lawn
I was scared, but in hell of a rage
Went back in the house, loaded up my gauge
Come back outside, girl's still on the ground
I paused for a second and I turned around
Looked up in the dark and I saw a man
Six feet from me, with a gun in his hand
He shot first, but the sucker missed
I was no longer scared, by this time I was pissed
The girl was shot in the head, and I thought she was dead
The whole spot was red from the blood that was shed
I'm still on the ground, the sucker points his gun
I thought I was dead, no chance to run
The girl reaches out from behind the man
Springs herself forward, knocks the gun from his hand
I grab my gauge and ran halfway down the block
Fucked into the alley it was one 'o' clock
He picks his gun back up to continue the chase
Turns around and shoots the girl straight dead in the face
I jumped into a dumpster and I closed the lid
Ain't no motherfucker gonna shoot this kid
He kept on runnin' and he passed me up
I come up from behind him and I said, "What's up?"
The punk turned around and his eyes got bigger
I squeezed the gun tight and I pulled the trigger
Shot him right in the chest, blew him back ten feet
And the sucker laid dead, middle of the street
In the streets of Detroit this happens every day
But fuck with this kid and get blown away







“The last time I seen him we played basketball together,” 50 said. “He had a knee injury, so we chilled for a little bit.”







Any rapper sayin' those kind of rhymes
In this day and age, in this period of time Trying to battle Eminem
Is worse than David Starr Trying to battle Proof, Eye-Kyu, B-Flat, Bizarre ? that's why you beg to differ me
You ain't got no style plus you lack delivery
Not to brag, I don't mean to boast
Look, my face is pale, but you look like you seen a ghost
? You're that bitch, you couldn't slip up in the zone If I put banana peels around this fucking microphone
So get a bull dozer, start from bottom to top And take this building down cause that's the only way you're wrecking shop



I'm the man!

I stand in, flapped by the wind as I begin
Do you know who I am? And met a reply with a grin
Yes, I'm tired of being untooted
Why should I be secluded? I've got a brand new horn to be tooted
To sum it up in a nutshell, "M&M will you kick it for me?"
A place where I dwell in, pull onto some wonderful productions
To make up for lost time, anything is obstruction
Finally let loose, unloading the stockpile
A mental projectile, I aim like the Reptile
I look to the one-handed juggler and ask him this
"Why do you insist on stepping to an octopus?"
Is there a reason for this? The hatred is aggravating
How many times will it take you before you realise you're fading?
Fading from existence because simulations are dead
There's so much more to learn, and pages left to be read
So put up the front, while you jam for the grammar that's poor
While I hold the scrapbook, that's heavier than the hammer of the mighty Thor
Words can weigh a ton, therefore its never to fall into the hands of the wrong one


Yeah, Yeah x8
Its another

Very few have made an attempt to put a foot on the other side
But I see no borderline from under this colorblind
Now some will probably never hold pieces of the sacred
But then I'm finally about to put an end to the hatred
War, the world will never enter the arguing
Awakening to the absence of unity is startling
Oh foolish pride, what the hell is you trying to do?
You cannot beat someone that's better than you, so quit trying to
The echo we want don't mean nothing by despicable
So how do you think you can manage to kick the unkickable?
You're graceless, bland, you're tasteless and you're faceless and you're dull
Its time you faced this, here, taste this
Straight from off of the pile, one of the numerous styles
The date of my birth on the earth, the deliverance of a star child
Rest with formidable talent and versatility
But such a power, there comes a responsibility
To infringe on the boundaries so now the defiance is clear
To form an alliance that's something even the giants fear
So instead of being oblivious to a color of skin
Rufuser abusing is accepted, now its a trend


You know, I don't understand why we all just can't get along
You hate me, but you know me and what I stand for
No? so why do you speak for me and every other white man when you say that we're your enemy?

On the floor lies a broken door, because I'm not to be spoken for
Stereotypes and superstitions, and fictional folklore
Rarely do you see the lighter side of me
I try to be persuasive but oh, so impatient!
Been trying to end the rivalry
But I've heard the entice delayed it, apologies are exhausted
Feelings are turning glacial, never to be defrosted
Who can I trust after repeatedly being shafted?
Switch to the opposite, now scenes are being reenacted
Pull up, set fort by his group, his tour is quick
He's practiced obviating, we hate him as bad as a pastor, huh
Always fighting for the position of top dog
The spots already occupied and I don't play leap frog
Because I do not wish to fight over territory that's already mine
But I'm always having to prove myself time after time
Oh How I never understand how a man could be outcast
Judged from the past and he's put last
But nothing but nothing to say, stuttering and slurring
And muttering words with no meaning, attack me sounding like Danny K
Here I go again, hammering, stammering, grammaring
Eating it like cheese, pass me the crackers please
I've got a craving

I'm the man!



... grab the mic and I am kickin 'em
While I'm getting wicked with the wicked shit
About to be kicking it with ridiculous skits
When I be flipping 'em
Taking mic's and ripping them
When I come equipped to grab
And I stab shit
I stab motherfuckers bad
They go back to the lab
It's like a crack to the crab
Or crack to the crack
It doesn't matter, cause I'm kicking mad data
It doesn't matter who's fatter
Cause if I had a gun, then I would add a whole to your bladder
Kicking the mad fuckin' shit and I ?
Motherfuckers are scared of
In all kind of ways when I rewind blind ...



1998"Just Don't Give a Fuck"
1999"My Name Is"
"Role Model"
2000"The Real Slim Shady"
"The Way I Am"
2002"Without Me"
"Cleanin' Out My Closet"
"Lose Yourself"
2003"Superman"
"Sing for the Moment"
2004"Mosh"
"Just Lose It"
"Like Toy Soldiers"
2005"Mockingbird"
"Ass Like That"
"When I'm Gone"
2009"We Made You"
"3 a.m."
"Beautiful"
2010"Not Afraid"
2011"Space Bound"
2013"Berzerk"
"Survival"
"Rap God"



I fucking hate you, I can't stand you
I'll rip your titties off, and them, I'll hand you
You're ugly, you won't hug me, you're dumb, you're stupid
I'm fat, lazy and crazy, you think I'm Shady?
I am Shady, you stupid bitch
Take your silicone implants, now you gotta Slim chance of
Fuckin' with me ever again
I got your silicone, you can't fuck with me
But I'm still alone, in my cell, mad as hell
Might as well give you some more shit to sell
Fuck!



Uh huh, yeah
Uh huh, yeah
Uh huh yeah
Check it out

Well here I am and I came to say
It's a devastating rhyme and it goes this way
Everybody knows that I ain't no sucker
Cause I am one hard motherfucker
Cause I'm the baddest, and that is my status
And right now, yo, I'm 'bout to show you what phat is
Phat is getting off my damn job
Because I'm phat like a hamhock
And yo-yo with the damn clock
Cause I'm the fuckin' man that you like to hear
When I'm bustin' out a rhyme in your atmosphere
But right now I'm 'bout to grab my nuts
Fuck around and say shit all night just to strut
So here I go like Robert Dinero
You know that I ain't nobodies hero
Cause I'm the man, so motherfuckin' hard
Sendin' motherfuckers to the goddamn graveyard
Oh I know you like the that I
Have the ability on the track to punch you in the eye
Blam, bloaw, boom, slash
You know that I just smash, trash
Your whole damn crew, your whole damn life
Then I'll fuck your goddamn motherfuckin' wife
I'll take her in the backroom, I'll take her in the bathroom
And that bitch can suck on my nuts like a vacuum
Ooh, I'm hard



Good evening may I help you?
How you doing I need to get the number for PhatBeats, Los Angeles, California
Hold on one moment please
Alright, How You Doing?
Ok one moment
How you doing?
O.K. Sir One Moment
F.A.T is the name?
Right, it's real easy
I'm sorry  I have nothing for the data sorry sir
Maybe it's P-H-A-T

I know they got it! I know they have it!
PhatBeats
Right they got it! Hello?
Hello?
Ts Time it's time I know you guys have it!
Who?
I know you guys have it! Do you guys have it Is it there?
What?
What?
I'm sorry I'm really excited do you have it?
What the dialadis?

What? What n...no! Um uh uh um the guy with the um the guy who you know
Brian! The guy with the the um the yeah the one with the blonde
Um ok
You know that guy he does that thing on MTV where you know he um sings that one song what is it ummmmm uh
BRIAN!!!!! I got PhatBeats on the phone! Hurry Up!
Oh hello haha
Hello *giggle*
Hi haha
Ok who are you talking about I don't know who you're talking about
EMINEM YOU FUCKING BITCH










Sixteen years old and completely unstoppable
I can't be dropped so I'm considered undroppable
Step my way and you must be insane
Don't come near me if you don't like pain
Suckers keep talkin' and I just about had it
This is my game and I'm the best at it
I write the rules and I'm the best in my division
I win by a knockout, never decision
Don't even try it punk, just forget to wish
Unless you like to eat fish and don't fuck with this
Silly suckers talkin' trash is one thing I can't stand
You wanna talk trash, go be a garbage man
So I treat you like garbage, throw your ass away
So you better start breaking out before you get taken out
My rhymes are like food because you always need it
But, yo, you wanna bite it punk? I'll make you eat it

Any emcee that wanna be like me
Stop wishing then come back to reality
You don't have what it takes, too many mistakes
I'm sorry to tell you but those are the breaks
With the brains of a scientist and the rhymes of a poet
Don't tell me that I'm good because I already know it
Never has there been someone with this much potential
Always pack a mic because it's simply essential
Using the microphone as a murderous weapon
Put it to my mouth cause all the suckers are steppin'
Don't try to play me out, because I'm not a game
Now I'mma see, things are gonna change
Don't ask me to battle if we have what you're losin'
Don't pick up a mic if you don't know how to use it
The mic is not a toy, and I'm not a little boy
If you're thinkin' 'bout laughin' remember
I'm the one employed
This is not a band and we're not a bunch of singers
It's Emcee Double M and DJ Butterfingers
Now because of his name, that don't mean he slips
Two is called a duo and this song is called a hit

Now just because I'm good that don't mean I'm conceited
If that's the impression you got I'm sorry you were misleaded
Whenever there's a battle, naturally I win it
It don't take but a minute 'til the sucker to fall in it
All it takes is once for you to step to me and...
Now you better pick what hospital you're gonna be in
But that's not the point, what the point I'm tryna make is
You talk behind my back and that's where your mistake is
But this song is not about you, ain't what I'm tryna say
Talkin' 'bout myself is a better subject anyway
But now it's time to say peace, we stated the facts
Double M, Butterfingers, the New Jacks



The one man on the planet that'll drive off of the Grand Canyon
Hop out of a Grand Am and land in it handstanding
Any man planning to battle will get snatched out of his clothes
So fast it'll look like an invisible man standing
I'm headed for hell, I'd rather be dead or in jail
"Bill Clinton, hit this and you better inhale"
Cause any emcee that chooses to go against me
Is getting taking advantage of like Monica Lewinsky
Came home in a frenzy, pushing a ten-speed
Screaming at Aunt Peg
With three spokes sticking out of my pant leg
Eff a headache, give me a migraine, damn it, I like pain
And you should be anywhere that a mic ain't
You rap knowing you wack
You act up and I'm throwing you down a flight of steps
Then I'm throwing you back up 'em
If they don't like the track, fuck 'em
The rap struck 'em harder than getting hit by a Mack truck
And then backed up on
And any half-assed known rapper that trespass
Better be ready for the second Celebrity Deathmatch
So tell the medic to bring the medication and quickly
I'm sicker than a 2Pac dedication to Biggie
I'm free-falling feet first out of a damn tree
To stampede your chest 'til you can't breathe
And when I'm down to my last breath
I'm a climb the Empire State Building
Get to the last step and still have half left

Pompous, roll with monsters and dons for accomplices
Cock non-fiction concepts constant
Bomb threat and I ain't even on yet
On spec, I spit thunder and you ain't even seen the storm yet
Lightning in the clouds, start a fight in the crowd
Hyper and loud, get this mic in your vowels, biting my style
Attack all of y'all, react on the thought of y'all
Slaughter y'all, I'm calling y'all, in fact, I'm blackballing y'all
More official than an ordered pistol aimed toward rappers
Saw off the pump handle and barrel for carrying convenience
Solid and hard and light up a star, I got to be Venus
Huddle and bomb back, take cover and all that
And try to not die, you not rugged enough
You just shook as soon as I step foot in this rap game
I'm a bubble on contact like peroxide, I'm touching a cut
Y'all sucking my ass, boosting my confidence a buck and a half
I know the game, I'm a train trapped inside a name
And whoever they taught me, yo, we ride the same
I shoot crews with the truth and chew lies of change
Speeding on a dragon in an attempt to collide with fame

This 9 is lifting you six feet when I spray rounds
Hit you with six shots in mid-air and four more on the way down
As eight strays graze through a kid's hair on the playground
No pun intended, just hop out of this whip
And leave it unattended 'fore I whip out this gun and end it
Unless you want it dented with bullet holes in one minute
Cause I can leave your Infinit' full of those even if someone's in it
Snatch the airbag, hit the corner and park it
Corner the market, I got her tied up in a chair and gagged
Bitches get slapped and grabbed by the hair and dragged
Like cavewomen while I'm gravedigging with Marilyn Mans'

You get laced by the gun in case you try to run
Hatred on my face by the ton, get baked by the sun
Constructed of interplanetary rock and metal
Topping levels of combustion that's hot enough to stop the devil
Innovative thrust that a enemy
The impact'll be the generated destructive energy to flatten trees
Black boy since birth, burst and tore the womb up
To hit the earth like a asteroid and blow the moon up
Trust me, I'm the epitome, you better bust me
Smoking organic ganja inside of a stanza
Me and my man cypher with cans of volcanic lava
Man, and it's hot, I'm out of my head
From the bottom
I can leap out a bottomless pit and land at the top
Raw, that's what I came out here for
To raise an eclipse and occasional trips to the beer store
Switch up the breed of emcee and stick a chick up
Vigorous speed to reach in the sea and pick a fish up
I'm fly against all laws of gravitation
I done crushed all ya'll, now you want a collaboration
But eff that, you stepped up, so I'm a eff your rep up
And tear the rest up with every joint that I press up
So stop violence or violence'll stop you
Got crews iller than anybody on your block do
I roll with a white boy that pop 'shrooms
Listen to rock tunes and jump in a costume and rob you

What a wonderful day, I should go outside and play
Ain't no need to sit inside the house and hibernate
"Hi, Renée, I was just about to toss a live grenade
In your driveway and drive away
Are you afraid of a blade made of a razor with AIDS?"
Blood dripping from it
Ripping your stomach up from the waist up
You talk a lot of ish, but you was never ill though
I'm sick enough to beat you to death with a feather pillow
Tipped over some cows just for a joke and a laugh
Jumped up, choked a giraffe, snapped his neck and broke it in half
Waging wars, went on stage and sprayed Cage with Agent Orange
And wiped my ass with his page in Source
Demon is here, I'm steaming this year
I rip Mystikal's voice box out and scream in his ear
It's not a gimmick, trick, it's an image, I live it
Give a what? I don't know what a "what" is to give it

I grab your throat and squeeze it until it's swollen
Then exceed it until it explodes over your shoulders
Pick up your urn with ashes in it and piss in it
Diss intended to verge like a hearse with a witch in it
No more do I battle emcees for fun
It's barely vivid you witness rare exhibits of terrorism
Through Israel and the art when even they're dark and dismal
I'm a deranged breed, shoot me
I'll catch a bullet in my teeth
And spit it right back at you at the same speed
I'll injure if I'm offending you, we can go to blows
Even my interview should be a Hip-Hop Quotable
You can have the title, that's for brothers that's cocky
I'll take the belt with diamonds in it like Ted DiBiase
I'm rebelling your chains, in fact, you wack
I'm telling you the plane still spelling your name in your raps
You're soft-hearted, I'll say, "Let's take it to the streets"
You'll start pleading with me before we can get the walk started
I'm a deranged breed, so don't try to touch this
5'9", I told you I don't know the chorus

Forget a chorus, my metaphors are so complicated
It takes six minutes to get applause
And by the time you all catch on, I'm a end your career
And walk away with the floor, so you have nothing to fall back on
I'll throw you out of ten floors
Pull a freaking headache out of my head and put it in yours
I'm indoors, waiting for this acid to seep in my skin pores
To go outdoors and do some in-stores
This trick wanted to blow me, I said, "It ought to happen"
"You swallow nut, girl?" "No, but I brought a napkin"
Getting skully while I'm autographing
Got my daughter laughing
Cause I sent her mother white water rafting
I'm not a fact, I'm a proven fear
Mr. Rogers blocking my U-Haul
Screaming, "You ain't moving here"
"Lorena Bobbitt, come here, want a souvenir?
I've been high as "L" since I was a juven-eer
Juvenile? Same difference, I need some 'caine
Cause I ain't sniffed since I woke up to seven slain infants
Brain implants and they say there's a slim chance
I won't stay the same cause I traded brains with a chimpanz'



Yes, this is Ken, I'm calling about your ad in the paper
Oh, Tom, ok, um, how big is the van?
Um, maybe I'll just give you my address, and then
And then you two strong men come




Cause some things in this universe
Don't make sense but somehow, always seem to fuckin' work
Driving down I seventy five 'bout to hop on six ninety six
I look over this fucking chick's tryna fix her makeup
I'm like bitch, you ain't a plastic surgeon
I advise ya to put up your visor, I'm getting kinda ticked
You're blocking my side mirror, she's like yeah, so? I'm like so?
You gon' need a stitch you keep actin' like that, ho
I look like your husband slut? That's a rhetorical question
You talk to me like you talk to him, I'll fuck you up
In fact, get in the backseat, like the rest of my dates
No bitch rides shotgun, what taxi?
Stop and pick you some Maxi Pads up is that what you actually ask me?
Bitch reaches over and smacks me
And says I annoy the fuck outta her, get in the fucking back
Put on your slut powder, you slut, what? Shut the fuck up now
Or get your feelings hurt, worse than my last chick when
I accidentally butt dialed her, she heard me spreading AIDS rumors about her
Turn the radio up louder, make it thump
While I bump that Relapse CD, tryna hit every bump in that cunt
Thought I snap back in that accent cause she kept asking me
To quit callin' her cunt, I said I cunt, she said, Marshall

You ain't really like that, oh
You're putting on a show, where's your mic at?
Cause you're breaking my heart
She said you're breaking my heart
You ain't really like that, oh
You're putting on a show, where's your mic at?
Cause you're breaking my heart
She said you're breaking my heart

Uh, pull up to the club in a Porsche, not a Pinto
While Marshall's at a white trash party, I'm at drama central
I walk up in there looking at my phone, on Twitter tweetin'
I'm feelin' a bunch of bitches lookin' at a nigga, cheesin'
I get approached by this little skeezer
She asked me am I the realest G, cause I'm Gucci from head to feet
I said, yeah, I'm really is cause I spit in your man's face
Like Cam did that little kid on Killa Season
She said I'm feeling a bit of ego, wait, am I talking wrong?
I said nah, I'm a walking Kanye Beyonce song
She said I'm mad at you, I said why?
She said why you never make songs for chicks as if it's hard to do?
I said I make songs for me, leave the studio
And go and fuck the bitch who belongs to who makin' songs for you
She said I'm feelin' your whole swagger and flow, can we hook up?
I said, um, you just used the word swagger, so no, she said

You ain't really like that, oh
You're putting on a show, where's your mic at?
Cause you're breaking my heart
She said you're breaking my heart
You ain't really like that, oh
You're putting on a show, where's your mic at?
Cause you're breaking my heart
She said you're breaking my heart

We been ridin' around in this hatchback 'til I'm fucking hunchback
Where the fuck's this party at slutbag cunt? Cut what act?
Think it's an act? Fuck that, I'm tryna shag scuz
Better find this love shack or somewhere to fuck at, ah, don't touch that
You fat dyke, I'm tryna hear some Bagpipes from Baghdad
Don't act like you don't like 'em, them accents, I rap tight
And I'm a torture you 'til we find this place, yeah that's right
Thought it was just past this light, just past Van Dyke
Better hit that map right, read them directions, oh yeah
You can't read and you can't write, told me that last night
She took my CD out the deck, snapped in half like
Relapse sucked, I snapped, hit the gas like
Blew through the light, spun out, hit a patch of black ice
Forgot we had a trailer hitch to the back, we jackknifed
Bitch flew out of the car, I laughed like, she deserved it
She didn't think I'd act like that in person

Tell him I'll be there in a minute
I'm tryna break up this cat fight between my mistress and my damn wife
Then a chick wanted a hug, she was fat
So I gave her dap and told her to scat, I'm not mean, I'm cute
On my way to the front door, taking the scenic route
To avoid this chick with a lace front lookin' like Venus and Serena's hooves
I'm just sayin', those chicks got horse asses, they been attractive
Hope when they see me they don't slap me with they tennis rackets
My mind drifted back to this shit
I seen my wife push her down, step over her body and smack the mistress
Police outside, I turn and pass the gat to Vicious
Then I step out and see my evil twin, he gives me an evil grin
He mugs the mistress, turns around and gives the misses hugs and kisses
Looks at me twisted, like Nickel "Yeah, watch this shit"
He smacks the dentures outta the mouth of the fat bitch he rode with
Looks back to mention, "Royce, it's good to be back to business"

You ain't really like that, oh
You're putting on a show, where's your mic at?
Cause you're breaking my heart
She said you're breaking my heart
You ain't really like that, oh
You're putting on a show, where's your mic at?
Cause you're breaking my heart
She said you're breaking my heart



What I wanna do, let me see right here, yo

Not many people that I label
Would be able to display table
Manners but my plan this
To make this beat rock like scanners
And make the fans just go bananas
Yo, get our Planters
That means our nuts for the sluts who don't understand this
Yo, my clan is
Yeah right, and y'all gon' stand there
And act like you don't understand it
Like my name is Janet, my titty fell out and I ain't plan it
Check, check this out
And if you're rockin' with your necklace out
That's my breakfast now
I'mma snatch it, yo my style is rechid, you can't fetch it
No you can't stretch it
And yo, it doesn't really matter
Cause your name I can't even pronunciate
You're the sa-same type-a mo'fucker
To go and suckerpunch Dre at the Vibe Awards
But he right behind the boards the next day
So, kiss an ass
Or kiss a dick, lick a dick
Eat my ass
Whatever you wan' do, it's on you
Big Proof comin' through..




It is old and ugly as fuck
It looks like mutant froggy duck
He's a prick, he's a cunt
And he never smoked blunt!

Maybe Michael Jackson, hahahah...

No...

I know, that dude is Nelson Mandela!

No, guys! It is Benzino!

HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAAAAAAAA...



Shady records
Ain't nobody better than us
Shady records
More cheddar than us
Shady records
Ain't nobody better than us
Shady records

I done figured this rap shit out, I map shit out strategically
Timing is everything and it seems to be the key
Timing is everything and it seems to be the key
Let 'em diss you first and respond immediately
In order to master the art of war, don't start a war
Shit not no more, we done scared 'em off, there are no more
Victims to sic, I'm fixin' to pick some and start shit
Ain't got no pictures to rip and shit to throw darts in
Ain't got no more targets, shit Irv and Jeff
We done beat 'em to death, Benzino in debt
It seems to just be no one left to bully, Bush is pussy
Why the fuck you think his name's Bush? Puss is bushy
Ain't shit going on, shit I been gettin' so bored lately
I'm thinkin' of doing some shit to get you to go and hate me again
Tell the truth I like the shit better then
Shit I can spit better, I'm bout to kick that shi-shit again
Look, the game just ain't the same, it's changin'
Shit Dre's quittin', Jay's quittin', now it's just wanksta
Sayin' the same shit, it's fake and it's ancient
It's makin' me so bored I'ma just make a new language
Fubba you cubba cubba, ubbu you ubbu ooba
Yooba can subba my dibidick through a tubba
Suma newma lama, I'm not a human
I'm a suicidal super sonic suicidal uni-bomber
You think I'm the new Osama, press think I'm the new Madonna
Jeffrey Dahmer left me with his legacy to carry on, uh
Lotta talk and rumors on us, who's the hottest? To be honest
Hip-hop ain't been the same since 2Pac moved to Cuba on us

Ayy yo
Shady records
They ain't better than us
Shady records
They ain't getting more cheddar than us
Shady records
They ain't better than us
Shady records
Motherfucker more cheddar than us



Performed by Jeff Bass for FBT Productions & Eminem

Written by M. Mathers & Dr. Dre
Mix engineering by Richard "Segal" Huredia
Published by Chrysalis Music
Contains an interpolation from "I Got The" as recorded by Labi Siffre, published by Chrysalis Music

Written by M. Mathers & Dr. Dre
Mix engineering by Richard "Segal" Huredia
Narration by Mark Avery
Contains an interpolation of "Go Home Pigs" as contained in the film Getting Straight published by EMI Music

Written by M. Mathers, M. Bass & J. Bass
Co-produced by Eminem
Mix engineering by Alan Mason
Drum programming by Mel-Man

Performed by Paul "Bunyan" Rosenburg

Written by M. Mathers, M. Bass & J. Bass
Co-produced by Eminem
Mix engineering by Alan Mason
Pre-production by DJ Rec
Drum programming by DJ Head
Additional vocals by Kristie Abete Swift

Written by M. Mathers, M. Bass & J. Bass
Co-produced by Eminem & DJ Head
Mix engineering by Slim
Pre-production by DJ Head
Drum programming by DJ Head
Cuts by DJ Len Swann

Performed by Zoe Winkler

Written by M. Mathers, Dr. Dre & Mel Man
Mix engineering by Richard "Segal" Huredia

Performed by Eminem, Marky & Jeff Bass for FBT Productions
Background music by Jeff Bass for FBT Productions

Written by M. Mathers, M. Bass & J. Bass
Mix engineering by Alan Mason

Performed by Aristotle, Eminem & Marky Bass for FBT Productions
Background music by Jeff Bass for FBT Productions

Written by M. Mathers, M. Bass & J. Bass
Co-produced by Eminem
Mix engineering by Alan Mason
Additional vocals by Dina Rae

Written by M. Mathers, M. Bass & J. Bass
Mix engineering by Richard "Segal" Huredia

Written by M. Mathers, M. Bass & J. Bass
Co-produced by Eminem
Mix engineering by Aaron Lepley
Pre-production by Denine Porter
Drum programming by Denine Porter
Cuts by Kid Rock

Performed by Royce da 5'9" & Jeff Bass for FBT Productions
Background music by Jeff Bass for FBT Productions

Written by M. Mathers, M. Bass & J. Bass
Co-produced by Eminem
Mix engineering by Aaron Lepley
Pre-production by Justin Trugman

Written by M. Mathers, M. Bass & J. Bass
Co-produced by Eminem
Mix engineering by Aaron Lepley
Contains an interpolation from "Pusherman" as recorded by Curtis Mayfield, published by Warner Chappell Music

Written by M. Mathers, R. Montgomery, M. Bass & J. Bass
Co-produced by Eminem
Introduction vocals by Jeff Bass for FBT Productions
Music by Jeff Bass for FBT Productions
Mix engineering by Aaron Lepley

Written by M. Mathers, M. Bass & J. Bass
Co-produced by Eminem
Mix engineering by Aaron Lepley


Recorded & mixed at The Mix Room and Dre's House
Digital editing & pre-mastering by Blumpy
Mastered by Brian "Big Bass" Gardner

*Original version for The Slim Shady LP by DJ Head for Yeeeah Entertainment


Thank You's
Funkyfreshinthaflesh, DJ Q, Slimfaz, Family Function & BLue Collar
Justin, Mustafa, Lynn Pompey, Mark Hicks, Shawn P, Eklypse, Vitamin C, Johnathan, Adam, Snafu, Jamie, Kim, my little brother Nate and my Mother

To the people I forgot, you weren't on my mind for some reason and you probably don't deserve any thanks anyway


This album is dedicated to my daughter, Hailie Jade Scott


℗ © 1999 Aftermath Ent./Interscope Records



There she go, shaking that ass on the floor
Bumping and grinding that pole
The way she's grinding that pole
I think I'm losing control

I get a new drink for everytime I move through crowds
Cause they do anything for a playa to fall down
Slipping pills wit no chill, spill you fall down
Straight kill with great skill, loot and take pound
I got hoes on dick, money on mind
I got enemies front, soulja’s behind
I’m ready for war, I fought right here before
Back when my name wasn't damn near a score
So I back the track up, move and bump to this
Think back and laugh, smack hoes and hump to this
Sit back and count stack, smoke a blunt to this
Write raps, make hoes clap, tap and then dismiss
It’s - only the 2 that be running it fast
Full control of their souls, I’m the man of the cast
They watch and they watch, it’s all eyes on me
So step the fuck back - am who they came to see
And I go and get locked soulja’s who remain
Make them join the 2 Six flow and give them fame
Ain’t the same, when you fight all the time then entertain
It’s the game, where they leave all behind that it's full of pain
My heart is cold so I ain't be giving a fuck
I pray for the people that wanna come and fuck with us
Suicidal in the fast lane, gang we’re in the cut
Fast lane, we go bang bang you better trust
But enough of that, let me just enjoy my drink
Let me enjoy these hoes beautiful bodies
While I stand here and think
Caressing her body, others watch, which shall I pick?
I like a hoe with a beautiful face and some nice ass tits
If I go down tonight, I’m going down with life
All this shit, but I still get lit

Two to the one from the one to the three
I like good pussy and I like good tree
Smoke so much weed you wouldn't believe
And I get more ass than a toilet seat
Three to the one from the one to the three
I met a bad bitch last night in the D
Let me tell you how I made her leave with me
Conversation and Hennessy
I've been to the motherfuckin' mountain top
Heard motherfuckers talk, seen em drop
If I ain't got a weapon I'mma pick up a rock
And when I bust yo ass I'm gon' continue to rock
Getcha ass of the wall with your two left feet
It's real easy just follow the beat
Don't let that fine girl pass you bye
Look real close cause strobe lights lie

I'm lookin for a girl with a body and a sexy strut
Wanna get it poppin baby step right up
Some girls they act retarded
Some girls are bout it bout it
I'm lookin' for a girl that will do whatever the fuck
I say, every day she be givin it up

Shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me
Come on girl, shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me
Ohh girl, shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me
Come on girl, shake that ass for me, shake that ass for me

I'm a menace, a dentist, an oral hygienist
Open your mouth for about four or five minutes
Take a little bit of this fluoride rin-inse
Swish but don't spit it, swallow it now finish
Yeah; me and Nate D-O Double-G
Looking for a couple bitches with some double D's
Pop a little champagne and a couple E's
Slip it in her bubbly, we finna finna have a party

I'm lookin for a girl I can fuck in my Hummer truck
Apple Bottom jeans and a big ol' butt
Some girls they act retarded
Some girls are bout it bout it
I want a bitch to sit at the crib with no panties on
Knows that she can but she won't say no

Now look at this lady all in front of me, sexy as can be
Tonight I want a slut, would you be mine?
Heard you was freaky from a friend of mine

Now I hope you don't get mad at me
But I told Nate you was a freak
He said he wants a slut, hope you don't mind
I told him how you like it from behind


God! I ain’t leaving without you, bitch
You're coming home with me
And my boy, and his boy - and his boy, and his girl



Additional vocals by Nikki Grier

Additional keyboards by Luis Resto
Guitar & bass by Chin Injeti
Drum programming by Khalil Abdul Rahman

Additional keyboards by Luis Resto

Keyboards & additional programming by Rahki
Additional keyboards & drum programming by Khalil Abdul Rahman

Additional production by Eminem
Additional keyboards by Luis Resto
Drums played & arranged by Dwayne "Supa Dups" Chin-Quee

Keyboards, bass & acoustic guitar by Mike Strange
Additional keyboards by Luis Resto

Additional production by Jordan Evans for Boi 1da Productions LLC, Matthew Burnett for Boi 1da Productions LLC & Eminem
Drums by Matthew "Boi 1da" Samuels
Strings by Matthew Burnett & Jordan Evans
Choir vocals by Kip Blackshire, Christal Garrick II, Terry Dexter, Rich King, Kristen Ashley Cole & Sly Jordan

Additional production by Matthew Burnett for Boi 1da Productions LLC
Additional keyboards by Luis Resto
Drums by Matthew "Boi 1da" Samuels
Strings by Matthew Burnett
Additional vocals by Sly Jordan


Keyboards & programming by Jim Jonsin
Additional keyboards by Danny Morris
Additional vocals by Steve McEwan

Drum programming by Nick Low Beer

Additional keyboards & drum programming by Khalil Abdul Rahman
Additional vocals by Liz Rodrigues

Additional vocals by Sly Jordan
Saxophone by Sly Jordan

Additional keyboards & drum programming by Khalil Abdul Rahman
Additional keyboards by Luis Resto
Bass & guitar by Chin Injeti
Additional vocals by Liz Rodrigues

Additional guitars by J. Brow for Veers Music
Vocal production by Makeba Riddick


Co-produced by Magnedo7 for Elleis Inc. Music Group
Additional keyboards by Luis Resto



AFTERMATH

INTERSCOPE
Production coordinator Les Scurry



Mastered by Brian "Big Bass" Gardner at Bernie Grundman Mastering


R.I.P. Big Proof
Big Proof Forever
1973-2006

This album is dedicated 2 anyone who's in a dark place tryin' 2 get out. Keep your head up...
It does get better!


℗ © 2010 Aftermath Records




Yeah, how you doin', um
I need to get the number for, um
Fat Beats, Los Angeles? California?
Alright, how you doin'
I have nothing for the name, sir, I'm sorry)
Maybe it's, um, PH80
I know they got it, I know they have it
I-I know- It's time, I know you guys have it
Is it- Do you guys have it? It-it's there
Last time, it-it came out, um, uh
May-er-February 23rd
And this-this time, I'm not gonna wait 'til, uh
May 23rd, I can't wait
Be-be-I-I seen it on the internet, it's-
No, I j-um-what, ah
The guy with the-um, um
What do you call him?
You know t- Brian!
The-the guy with the, um
The-yeah, the-the
If you gave me a name then I would know, but)
Oh, um, the guy- You kn-you know the guy, um
He does that thing, on MTV, um
He sings that one song, um, uhhh
What's it-ah-ah-ah, BRIAN!
I GOT FAT BEATS ON THE PHONE! HURRY UP!
I don't know who're you talking about)
EMINEM, YOU FUCKING BITCH!



Recorded at Encore Studios
Recorded and mixed by Mauricio "Veto" Iragorri

Co-produced by Jeff Bass for FBT Productions
Recorded at Marshall's house and 54Sound
Mixed at 54Sound
Recorded and mixed by Steve King
Guitars and bass by Jeff Bass
Additional guitars by Steve King
Drum programming by DJ Head
Additional background vocals by Dina rae

Produced and mixed by Dr. Dre
Recorded at Sierra Sounds and Larabee West
Mixed at Encore Studios
Bass and guitars by Mike Elizondo
Background vocals by Traci Nelson, Barbara Wilson, Shy Felder and Conesha Monet Owens

Recorded and mixed by Steve King
Recorded at Marshall's house and 54Sound
Mixed at 54Sound
Keyboard, guitar and bass by Jeff Bass
Additional drum programming by DJ Head

Recorded and mixed at 54Sound
Recorded and mixed by Steve King

Recorded and mixed at 54Sound
Recorded and mixed by Steve King
Background vocals by Gary Kozlowski and Lynette Purdy

Recorded at Marshall's house and 54Sound
Recorded and mixed by Steve King
Mixed at 54Sound
Additional drum programming by DJ Head
Guitar and keyboards by Jeff Bass
Additional keyboards by Steve King and Mike Elizondo

Drum programming by Mel Man
Recorded at Marshall's hous and 54Sound
Recorded and mixed by Steve King
Mixed at 54Sound

Recorded at Marshall's house and 54Sound
Recorded and mixed by Steve King
Guitar, keyboards and bass by Jeff Bass

Co-produced by Jeff Bass for FBT Productions
Additional production by DJ Head
Recorded at Marshall's house and 54Sound
Additional recording by Mauricio "Veto" Iragorri
Keyboards, guitars and bass by Jeff Bass
Sample clearance services by Music Resources, Inc

Performed by Paul D. Rosenberg, Esq

Co-produced by Jeff Bass for FBT Productions
Recorded at Marshall's house and 54Sound
Recorded and mixed by Steve King
Recording of Joe Perry's guitar by Marti Frederiksen
Mixed at 54Sound
Drum programming by DJ Head
Keyboards, guitars and bass by Jeff Bass
Guitar solo by Joe Perry of Aerosmith
Sample clearing services by Music Resources, Inc

Additional production by Jeff Bass for FBT Productions
Recorded at Marshall's house and 54Sound
Recorded and mixed by Steve King
Mixed at 54Sound
Keyboards and bass by Jeff Bass

Recorded at Marshall's house and 54Sound
Mixed at 54Sound and Encore Studios

Performed by Eminem and Steve Berman

Co-produced by Denaun Porter
Recorded and mixed at Encore Studios
Drum programming by Denaun Porter

Produced and mixed by Dr. Dre
Recorded at Encore Studios and 54Sound
Mixed at Encore Studios
Phone call by Timbaland

Recorded at Marshall's house and 54Sound
Recorded and mixed by Steve King
Guitar and bass by Steve King
Special thanks to Beachwood Music

Produced and mixed by Dr. Dre
Recorded at 54Sound, Sierra Sounds, Larabee West and Encore Studios
Mixed at Encore Studios
Television voiceover by Steve King

Performed by Ken Kaniff


Typeface based on Eminem's handwriting designed by Kevin Dresser at Dresser & Sons
Mastered by Brian "Big Bass" Gardner at Bernie Grundman Mastering


℗ © 2002 Aftermath Records




I'm the illest rapper to hold a cordless
Patrolling corners, looking for hookers
To punch in the mouth with a roll of quarters
I'm meaner in action than Roscoe beating James Todd Sr. and smackin' his back with vacuum cleaner attachments
I grew up in the wild hood, as a hazardous youth
With a fucked up childhood that I used as an excuse
And ain't shit changed but kept the same mindstate
Since the third time that I failed ninth grade
You probably think that I'm a negative person, don't be so sure of it
I don't promote violence, I just encourage it
I laugh at the sight of death
As I fall down a cement flight of steps
And land inside a bed of spider webs
So throw caution to the wind
You and a friend can jump off of a bridge and if you live, do it again
Shit, why not? Blow your brain out, I'm blowing mine out
Fuck it, you only live once you might as well die now




Uh, this is Marshall, I call there all the time
What I wanna do, actually
I wanna get a-eh, eh, it's called-I call it
The Slim Shady platter, it's like, with shrimp, like, around it
And inside, it's like, um
It's like a piece of liver that they give me
And they-they put like, salad on the side
Wha-wil-- Blergh-hrm-be-lay-la?
Schwepp-a-hrm-de-lay-la!
Uh, hmph, I needed shrimp, I needed shrimp
Around, eh, the plate, what are you talking about
Yes, yes, the fuckin'- the shrrreerp
Okay? Ther shrreerp, goes arrround the sarrrad
Chopped Se-lim Shady, Slim Shady liver
Okay? Served, a la carrrot on the ass for mama
Alright, I'm srrrerrry, okay
The shrimp, the shrimp-ah, he-he-hello?
Ah hrm-de-lay-la, fuck Mama, hrm-lay, what're you talking about
Shu-bitch, mama, shu-bitch, yeah smool, ah, smool puzy I like
She in this still, what are you talking about
Okay? I fuck mama, hello?
Listen to me or no? Excuse me




Hi, my name is, what?
My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh?
My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka Slim Shady

Excuse me!
Can I have the attention of the class for one second?

Hi kids, do you like violence?
Wanna see me stick Nine Inch Nails through each one of my eyelids?
Wanna copy me and do exactly like I did?
Try 'cid and get fucked up worse than my life is?
My brain's dead weight
I'm trying to get my head straight
But I can't figure out which Spice Girl I want to impregnate
And Dr. Dre said
"Slim Shady, you a basehead!"
Uh-uhhh!
"So why's your face red? Man, you wasted!"
Well, since age twelve I felt like I'm someone else
Cause I hung my original self from the top bunk with a belt
Got pissed off and ripped Pamela Lee's tits off
And smacked her so hard I knocked her clothes backwards like Kris Kross
I smoke a fat pound of grass and fall on my ass
Faster than a fat bitch who sat down too fast
Come here, slut
"Shady wait a minute, that's my girl, dog!"
I don't give a fuck
God sent me to piss the world off



Little things start to trouble me, pressure me and bother me
This shit is mess to me, especially to poverty
I always wondered what my destiny would offer me
My only guess would be accessory to robbery




These are the results of a thousand electric volts
A neck with bolts
A kid who refused to respect adults
Wore spectacles with taped frames and a freckled nose
A corny looking White boy
Scrawny and always ornery
Cause I was always sick of brawny bullies picking on me
And I might snap, one day just like that
I decided to strike back and flatten every tire on the bike rack
My first day in junior high this kid said
It's you and I, three o'clock sharp this afternoon you die
I already gave you my lunch money
What more do you want from me
He said, don't try to run from me, you'll just make it worse
My palms were sweaty
And I started to shake at first
Something told me, try to fake a stomach ache, it works
I screamed, oww, my appendix feels like they could burst
Teacher, teacher, quick I need a naked nurse
"What's the matter"
I don't know, my leg, it hurts
"Leg? I thought you said it was your tummy"
Oh I mean it is, but I also got a bum knee
"Mr. Mathers, the fun and games are over
And just for that stunt, you're gonna get some extra homework"
But don't you wanna give me after school detention
"Nah, that bully wants to beat your ass and I'mma let him"

Brain damage
Ever since the day I was born
Drugs is what they used to say I was on
They say I never knew which way I was going
But everywhere I go they keep playing my song



Met a retarded kid named Greg, with a wooden leg
Snatched it off and beat him over the fucking head with the peg
Go to bed with the keg, wake up with the forty
Mixed it with Alka-Seltzer and Formula 44D
Fuck an acid tab, I strapped the whole sheet to my forehead
Waited until it absorbed in, and fell to the floor dead
No more said, case closed, end of discussion
I'm blowin' up like spontaneous human combustion
Leaving you in the aftermath of holocaust and traumas
Cross the bombers, we blowin' up your house, killing your parents
And coming back to get your foster mommas
And I'm as good at keeping a promise as Nostradamus
Cause I ain't making no more threats
I'm doin' drive-bys in tinted Corvettes on Vietnam war vets
I'm more or less sick in the head
Maybe more cause I smoked crack today, yesterday, and the day before
Saboteur, walk the block with a Labrador
Strappin' more corral for war than El Salvador
Foul style galore, verbal cow manure
Comin' together like the eyebrow on Al B. Sure!
Motherfucker!




Um, I was wondering if you have, um, wha-what's his name?
Sli-Eminem, or Slim Shady
I don't know if he bought it, I don't know if he got it off the internet
Th-the, okay, aw, I was wondering who produced it, the third track
I don't know, cause the snare, the snare is like "csh, csh, csh"
Aw okay, alright
Well if it-cause everybody's telling me they have it
Fuck you!







Yo this Marshall, how you doing?
Yeah I actually would, I would like to set up an appointment to get my dick rubbed
I'm just like... Yo, I'm kinda mellow
You know what I mean? My personality, I'm like real laid back
You know what I mean?
Okay, well first of all bitch, you offended me by saying I, I should be a man about it
’Cause, yo I'm really, I'm really confident in my sexuality
Right, right, but I'm saying, what-what's you saying
Right I ain't trying to get off over the phone
I'm trying to set up an appointment like a man
I don't know, if we could do it, like, at 2 o'clock or something like that, you know what I mean?
Alright, alright bitch I'mma call you in a minute, you know what I mean?
Alright bitch





I’m a kick it
The motherfuckin’ liquid
That I be spittin’
Infinite ammunition
Yeah you wishin’
You try to step to this but you died
You tried to fuck with my style but get denied
And get hit
And get pushed back to the fuckin lab
When I stab you in the abdomen
When I grab a pen and jab it in


Travelin like an abdomen and gag you with it
Javelin when I’m stabbing it and grabbin it
With the Canibus animal animus
Element jam it is
Whatever lattice magnanimous
And the shadow is adamant
The equilibrium will lay on top of these mathematics
In alphabetical order, Destroyer!




Livin' like a sleuth

But don't chew with your mouth full
Don't chew with your mouth full
Cause if you chew with your mouth full
You'll end up biting your toes

Tossin' curves that are nerve-wrackin'
Which is trickery, victory's repetitious
Though weaker ones and overeager ones that just get ate up
Though many will often try to duplicate the style I made up
If my weight up it wouldn't matter, you're slow as a paraplegic
Whoops you missed, here's my fist, eat it


Frostbite



When will he ever learn?
I guess never




Gave you all the finger and told you to sit and twirl
Sold a billion tapes and still screamed, "Fuck the world!"
I think I got a generation brainwashed
Stop they blood flow until they veins clot
I need a pain shot, and a shot of plain scotch
Purple haze and acid raindrops
Shaved my armpits and wore a tank top
Bad Boy, I told you that I can't stop
You gotta make em fear you 'fore you make em feel you
So everybody buy my shit or I'mma come and kill you

I got mushrooms, I got acid, I got tabs and aspirin tablets
I'm your brother when you need, some new weed to set you free
You know me, I'm your friend, when you need a Mini Thin










Well i do pop pills
I keep my tube socks filled
And pop the same shit that got 2Pac killed
Spit game to these hoes
Like a soap opera episode
Then punch a bitch in the nose
Until her whole face explodes



I was looking at your ad in the paper, um
Okay, um, you're gonna laugh, um
This is kinda personal, but
I'm, um, a transexual
And I was wondering if, um, you could-
I thought you was gonna laugh at me, um
I was wondering, um, how much would charge, to like, um
Sculpt, like-like, if-if-if you were to make like, um
I work in the steel and...)
You couldn't make a-a sculpture of, like um
I thought you were, I thought you were yelling at me
It sounds very loud in my ear
Cause I was trying to get like, just-
All I really wanted- you're probably gonna laugh, but
All I really wanted was, um, a sculpture, really
You can't make a sculpture of my penis?
Just my penis, that's it, just the head of my penis
Why don't make sculptures of penises?
You're being mean, sir, 'cause you put an ad in the paper
You put an ad in the paper for penis sculptures!
This is really messed up, you're doing psychological damage to me
Physically and mentally
Oh my god, I'm sorry, I'm sorry, goodbye




*Ends off I'm Shady snippet and instrumental still plays*
And that's my name!
*Phone rings*
Oh, my God, you sound sexy
Um, listen, I was just, I-I
I don't know, I don't do this a lot, it's like, my second time
I swear to God, um, listen, it says
I don't know im reading this over in the paper and-and
It says you're, I don't know, a ch-a-transexual
What type of, I don't know, what type of s-
Aight, do you wanna, do you wanna attend to your dog?
You fucking slut, oh God...



Um, I-I just have one more question
I don't know if you were the guy we were talking to, um
Um, probably what I was wondering, um
Is if, I-I-I don't know, I've seen Eminem
He did a show at Tramps and his hair was like, blond
And I was wondering, actually, that's not even a question
But I was wondering, um, is-is-is
Is Dr. Dre, um, is he white?
Um, I had a que-
The oh-this ain't the--, oh this a girl
I had a couple of questions about, um, about this guy Eminem
I-I know him, I-I'd, I know him, I've-I've like, I've like studied him
I-I've-I know all his freestyles by heart
I'm sorry, I'm just really excited because something-
And, I don't know how he got the album, he sa-
He said he got it off the internet or something
But I was figuring like, maybe Fat Beats like, had a bootleg
Or something that I could just get
I wouldn't, like, turn you guys in or nothing like that, just--
They don't have it Brian, you fucking dick!
Okay, is-is-is-i-i-i, it's, um
Is Dr. Dre white?
The Dr. Dre I know ain't white, I don't know)
Oh, okay, okay, oh!
Dr. Dre, the Dr. Dre from The Chronic, you asshole!
You guys are so-- you, I'm sorry, I'm sorry
Dr. Dre is not white, Dr. Dre is not white, you fucking dicks
Ok, goodbye
Slut



Hi, my name is, my name is nobody famous
Guess what? I'm an anus
I'm here with Mancow, haha
You know how I do it, cause I kick this fluid when i do it
I bust it, I kill it and I crush it with Mancow
You don't understand how we do it
We land now with hits and freestyle flows
Cuz we the ish, I said ish backwards and guess what that is...
Shhh, yea I can't say that, yo, hit the playback
Check it, cause rappers don't know how to display that
Rhymes that I be kicking, freestyle when I be kicking
Sticking these, ribs sticking out, poverty stricken
I'm all hungry cause I ain't ate in ten minutes
I'm infinite, oh, hey, check it out, I'm Ken Kaniff

Oh, hi there man, oh yeah
Hell no bro, oh yeah, no, yeah
Oh here I am I'm chillin' with Mancow
You know how we do it man you know we got the know how
Mancow kick a freestyle






1999
"My Name Is"
2000
"The Real Slim Shady"
"The Way I Am"
2001
"Stan"
2002
"Without Me"
"Cleanin' Out My Closet"
"Lose Yourself"
2003
"Superman"
"Sing For The Moment"
2004
"Just Lose It"
2005
"Encore"
"Like Toy Soliders"
"Mockingbird"
"Ass Like That"
"When I'm Gone"
2006
"Shake That"
2007
2008
2009
"We Made You"
"3am"
"Old Time's Sake"
"Beautiful"
"Insane"
2010
"Elevator"
"Hell Breaks Loose"
"Music Box"
"Not Afraid"
"25 to Life"
"Talkin' 2 Myself"
"Cold Wind Blows"
"Won't Back Down"
"No Love"
"Love The Way You Lie"
2011
2012
2013
"Beautiful Pain"
"The Monster"
2014
"Survival"
"Rap God"
"Berzerk"
"Headlights"
"Guts Over Fear"
2015
"Phenomenal"
"Kings Never Die"




My name is Slim Shady they- I mean
That's like a nickname, they call me, you know
Alright, slut, what I'm saying is, would
Can you stick a finger in, like, at least on the-
You know what I mean? Like, I'm saying, like
Just like a finger, you know what I'm saying?
Sex, you know, I just want to stick a finger up a bit
I'm just horny, I got my dick in my hand, you know?
Aight, quote-quote unquote
I heard that, but I'm saying, can you
Like, put your own dick in your hand
I didn't know "bitch" was a bad word



{Jusqu'à ce que je m'éffondre}

Des fois tu te sens crevé, tu te sens faiblard
Quand tu te sens faiblard, tu as tout simplement envie
D’arrêter
Mais il faut chercher en toi, il faut trouver la force
Intérieure
Ecarter ces conneries, trouver la motivation pour pas
Laisser tomber
Pas être un lâcheur, même si tu te prends de belles
Gamelles…

Jusqu’à ce que je m’effondre je cracherai ma tchatche
Tant que ça vous parlera, jusqu’au jour où je laisserai
Tomber tu pourras pas dire que je les enfonce pas /
Sinon je serais pas hip hop, je serais pas Eminem /
Pensées subliminales, quand j’arrêterai d’en envoyer
Les femmes sont prises dans mes rets, je les retourne je
Crache mon venin, des montées d’adrénalines, même avec
La pénicilline t’arrête pas le carnage, l’amoxacilline
à côté c’est de la bibine /
Le flic qui se fait buter, le lascar du hip hop cueille des
Millions d’auditeurs pop /
Tu me suis, tu ressens le truc sinon tu flippes genre je
T’ai montré, l’esprit de Dieu vit avec nous /
Tu entend beaucoup les paroles qui choquent. C’est un
Miracle ou le miracle c’est moi, moi je suis juste le
Produit de la pop en effervescence. Pompe-moi le dard
Voilà comment ça se danse, vous oubliez, les meufs
Mézigue je m’en tape


Tant que le toit sera là, tant que les lumières seront
Allumées
Tant que mes jambes tiendront, je la bouclerai pas
Tant qu’il y aura de la fumée tant que je planerai
J’irai de ma tchatche jusqu’à ce que mes os
S’effondrent

Tant que le toit sera là, tant que les lumières seront
S’envole)
Que mes jambes)
J’irai de ma tchatche jusqu’à ce que mes os


La musique c’est comme la magie, tu ressens un truc
Spécial quand tu es en plein dedans, tu craches tes trucs
Et les gens pigent ton truc /
C’est ton moment et à chaque minute tu t’y accroches
Parce que tu risques de plus jamais connaître ça à
Nouveau /
Alors tant que tu y es tu essayes d’en profiter au max et
Quand ton tour de piste est fini, il faut accepter que
C’est la fin, le bout du rouleau, moi j’ai une liste
Voilà dans l’ordre. On y va, Reggie, Jay-Z, Tupac et
Biggie, Andre d’Outkast, Jada, Kurupt, Nas et ensuite moi
Mais dans l’industrie je suscite des jalousies, alors
Quand je figure pas sur cette liste, ça me fait pas chier
C’est pour ça que tu me vois marcher peinard comme si
Rien ne pouvait m’emmerder, même si un mec sur deux
Arrive pas à avaler que je sois là /
Tu as horreur de ça mais tu sais que tu me dois le respect
De quoi faire bander la presse, comme Bobby et Whitney si
Nate levait la main sur moi


Refrain

Dès qu’un couplet commence je bouffe le cœur d’un MC
Qu’est-ce qu’il se dit ou se dit pas, il s’en prend à
Moi, c’est pas malin /
Et c’est absurde comment les gens gobent tout au mot
Près. J’ai sans doute jamais eu le soutien que je
Méritais /
Mais je serai jamais au service de quelqu’un, ma place est
Réservée à jamais. Si je quitte un jour cette terre, ce
Sera d’abord ma mort /
Car au cœur de mon cœur je sais que rien ne serait pire
C’est pour ça que je suis malin quand je ponds mes
Couplets /
Mes pensées sont sporadiques, je me comporte comme un
Drogué. Je tchatche comme si j’étais accro au crack
Comme si j’étais Kim Mathers /
Mais j’ai pas envie de passer mon temps à faire la
Guéguerre. En fait je préfèrerais poser un cul et
Descendre quelques rappeurs /
Donc c’est une attaque plein pot que je leur envoie, la
Chanson parle d’un combat rap pour l’électricité
Statique /
Parce que je pense pas vraiment que le fait d’être Slim
Soit important. Disque de platine, tout ça ça vaut rien si
Je suis pas celui qui déchire le plus /
Alors…

Refrain

Tant que le toit, tant que le toit tiendra bon
Tant que mes jambes, tant que mes jambes sous moi tiendront
Je, je tomberai pas, je tiendrai droit
L’impression que je suis imbattable!



This kind of music, use it, and you get amped to do shit
Whenever you hear some shit and you can't refuse it
It's just some shit for these kids to trash they rooms with
Just refuse whenever they asked to do shit
The type of shit that you don't have to ask who produced it
You just know that's the new shit
The type of shit that causes mass-confusion
And drastic movement of people acting stupid

You 'bout to witness hip-hop in it's most purest, most rawest form, flow almost flawless, most
Hardest, most honest known artist, chip off the old block, but ol' Doc is, {back}, looks like
Batman brought his own Robin, oh God, Sadam's got his own Laden, with his own private plane, his
Own pilot, set to blow college dorm rooms doors off the hinges, oranges, peach, pears, plums
Syringes, {vnn vnn}, yeah here I come, i'm inches, away from you, dear fear none, hip-hop is in
A state of 911, so

This kind of music, use it, and you get amped to do shit
Whenever you hear some shit and you can't refuse it
It's just some shit for these kids to trash they rooms with
Just refuse whenever they asked to do shit
The type of shit that you don't have to ask who produced it
You just know that's the new shit
The type of shit that causes mass-confusion
And drastic movement of people acting stupid

I'm still hearing those sirens
I'm still getting chased by those lights
Only the light's mine and my mic's on
And my time is none because I'm writing more
And I ain't here to meet a soul in this buisness
And I can't let y'all derail me man
I got young Kobe, homie, you gotta let go of Obie
We got them craps going on
And that yak going on
Soon as a nigga touch down back from tourin'
It's whateva, put that on the chedda man
But in the meantime, it's Jimmy Ivene time
Chase cheese, rhyme till my voice give out
This is it my nigga, this what we boast about
Now I'm here so shut your motherfuckin mouth

This kind of music, use it, and you get amped to do shit
Whenever you hear some shit and you can't refuse it
It's just some shit for these kids to trash they rooms with
Just refuse whenever they asked to do shit
The type of shit that you don't have to ask who produced it
You just know that's the new shit
The type of shit that causes mass-confusion
And drastic movement of people acting stupid

There's a certain mystique when I speak
That you notice that it's sorta unique
Cause you know it's me, my poetry's deep
And I'm still matic the way I flow to this beat
You can't sit still, it's like tryin to smoke crack
And go to sleep, I'm strapped
Just knowing any minute I could snap
I'm the equivalent of what would happen if Bush rapped
I bully these rappers so bad lyrically
It ain't even funny, I ain't even hungry
It ain't even money, you can't pay me enough
For you to play me, it's cockamamie
You just ain't zany enough to rock with Shady
My noodle is cockadoodle, my clocks cuckoo
I got screws loose, yeahhh, the whole kitten-kaboodle
I'm just brutal. It's no rumor, I'm numero uno, assume it
There's no humor in it no more, you know
I'm rollin with a swollen bowling ball in my bag
You need a fag to come and tear a new hole in my ass

This kind of music, use it, and you get amped to do shit
Whenever you hear some shit and you can't refuse it
It's just some shit for these kids to trash they rooms with
Just refuse whenever they asked to do shit
The type of shit that you don't have to ask who produced it
You just know that's the new shit
The type of shit that causes mass-confusion
And drastic movement of people acting stupid




Hi, can I speak to Rex please?
How ya doin', um, my name's Ken
Um, I'm lookin' for a buddy
Just- cold work my wife is sitting right here
Um, just a buddy, like, you know, a friend
Someone to pal around with
I'm thirty-two, I'm, I'm single
Can it be arranged?
Um, whenever
If you have time tonight, um, that'd be great
I mean, I'm just- I'm really waiting
Cock massage, whatever
I'm just really ready
I've been waiting too long
I mean, I'm just ready
You know, like
Alright, do you use lubricants?
Cause- okay
Aww, good, thank god, cause-
I was wondering cause I never, I never did this before
But man... Rex
Really? Um, okay, what about tomorrow
Okay, if- what time should I call
Ok- are we gonna fuck or what cause I'm ready
Please?



Now greatings to da world
Vye here is da one called MNEK 'long side gong to da zilla

Standing at this liquor store
Whiskey coming through my pores
Feeling like I run this whole block
Lotto tickets, cheap beer
That's why you can catch me here
Tryna scratch my way up to the top

Cause my job got me going nowhere
So I ain't got a thing to lose
Take me to a place where I don't care
This is me and my liquor store blues

I'll take one shot for my pain
One drag for my sorrow
Get messed up today
I'll be okay tomorrow
One shot for my pain
One drag for my sorrow
Get messed up today
I'll be okay tomorrow

Me and my guitar, tonight
Singing to the city lights
Tryna leave with more than what I got
Cause 68 cent just ain't gonna pay the rent
So I'll be out here 'til they call the cops


Here come Junior Gong
I'm flying high like superman
And thinking that I run the whole block
I dunno if it's just because
Pineapple kush between my jaws
Has got me feeling like I'm on top
Feeling like I would stand up to de cops
And stand up to de bigga heads
Becaw de whole ah de ah saps
All de talk dem a talk
And dem fly make nah drop
Nuff ghetto youth cannot escape de trap


Now greatings to da world
Vyes to da one called MNEK 'long side gong to da zilla
A.K.A. Damian junior gong Eminem
Yes sir
Ya best believe, ha ha ha



You better get back, get back
You better get back, get back get back
You better get back, get back
You better get back, get back get back

Doing a ron on doctrine and stompin’ oxygen
Hittin’ with sudden force, then your boy laying in the same
Smuggle a gun in court and shoot the judge
A double deuce with slugs, and Proof on drugs
Will turn you to a rapper that you used to love
High from your medicine cabinet, pills
Grabbing the steel, leaping off of buildings that haven’t been built
I’m not the best yet, ‘cause I haven’t been killed
I’m laughing at you faggot rappers with deals

You better get back, get back
You better get back, get back get back
You better get back, get back
You better get back, get back get back

Disappointed in my dentist appointment
He only gave me the fucking gas for thirty minutes this morning
Went to the hospital to get a chest X-ray
Checked out the next day, in a dress with a sex change
I’m having a bad day, my fucking dads gay
I hate fags and I’m fucking mad ‘cause I don’t have AIDS
All I wanna do is die, I tried suicide six times
Couldn’t even do it right
Relaxed had a relapse and called three cabs
And had to be dragged back to rehab with bloody kneecaps
Enrolled myself in a twelve step program
Tripped on the first step, and got pinned down in a choke slam
I sware to God this pop culture comes any closer
I’m kicking his whole fucking wall over
Two more shots and it’s all over
I’m all over this wall, try not to fall over

You better get back, get back
You better get back, get back get back
You better get back, get back
You better get back, get back get back

BLAOW BLAOW, shots in broad day
The bitch shouldn’t have been in the way
Me shady and mic fucking a hermaphrodite
My little sister was a virgin, till late last night
Tell all my boys take turns







Yo, Manix man, I think I just spotted my prey
There she is; check her out
Yea I know she's with her man and everything but...
I can still get her man, 'cause you know me
Just drop a couple of smooth rhymes on her
And I got her you know what I'm saying?
Aight, I'll tell you what I'mma do about her man!
Aight, Check this out...

Hey baby, let me have a word with your man
I'd like you to enter my fortress
Just cause you are just the most gorgeous
Woman I've ever seen and for just
The next few hours of ya life I'd like to
Bring out the real woman inside you despite you
Might be in love and all that with your, man
But lemme get chat with you
Why don't we get to know each other, haven't you
Ever wondered what it was like to date an M.C.?
Now what's a woman like you, without a man like me?
And someone like yourself I can grow very fond of
Beyond a doubt and I would always hold onto your
Love, and be faithful I promise
Cause I'm as
Loyal as a puppy, and I'd treat you like a goddess
That we would've stumble onto each other but first, wait
Before you're lured, I want to know if you're insured
And if you're sure, you're gonna be able to endure
A tremendous amount of pain that seems endless
Strenuous brawn and brain, but yet when this
Whole thing is over and I make it through the ride
Then I'd gladly stand by your side




Now listen to me, while you're kissing her cheek
And smearing her lipstick, slip this in her drink
Now all you gotta do is nibble on this little bitch's earlobe
You shouldn't take advantage of her, it's not fair)
Yo, look at her bush, does it got hair?
Fuck this bitch right here on the spot, bare
'til she passes out and she forgot how she got there
No but I seen the porno with Sun Doobiest!
Man, fuck that, hit that shit raw dog and bail








Why am I a dick?
I need a new set of morals
What does snoop and daft punk do?
They don’t know what you know
Bring it down
And watch this braggart smell that dross's ass alright


The day was rough
I can hear your stertorous heaving it kept me wakeful and restless, but I've had enough
Awake all night, as my heart screamed out to him in endless warrens
I want to be near you, to hear you
But I swear it was a cycle on repeat
So, I dumped everything just to bear you
Walking awake like a sleepwalker that's what my life's about, in case you're wondering
A shadow through some real fight and shit, there's no mercy
The night was long, I was walking all night
There was nothing I grabbed that I could digest
So I sat there with dyspepsia
That's what the moon-walker asked me to do in his dying song
Ha, ha, ha, ha
I'm think I am the best, I don't need to be reminded, I hear it so many times when you play it right
You say it to me in whispers when I'm sleeping like you don't want me to hear it say it to me for real ever now
I'll shower out spit from my mouth, when I hit the right answers to the questions in the final round
There ain't gonna be no fright, no regrets
Cause I'm gonna learn this rap up your game
These people say learning this rap is a bigger crime
The mutiny I commit was conflicting carnage, yours was licking some calcium off chalk kid
There are charges against me as a soldier with a sound mind
I heard cries of people, they were howling to jump into the river
I said you don't need to jump to beat them son'
You will learn, oh! uh! what about the girl with no morals that, you said it there hon'
Was she any better than the one giving her boss a blowjob under his desk nun?
You remember last night when you were speared and lost your virginity
How did that taste? does it look like fame got some to give you eh? I think, they want more copulation now
My frown is so tightly packed to see you in your morals cow
You lost it all, now just pack and get out, cause I've begun to teach you, no I'm not out


Moral world is a grave state of affair, graver than outbreak
It's the way it gets the man to be of one mind with that of his woman, reminds him he's no wreck
There aren't circumstances which makes a woman forget herself
They are created only cause she wants to go there to be an elf
Moral world is a grave state of affair, graver than outbreak
It's the way it gets the man to be of one mind with that of his woman, reminds him he's no wreck
There aren't circumstances which makes a woman forget herself
They are created only cause she wants to go there to be an elf
Moral world is a grave state of affair, graver than outbreak
It's the way it gets the man to be of one mind with that of his woman, reminds him he's no wreck
There aren't circumstances which makes a woman forget herself
They are created only cause she wants to go there to be an elf


Cardinal sins are venial for this verse
The upshot that rung in my ears was that you are a whore
The verisimilitude of the vermins vandalized your morals for real
It was all in vain for zoerick is a vacuous vanadium vaccinated to vacillate
With the number of men you've fucked
A sordid virago will soon be on the street screaming to save your soul
Your solipsism is self annihilating
So just know that you could be your only solace
Cause the questions you answered were vapid
She'd dig in nails and tear down your throat cause you don't know ace
Please pray that we keep calm, make jesus our best
And not hurt ourselves
I'm going to be around to see you moan under your breath
Cry bitch, cry your motherfucking guts out if you ever had it
You wanted to throw out every little pride cause you had it
Where were your morals when we were asking you
You have them, faith in all those who are away from hurting you, Al Pacino haunts on Andrei's philosophy of riding cars
There will be no hurting you
Remember all the trauma that you had, It'll soak the pain that's in you
Keep the card open and I'll even show it to you
I'll gift you a way that tells you what's ahead of you
It'll prepare you for the tests that in it too
That's what we get, you know violence isn't my way
Whether you like it or not time isn't enough but my crowd ain't running away
I have my walls with Christ painted on it, Dr. Dre
But I swear you could have sling her
There are some answers that I demand to know
Understand it and fathom it too
So what does it make me?
A humanoid blabbering maniac of a zoerick figure
“I get bored of pretty things like you”
When your crazy bitch senses are tingling
I swear you said, “I get bored of ugly things even quicker”, I mean Quicker
Diamond in box in my back pocket next time you think about stealing that
What has it to do with your name?
Or Showing off your crazy stuffed breast assets too



Moral world is a grave state of affair, graver than outbreak
It's the way it gets the man to be of one mind with that of his woman, reminds him he's no wreck
There aren't circumstances which makes a woman forget herself
They are created only cause she wants to go there to be an elf
Moral world is a grave state of affair, graver than outbreak
It's the way it gets the man to be of one mind with that of his woman, reminds him he's no wreck
There aren't circumstances which makes a woman forget herself
They are created only cause she wants to go there to be an elf
Moral world is a grave state of affair, graver than outbreak
It's the way it gets the man to be of one mind with that of his woman, reminds him he's no wreck
There aren't circumstances which makes a woman forget herself
They are created only cause she wants to go there to be an elf


These people said my actions don’t mean a thing
There isn't anything I'm doing that'll make anyone believe in what I think, It don't prove a thing
You got be at the trial, paying a social price
For the bombs you pull out
I swear I can't be lying, Mr. Birdy was invisible and he stood right there by my side
Cause everything I read got fragmented, I was the only one to see him there
Was it a girl or a boy I couldn't have known by then
The woman was gnawing on the lizards head
I asked her don't it have poison in it, she said she was fed on poison before she born
She asked me questions, demanded answers for every suggestion I ever made
I told her she was a loser and a motherfucking nerve varying ass, I rhymed every word she ever said
From morning to night in that stage light dad
She pushed me hard and clamped my bearding ass right there
Like a Sinner, a hater and a liar
Then I realized it was me from last night the sleepwalker under moonlight
There was a deeper mystery hidden inside that side of me
It was not just me, but your soul latched on to me
Like it wouldn’t let go
It pushed me hard even though it was my everything
It was not a shadow, and you are not a spring fielder throwing me off like a violent singer
I could have asked your name and thrown us off this stingy black mans’ game
Still you wanna know about me, ain’t it ya?
I can’t be an emotional fool no more
I smile for you and invite you with open arms now
But then it’s you, ain't’ it?
You ran away from me and went to the dark, cause you loved ‘em there, over me
I saw you inside of me, go over to that boy
Take that pregnancy test like you could get pregnant out of masturbating, ha, ha
You ask me where is it in here jackass?
I broke the glasses like it was for you
You like it and you know you think like you’re singing like me too, puppies don’t eat Beatles man
So, Take my head and put it in a bottle with knife in it
Watch as the blood pours and drink from it will ya?
Denial hides and disguises me, fuck it when I can't
Cause I think I’ll even have it on ecstasy
Maybe I’m lost and intentionally ignored your things literally
One of the clearest sign of a moral life is right speech
I could spurn all of it too, so I wiped you off from everything
So, you don’t have a place to stay and no money in your pocket
Still I hear you fucking diss and hum on my head, it’s fucking scary
Maybe now, you can ram your own head, I really wouldn’t care
I hear you plucking your eyebrows and hear it real loud too as I
Ting, ting, ting
There is nothing I wouldn’t say
Watching you fight in the stadium and hear you slave for indefinite cars
This is my only invocation, you get beaten so bad that your bones crumble to be sent over to a charnel house
Its yo morals I need
There is no backing off form the lightning streak, its straight on my feet


Moral world is a grave state of affair, graver than outbreak
It's the way it gets the man to be of one mind with that of his woman, reminds him he's no wreck
There aren't circumstances which makes a woman forget herself
They are created only cause she wants to go there to be an elf
Moral world is a grave state of affair, graver than outbreak
It's the way it gets the man to be of one mind with that of his woman, reminds him he's no wreck
There aren't circumstances which makes a woman forget herself
They are created only cause she wants to go there to be an elf
Moral world is a grave state of affair, graver than outbreak
It's the way it gets the man to be of one mind with that of his woman, reminds him he's no wreck
There aren't circumstances which makes a woman forget herself
They are created only cause she wants to go there to be an elf
Ha, ha, he, he, he
Where am I the dick?



I love bein hated, it great it
Let's me know that I made it
I wouldn't have it no other way
I wouldn't trade it for the world
Only let's me know that I'm loved
By so many other motherfuckers that ain't you
And as long, as you keep fuckin with us, we keep fuckin you up
And keep pullin the rug from up under you
And what's ever more fucked up, is we enjoy what were doin
So much there ain't nothin that we love more than +Pullin Your Skirts Up+
And exposin you hoes so much, people are startin to wonder
What's up with them fuckin one dough a man under-els
Do unto others of you will have done under you
So who the fuck you motherfuckers gonna run to
You will ask youself, how come your mans
Didn't enter that last round that he had in Curtis Jackson's ass while he had the chance
You keep askin us to keep it on wax but we can't
This is past any irrationalization
We have captured national media attention
Conversation is senseless, you can sense the tension start buildin
Soon as we enter the '106th & Park' building
Someone's gonna get killed and I swear to God
If someone so much as even touches one of my people
I'll put a million on his head
And you ain't got the funds to match or counteract it
But I'd rather rap than get into this gangsta shit
And it ain't because I'm a bitch
It's because I ain't a bitch, I don't endanger people that I'm with
I'm a general, I ain't Bush, I don't send my soldiers to war
I'm right there in the middle of the shit with 'em, so when I do get 'em
Orders to storm your headquarters, you'll be fuckin with a...

Fuckin with a peacekeeper, see you the nigga that greet this lyrical meat cleaver
That I eat ya, niggas wanna keep speakin, like it ain't even that deep
I got heat that'll sweep a niggas street
See I wouldn't fuck with me neither, only heaven can help ya
I'll be searchin for you longer than the "Legend of Zelda"
Without a failure, there's gonna be hell to tell the
Captain that a bassett hound couldn't even smell ya
Body, when I hide ya, I be on that mob shit
You another Hoffa, under the Renaissance bitch
You get bombed like Lebanon with my own tactic
I snatch your head like one of Saddam's kids

Doe Rae Me Fa So La Dee Da
Don't play me cause your washed up, lost your spot
Mama say mama sa Macosaca
Ja quit playing now get off your not 2Pac
Doe Rae Me cause we're hot and you're not
Going at me is the only shot you got
Ja quit playing now get off your not 2Pac
You can get popped after all that shit you talk

Niggas is so gangsta, Niggas is thugs
Niggas'll spend their whole life peddlin drugs
Slanging dope in hopes of one day bein able
To own their own label and give the game up
Some niggas came up, some just didn't
That's just the way it is, if it ain't meant it, it just isn't
Some niggas'll get money and pay niggas to back em
So they can act up, feel comfortable, and rap tough
And that's as backwards, cuz them niggas just gone keep coming back
And that's when extortion happens
You struggle to get free, I know how this shit be
You deal with anything to live legitimately
But you gone find if you do get in this industry
It's best to be business with me than against me
Niggas get behind mics and ain't even MC's
Niggas get on MTV just to diss me
This shit don't even piss me off
I'm laughin all the way to the bank
Watchin the satellite from a Bentley
You niggas don't even got a car
You're so far under my radar
I don't even know who the fuck you are
To tell you to suck my dick while I'm pissin
I don't even listen to your shit to know who the fuck I'm dissin
The media just feeds into these feuds
Tryin to add fuel to the fire. This little nigga, Ja Rule
Talking bout he's gonna slap me. Nigga please
You gotta jump and swing up to hit me in the knees
I laugh at these magazines when they interview em
All they doin is making fake threats to us through em
And pussy you're not Pac, I knew em
Pac was a real nigga, you just a fuckin insult to em
It's too bad we had to fallout before he passes
If he could see this shit now, he'd be whoopin your ass
You're talkin to a pioneer who engineered this shit for 19 years
Who you got in your ear? I don't even gotta say it, the fans know
Quit tryin to be tough, nigga, you look like a asshole

Doe Rae Me Fa So La Dee Da
Don't play me cause your washed up, lost your spot
Mama say mama sa Macosaca
Ja quit playing now get off your not 2Pac
Doe Rae Me cause we're hot and you're not
Going at me is the only shot you got
Ja quit playing now get off your not 2Pac
You can get popped after all that shit you talk

Hey dog, I'ma walk like a beast, talk like the streets
I'ma stay blazin New York wit the heat
Stalk on the beat, walk wit my feet
Understand my pain, the rain ain't sleet
Peep how I'm moving, peep where I'm going
Shit don't seep, then sleep not knowin
But I'ma keep growing, getting larger than life
Easy-going with the same one that started the fight
He be knowing how dog get, when dog gon bite
Tried to show him the dog shit, it's dog for life
Grand champ, and my Blood Line is tight
Cuz it's all good, it's all right
Niggas tried to holla, but couldn't holla back
Now they gots to swallow, everything in the sac
Blood Line, and, we can go track for track
Damn dog, why'd you have to do them niggas like that?

Doe Rae Me Fa So La Dee Da
Don't play me cause your washed up, lost your spot
Mama say mama sa Macosaca
Ja quit playing now get off your not 2Pac
Doe Rae Me cause we're hot and you're not
Going at me is the only shot you got
Ja quit playing now get off your not 2Pac
You can get popped after all that shit you talk

Blood sweat and tears, you did not create me
There'd be no West coast without me
And now you tryin to act like my rival?
Watch what you say partner, it's a small earth
Don't play games with your life nigga, it's not worth
Put your hands up people, it's time to fight now
I beat holes in your chest, remain hostile
They say that pride is the sign of a foolish man
Live and direct in the flesh, I'm right in FRONT OF YOU!

Doe Rae Me Fa So La Dee Da
Don't play me cause your washed up, lost your spot
Mama say mama sa Macosaca
Ja quit playing now get off your not 2Pac
Doe Rae Me cause we're hot and you're not
Going at me is the only shot you got
Ja quit playing now get off your not 2Pac
You can get popped after all that shit you talk

If I could capture the rage of today's youth and bottle it
Crush the glass from my bare hands and swallow it
Then spit it back in the faces of you racists
And hypocrites who think the same shit but don't say shit
You Liberace's, Versace's, and you nazis
Watch me, cause you thinking you got me in this hot seat
You motherfuckers wanna JUDGE me cause you're NOT me
You'll never STOP me, I'm TOP speed as you POP me
I came to save these new generations of babies
From parents who failed to raise 'em cause they're lazy
To grow to praise me I'm makin 'em go crazy
That's how I got this whole nation to embrace me
And you fugazi if you think I'ma admit wrong
I cripple any hypocritic critic I'm sic'd on
And this song is for any kid who gets picked on
A sick song to retaliate to, and it's...



Doe Rae Me Fa So La Dee Da
Don't play me cause your washed up, lost your spot
Mama say mama sa Macosaca
Ja quit playing now get off your not 2Pac
Doe Rae Me cause we're hot and you're not
Going at me is the only shot you got
Ja quit playing now get off your not 2Pac
You can get popped after all that shit you talk

Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now?
Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-la-la la la la la

Fuck y'all niggas

*GUNSHOT*










Co-produced by Slim for FBT Productions
Recorded and mixed by Kevin Wilder and Rboert "Flipside" Handy at Bassment Sounds Inc., Ferndale, MI 48220
Mastered by Grant Mohrman at Pearl Sound, Canton, MI 48187
Manufactured and distributed by WEB Entertainment
430 W. Eight Mile Rd
Ferndale, MI 48220



℗ © 1996 WEB Entertainment




It's the Bushman with art in a dart
It’s six o clock sharp you hear them dogs startin to bark
And while they're carving a mark in ya arm, with teeth sharper than sharks
Im out in the parking lot stripping ya car for ya parts
Boy I was rhyming when you was mispronouncing my name
Like E-minem, now you look for my tapes and can’t find em
Back in the day I'da killed for some radio play
But now i’m with Dre, and I still don’t give a fuck either way
But ima trust Bush to give me a thrust and a push
While these other radio stations are busy playin’ puss
So look to the next man and if he ain’t clapping his hands
Throw him in the bush so fast he gets stabbed in his back with a branch
It’s 98 the one station that runs town
And two DJs rippin’ from sun up to sun down
From sun down to sun up
Slim shady still don’t give a thumbs down
With three fingers and keep the middle one up
It’s 98 WJLB
Watch in October for the Slim Shady LP

Bushman art in a dart
Bushman art in a dart



Are you feeling good about the album at this point?

In this last crunch, what have you been working on?


Rolling Stone's Review of Eminem's The Marshall Mathers LP 2

So why did you dye your hair blonde again?

Did physically looking like that help you get back in the mindset or change the way you were recording?


That's crazy.

A lot of people, maybe even you, think the original is your best album.

You've been hard on Relapse, but Tyler, the Creator says that it's his favorite hip-hop record in years. He loves that record.

On Recovery, obviously the world came to you on that one. How do you feel now about that record?

So how did you come to decide to designate this the sequel to The Marshall Mathers LP? How did you decide to make your life miserable like that?

Okay.

So did seeking out Rick Rubin come from that direction? You were like "Why don't I go back to the source?"

You've called Rick "Yoda" – was there still stuff to be learned from him at this point in your career?

He's very psychological, right?

Did he have all the old drum machines sitting around the studio?
Oh, he's got some shit in the stash. Yeah. Definitely.

So much has changed in hip-hop since you started producing – did you find the beats you were making on your own were influenced by newer stuff?

Basically, if there are outside influences that are current, you let that come in from the other producers, but your shit is your shit.

On the new song "Legacy" you're talking about yourself in detail as a kid. What does it take to get back in that mindset at your age?

Tribulations.

I just love that you rhyme "Onyx" with "comics" on that song.

You've praised the Beastie Boys' evolution, but it doesn't seem like you're going to have a "the disrespect for women has got to be through" moment.

You've written a bunch of your own hooks, and even sing some of them. Where does your sense of melody come from?

Maybe it's just pure instinct.

Having Kendrick Lamar on your album, did you have any concern that he might go in and try to upstage you?

Is there advice you would give him at this point?

Fundamentally, do you feel like a rap god or do you feel like an underdog?






'Eyo, what's going on, my name is Eminem and you're listening to the Stretch Armstrong and Whoo Kid mixtape, stupid
The Murda Mixtape; if you don't like it suck my penis
You know that little thing

May I have your attention, please?
May I have your attention, please?
Will the real Slim Shady please stand up?
I repeat, will the real Slim Shady please stand up?
We're gonna have a problem here

Y'all act like you never seen a white person before
Jaws all on the floor like Pam
Like Tommy just burst in the door
And started whoopin' her ass worse than before
It's the return of the… "Ah, wait, no way, you're kidding
He didn't just say what I think he did, did he?"
And Dr. Dre said... nothing, you idiots
Feminist women love Eminem
"Chicka, chicka, chicka, Slim Shady, I'm sick of him
Look at him, walkin' around, grabbin' his you-know-what
Flippin' the you-know-who," "Yeah, but he's so cute though."
Yeah, I probably got a couple of screws up in my head loose
But no worse than what's goin' on in your parents' bedrooms
Sometimes I wanna get on TV and just let loose
"My bum is on your lips, my bum is on your lips"
And that's the message that we deliver to little kids
And expect them not to know what a woman's clitoris is
Of course they're gonna know what intercourse is
By the time they hit fourth grade
They've got the Discovery Channel, don't they?
We ain't nothing but mammals—well, some of us, cannibals
Who cut other people open like cantaloupes
But if you feel like I feel, I got the antidote
Women, wave your pantyhose, sing the chorus, and it goes…

I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?

Will Smith don't gotta cuss in his raps to sell records
You think I give a damn about a Grammy?
Half of you critics can't even stomach me
Let alone stand me
"But Slim, what if you win, wouldn't it be weird?"
Why, so you guys could just lie to get me here?
So you can sit me here next to Britney Spears?
Shit, Christina Aguilera better switch me chairs
So I can sit next to Carson Daly and Fred Durst
And hear 'em argue over who she gave head to first
Little bitch put me on blast on MTV
"Yeah, he's cute, but I think he's married to Kim, hee-hee."
I should download the audio on MP3
And show the whole world how you gave Eminem VD
I'm sick of you little girl and boy groups
All you do is annoy me
So I have been sent here to destroy you
And there's a million of us just like me
Who cuss like me, who just don't give a fuck like me
Who dress like me; walk, talk, and act like me
And just might be the next best thing, but not quite me

I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?

I'm like a head trip to listen to
‘Cause I'm only givin' you things you joke about with your friends inside your livin' room
The only difference is I got the balls to say it in front of y'all
I just get on the mic and spit it
And whether you like to admit it
I just shit it better than 90% of you rappers out can
Kids eat up these albums like Valiums?"
It's funny, ‘cause at the rate I'm going, when I'm 30
I'll be the only person in the nursing home flirting
Pinching nurse's asses when I'm jacking off with Jergens
And I'm jerking, but this whole bag of Viagra isn't working
And every single person is a Slim Shady lurking
He could be working at Burger King
Spittin' on your onion rings
Or in the parking lot, circling, screamin', "I don't give a fuck!"
With his windows down and his system up
So will the real Shady please stand up
And put one of those fingers on each hand up?
And be proud to be outta your mind and outta control
And one more time, loud as you can, how does it go?

I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up

Ha ha, I guess there’s a Slim Shady in all of us
Fuck it, let’s all stand up







Get your rusty ass over 'fore I put a shine to it
See man, it's man I trust so I'mma rhyme to it
20% out of a hundred groups are mediocre
They took a medicine effect and I'm a pretty choker
So once you got a couple microphones well I'mma rep 'em
You got some Nile rapper rivers too, well I'mma check 'em!
Because they new to this, I'm true to this!
They shouldn't be doin' this
A lot of rappers reppin' keepin' miles is a few in this
Game, to maintain, I keep it going on
You hear the guitar and the funky beat I'm flowin' on
I don't tell 'em when I see it, I just spot it
Just runnin' me, have soul and ain't the only person got it
And blacks don't have to act white if they like Red Hot Chili Peppers
And whites dont have to act black if they like Salt-n-pepa
So I'm Blackened like Metallica, look at me in shock
But nothing, else matters wherever I may roam
The microphone's my best friend and the stage is my home
Our music got the sounds, our rhythms got the hooks
I listen to Kenny Rogers, Marvin Gaye and Garth Brooks
But music is good music, the other, is mess



Yo, his palms are sweaty, knees weak, arms are heavy
He's nervous, but on the surface he looks calm and ready
To drop bombs, but he keeps on forgetting
What he wrote down, the whole crowd goes so loud
He opens his mouth, but the words won't come out
He's choking, how? Everybody's joking now
The clock's run out, time's up, over—blaow!
Snap back to reality, oh, there goes gravity, oh
There goes Rabbit, he choked, he's so mad, but he won't
Give up that easy, no, he won't have it, he knows
His whole back's to these ropes, it don't matter, he's dope
He knows that, but he's broke, he's so stagnant, he knows
When he goes back to this mobile home, that's when it's
Back to the lab again, yo!
This whole rhapsody
Better go capture this moment and hope it don't pass him

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better…

Back to reality, oh, there goes gravity, oh
There goes Rabbit, he choked, he's so mad, but he won't
Give up that easy, no, he won't have it, he knows
His whole back's to these ropes, it don't matter, he's dope
He knows that, but he's broke, he's so stagnant, he knows
When he goes back to this mobile home, that's when it's
Back to the lab again, yo!
This whole rhapsody
Better go capture this moment and hope it don't pass him

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better…



Hey there, little boys and girls
Today we're gonna to learn how to poison squirrels
But first, I'd like you to meet my friend Bob
Bob's 30 and still lives with his mom
And he don't got a job
'Cause Bob sits at home and smokes pot
But his twelve-year-old brother looks up to him an awful lot
And Bob likes to hang out at the local waffle spot
And wait in the parking lot for waitresses off the clock
When it's late and the lot gets dark
And fake like he walks his dog, drag 'em in the woods
And go straight to the chopping blocks
And even if they escaped and they got the cops
The ladies would all be so afraid, they would drop the charge
'Til one night Mrs. Stacey went off the job
When she felt someone grab her whole face
And said not to talk
But Bob wouldn't knock it off
'Cause he's crazy and off his rocker
Crazier than Slim Shady is off the vodka
You couldn't even take him to Dre's to get Bob a doctor
He grabbed Stace' by the legs as chopped it off her
But ever since the day Stacey went off to wander
They never found her, and Bob still hangs at the waffle diner
And that's the story of Bob and his marijuana
And what it might do to you
So see if the squirrels want any—it's bad for you

The kids, the kids!
Don't forget about the kids, the kids!
Shady, what about the kids, the kids?
Shady, what about the kids, the kids?
You gotta save the kids!

My penis is the size of a peanut, have you seen it?
Speakin' of peanuts, you know what else is bad for squirrels?
Ecstasy, it's the worst drug in the world
If someone ever offers it to you, don't do it
Kids, two hits'll probably drain all your spinal fluid
And spinal fluid is final, you won't get it back
So don't get attached, it'll attack every bone in your back
Meet Zach, twenty-one years old
After hangin' out with some friends
At a frat party, he gets bold
And the peer pressure will win every time you try to fight it
Suddenly, he starts to convulse
And his pulse goes into hyperdrive
And his eyes roll back in his skull {​​​*blblblblblb*}​​​
His back starts to look like the McDonald's Arches
He's on Donald's carpet, layin horizontal, barfin' {​​​*BLEH*}​​​
And everyone in the apartment starts laughin' at him
"H- hey Adam, Zach is a jackass, look at him!"
'Cause they took it too, so they think it's funny
So they're laughing at basically nothing
Except maybe wasting the money
Meanwhile, Zach's in a coma, the action is over
And his back and his shoulders
And that's the story of Zach, the ecstasy maniac
So don't even feed that to squirrels, class
'Cause it's bad for you

The kids, the kids!
Shady, what about the kids-
Don't forget about the kids, the kids!

And last but not least, one of the most humungous
Problems among young people today is fungus
It grows from cow manure
They pick it out, wipe it off, bag it up
And you put it- put it- put it- put it- put it-















Yeah, Ya Boy
I want to thank David Foster
For letting me bring this platinum back
Let's get it, yeah

It's time for me to go home, but she still want me to
Been committed all day but she still say
She don't want me to go, she keep tellin' me ta
I'm a stay with ya, I'm a get paid with ya
I'm a stay with ya, I'm a get paid with ya

I wake up every day with the same plans
She's on my mind and there's no other game plan
I'm always with her I could never be a changed man
And I been knowin' this since back in the days man
My grandmother used to tell me she was dangerous
But people was gettin' money on her and gettin' paid and shit
I said I want money too, I'm a mess with you
I said holla at Ya Boy, she like what it do
From New York to California people grind on ya
And they never stop, even though a stop sign is on ya
I'm a take my time and flick nicks and dimes on ya
I ain't tryin' to unwind but she keep cryin' like won't ya

It's time for me to go home, but she still want me to
Been committed all day but she still say
She don't want me to go, she keep tellin' me ta
I'm a stay with ya, I'm a get paid with ya
I'm a stay with ya, I'm a get paid with ya

I ain't even goin' lie dog, I think I love her
I might even just put her on my CD cover
Squeeze and hug her even share her with my little brother
She want me to stay from sundown 'til the sun come up
Don't let her looks fool you, she get bad at night
If you with her you might get grabbed at night
Shot and stabbed at night, she took that med that night
I never beat her I told her I never leave her
When there's nowhere else to go, that she's there whenever I need her
I like to get high, she there growin' my reefer

It's time for me to go home, but she still want me to
Been committed all day but she still say
She don't want me to go, she keep tellin' me ta
I'm a stay with ya, I'm a get paid with ya
I'm a stay with ya, I'm a get paid with ya

If you love her like I do, and hug her like I do
Then you know what this song implies to
Them other type of people they be hatin' on her
'Cause they know Ya Boy affiliated with her, chyeah
This for my people on the corner
Get your money on her from NYC to Arizona
From Florida all the way to California
The whole wide world from Tacoma to Barcelona
Make small moves if you're slick you's a goner
I'm a be fine 'cause she knows I'm a soldier
She's my bitch for life, we don't ever fight
And my bitch don't ever say goodnight, she say

It's time for me to go home, but she still want me to
Been committed all day but she still say
She don't want me to go, she keep tellin' me ta
I'm a stay with ya, I'm a get paid with ya
I'm a stay with ya, I'm a get paid with ya

I'm a stay with ya
I'm a get paid with ya
I'm a stay with ya
I'm a get paid with ya



There are enough insults in my head to fill up a swear jar
And have it overflowing
So don't get me going don't dare start
You'll never see me again Amelia Earhart
I'm popping a wheelie, off to a really unfair start
I'm past grinding, for me - guess I just be grounded up
Like Ground Round or a pound of chuck
Tightly-wound as fuck
Till the Fire Marshalls come shut
Fire Marshall down and up
I suggest you better shut the fuck up
And stop fucking around and duck!
I ain't playing this time, I told you I'm out for blood
So to say I "keep it 100" would probably sound redundant
Like calling a bitch a ho or asking a gal to suck
And blow on your dick cock. Is she up to screwing? Down to fuck?
It's a man's world and I'm trapped in a land of smut
With a thousand sluts strapped and muzzled
Running through a house of mutts
In other words, I'm shutting every one of you bitches' mouths up
And I'm watching my language if I tell you to kiss my fucking butt!
And ain't shit changed, my shit still don't stink, player
My farts may have gotten staler ever since
I became a trailer park celebrity
Maybe my complexion became a little paler
Poster child for white trash
I'm a Garbage Pail Kid sailor, yeah
See me I'm all up on your bitch means I'mma rape her
All I got for these hoes is dick, duct tape and a stapler
So bitch, you better look for table scraps to scrape up
I don't subscribe to the News or the Free Press
But homie, I get the paper!
That was fuckin' stupid...















"Breaking news
Detroit rapper Eminem cancels his sold-out European tour
To check himself into rehab
After admitting an addiction to sleep medication
We'll have more on this story as it develops"
"Shady Records recording artist Obie Trice
Has apparently survived a gunshot to the head
In what appears to be a random drive-by shooting
Meanwhile, Eminem is rumored to be alienated
On again/off again relationship with..."
"This just in, a tour bus involving Eminem's bus..."
"Updating a story we brought you earlier
About gunfire at an after-hours club
We've learned that the rapper Proof has been fatally shot."
"Shady/Aftermath recording artist..."
"Long-time best friend of Eminem
And a member of the rap group D12"
"D12, back in the news again today..."
"Is it a sabbatical or the end?
The rumors and speculation continue to swirl around Eminem
He insists he's just taking a break
But doubters believe he's retiring, leaving us all to ask
'Will the real Slim Shady please stand up?




This has been the Shady Classics Mixtape


Thank you, Whoo Kid, for 10 years of Shade 45
10 years of suffering
10 years of wanting to fire you
10 years of firing you, re-hiring you and firing you again

I hate that motherfucker

We hate you, and we love you
But we really hate you, and guess what?
You're fired
But you're hired
But then, after you put this out, you're fired... again
ShadyXV in stores November 24th
Shady Records greatest hits, plus 12 new bangers from me, Slaughterhouse, Yelawolf, D12, and more














Tá ligado eu nem entendo...
O ano passado eu não era ninguém
Esse ano tô vendendo discos
Agora todo mundo quer chegar em mim como se eu devesse algo
Que caralho vocês querem de mim...
10 milhões de dólares?
Sai daqui, porra!


Sou apenas um cara normal
Ninguém nunca se importou antes


Ae, você talvez me verá correndo
Você talvez me verá andando
Você talvez me verá caminhando com cachorro rottweiler morto
Com sua cabeça cortada na estacionamento com um colar de espinhos
Gritando com ele
Porque o filho da puta não quer parar de latir
Ou apoiado pra fora de um janela, com um arma engatilhada
Dirigindo pelo quarteirão no carro em que balearam o 'Pac
Procurando os assassinos do BIG, estou vestido ridículo...
Azul e vermelho, tipo eu não vejo qual é o problema
Barril duplo medida 12 maior do que o Chris Wallace
Irritado, porque Biggie e 'Pac perderam tudo isso
Essas imitações podres ficando ricos por causa deles
E pegar os dólares que deviam ter ficado dentro da carteira
E no meio de tudo isso, cristais e relógios de pulso
E vendo tudo isso eu tive que relaxar e ficar enjoado
E andando por ai com uma garrafa de Remy Martin
Eu sou anti-Backstreet e Ricky Martin
Com instintos pra matar N'Sync, não comecem
Esses bostas não sabem cantar e Britney é um lixo
Qual é, essa vaca é retardada? Me devolve meus 16 dólares de volta
Só vejo bichinhas em revistas sorrindo
O que aconteceu que éramos tão maus e violentos?
O que aconteceu com os bons tempos em que a gente batia nas pessoas
Pegava seus tênis e agasalhos e seu boné?
New Kids On The Block, chupam muita rola
Bandas de meninos e meninas me dão nojo
Mal posso esperar para pegar essas bichas em público
Um monte de criancinhas querem falar palavrões igual eu
Eu acho que fui colocado aqui pra perturbar o mundo
E destruir seu filho ou filha de 4 anos
E fui colocado aqui para botar medo em viados que espirram refrigerantes Faygo
E que se chamam de "Palhaços"
Porque eles parecem bichas
Viado 2 Dope e Viado Quieto...
Reivindicando Detroit
E eu não luto wrestling
Eu nocauteio vocês, seus porras de bichas
Pergunta pra eles do clube que eles estavam
Quando saíram de fininho...
Lá nos fundos quando viram a gente e saíram correndo
Olha vocês falando merda de novo
Quando vocês nem viram a estrada de South of 10
E eu não preciso da ajuda do D-12 para brigar com duas fêmeas
Com maquiagem, que talvez tente me arranhar com unhas postiças
"Slim Anus", pode crer que é Slim Anus...
Porque eu não fico fodido no meu que nem vocês, seus dois viados!


Eu não sou um lutador de wrestling
Venham me ver nas ruas sozinho
E se você quer falar merda


É porque vocês me amam que vocês esperam bastante de mim?
Sua putinha que curte grupinhos, sai fora
Vai transar com o Puffy
Agora por causa que meu cabelo é loiro
E essa cabeça doida que tenho, eu virei Pop?
Agora essas criancinhas me zoam e agem como bichinhas...
"Oh, ele fez umas parada com a Missy
Então ele acha que é muito bom pra fazer alguma coisa com o MCGet-Bizzy."
A porra da minha mãe está me processando por 10 milhões de dólares
Ela deve estar querendo um dólar por cada pílula que roubei
Caralho, onde vocês acham que eu peguei o costume?
Eu só tinha que entrar no quarto dela e levantar o colchão
Qual é vagabunda, Senhora Briggs ou Senhorita Mathers?
Falando que eu fabriquei o meu passado
Então me diga, que caralho que um cara tem que fazer?
A cada 1 milhão que eu ganho, outro parente me processa
Família brigando e esperneando pra ver quem me convida pra comer
Um meio irmão e irmã que nunca me viram
Ou sequer me deram uma ligação até me verem na TV
Agora tá todo mundo feliz e orgulho por mim
E pra completar, eu ando até a banca de jornais
Para comprar uma porra de revistinha barata com um vale-refeição
Pulei para a última página, passei rapidinho
E o que eu vejo?
Uma foto da minha grande bunda branca!
Uhh, aqui, Duplo-X L, Duplo-X L
Agora sua revista não vai ter nenhum problema pra vender...
Ah, foda-se, eu vou até comprar umas pra mim!


Sou apenas um cara normal
Ninguém nunca se importou antes



Little things start to trouble me pressure me and bother me
This shit is stressin me especially the poverty
I always wondered what my destiny would offer me
My only guess would be, accessory to robbery











I'd be a horrible mixtape DJ
I would be really fuckin bad
THIS IS MOTHERFUCKIN EMINEM!
Or just Eminem
Whatever you want to call me
And your listenin to the motherfuckin easy listenin sounds, or whatever
Clear your fuckin ear wax out
This is motherfuckin DJ Kay Slay
The Drama King and it goes a little somethin like this
Yo turn that click off, alright...

Look 

My music is soothin but it's also been proven
That it can put you in the mood to jump outta ya car while it's movin
You've been waitin on this moment, my sermon
Is like a omen, I'm servin, I'm Erick Sermon
I saw the window was open and I jumped through it
My shit if you don't get pumped to it
I quit, here's my rhyme book go head and thumb through it
And pick what you want from it, rummage ya find somethin
You can use to jump someone and roll up bumpin
I'm constantly coppin over you, squatin, shit is gotten
To the point, where I'm ain't even writin no more I'm just jottin
This is chicken scratch
Shit is sickin, I've been kickin ass off bullshit, throw away rhymes, pick a batch
I live for the love of rap
You crazy? I've made beats for Jay-Z for free
Page me, you need a beat
You Canibus? then it's Dre's beat
You Kay Slay? the fee's waived
I stay beefin with JD to the day Dre two-ways me
That it's ok to stop blazin him
Oops I put it out I apologize now is too late G
It's on tape and the tape leaked
"Say what you say" motherfucker
Drama King, Kay Slay motherfucker
We dictate these mixtapes motherfucker
Xzibit blaze this little gay midget cocksucker



Want some water?
No, I think I'm okay
Rainshine

I don't care how sick you say it's gonna get
My big ass bubble has not busted yet
Because I feel
I feel fine, I feel fine
Yes I feel
I feel fine, I feel fine
Yes I feel, I feel fine, I feel fine
Yes I feel, I feel fine

New time again, dis a new time again
For de time now, de dodge a man him come through and then
Me no want no war, me say between no man
'Cause this hear time dodge a no work for satan
Lord have mercy
Lord have his mercy
Lord have mercy
Lord have his mercy

You know what?
I've got nothing to complain about
My breath is bad
But my beer is stout
So take my hand and let us jump about
'Cause we got nothing to complain about
The sky is grey
I think it's gonna rain
But that's okay
'Cause hell, I like the rain
So join me here in this here refrain
And shut your shit
And don't complain
What?
'Cause we got nothing to complain about
And you got nothing to complain about
So c'mon
It ain't that difficult to figure out
That we've got nothing to complain about
So c'mon

A man a shot upon him, life through the dark
When you check it out, it's a natural fact
Jah jah have good judgement when you do all you want
And if...

You can speak of babylon while you're around me
'Cause every single little thing I see astounds me
Rainshine...

Inna this time, me no fight 'gainst no man
Me no want no man come try to test dodge
'Cause when you check it out and go upon one mission
And God and the Father and me inspiration
Me test upon a mission and a one-way plan
Me no want no man try disrespect me fashion
'Cause when you check it out and put inspiration
And that is how a you go reach Mount Zion

I feel magical, mystical, motherful, logistical

Lord have his mercy

Magical, mystical, motherful, logistical
Magical, mystical
Magical
Magical, mystical

Look around X3
On the ground X2
There's a finger on my blister



Lyrics for Chokin This Pig by Eminem
I am he as you are he as you are me and we are all together
See how they run like pigs from a gun, see how they fly
I'm crying

Sitting on a cornflake, waiting for the van to come
Corporation T-shirt, stupid bloody Tuesday
Man, you been a naughty boy, you let your face grow long
I am the eggman, they are the eggmen
I am the walrus
Goo Goo G'joob

Mister City Policeman sitting-
Pretty little policemen in a row
See how they fly like Lucy in the Sky, see how they run
I'm crying
I'm crying, crying

Yellow matter custard, dripping from a dead dog's eye
Crabalocker fishwife, pornographic priestess
Boy, you been a naughty girl, you let your Knickers down
I am the eggman, they are the eggmen
I am the walrus
Goo Goo G'joob

Sitting in an English garden waiting for the sun
If the sun don't come, you get a tan from standing in the English rain
I am the eggman, they are the eggmen
I am the walrus
Goo Goo G'joob, Goo-Goo Goo G'joob
Goo Goo G'joob, Goo-Goo Goo G'joob

Expert, texpert, choking smokers
Don't you think the joker laughs at you?
See how they smile like pigs in a sty, see how they snide
I'm crying

Semolina Pilchard climbing up the Eiffel Tower
Elementary penguin singing Hare Krishna
Man, you should have seen them kicking Edgar Allan Poe
I am the eggman, they are the eggmen
I am the walrus
Goo Goo G'joob, Goo-Goo Goo G'joob
Goo Goo G'joob, Goo-Goo Goo G'joob
Juba juba juba, juba, juba, juba, juba, juba, juba juba. Juba juba
"Three below the blank skies, rumming up the blues. You know, it's true
Nice. Love the people, love the people..."



I sit back with this pack of Zig Zags and this bag
Of this weed it gives me the shit needed to be
The most meanest MC on this - on this Earth
And since birth I've been cursed with this curse to just curse
And just blurt this berserk and bizarre shit that works
And it sells and it helps in itself to relieve
All this tension dispensing these sentences
Getting this stress that's been eating me recently off of this chest
But at least have the decency in you
To leave me alone, when you freaks see me out
In the streets when I'm eating or feeding my daughter
I don't know you and no,
I don't owe you a motherfucking thing
I'm not Mr. N'Sync, I'm not what your friends think
I'm not Mr. Friendly, I can be a prick
No patience is in me and if you offend me
I don't care who was there and who saw me destroy you
Go call you a lawyer, file you a lawsuit
I'll smile in the courtroom and buy you a wardrobe
I don't mean to be mean, but that's all I can be is just me

And I am, whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news everyday I am
Radio won't even play my jam
'Cause I am, whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news everyday I am
I don't know, it's just the way I am

Sometimes I just feel like my father,
I hate to be bothered
With all of this nonsense it's constant
And, "Oh, it's his lyrical content -
- the song 'Guilty Conscience' has gotten such rotten responses"
And all of this controversy circles me
And it seems like the media immediately
So I point one back at 'em, but not the index or pinkie
Or the ring or the thumb, it's the one you put up
When you don't give a fuck, when you won't just put up
With the bullshit they pull, 'cause they full of shit too
When a dude's getting bullied and shoots up his school
Where were the parents at? And look where it's at
Middle America, now it's a tragedy
Now it's so sad to see, an upper class city
But I'm glad 'cause they feed me the fuel that I need for the fire
To burn and it's burning and I have returned

And I am, whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news everyday I am
Radio won't even play my jam
'Cause I am, whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news everyday I am
I don't know it's just the way I am

I'm so sick and tired of being admired
That I wish that I would just die or get fired
And dropped from my label, let's stop with the fables
I'm not gonna be able to top on "My Name is... "
And pigeon-holed into some pop-py sensation
That got me rotation at rock'n'roll stations
To deal with these cocky Caucasians who think
I'm some wigger who just tries to be black 'cause I talk
With an accent, and grab on my balls, so they always keep asking
What school did I go to, what hood I grew up in
The why, the who what when, the where, and the how
'Til I'm grabbing my hair and I'm tearing it out
I'm racing, I'm pacing, I stand and I sit
And I'm thankful for every fan that I get
But I can't take a shit, in the bathroom
Without someone standing by it
No, I won't sign your autograph
You can call me an asshole I'm glad

'Cause I am, whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news everyday I am
Radio won't even play my jam
'Cause I am, whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news everyday I am
I don't know, it's just the way I am



Look, if you had one shot, or one opportunity
To seize everything you ever wanted, in one moment
Would you capture it or just let it slip?

Yo, his palms are sweaty, knees weak, arms are heavy
He's nervous, but on the surface he looks calm and ready
To drop bombs, but he keeps on forgetting
What he wrote down, the whole crowd goes so loud
He opens his mouth, but the words won't come out
He's choking, how? Everybody's joking now
The clock's run out, time's up, over—blaow!
Snap back to reality, oh, there goes gravity, oh
There goes Rabbit, he choked, he's so mad, but he won't
Give up that easy, no, he won't have it, he knows
His whole back's to these ropes, it don't matter, he's dope
He knows that, but he's broke, he's so stagnant, he knows
When he goes back to this mobile home, that's when it's
Back to the lab again, yo! This whole rhapsody
Better go capture this moment and hope it don't pass him

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better…

His soul's escaping through this hole that is gaping
This world is mine for the taking, make me king
As we move toward a New World Order
A normal life is boring; but superstardom's
Close to post-mortem, it only grows harder
Homie grows hotter, he blows, it's all over
These hoes is all on him, coast-to-coast shows
He's known as the Globetrotter, lonely roads
God only knows, he's grown farther
From home, he's no father
He goes home and barely knows his own daughter
But hold your nose, ‘cause here goes the cold water
These hoes don't want him no mo', he's cold product
They moved on to the next schmoe who flows
He nose-dove and sold nada, and so the soap opera
Is told, it unfolds, I suppose it's old, partner
But the beat goes on da-da-dom, da-dom, dah-dah, dah-dah

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better…

No more games, I'ma change what you call rage
Tear this motherfuckin' roof off like two dogs caged
I was playing in the beginning, the mood all changed
I've been chewed up and spit out and booed off stage
But I kept rhymin' and stepped right in the next cypher
Best believe somebody's paying the Pied Piper
All the pain inside amplified by the
Fact that I can't get by with my nine-to-
Five, and I can't provide the right type of
Life for my family ‘cause, man, these goddamn
Food stamps don't buy diapers, and there's no movie
There's no Mekhi Phifer, this is my life
And these times are so hard, and it's getting even harder
Tryna feed and water my seed; plus, teeter-totter
Caught up between being a father and a prima donna
Baby mama drama, screaming on her
Too much for me to wanna stay in one spot
Another day of monotony's gotten me to the point
I'm like a snail, I've got to formulate a plot
Or end up in jail or shot
Success is my only motherfuckin' option—failure's not
Mom, I love you, but this trailer's got to go
I cannot grow old in Salem's Lot
This may be the only opportunity that I got

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better…

You can do anything you set your mind to, man

